339 of 382 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy favorite entertainment tablet,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Comdet-See all my reviews(TOP 50 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have an iPad and an HP Touchpad, but the Fire has quickly turned into my favorite tablet for entertainment activities. The reasons are simple - it makes it incredibly easy to access movies, TV shows, books and magazines from Amazon, many of which are free under Prime. I can hold it for hours without it getting uncomfortable, the screen is great, and the overall look and feel of the operating system is intuitive. Storing and accessing content on the Amazon Cloud is also a seamless, simple process.I was concerned about the screen size since I've become used to the larger tablet screen sizes of the iPad and Touchpad. I'm finding that the benefits of a smaller screen size (easier to hold in one hand and light weight) outweigh most of the disadvantages. I miss a larger screen the most when I'm reading a magazine or a newspaper, but the copy remains highly readable even on the smaller screen.Sound quality is decent with the onboard speakers. Nothing spectacular but workable. I find a decent set of headphones/earbuds to be a worthwhile addition. The touchscreen is also not without an occassional glitch. I get the same "lack of a final polish" feeling using this as I do with my Touchpad versus the more slick feeling of the iPad. But none of these issues impact usability, and I'm willing to let some factors slide in exchange for a more affordable price.Is it an "iPad killer" or an "Android tablet killer"? No. But why is that even an issue? I wanted an easy way to avail myself of the benefits of Prime membership (most notably being able to stream shows and movies for free) and the Fire accomplishes this very well. It comes at a price that's a lot easier to handle than the iPad, and a level of ease of use/functionality that's easier to handle than Android tablets.None of the so-called limitations of the Fire detract from my using it. Yes it has limited onboard storage but with the way the Cloud is integrated, I've not had any difficulty using that as a way of storing content. Plus, when Amazon stores it, they deal with the issue of backup. I also don't miss the 3G connectivity. Sure, I'd love to be able to connect anywhere, but I will not pay the prices charged for data connectivity. I never use the 3G on my iPad for the same reason - just costs too much!I'll certainly keep and continue to use my iPad since I use that a lot for work. But when I'm done with work and want to have fun, the Fire will be in hand. It's cheap, works well, and provides access to virtually unlimited video and print entertainment. For me it's a perfect fit.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

9,207 of 9,583 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsI want to love it, I really do. But I can't.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;waetherman-See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As a long-time Kindle fan I was eager to get my hands on a Fire. For the most part I've found that it does what I wanted it to, which is be the one device I can take with me anywhere. There are some great features; the reader app is excellent (though not without flaws), the app store experience is terrific, videos are fantastic, and the device is quick and for the most part dead-simple to use, all thanks to the services Amazon provides. And of course the extras that come with Prime membership really make it a real value - I won't be cancelling my Netflix streaming account just yet (watching Netflix on the Fire works very well) but I imagine within a year Amazon's free streaming video catalog will be just as good as Netflix. The free "lending library" book every month really is the icing on the cake though, and makes Prime membership a no-brainer. The hardware itself is solid and has a quality feel, it's just the right size for one-handed use, and the screen is fantastic (for an LCD screen) with good brightness and excellent color, and a very wide viewing angle. So as a reader, video player and music streaming device the Fire excels, and as an occasional browsing, emailing, game playing tablety thing it does pretty well.But there are some downsides too; the small bezel size makes holding it without inadvertent page-turns difficult, the lack of buttons makes controls harder, the accessible storage memory is limited to just 5GB, which seems awfully small when carrying my own video content on a trip, and overall the interface of the system is just a little awkward and unfinished. Sometimes the back button doesn't work, buttons are hard to push accurately or launch the wrong function, navigation isn't exactly intuitive, etc. Particularly annoying are things like the way that almost half the screen is taken up by menu bars when browsing in landscape mode, the "momentum" of the browsing not stopping, menu bars that sometimes just pop up randomly while reading, and the navigation of Newsstand content like the New York Times is incredibly awkward. And then there's the jerkiness that happens when browsing or navigating other content; to me, this just shouldn't happen when reading a book. This is a Kindle, after all.On the missing or unfinished side its disappointing that there isn't even a little bit of social media built in - no sharing clips of books or newsstand material via email, FB or twitter. Also missing is the "read out loud" found on other Kindles, and the new "X-Ray" feature found on the other new Kindles. There is no archiving or syncing personal documents - they have to be mailed individually to the Fire. And there's no page numbers in the books - c'mon, Amazon, this is even available for the old Kindles at this point. The browser lacks some basic functionality like being able to rearrange bookmarks, and other little annoyances. The email application is very basic, and doesn't always format text properly, and doesn't have simple things like a landscape mode to view a list of messages. But the biggest "unfinished" feature of the Fire is the Cloud integration; the Cloud doesn't work hand-in-glove with the Fire in the way you think it might. In order to access features like the video or the docs, you basically have to go through a browser the way you would from any other device. For the most part the Cloud acts only as a digital locker for items purchased from Amazon, not seamlessly as a repository for any kind of content you want to access from the Fire. The way the Cloud seems to be marketed, and the way it should work, is that the Fire and the Cloud should work seamlessly together for all kinds of content; if you upload your own movie from your PC to the Cloud, you should see it in your Video tab on the Fire, and be able to stream it or download it. If you upload folders of work documents to the Cloud, they should be available to browse and download from the Fire's Doc tab. But that's not the way it works. For whatever reason, the Fire's using a Frankenstein mix of the Cloud, Kindle digital library, the app store, and local storage to handle content needs. It just isn't quite ready for prime time, and it isn't what people are expecting when they pick up the Fire.All of these little things add up to make what could be a great device merely adequate. Many will be able to overlook these problems and enjoy the Kindle Fire for what it is; an inexpensive all-in-one-entertainment device. I only point them out to remind people that they should not expect perfection from the Kindle Fire, at least not out of the box. Over the next few months it's possible (likely) that many of the problems I have could be fixed with software revisions - i.e. the bezel problem could be fixed by making the margins in the reader app non-active, for instance, and the problem with the menus taking up too much room could be fixed by making them accessible via swipe-up or swipe-down. Hopefully Amazon is already working on these things. Until then, I'm trying to learn to live with the Fire as best I can. Maybe I can learn to love it.NOTE: This review has been edited slightly since it was originally posted for the purposes of clarity and to answer questions that have come up in the comments thread to this review. Please leave a comment if you need clarification or think that something has been missed.UPDATE NOV 30: a recent software update seems to have fixed several of the above problems, specifically the system speed and page-turning speed are better, and the button response is much improved. Random menus no longer appear when reading, momentum in the browser doesn't seem to be a problem anymore, and the carousel is much easier to use as a result of it having slightly more "friction" in paging through the most recent items used.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (715)

4,514 of 4,696 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOutstanding Value at $199 and Full of Functionality / Bells / Whistles,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Michael Gallagher(Houston, TX)  -See all my reviews(TOP 50 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had a chance to play with the Kindle Fire for a few hours now, and overall I think it is a great tool /toy when you factor in the cost of ownership and what you get.  Compared to $500 minimum for the introductory price of the bottom of the line iPad2 (WiFi only), at $199 this is a great buy.Using a Wifi connection at two different locations, the speed was pretty fast connecting to the Amazon server as well as to a couple of Internet sites.  I had fast connectivity and display on Fox News, CNN, my personalized Yahoo page, and the website of the International Association of Penturners (hey, I do have hobbies!).  I had slow connectivity at both Wifi locations with Google, ESPN, MSNBC, the Houston Chronicle, and the Weather Channel - I hope the unique app for ESPN and the Weather Channel are a lot faster, but I haven't loaded them onto the Fire yet.  I will point out with the exception of the Google website, those other sites listed as slow are usually slow on my other handheld devices such as my Droid phone and my work iPad2 (yes, the Kindle guy owns and uses an iPad for work purposes).  The web browser is called Silk, and it is nice and user-friendly.Let's talk about what I see as the benefits first:The screen size to me is just right for what I will be using it for - I have used an iPad and the screen is larger - but I did watch about 15 minutes of an episode of season 3 of 24 on the Fire and I didn't have screen envy or felt like I was missing anything.  The sound quality was good, but I listened to it mainly with a set of headphones so I wouldn't wake my kids.Concerning size of the overall unit - not too heavy or bulky and it fits nice in your hand.  I have it in one of the Marware covers and it just "feels" right: that's not a firm statement for a review, I know, but what else can I say?  Holding the iPad feels a little bulky at times but the Fire is just a little bit larger than my Kindle keypad, so I was pretty much conditioned to this size over the past few years.  Compared to the iPad, the Fire doesn't generate near as much heat.Speed of the apps as well as reading a book is VERY fast and responsive.  I haven't tried a a challenging spreadsheet or Word document with the Open Office app yet, but then again I can't think of too many times where (based on my guesstimated usage) I will be doing those kind of tasks on my Fire: I like to keep my work separate from play.  Maybe the time will come when business applications will become more prevalent with the Fire, but that's a story for another day.Back to the pricing - $199 is an absolute steal for a unit with this many features.  Compare that to an iPad2 at more than twice the price for a few more inches of screen space.  Some people really want that, but it doesn't bother me.  You will also receive a month free of Prime membership and I highly recommend you try out the benefits, which are more than free two-day shipping.  You get full access to thousands of movies and tv shows for free.  You can give them a test drive on your Fire and see if it is for you or not.  I already rent a lot of movies to my Tivo via Amazon, and I can see the functionality of the free movies combined with the for rent options being able to be played on this device as very compelling for when I go on business trips.And, for those of you I've been playing Words with Friends with, this morning's moves were made on the Fire - the touchscreen worked flawlessly.I transferred some music to the Fire and it works like a charm.  I haven't had enough time to really dive deep into this feature yet and come up with a playlist or jukebox list, but the sounds quality was nice: not too loud and not too soft.Here are some potential negatives:I don't think I will be reading too much on this device.  Who knows, that opinion may change, but I REALLY like the Kindle for reading with its eInk screen.  I read a lot outside or in bright light, and based upon my experiences with reading on an iPad the eInk is better than the full color for reading outside. However, my youngest child really likes the full color resolution as the books he likes to read has a lot of pictures in it (he's in elementary school).  So, to each their own.  I didn't purchase the Fire for reading, but more for entertainment.As mentioned above, the screen is smaller than an iPad.  That doesn't bother me (see comments above), but it may bother some people where size matters or they have to have the "biggest" of this and that.I really wish they would have shipped this thing with a micro USB cord: if there is one in the packaging I missed it.  Luckily, I have a few of them in the house, so I wasn't too put out.  I imagine they did that to keep the overall cost at $199.There are lots of apps available for the Fire because it uses the DROID platform, but Apple lovers will pound their chest and say "but we have over a million apps" blah blah blah.  I think you should look at the QUALITY of the app vs. the quantity, as there is certainly a lot of junk in the iPad app store (as there is the DROID store), but your basic functionality for the apps I want / need are there.Overall, at $199 this is an extremely great value to me and well worth it: Amazon has hit a home run with this one.  If you haven't grabbed one now, get one before they run out before Christmas!EDIT TO ADD:Okay, I've tried to add this twice and it bombed, so hopefully the third time is the charm.  Email setup was very easy - it took about a minute to setup my main Google account, and I was able to send a test message to another account as well as receive and reply to other emails.  I sent a picture via email to the Fire and it showed crisp and clear.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (89)

2,027 of 2,126 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsFire - the FAQ,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;A. Dent "Aragorn"(Minas Anor, GD)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(TOP 10 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(HALL OF FAME REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I tried to make the first 2 sections as informative and as objective as possible, hoping that anyone not yet decided whether they want a Fire or not may find this at least marginally useful. The rest and the star rating should be heavily influenced by my own subjectivity and biases.PLAYING WITH FIRE (USABILITY)Q: Do I get free and unrestricted access the Web?A: Yes. The Silk, multi-tabbed browser allows access to just about anything on the Web.Q: Can I store songs, video, photos on the Fire?A: Yes. The Fire has about 5GB of physical storage space. In addition, Amazon offers 5GB of free 'cloud' online storage for non-Amazon media.Q: Is the 5GB of physical storage large enough for, let's say, 50 apps, 1000 songs, 1000 photos and 100 home videos?A: Yes, except for the home videos.Q: Does 'Kindle' indicate that this is a true reader, like the other Amazon Kindles?A: No. The Fire is a customized Android tablet with a backlit touchscreen. While it does come with a Kindle app accessed through the 'Books' tap on the home screen, the reading experience is similar to that from any other tablet.Q: Does the Fire make it easy to access Amazon content?A: Yes. The Fire was designed to facilitate that. You will have easy and immediate access to you Amazon-purchased books, music, video and apps and to their related stores so that you may purchase more.Q: Does the Fire make it easy to access non-Amazon content?A: No. You can transfer and retrieve/play non-DRM content directly into the Fire via an USB cable. Anything stored on Amazon's Cloud that's non Amazon-purchased shouldn't exceed 5GB or you will have to pay a fee for the additional storage.Q: If I have another Android tablet/phone, will I have all the already-purchased apps available on the Fire?A: Yes and No. YES for all the apps downloaded from Amazon's Appstore and NO for all others.Q: Are 'major' apps such as Netflix or Pandora preinstalled?A: No but they are easy, quick and free downloads from Amazon's Appstore.Q: Is the Amazon Appstore the default store for Android apps?A: Yes. And Amazon would like it to be the only store.Q: Do I have access to non-Amazon Android app stores?A: No. Or not unless you are prepared to engage in some serious tinkering. While you can install Amazon's Appstore on any Android tablet from Google's Marketplace, Amazon's Appstore does not carry a Google Marketplace app at the time I'm writing this.Q: Can I install apps from sources other than the Amazon's Appstore?A: Yes but it's not easy. A Fire setting will enable the installing of non-Amazon Appstore apps but, without access to third-party app stores, some skills are required.Q: Are there any Google apps available at the Appstore?A: Not at the time I'm writing this.Q: Is it easy to buy Amazon digital or non-digital merchandise through the Fire?A: Yes, it's very easy. Fire is built to facilitate that.Q: Is it possible to turn off 1-Click?A: Yes and No. 1-Click can be disabled for non-digital purchases but it can NOT be disabled for digital purchases.Q: Can I prevent my kids or anyone else from making purchases while using the Fire?A: You can password-protect access to the Fire itself but, once in, it's impossible to prevent 1-Click ordering of digital content.Q: Are there ANY restrictions I can set?A: You can disable in-app purchases or you can set parental controls with a PIN for in-app purchases if enabled. Post-patch, you can password-protect Wi-Fi.Q: Are 'parental controls' limited to requiring PINs for in-app purchases?A: Yes.Q: Is it possible to make any of my past digital purchases disappear from Fire's 'cloud'?A: No. (According to Amazon's Customer Service rep.)Q: Would Amazon allow me to 'return' digital items that I (or someone else using my Fire) ordered by mistake?A: I was told by a Customer Service person that there is a 7-day refund policy on digital items. Not tested by me.Q: Does the purchase come with any perks?A: Yes. You get one-month free Amazon Prime which translates in free 2-day shipping and access to Amazon's streaming video library.Q: Did the Dec. 20, 2011 patch address all parental control and unrestricted 1-Click issues?A: No. Password-protecting Wi-Fi access does not address these issues because it's an 'all or nothing', crude and ineffective answer to real concerns. Password-protecting Wi-Fi is not a solution to anyone who would like to allow access to most cloud content but restrict or block 1-Click purchases and access to certain categories of content.INTO THE FIRE (SPECS AND FEATURES)Q: Is the Fire display bright and sharp?A: Yes.Q: Is battery life on par with today's expectation?A: About 4 hours of battery life are a little bit less than what competition offers.Q: How does the Fire connect to the outside world?A: Fire is a Wi-Fi device. There is no 3G/4G. You can also connect and transfer connect from a PC/laptop via the USB port.Q: Can the Fire be charged from a laptop or a standard USB charger?A: Not very efficiently. The charger that comes with the Fire is rated 1.8A/5V. Generic USB chargers output a lot less than 1.8A.Q: Does the Fire have cameras?A: No.Q: Does the Fire have a microphone?A: No.Q: Does the Fire have a motion sensor?A: Yes.Q: Does the Fire come with GPS, compass, IR sensors?A: No.Q: Does the Fire have Bluetooth?A: No.Q: Does the Fire have an HDMI port?A: No.Q: Is there any way to pair a physical keyboard, speakers or some display device with the Fire?A: Not at the time I'm writing this.Q: What are the sound output options?A: Sound outputs through the speakers or through the headphones port.Q: Absent volume control buttons, is it possible to control volume through Fire's virtual controls from within an app?A: It depends on the app. Some apps do not allow it.Q: Is Fire's storage expandable through memory cards?A: No.Q: Is CPU performance adequate?A: Yes.KINDLING THE FIRE (my conclusions and rating)I found the Fire to be a good pick for anyone seeking a small, portable interface into the digital content world 'out there', especially but by no means limited to Amazon-provided content. However, for anyone who would like to share their Kindle, the Fire may be a little too hot to handle at this time, especially if you are sharing it with kids or if it's meant to be used by a kid. Please read my note at the bottom of this review for the details. I also listed Fire's other issues with the hope that I may be able to help anyone not sure whether the Fire is indeed what they want.After several months of me and my daughter playing with the Fire I can say that I am generally pleased with my purchase. I will be thrilled once Amazon addresses at least the huge problem having to do with parental controls over Fire-made purchases. I also hope that Amazon open the Fire a little bit more to non-Amazon content sources and... please... I want my Gmail app.The Fire is Okay because it's an inexpensive, easy to use, capable, not fully locked tablet. It makes it easy to buy and 'consume' all kinds DRMed of media, especially that which is stored in Amazon's cloud (free for all Amazon purchases) and I had little difficulty adding my own DRM-free content. The Fire is not a replacement for PCs or laptops but no tablets are. I don't miss an outward looking camera because there are much better alternatives to taking pics with a tablet but a little cam looking at user's face and a mic (video calls) would add significant value to a good product. Then, of course, there are the issues I listed above.I'm going to grant the Fire 3 stars at this time. Three stars mean "It's Okay." My rating could and should improve once Amazon addresses some of the issues I listed above.______________________________________________________NOTE on 1-CLICK PURCHASES (playing with FIRE revisited)It is currently impossible to turn off 1-Click purchases of most media on the Fire. This is quite an issue for anyone who has kids, especially if the user happens to be the kid. The way the Fire is currently set up you are going to get your song or your movie or your book almost the instant you touch them while browsing through the store. This may be okay when you are using a laptop because you can set multiple accounts and make sure that only those authorized can order things but the Fire can be easily shared and I'm not aware of a way that would allow both multiple accounts and the ability to access the purchased media at the same time.To make the story short, it is possible to set some controls but at the App Store only but it's only for in-app purchases. The other media stores: music, movies, books do not allow for any restrictions such as asking for a password or PIN before completing a purchase transaction. The Customer Support person I discussed this verified that this is indeed the case and she promised to forward my feedback to the higher ups. Until then, I am and I will continue to be very concerned. Not that our daughter would knowingly buy the entire Amazon movie library without my permission but that, possibly, one of her friends would do that without being fully aware of what she is doing. Amazon MUST address this or sell the Fire as an 'adults only' product.--&gt;&gt; Brush your teeth, it's the law! &lt;&lt;Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (78)

1,209 of 1,277 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA great device and an excellent value,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;Learn Richly "Learn Richly dot com"(Indiana)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)SHORT SUMMARY: WHO SHOULD BUY A KINDLE FIRE=============================================The Fire is an all-around excellent device, especially for the price.DO BUY IT, without hesitation, if you want to consume media by yourself or with one other person (max). For example, if you read books and other Kindle content, surf the web, look at photos and want to watch Amazon Instant Videos (Movies &amp; TV) or web-based video sites, then the Kindle will serve your needs well.DON'T buy it if you consume as a group or want to do any creation other than the occasional social media post. Watching movies with many other people is hard (7" isn't that big), and the lack of keyboard options, Bluetooth, etc., makes this a very focused device that creators will soon tire of. Doing anything with maps is difficult or impossible, as are all the nifty apps that require a camera, so if those limitations are a deal-breaker then look at a Samsung Galaxy Tab (to stay small) or iPad (big and expensive).OVERALL STRENGTHS====================+ The IPS screen is nothing short of fabulous. I've spent several hours staring at it now and am still amazed. It makes my friend's iPad 2 look grainy. Using this as a high-end photo frame on your desk is actually tempting because the colors are so rich. The screen is very close to 16:9 (15.36:9) and fits movies much better than a 4:3 iPad screen, which negates much of the 2.7" screen size difference between the two (but the reverse is true for old videos that are not widescreen). Overall, the video experience is good enough that you soon become immersed in the movie and you forget about the medium. Plus, since it's so small, you can carry with you more often.+ The overall feel and construction is super-solid. The rubber/silicone backing gives such peace-of-mind; at this price, I don't plan on buying a case for mine in the foreseeable future.+ Compact size. It's about the size of a "steno" pad. You can throw it in your backpack, purse, or coat pocket. Overall the Fire is a great balance between usability and portability--much more screen space than a smartphone (at about the same price) but lacking only one typical phone storage option: in your front pocket.+ Simplicity and UI polish of the overall experience is tight. I wouldn't hesitate to give this device to a total tablet novice. This is a great gift idea for even the most technologically-challenged individual.+ Speed is perfectly adequate for anything I've had to throw at it. I've tried at least half a dozen games now and they are buttery smooth. The crisp display and saturated colors make it such a joy to re-examine all my old apps.+ The email client is slick! I have used apps like TouchDown and want to cry because they are so ugly and complicated. Not so with the Fire! Even though this is not a "creator" device, I am glad that they didn't skimp on a full-featured email client that actually looks nice.+ Silk web browser! Side by side on the same wi-fi connection vs. my dual-core Android phone, the web browser doesn't seem that much faster. HOWEVER--they were both *very* fast! Keep in mind two things: 1) Silk is taking away bottlenecks, but if your existing wi-fi connection is already super-fast (i.e. no bottleneck), you won't notice the difference. 2) The "cloud" improvements will only begin to work when there is a large group of Kindle users who are sending data to Amazon so that they can start proactively caching. It should get faster and faster as more people start using it, so don't feel bad if you're not seeing any speed change out of the box.+ Content, content, content. What sold it for me was the new Kindle Owner's Lending Library. For my $79 Prime subscription I'm getting access to a ton of shows that were are least partially available elsewhere, but no one else is giving away a book a month. I've seen at least a dozen titles I want to read, so my schedule is "booked" (sorry, couldn't resist) for a year solid. I was already a Prime member, but had never purchased a eInk Kindle because, so now I will have a "Kindle Device" that will qualify me to read a free book a month.OVERALL WEAKNESSES====================-No GPS or Google Maps is a disappointment. I wanted this thing to be a huge GPS to take in the car, but without a GPS chip that can't happen.-No Bluetooth limits its use as a creation device. The $30 Bluetooth keyboard I use for my Android phone is useless for the Fire. Please, someone, make a MicroUSB keyboard that works easily with the Fire or point me to one that already works with the Fire and I'll update this section (I couldn't find any on Amazon).-Lack of hardware buttons was at first a turn-off, but after the tenth time of accidentally hitting the home button playing a game on my Android phone, I now appreciate this minimalist approach taken by the Fire. There's the power-button that you may occasionally bump by accident, but you just need to turn the whole thing upside down and the power button is then at the top--problem solved. The remaining complaint is the missing volume button, but I can also understand the reasons behind that. The original iPod touch lacked volume buttons, but they eventually included hardware controls on subsequent devices.-Content Lock-in. This is the flip-side of the coin for having so much Amazon content. Since there's no HDMI, any movies you buy are going to be stuck on the device unless your TV also supports Amazon Instant Video streaming. I think the strength of selection outweighs this, but it's something to keep in mind!-(Minor) Does not play WMV files. My Android phone does this--why is this codec missing?-Battery life--The specified battery life is really a best-case: you'll want to charge this device at least every other night. It's terrible compared to an iPad 2 and great compared to a typical dual-core phone. It remains to be seen if the competition from the large bricks and mortar book store's new tablet is any better, but on paper they say theirs is longer.CREATIVE USES FOR THE FIRE==========================+ Fitness. Use your new Fire as an indoors exercise companion for treadmills, stationary bikes, elliptical machines, etc. Make yourself a commitment to not watch TV until you've worked-out first (while watching/listening/reading on the Fire, of course). It's the perfect size to strap-on or permanently adhere to your home fitness apparatus. This device and a Prime membership is about the same cost as two months for a personal trainer.+ Schools and home schools. With the number of education apps out there (and ease of development), expect the Kindle Fire to become THE device for kids to use in their studies. This device, in 2011 dollars, is about the same price as my fancy graphing calculator in high school during the early 90s, so we can only guess what kinds of cool education-centric applications will come from this new class of gizmo. For parents, see a variety of great sites (like mine, Learn Richly) that make it easier to evaluate very fun products that make learning a breeze!+ Small business elegance. What if your customers in the waiting room were each given Kindle Fires instead of magazines? How about giving your next sales pitch or presentation as an interactive HTML5 web page that allows your client to engage with the content even as you're explaining it? This also becomes the perfect Kiosk device because it's so open, inexpensive and ubiquitous.+ Lists and reference. Putting a $700 iPad in your shopping cart while you check of grocery items makes me nervous, but somehow I'd feel safe doing that with my rugged-feeling grippy-backed Fire. Use it around the house for the kids' chore chart or as a "dedicated" to-do list while at work (what good is the task list in Outlook if I never look at it?)--this price point makes all sorts of things feasible, and especially if you buy multiple devices to establish a community of users in your office or home.APPS INCLUDED &amp; MISSING w/SUBSTITUTE SUGGESTIONS=================================================Built-in you will find already downloaded:+ Kindle Reader App (with more layout options, such as line spacing and margins, than the current phone Android Kindle app)+ Amazon shopping app+ Integrated Music, Video and Web browsing (Silk)+ "Docs" tab that takes documents you email to your @kindle email address and puts them in Kindle format+ Audible audio books app (Amazon subsidiary)+ IMDB (internet movie database) app for information about movies, actors, etc. (Amazon subsidiary)+ Contacts app (looks like standard Android with Fire skin)--will sync with GMail contacts and probably others+ Email app with built-in support for Gmail, Yahoo, Hotmail, AOL and "other", i.e. POP for my ISP worked (not sure about IMAP). Attention:  NO MS EXCHANGE/OUTLOOK :(+ QuickOffice, which is a *viewer* for PowerPoint, Excel and Word--no editing at all+ Gallery app for photos--looks like you'll need a MicroUSB cable and a computer to do much with it, though+ Help &amp; Feedback+ Facebook--seems to be a link to the mobile site+ Pulse--good, possibly great, news aggregator/reader+ Other various popular apps/games that are links (but not already downloaded)--may be trials or ad-supported and you can get them from the AppStore anyway. Thanks for not installing them Amazon! This device is refreshingly free of "bloatware"Missing:- Task list &amp; Memo / note- taking--I recommend ColorNote Notepad Notes that has both of these functions- Alarm clock--I recommend Alarm Clock Xtreme Free- Calendar--too many choices to recommend a replacement, but you'll probably get one with a paid Exchange email client- Calculator--I recommend Calculator Ultimate Lite- Weather--AccuWeather for Android or My-Cast Weather Lite both get good reviewsAnything else I've missed? Comments welcome, thanks!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (36)

401 of 428 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFirst Impression...It works well as a tablet too!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;DubStep(San Francisco)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This will be a review that will be updated as I continue to use the Kindle.SHORT BACKSTORY: I own a 1st gen Kindle, and despite its original design flaws, I have put it to great use. I am a Prime member. When I saw a tablet(ish) device with a modded version of Android, made by Amazon, with a dual core processor and a smaller, more portable form factor than the iPad for sale at the easy on the wallet price of $199, I pre-ordered immediately.FIRST IMPRESSION: The packaging it comes in is very simple. The Kindle came in a brown cardboard box, which I expected to open and see a Kindle box, but rather opened and saw the Fire itself. Underneath was the Micro USB charger. I immediately plugged it in and fired it up. First thing it asked was to connect to WiFi (it showed every network within at least a 300 ft radius (my office floor is shared with a few others). Connection was hassle free. Then it asked me a few questions, registered quickly with Amazon, and then updated the software. After that 5 minute process, I was free to explore.OS: Intuitive and easy to navigate. A lot of cool little nav helpers come up to explain the various navigational aspects and preloaded apps. It immediately showed all the books in my library.TOUCHSCREEN: Seems very responsive. Keyboard typing was easy enough, especially when laid out landscape. I know other Android devices can bring up different keyboards, so I'll be looking into this.PROCESSING: Haven't opened up anything super intense, but navigating between apps is smooth and doesn't stutter.INTERNET: Took about 6 seconds to fully load a Reuters news page. I've read Silk gets faster with more use, so I'll expect that, but for now, it's definitely fast enough.CLOUD CONNECTION: Awesome. I love everything about it. All my content was readily available and I know my usage of this will go up now that I have this device.MEDIA: I quickly threw on an episode of 24. It looked very crisp and had no trouble whatsoever with streaming. I'll dive into Hulu and Netflix a little later.That's all I've gotten through at the moment. I put this at 5 stars because it MET MY EXPECTATIONS. I read all about this device before buying it, so I knew exactly what I was getting for $199 dollars. It has met all of my expectations of a small form factor tablet that is intuitive, media friendly, and has great processing capabilities. I did not expect an iPad, so there is no comparison in my mind.My next update will go a bit more in depth into EMAIL and Document capabilities as well as exploring some apps. I hope you enjoy this as much as I am!------UPDATE #1EMAILNICE: Email setup is a breeze for GMAIL (including IMAP) and they present a unified inbox view which is nice. However, they don't thread the emails, but that's not a huge issue.BUMMER: Native Email app doesn't support MS exchange, had to download an app. Again, it's not a big deal, but would have been nice to get work emails on this.Sent a PowerPoint Presentation to my personal email and opened it on the Fire. It displayed perfectly in hi res...I am a happy camper at this moment :)UPDATE #1.5APPS: This is my first Android(ish) device and as such my first experience with the Amazon appstore. App store is coming up shallow (in variety of apps) esp. in the finance apps department. That is just my initial response and I may not be entering the right search strings (for finance, I tried Bloomberg, finance, finance apps). I'm SURE as more and more Kindle Fire's come online, the developer community will focus on improving and optimizing more apps.Free APP a day program is very cool and I will be sure to set a reminder to look into this every day.I would gladly take any suggestions for finance (news, stocks, charts etc.) apps or any others.UPDATE #2Loving the Pandora app. And the Cloud player! And just discovered that you can upload UNLIMITED MP3 files to the Cloud just by upgrading to the 20GB plan ($20 annually...). For me, that's over 60GB of music available anywhere + 20GB of anything else. Awesome.UPDATE #3Now that I've spent a great amount of time with the Fire, I can honestly say that I'm very happy with the purchase. It functions fantastically as a tablet device. It could rival the iPad due to the plethora of media streaming options, portability, CLOUD capabilities, flash availability, and basic functionality (but don't set your expectation on this, it IS NOT positioned to be an iPad competitor).I downloaded the TouchDown Exchange app for receiving work emails. The Accuweather app is much more functional than the native Weather Channel app. Thompson Reuters News Pro is a great reader, especially for financial news. Netflix and Hulu + both work very well and I have had no issue in streaming content for both. YouVersion still needs some refining, but it looks great on this tablet.I am starting to realize that the lack of 3g will be a bummer moving forward, but it is not a blocker yet. If the developer community picks up the popularity of the Fire, I will be excited to see a plethora of new apps coming online.Again, overall, I am pleased at how functional this is as a tablet.FINAL UPDATENo issues so far (3rd day of ownership). This thing doesn't leave my side (at home or the office). Amazon's free app a day program is awesome; today downloaded an email app that is normally $10 for my favorite price...free99. My biggest gripe at the moment is that they don't have multiple keyboard options (outside of landscape or portrait). This was available on other tablet devices with Android OS and would make typing a bit easier. But please...for $200, this thing kicks ass.UPDATE (as of DEC. 19th)The FIRE is working great. I stand by my initial 5 star rating.Not thrilled with Amazon's app store, but like I said before, it will get better as more developers come on line. All of my previous comments still stand. Amazon's free app a day program should not be overlooked as its utility has been fantastic. The BEST thing about this is its form factor. I didn't realize how important this was until I found myself carrying my Fire with me everywhere. With the amount I  use it, I'm happy that it is light and almost pocket sized. Battery life seems to be about 5 hours with heavy use, 7.5 with reading. I charge this thing every night along side my iPhone, so it's not a burden. This makes a great gift for any electronics fan looking for a reader and mobile media player.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (22)

188 of 199 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExactly what I wanted in a tablet,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;J. Gower-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been a long time fence-sitter in the tablet wars, but I finally decided that the Kindle Fire was what I was looking for.  I had previously purchased the original iPad for my son, but he never used it so I was very worried about spending that much cash for what I feared would be an expensive toy.I was primarily interested in tablets for mobile web browsing, watching some videos now and then (I have a ton of digital movies), and that's about it.  I have a very small music collection, which I've moved to both Google Music and Amazon's cloud storage, so I'm not what you'd consider a big mobile entertainment guy.So far, from the time I've spent with it, the Fire is going to fit the bill nicely.1. WEB.  The Silk web browser is fast enough. I don't bother running side-by-side tests, as all I worry about is whether or not I'm going to become irritated by page loads.  Thankfully, that's not the case.  The text IS a bit dithered (blurry) in some places, which I assume is an artifact of Silk's server-side rendering, but it hasn't seriously affected legibility.  Web videos load pretty darned fast, and the entire browser experience just works.2. VIDEO.  I streamed one of my Amazon Unbox videos as soon as I opened the Fire, and was very pleased with the speed at which the video appeared as well as how quickly the controls just got out of the way so I could enjoy the flick.  It's going to be an EXCELLENT device for videos.3. MUSIC.  The streaming music store works pretty doggone flawlessly.  The only complaint I have so far is that I can't seem to find any difference in the equalizer settings.  Beyond that, since I'm not terribly into music, it suits my purposes just fine.4. BOOKS.  Kindle Fire's weak spot, imo, and the reason I give it four stars.  But to be fair, it was never going to compete with my Kindle 3.  E-ink really is just that much more comfortable to read versus a (relatively low resolution) LCD screen.  Text just isn't that crisp and the backlight actually interferes with legibility.  I've read rumors that the NEXT Kindle tablet (due in 2012) might just feature a dual LCD/e-Ink display or even a Mirasol display, which would remedy this nicely.  For now, though, I didn't expect miracles from LCD and, by golly, I didn't get them. :)5. APPS.  I'm not a big gamer anymore.  (I used to be huge on Gameboy, but I got older and slower.)  The App store, curated by Amazon, is exactly what I though it'd be.  Some might complain about it not having a billion apps, but I really do think everything that the casual user would want is there.  (But if you're not sure go browse it and see BEFORE you buy the Fire.)  As far as accessibility goes, it's easy to get in and out of.As far as the Kindle itself, it's a SOLID little brick.  It's not fancy, nor would I say it has that "Apple aesthetic" going for it, but it's a shick brithouse of a tablet.  Amazon might just decide to advertise it as a personal defense device, if they decide the tablet business isn't working out.  It's got a nice, rubberized back.  It is, however, a bit heavier than I expected and is likely to be less comfortable for long-term reading than the (significantly) lighter Kindle 3 or Touch.  The onscreen controls are easy to get to, which stood out to me since I saw some reviews complaining about the lack of physical buttons.Overall, the Kindle Fire is snappy if a little quirky.  I figure it's early and that we've got plenty of time for Bezos 'n co. to tweak the software.  The Silk browser WILL get faster as more users use it--which is the beauty of cloud storage/computing--and in the long run, I really think the whole Amazon/Kindle ecosystem is just plain excellent.  If four and a half stars were available, I'd have shaved only a half a star for the e-Reader functionality, since I knew coming in that it simply couldn't replace my Kindle 3.If you're a Prime member already, this thing's a no-brainer.  If you don't have another tablet and you weren't sure about the costs, it's a great time to get your feet wet.  Amazon's always been incredible about returns if you don't like it, but I think if you're like me and you wanted a good little media consumption device that works pretty intuitively, does the main things you want it to, and doesn't break the bank, the Fire is a doggone great deal for the cash.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

318 of 353 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGood value for money,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;Sid-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As an Ipad owner I initially had low expectations for the Fire. However, after having played around with the Fire, I have to admit it is actually quite compelling especially if you are a price conscious buyer. Here's why:- The mp3 apps works real well. I switched to using the Amazon MP3 store fairly recently having used the itunes store for years primarily since Amazon seems to have a larger selection and lower price. I uploaded all my Apple DRM free music to my Amazon cloud drive and now I have access to all my music -  both itunes and Amazon MP3. Unfortunately, some of older Apple DRMed music files do not play on the Fire as expected- The video app is real snappy and I had no issues streaming video at home over wifi. I can honestly say that the Amazon video app is as good as the Netflix app on the Ipad. It seems like the netflix app will be released soon for the fire so I plan to compare them side by side then.- I don't read many books so I can't really provide much useful insight on the book app. I did like on the Fire that the one book I owned opened up on the last page I had stopped reading on my Ipad from months ago. The screen is a bit glossy so that may put some readers off.- The Fire is in general very snappy especially compared to most other Android tablets. Not as snappy as an Ipad but oh so close.- I did notice a slight improvement in page load times in Silk. I am not entirely sure whether that was due to the browser or my internet connection.- I don't like the placement of the power button as I find myself accidently hitting it all the time. The fire is also feels a bit heavy but it is not intolerable.Overall, I feel this is a compelling device for the price and the negatives I stated above are minor to me. If I were looking for a 7"" or below $300 tablet, I would say this is the best tablet around. However, if you have $500+ to spend, chances are you would be happier with an Ipad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

91 of 103 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhat did I ever do without a Fire?,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;FantasyReader "Jody"(Indiana USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I halfway expected to be disappointed. $200 is pretty cheap for a tablet, so how good could it be?  The answer?  Surprisingly nice.The build appears to be sturdy.  It just feels solid.  I turned it on, and saw KindleFire on the screen during boot-up, with Kindle in white, and Fire in orange.  Then the slide came up.  It was pretty intuitive if you've ever used a touch screen device.  I slid the orange tab and led step-by-step through connecting to wireless, followed by a short, but effective mini-tutorial of functions and buttons.  So far, so good.I tried out various features.  I synced up my g mail (super-easy), downloaded contacts, and everything works great.  Much easier to read than on my phone.  Next, I looked at my Cloud music and played some.  Nice sound for the size of the device.  More than satisfactory.  Then I started an Amazon Instant Video.  While jerky at the start, it soon stabilized and played normally.  I think the jerkiness was due to buffering.  The rest of the episode played with no problem.Then I checked out the apps.  I downloaded some of the same ones I have on my phone.  These were not newly purchased apps, just the very same apps I already had.  Every single one worked fine.  I opened up Quick Office (obtained free as the free app of the day yesterday), everything works fine.I have not yet found a single thing I don't like about it.  I think I will need a screen protector; the fingerprints might bug me otherwise.  But it's no worse than cell phone in that regard.No issue with glare, at least indoors.  Have not tried outdoors yet.  The screen is pretty glossy, so glare will likely be an issue outdoors, but I have my K3 for that.Next, I logged in to Facebook.  I have to say I don't like Facebook since the new changes, but I had no problem getting around.I read some reviews that mentioned it was hard to learn, and not intuitive, but I can't say I found it be difficult at all; pretty easy in fact.So far, I found nothing that raises any red flags to me.  If this is not THE perfect device (for what it is), it's pretty darn close.  I think it's a winner.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

97 of 106 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Is a True Innovation,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;Megalocke-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought my Kindle Fire yesterday after much back and forth, hand-wringing and consternation over the bad reviews that have cropped up about this device, as well as the media coverage of it having "problems" that Jeff Bezos says he is fixing. Here's the thing, I don't know what needs fixed. After playing with the Fire for 24 hours, I can say it is everything I am looking for in a media-consumption device: I can read the Web, listen to music, stream video and enjoy apps. My goal in this review is to debunk, confirm and examine all claims I've read about the Fire.Question Number One: Whose pond are you swimming in? If you're an Apple devotee, who has an iPhone, keeps all your music in iTunes and doesn't care about e-books, no this is probably not the device for you. Save your money and get an iPad, because flat out, you won't like this as much as I do. But if you happen to keep your music in Amazon's cloud, have an e-ink Kindle and an Android phone you will get much, much more out of the Fire. For one, the music in your cloud drive will pop up on your device as soon as you sign in, as will the option to download the books you're purchased on your other Kindle. Finally the app store has many of the Android apps to which you're accustomed.Now let's get down to performance:Let me first say, I feel like the one-star reviews of this device (really anything under at least three stars) are punitive, incorrect and probably people not realizing their Wi-Fi connection sucks more than the fact the browser doesn't work. As mentioned, I am familiar with many of the "complaints" about this device, so let's address them.1. The Browser is slow: FALSE - it is super speedy. I don't get the complaints. Awesome. No viability to this claim.2. Volume is too low: FALSE - I would put the volume situation on par with, say, a smartphone. I'd say it is relatively similar to an iPod touch or Android phone. So this complaint just holds no water. I don't know what people expect, but it's plenty loud with headphones.3. Touch interface is glitchy: LARGELY FALSE: The calibration seems like it may be a bit off AT TIMES (maybe, or maybe I'm just not used to the device), but nothing that ruins or even hurts the experience. VERY MINOR. I'm sure Amazon is looking to tighten this up.4. Power Button in Bad Place: FALSE: I don't get it. It's not easy to accidentally turn it off.5. No hardware volume buttons: TRUE It doesn't have any. I thought this would bug me, but here's what you need to think about: This isn't an ipod or a smartphone that you use for listening to music with the device's screen turned off. You're usually listening while doing something else on the device, so adjusting volume on-screen is no big deal.6. Loose with Privacy: TRUE Too easy to buy stuff, the carousel needs to be editable. This needs fixed and I'm sure Amazon will, as they have committed to.There is one con: It's a touch heavy, yet still MUCH lighter than the iPad. However, much like the first gen iPad, I'm sure this will be slimmed down in the next generation, but 24 hours after popping the box open, I'm getting used to it and figured out comfortable ways to hold it over long periods of time.Let's not forget, this device is $199. During the 30 minutes I spent at Best Buy yesterday considering this purchase, I watched eight people walk up and buy one of these. I'm guessing these are moving much faster than iPads. No they don't do as much as an iPad, but if you want to mainly consume media, this device is incredible. Again, I feel like the criticism this device has taken is unfair. It has a couple first-gen issues, but Amazon should be applauded for putting a product like this out rather than taking crap for minor blemishes that do not ruin the experience.Aesthetically, this is a beautiful machine. It is a pleasure to use. I am so glad I got one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (9)

53 of 57 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsReview it for what it is and not what you think it should be,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Ryan Mccrea "rymac69"(Ohio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First and foremost, lets get it out of the way.  This is not a iPad, it was not intended to be an iPad, or a Android Tablet made by any manufacture you would like to name.  It is a Kindle reader with added functions.  I had an iPad and an iPad 2, because I just had to have them.  The problem was that after the novelty wore off, as the surveys have said, I found that it was more just a time waster or something that I took to the bathroom with me.  I don't want to get into the argument of 10" vs 7" screens, but for me a 10" screen is to big.  If I have to carry an added case with me, I might as well take my laptop and have everything I need. isOk for the review.  This is a great device for what it was made for.  A $199 e-reader that allows me to download movies, stream movies, play plants vs. zombies, surf the web, and oh yea...read a book.  Yes it has its minor flaws as some have said.  For me the only real down side is the lack of physical buttons, but once you get use to it, its getting less and less of a problem.  As for storage?  I know many have said that it doesn't have enough for those times that you don't have access to the cloud.  I am not sure who it is that sits on a plane, or train, or in a car for 8 or more hours each day, but maybe they need to look into the iPad...I can not think of one time during my travels that I haven't been able to access some form of wi-fi, atleast every few hours.  I easily can place a couple rented movies, a few books, and more games then I will sit and play during the trip, on my Fire without an issue.I really was gonna purchase the nook color tablet, just so I could buy a nook2android sd card when they came out, but after playing with my Fire for a few days, I don't see why.  I think I may even get a Prime subscription.The Fire is not a iPad killer...again I do not think it was meant to be...what it is, is a reasonably priced media device for the common man/woman.  Something that will allow you to relax and enjoy during your free time without breaking the bank.  This is the real world.  Nothing is perfect and the Fire is not perfect, but bang for the buck, even without Prime membership, you can't beat it.So you folks with your ipads, galaxy tablets, and all the other items I see compaired....enjoy them and let the rest of enjoy our Kindle Fires.  For some of us, they are enough, and we aren't looking to impress the next guy/girl sitting next to us because we pull out the newest $600 tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

83 of 92 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsInitial Feedback,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Take a Walk-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Have used the Fire for about an hour after initial set-up.  First off, I've been thinking that instead of comparing the Fire to an IPAD, it should be compared to the IPOD touch -- (a) it is in the same price range as the IPOD touch, and (b) it will be a gift for my daughter, and I can see this product replacing her IPOD touch.  From that perspective, it is an 5-star device, that easily outperforms it's competition.But, evaluating it on its own merits, I've quickly discovered one, non-major issue: The carousel:  Really don't want my entire library on the carousel.  Amazon needs to quickly update this UI, and allow users to remove items from the carousel.Will update this review after spending more time with the device.11/17/11 Review Update.Have removed a star from the review for an important reason:  Amazon Cloud, which allows a person to store files (documents, photos, home videos, etc.) for use anywhere (which is its reason to be), isn't usefully supported on the Kindle Fire.  Music works well, but any other file type which you'd like to store in the cloud, then download to your Fire...you're out of luck....Dropbox could feasibly work (but Amazon market doesn't support Dropbox).  I was prepared to upgrade my Amazon Cloud service, but given its limited usefulness on the Fire, I won't be making the upgrade purchase at this time.Also --- the "official" Youtube app isn't preloaded on the Fire, and isn't supported on the Amazon market.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

1,144 of 1,330 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsSerious problems, mostly software, but could use better hardware too.,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Dan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The idea seemed like a good one, an inexpensive tablet that delivered all kinds of media content, and in a small lightweight device...cheaper and more portable than the Ipad (which I also own) and based on the Android operating system (which I've used on phones and tablets.)The reality is this thing has some very serious problems, which should be able to be fixed in firmware, and some hardware limitations, that might get a little better, but put it squarely behind it's main competition, the Barnes and Noble Nook.Likes:Brilliant IPS screen, like the one on the Ipad.Nice simple interface.Amazon prime content, lots of free movies and TV shows for less than a Netflix subscription ($80 per year.)Very good battery life including excellent sleep life (a problem with previous Android devices.)Very clean looking design.Just OK:Speakers could be and are too easy to cover/muffle with hand.Cheap charger with mini-USB integrated instead of separate USB charger and cable.Dislikes/problems:Lack of a hard buttons make navigation cumbersome.  The device should have a dedicated back button and a dedicated volume rocker (which the Ipad and Nook have)Lack of purchase password protection means anyone using the device and start ordering stuff with your account (which the Ipad and Nook have.)Lack of privacy means anyone picking up the device is greeted with a screen showing exactly what you were doing.Off switch is located in a very unfortunate place...very frustrating to keep turning the device off when watching a Netflix movie.Screen is too shiny.  It has more glare than the Ipad or Nook.Browser real estate is very limited by menu bars on the top and bottom.  (Nook hides bars.)Browser stumbles on some websites and is sometimes painfully slow.Touch screen can be frustratingly unresponsive.  This is exacerbated by slow browser response.  Sometimes I have to look to see if it is doing anything...then poke at it again...and again.I bought this device to enjoy Amazon content (like movies and books) AND to use as a quick portable web browser, and for other content (like Netflix.)It works pretty good for the Amazon content, with a few issues; the overly shiny screen and the poorly placed power switch.  As a web browser, it works worse than the browser on my EVO Android phone.  It's built in Silk browser (you can't download replacements) is slow on some websites and plain doesn't work on others and the menu bars hide too much of the page content.  On top of that, Amazon built limitations into this device, that makes it less functional than other Android Gingerbread devices, like limited multi-touch commands.From a hardware standpoint, Amazon might have skimped a little too much.  The Nook, with twice the memory, feels much faster and more responsive.  The lack of hard buttons handicaps the device making simple things, like changing the volume, a button pressing, menu wading annoyance.  This annoyance is made worse, by the unresponsiveness of the device to presses.  I'm not sure if the device isn't as responsive as it should be because of the hardware, or the Amazon interface.  I hope, for the sake of people who keep theirs, it is something Amazon can improve with firmware revisions.  I miss the mic.  It is useful on all kinds of Android applications, including speech to text applications and translators.The biggest showstopper issue I have with the device, though, is the total lack of security and privacy.  Here is a device with no other security or protection other than a screen lock password.  Hand this device to a friend and they get to see everything you've been doing with it.  Hand it to your child and they can order thousands of dollars worth of content.  God forbid this thing gets intercepted in the mail on the way to your house, as Amazon set it up with your account already active.Another limitation is video content can only be stored on the device's limited internal storage, or downloaded from Amazon's cloud content.  You can't upload your own video content to the cloud and view it on the device.The day after receiving this device I stopped by a Barnes and Noble and picked up a Nook tablet.  The Nook tablet is not as "pretty" as the Fire.  I was skeptical...expecting something limited like the Kindle, but much to my surprise and delight, the Nook is everything I had hoped the Kindle Fire would be.  It's screen is more responsive and has some kind of anti-glare coating that makes it much more readable.  Taps work.  Double tap zooms in the browser, like it does in all other Android browsers (other than Amazon's Silk browser.)  Websites rendered properly.  Despite only being a tiny bit lighter, the Nook feels much lighter...perhaps it is the wider thinner bezel or the weight distribution, but it is more comfortable and secure to hold in one hand.  The Nook has a dedicated home button, and a dedicated volume rocker...much nicer.  The Nook has a mic.  Even Netflix looks sharper...like it is being delivered at a higher bit rate.  I also learned Nook offers free wifi in stores and free book loans and one can lend books to other Nooks.Bottom line:  Anyone not devoted to Amazon content, should consider the Nook reader as a real alternative.  It is definitely worth the $50 difference ($25 if you buy a B&N; membership.)  I'm returning my Kindle and waiting for version 2.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (86)

80 of 89 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars4.5 stars - Absolutely Well Worth the Cost,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Dianne E. Socci-Tetro "Books &amp; Chat"(New England, USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For me and all the other Luddites still out there, this product is almost better than sliced bread.I am admittedly the worst when it comes time to following directions and using anything `new' tech (it took me forever to get used to my iPhone). Generally, I balk at using anything new and am really cranky until I get used to it (in two or three months!)  But, when this got to me it was as easy to use as I don't know what.  Open the box, plug it into the wall and follow the screen directions.  It already has my books loaded into it since I have several other types of Kindle. Therefore, that is a plus.  I've also tried all the features and am very impressed. The speakers while small are certainly loud enough for one like me who is partially hard of hearing can hear comfortably. For movies-the color is crisp and the screen is just large enough to comfortably enjoy the movie without having to squint. The `keys' on the keyboard are large enough to fit my chubby fingers and I have no trouble even with long nails.The screen does have issues with your body oil so I will be getting the covers for the screen.A simple to follow manual is loaded in just like on the older model KindlesI am very impressed as to how your library is set up. You can choose how you view your books---choose viewing them on a shelf or  simply flip through all of the covers at one time. Flipping pages using a button on the side is outdated with the Fire, so you can control just were you want to be in the book at the touch of a slideOh dear!!! Facebook is loaded in it so I may be playing games a lot more than I ever have with just my desk/laptop!Right now the only thing I DON'T like is the cord is way too short.  It comes complete with all of  the tools for reading we are used to using with the Keyboard Kindle. Although some things prior Kindle owners are used to such as putting your books into specific folders is not possible at this time and I don't know if it will be possible in the nurture.Without 3G it can be frustrating to use when you are like me and have an iffy signal.EDITED TO ADD--if you are going to be trying to down-load converted content from Calibre, and are used to doing it Via a USB cord like I am, you will not be able to since there is no USB cord with this package.  BUT - you can use the cord (USB) that came with your older  Kindle if you have one.If I compare it to my other Kindles (Kindle DX and Kindle Keyboard w/3G) I can say this-I love the fact that it doesn't weigh as much as the DX and the screen is larger than the 3-G but of course not as large as the DX.  It does reflect ( without any screen cover) the lights that you are using around you and while that could be annoying I found that  I could ignore whatever was reflected if what I was reading or watching was interesting enough to capture my attention.For the money, you cannot go wrong.  I don't want to pay the monthly charges that I may have had to had I bought an iPad and I don't think I ever would have used half of the iPads features. Therefore, the out lay in cash would have been silly for me.For a  serious reader who wants to dabble in movies, music and the web - this is perfect.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (16)

32 of 33 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsNice hardware but software is very limited,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Nick-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I picked up a Kindle fire in the states and am now back in Cayman where I live. The fire seems like a reasonable piece of kit, but if you live anywhere other than the US, or if you happen top travel a lot outside of those shores, you'll find the baked in Amazon version of Android very limited. I have an android phone and I can use the app store etc. On the fire I have no option but the amazon app store (which I would love to have work) but that just gives me an error that I can't download anything as I am not in the USA. Even free stuff can't be downloaded. I wanted to add a simple note taking device, but nope, can't be done.Basically a neat bit of hardware. I am a developer and really highly rate the Amazon Web Services, which I can use quite comfortably from Cayman, but I'm really disappointed with the fire. I can't even enter a proxy server, so I can't use it at work. Huge let down.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

64 of 71 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWould Give Kindle Fire Six Stars If I Could.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Amazonian Consumer-See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Once you see the Kindle Fire in person, you would be amazed that this very high quality tablet has a price tag of less than $200. The hardware and software quality are on a par with Apple.And the 7-inch form factor, IMO, is actually better for reading than the 9.7-inch iPad which I also have. There are two reasons for this. First, the Fire's dimensions and weight closely resemble a physical book that we are used to read and carry around. Second, when it is held in the vertical position, the default text size and text line width are nearly the same as a real book. I tried reading using the Fire inside my car in broad daylight, and it was quite readable and comfortable.When I turned on the Fire for the first time, it would ask me to select the Wi-Fi network that I want to use, and the password if the network is encrypted. Afterward, the Fire would update the Kindle software to the latest version.The Fire is already registered when you receive it, so it will greet you with your name and subsequently present you with a carousel-like shelf which would have all your Kindle book titles. But this shelf is not just limited to books, media of all types (Books, Music, Video, Documents, Apps, and even Web pages) would all appear here, in the order that you have used them, with the last used being on the left and topmost. You can use your finger to swipe left and right to browse all the items. I like this interface very much because it allows you to switch quickly among the seven media types.Watching movies on the Kindle Fire is fantastic; the video and audio are always smooth and I have not encountered any problem.The Fire is more narrowly focused on media consumption compared to the iPad. It does not have cameras nor microphone to allow audio/video chatting, picture-taking, and video-making (your cellphone probably can do all that already). But the Fire does very well what it was designed to do. It is more usable in many ways in a 7-inch form factor and it is much more affordable at less than $200.I highly recommend the Kindle Fire.If you are also in the market for a Kindle Fire protective case, I'd recommendBear Motion Genuine Leather Case for Kindle Fire Cover. It is high quality and the price including shipping is less than $20. I demand high quality, but I am reluctant to pay more than 10% of the price of the tablet for a case. Or for slightly more, you can get a more versatile case by AmazonBasicsAmazonBasics Leather Folio Cover with Multi-Angle Adjustable Stand for Kindle Fire, Samsung Galaxy Tab 7.0 (Black).(I have Amazon's Prime membership, so thousands of the movies and TV shows are available to me without additional cost. If you often buy from Amazon, then Prime membership is worth it, because your stuff arrives in two days, and there is no shipping charge. Consider the movies/TV shows as a great bonus. I discontinued my Netflix subscription ever since Amazon began offering free streaming for Prime members).Update 12-9-2011After running the Fire for about three weeks without ever turning it completely off, I encountered something strange: I could not wake it up when I pressed the power button like I used to. The button would briefly flash green then turn off. Thinking that the Fire may have run out of battery power, I plugged in the AC adapter/charger. Normally the power button should then show the color amber/orange, indicating that it is charging, but there was no light. At this point, it looked to be dead, so I called Amazon Kindle Fire support line. The tech person asked me to press the power button while he counted to twenty, then I released the power button. This is called a "hard reset". I don't remember seeing anything on the screen after releasing the power button, so I pressed the power button again. It was then that I saw the words "kindle fire" on the screen, indicating that the Fire is starting up. Everything is back to normal again, and when I plug in the AC adapter/charger, the power button would glow amber like it should. I have described what has happened in detail so that if you encounter this, you will know what to do.Update 12-23-2011It has happened again. I was unable to wake up the Fire from sleep just now. The situation was exactly like what happened on 12-9-2011. No problem, just hold down the power button for about 20 seconds to do a "hard reset", then press the power button again to turn it on. I expect Amazon to cure this problem in the near future.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

46 of 51 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsStay at home Mom-My review so far,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Melissa Lauderdale "misca"(Jacksonville, NC)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)FYI- I have only touched an Ipad once, so I do not have any other experience to go off of a tablet! Just received my Kindle Fire about 30 minutes ago, and wanted to share my first impressions of my new kindle. To start, setup was very easy, as long as you remember what your wi-fi password is for your home(dont use it constantly so had to think about it).PROS:Colors are very vivid: There is some glare from the inside lights(received mine about 6:30 so it was dusk outside):screen is very easy to use, scrolling and picking out what you need: It does show everything that you have used constantly(I am one of those people that have a lot of the free romance books that Amazon has so it's kind of embarrasing! beware of that if your shy or will use in public.-Facebook-works great, Pandora-good sound quality, you can play it in the background while you do other things, Youtube-didn't have any problem playing it, but the sound is a down, but I put that to the sound quality of youtube, not the Fire's capabilitiesInstant Stream for Prime- Something i was most excited about, it shows up instantly that you touch the videos. Streamed quick, sound all the way up is good enough to listen without headphones as long as it isn't to loud.Internet-haven't used it for much yet, but the slight, and I do mean slight lag is not a problem.CONS:Screen brightness: If you aren't used to a tablet with the backlit screen(like me, I had only the Kindle 3g) it is VERY bright. It kind of made my eyes hurt a little bit, and I don't like how I was changing the brightness level.Reading: I really hope I get used to this, or I will not be doing reading on this, and instead go back to my Kindle 3g. The screen is very bright, although they give you 3 options to choose from of colors( White/Black, Black/White, or a slight yellow matte background with black letters) the last one I think I will be using for a while until I can get used to the brightness. Screen is also very sensitive, and it will take time to get used to not haveing the buttons on the side.To stay on the reading, and more of something that I think they should change for options, is we should have the x-ray option, I don't like how you can't check up the book your looking up on the internet, straight from the source, and I would really like the option to rate, and write a review straight from the books' menu.Overall my impression is that it is a great MEDIA tablet, which is exactly what it is touted to be. I think I will be very happy with this once I get used to it, and I will try and update this once I have more time with it!UPDATE 1 DAY LATER: The brightness you get used to, thank God! I was reading on it last night and my eyes adjusted. Pictures that you transfer over can be put in your gallery(under apps), and they are so vivid!Music from your music folder- Easy enough. If you have ever moved over a file to a mp3 or something else, it is as simple as click and drag. Just make sure it is one of the accepted files(look on the product page for this).Children- I have a 2 year old, and I had a lot of the apps that I downloaded on my Android phone, to let her play with. She loves playing the games, and she stole my fire out of my hands when I downloaded Elmo. It is a perfect size for her to hold on the couch and watchHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

68 of 77 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsGreat as an Amazon portal.  Very poor as a tablet.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;AM(Frederick, MD USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is an interesting little toy, but as it stands, it's about half as useful as my phone, even if my phone couldn't make calls. As a portal into content sold by Amazon, it's absolutely excellent. As an Android device, I'm rapidly coming to the conclusion that my G1, the very first Android device, was better.Something that was praised in an early review of the Kindle Fire was that, unlike other Android tablets, it told you what it was for. There was no staring blankly at a desktop, trying to determine for yourself what exactly you wanted the tablet for--something that's been a problem for other Android devices. Instead, you've got a friendly menu at boot: Newsstand, Books, Music, Video, Docs, Apps, Web. There's a carousel of recently used things below that, and a row of favorite apps at the bottom. So, what's it for? News, books, music, videos, docs, apps, and the web, of course! With Amazon ensuring you always have options for the first four of these, it's easy to see what you bought that Kindle Fire for.Unless, of course, that's not what you bought that Kindle Fire for. If your notion was that you'd get a nice, cheap Android tablet for general use, you're going to have some problems. In ensuring that they could provide content to users with zero fuss, Amazon locked much of what Android users think of as "Android" out of the Kindle Fire. Android phones, during setup, integrate tightly with your Google account, and a wealth of Google oriented applications are all ready to go with your phone when you turn it on. That's not so with the Fire, and it's not just a matter of extra setup--the thing is locked down. This means no Youtube app, Google+ app, no Google Maps app, no official Gmail (Fire's mail client can read Gmail, but it's not very impressive), no ANYTHING that Google brought to the table for Android, unless you muddle through the web interface, which is really irritating when there's a perfectly good Android app for that.If you don't like their browser (Silk), you can't use a different one. This has already presented a problem for me in the way of trying to use JManga, a portal for manga that's run by Japanese manga publishers directly. This isn't an "oh, it doesn't work on mobile," thing: it doesn't work on Silk. Dolphin, one of the best browsers for Android, handled it fine, but isn't available for the Fire, because Amazon said so. Dolphin is in the Amazon Appstore, and they're perfectly happy to let you have it--but only for your Android phones. It's explicitly blocked from the Fire (and so is every other web browser). You can't go to the official Android Market website to get it either. Try, and Silk will kick you back to Amazon's Appstore.Using Silk to watch videos from sources like YouTube has proven a bit spotty, but doable. When running in the desktop style, framerate problems abounded. Switching to the mobile web based version of YouTube fixed that, but it's awfully stripped down. Again, if Amazon weren't so determined to lock customers out of apps provided by anyone but themselves, this would be a non-issue, as I could just use the YouTube app and have it work fine.So far, I HAVE found an option in the Fire's OS settings to allow installation of third party applications (which is how the Amazon Appstore works on "normal" Android devices), but I have yet to find a way of doing so, now that I'm allowed.This is not what it could, or should have been, and the fault lies entirely with Amazon taking a page from Apple's playbook, and trying to maintain an iron fist on the device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (8)

301 of 356 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsVery disappointed; not the tablet for me,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Art History Professor(The wonderful Midwest)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)&lt;!--

function fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix,w,h)
{	
  try {	
    var ifrm = parent.document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "movieFrameID");
    if (ifrm) {	
        var h2 = h + 35;
        ifrm.style.height = h2;
      }
    } catch(err) {
 
    } 


  if (h &gt; 0) {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height=h+"px";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height=h+"px";
  }
  else {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height="";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height="";
  }
  document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "flashcontent").style.height="100%";
}

function fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix,divName,html)
{	
    document.getElementById(nsPrefix + divName).innerHTML=html;
}

function embeddingPopup(nsPrefix)
{
  alert("placeholder function for embedding code");
}
--&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_moN2JWS026D607embeddingPopup(){	
alert("Embedding code will be displayed here.");
}

--&gt;&lt;!--
function cv_moN2JWS026D607refresh_preplay() {

document.getElementById("cv_moN2JWS026D607chiDiv").innerHTML = document.getElementById("cv_moN2JWS026D607hiddenPre").innerHTML;
};
cv_moN2JWS026D607refresh_preplay();

--&gt;// &lt;![CDATA[

var cv_moN2JWS026D607so;	   


function cv_moN2JWS026D607loadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes) {

  try {
      cv_moN2JWS026D607so = new SWFObject(swfLocation, "cv_moN2JWS026D607AMPlayerProd", swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor);	   

      for (var v in swfParams) {
        cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addVariable(v, encodeURIComponent(swfParams[v]));
      }
      for (var v in flashParams) {
        cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addParam(v, flashParams[v]);
      }
      for (var v in embedAttributes) {
        cv_moN2JWS026D607so.setAttribute(v, embedAttributes[v]);
      }

      cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addVariable("swfEmbedTime", new Date().getTime());

      var agt = navigator.userAgent;
       
      var reFirefox = new RegExp("firefox/", "i");
      var regx = agt.split(reFirefox);
      var ffVersion = 8;
      if (regx[1]) {
          var pts = regx[1].split(/[.]/);
          ffVersion = parseFloat(pts[0] + "." + pts[1]);
      }
      var minorVersion = parseFloat(navigator.ap);
      if ((navigator.appVersion.indexOf("Mac")!=-1) || (ffVersion &lt; 1.5)) {
          cv_moN2JWS026D607so.setAttribute("height", swfHeight);
          cv_moN2JWS026D607so.setAttribute("width", swfWidth);
          cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addVariable("oldFirefox", "1");	     
      }

      if (cv_moN2JWS026D607so.write("cv_moN2JWS026D607flashcontent")) {
          fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_moN2JWS026D607', 
                               320, 
                               283);
      }
      else {
          var nsPrefix = 'cv_moN2JWS026D607';

          fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix, 0, 0);
          fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix, "flashcontent", '&lt;br /&gt;To view this video download &lt;a target="_blank" href="http://www.macromedia.com/go/getflashplayer" target="_top"&gt;Flash Player&lt;/a&gt; (version 9.0.115 or higher)');
      }
  } catch(err) {
      fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_moN2JWS026D607', 0, 0);
  }
  return false;
}



function _cv_moN2JWS026D607loadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
    var swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
    var swfWidth = "320";
    var swfHeight = "100%";
    var flashVersion = "9.0.115";
    var bgColor = "#FFFFFF";

    var swfParams = {};
    var flashParams = {};
    var embedAttributes = {};
    swfParams.amazonPort = "80";
    swfParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    swfParams.telemetrySubPageType = "VideoReview";
    swfParams.nsPrefix = "cv_moN2JWS026D607";
    swfParams.locale = "en_US";
    swfParams.logUrl = "gp/mpd/l";
    swfParams.canResize = "1";
    swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    swfParams.sessionId = "000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.marketplaceID = "ATVPDKIKX0DER";
    swfParams.salign = "LT";
    swfParams.preset = "detail";
    swfParams.mediaObjectId = "m34PWF8KHVWH0J";
    swfParams.autoPlayTimer = "";
    swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = "m34PWF8KHVWH0J";
    swfParams.playIsUserGenerated = "1";
    swfParams.enableShare = "0";
    swfParams.permUrl = "gp/mpd/permalink";
    swfParams.telemetryPageTypeID = "R2DH59TDOVD5CT";
    swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/m34PWF8KHVWH0J/000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.amazonServer = "www.amazon.com";
    swfParams.scale = "noscale";
    flashParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    flashParams.salign = "LT";
    flashParams.bgcolor = "#FFFFFF";
    flashParams.allowScriptAccess = "always";
    flashParams.quality = "high";
    flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
    embedAttributes.title = "Flash Player";

    if (movieID){
      if (playerVersion == '3'){
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
        swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = movieID;
      } else {
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/legacy/20101014901/AMPlayerProd._V197491872_.swf";
      }
      swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/" + movieID + "/000-0000000-0000000";
      flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
      swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    }

    if (document.getElementById('cv_moN2JWS026D607duration')) {
      document.getElementById('cv_moN2JWS026D607duration').style.display='none';
    }
    cv_moN2JWS026D607loadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes);

  return false;
}

function cv_moN2JWS026D607loadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
   return _cv_moN2JWS026D607loadSwf(movieID, playerVersion);
}


	
		// ]]&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_moN2JWS026D607newHeight(h)
{	
    fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_moN2JWS026D607', 0, h);
}

function cv_moN2JWS026D607resetPlayer(w,h,bw,cc) {
  cv_moN2JWS026D607newHeight(h);

  cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addVariable("resetBandwidth", bw);
  cv_moN2JWS026D607so.addVariable("cacheCode", cc);
  cv_moN2JWS026D607so.setAttribute("height", h);
  cv_moN2JWS026D607so.setAttribute("width", w);
  cv_moN2JWS026D607so.write("cv_moN2JWS026D607flashcontent");
}

--&gt;m34PWF8KHVWH0J / moN2JWS026D607var cv_moN2JWS026D607RollOverImg = new Image();
cv_moN2JWS026D607RollOverImg.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/913KmQsy2NS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";

var cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay = document.getElementById('cv_moN2JWS026D607preplayImageId');
if (cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay) {
  cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay.onmouseover = function() {
    cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/913KmQsy2NS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay.onmouseout = function() {
    cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/913KmQsy2NS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  
  var node = cv_moN2JWS026D607preplay.parentNode;

  var cv_moN2JWS026D607currentClick = node.onclick;
  node.onclick = function () {
    var head = document.getElementsByTagName("head");
    if (head[0]) { 
      var logTag = document.createElement('script');
      logTag.type = "text/javascript";
      logTag.src = "/gp/customer-media/du/log.html?ie=UTF8&amp;s=CustomerVideoPlay&amp;p=CustomerImage";
      head[0].appendChild(logTag);
    }

    if (cv_moN2JWS026D607currentClick) {
      return cv_moN2JWS026D607currentClick();
    }
  }
}Length:: 5:03 MinsIt is very possible that this will be the perfect tablet for you, but I was very disappointed.  To begin, the wireless strength is subpar, and I was woefully saddened that I could not watch the digital versions of Blu-Rays on it.  It very much is an Amazon content delivery system, which is fine if that is what you want, but I was hoping for something a wee bit different.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (54)

42 of 46 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWonderful device WHEN you factor in the cost,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Matthew J. Thompson(Forest Lake, MN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had the Kindle Fire for a little over a week now, and I think that is enough time to provide my first impressions on the device. The first and most important thing that should be said is that this is not an "iPad-killer." It is not designed to be. I have seen so many articles and comments comparing this to the iPad, and surveys where people are asked if they will be buying a Kindle Fire over an iPad this Christmas. If you are expecting an iPad, or even a tablet, you will be disappointed. The main purpose of this device is to deliver Amazon content to you more effectively. It is designed for consumption, not creation. That is the reason it is so cheap and why Amazon is taking a loss on it. They are hoping to make up for that loss through sales of videos, music, books, and apps through Amazon's Web Services. You can also use it to view your own movies and media, but will find that it is more limited in that way than a regular tablet. Personally, as someone who has ordered several rentals from Amazon Video, and had to contact customer support for every single one of them due to problems with Amazon's Unbox player or purchases not appearing in my downloads, I can really appreciate this. But if you don't plan on using Amazon at all to obtain your media, you may want to take this into consideration before purchasing the Fire. Additionally, the reason this product is so hyped, and one of the reasons I like it so much, is due to the ridiculously low price. Amazon reviews shouldn't focus on price, but it is hard not to with this device. On price alone, this is a five star device. However when looked at the Fire overall, and when compared with other touch devices (what little there is to compare it to), I have to give it four stars, since there are a few areas I feel could use definite improvement.FORM FACTOR - The Kindle Fire feels almost the same in my hand as my 3rd generation Kindle but it is a bit heavier. It might be difficult to hold it one handed and read a book for an hour or watch a movie. You're going to need to rest it on something. The display is made of Gorilla Glass, which is a highly damage-resistant. You can still crack it, but I have used a phone with Gorilla Glass for two years on it and it has zero scratches on it despite being kept daily in my pocket with my keys. The back of the tablet is rubberized, so it won't slide around and won't get scratched easily. It also feels good in my hand. Despite all the companies that will be selling them, I do not think you need a screen protector. I have scratched Gorilla Glass before, but it is very difficult to do.CONNECTIONS/STORAGE - On the bottom are a headphone port (which will accept external speakers), micro-USB (for charging and file transfer), and power button. The Fire doesn't come with an SD card slot, with good reason. As mentioned, Amazon wants you to get content directly from them. It also reduces the production costs. You can transfer your own content to the device through the USB connection from your home computer. The Fire comes with 8Gb of storage, which is enough to hold about 8 downloaded movies, 80 apps, 800 songs, or 6,000 books. I filled mine up right away so I never checked it out of the box, but apparently it is closer to 6.5Gb as the OS is going to take up some of this. You have to really become adept at managing your content through the Cloud. Books won't take up much room, but magazines are around 250Mb and movies are a little under 1 Gb. Free videos available through Amazon Prime cannot be downloaded, only streamed. So unless you buy a movie from Amazon or transfer one of your own, you must be connected through a wi-fi connection in order to watch your movie.AMAZON CLOUD - If you have not tried out the Amazon Cloud Drive, you will be pleasantly surprised. You get 5Gb (which they will probably increase in the near future) of free online storage to store anything you want, and you can access it from anywhere. This combines very nicely with the Fire. 5Gb isn't much for my collection, so I upgraded to a higher plan (rates are $1 per extra gigabyte per year). I can upload a playlist to it and listen to it on my home computer, then when I get to work the Fire can access it and pick it up where I left off. Any songs you get from Amazon Mp3 are automatically stored on the Cloud and don't contribute to the 5Gb storage space.E-READER - This was going to be the big determination in whether I should get a Fire or the new Kindle Touch. Ultimately I ended up getting both since I prefer the E-Ink technology to the backlit display of the Fire. If you are the type of person who reads a lot and expect to spend at least 50% of your use on reading books, I don't think you will be satisfied with the Fire over your Kindle 3 or the Kindle Touch, Wi-Fi, 6" E Ink Display - includes Special Offers &amp; Sponsored Screensavers. It just isn't the same, and after hours of reading, the display would make my eyes hurt a bit (just like with any tablet). However it is nice not to have to use a lighted cover to see my books in the dark. The Kindle Fire is difficult to read in bright sunlight or on the beach. The touch navigation is very nice, but it doesn't function as nicely or quickly as it does on the iPad or even the Kindle Touch. This can be a problem for me, and the main reason I am using the Kindle Touch for reading books. Additionally, the Fire doesn't support real page numbers, even though the Touch does. So you have to use that ridiculous "location 121 of 16077 - 2%" format. A year of that with my last Kindle and I still don't understand what that means. They need to fix this in an update. Being able to touch a word and have it bring up the dictionary is incredibly convenient and takes less than 2 seconds. But still, the Kindle Touch handily beats the Fire for reading.MAGAZINES - The Kindle Fire can also handle magazines, however the display is just too small to be an enjoyable reading experience. I tried out several different magazines, and the main problem I had was with the formatting. I tried to read an issue of Bon Appetit and my eyes were straining after three pages. There is no way to read a single article without zooming. The Fire handles magazines two ways: with Page View, which shows the original magazine display, and with Text View, which attempts to just provide the text of the article. A lot of magazines these days have several things going on in one page, with multiple columns, little sidebars and boxes everywhere, etc. I couldn't view a lot of this without zooming, the text is just too small. So Page View did not work very well for magazines like this. It is especially tough with magazines like Entertainment Weekly, Men's Health, GQ, etc. I found magazines like that unreadable on the 7" display. Magazines that focused mostly on the article, like Nature, Wired, etc, were handled much better. Some magazines even come integrated with embedded video and audio, which is a very nice feature, and one I can see being very useful for things like Men's Health, but I haven't had as much of a chance to use it yet. Text View is a very nice feature that works mostly well, but seems to get a bit confused with magazines that have complicated formatting, so it pretty much defeats the purpose since those are the ones I need it for the most.COMIC READER - This is one of the main reasons I purchased the Fire. Amazon has a fairly extensive collection of comic books available for the Fire, including an exclusive deal with DC to publish many of their books. In addition to a proprietary comic reader that comes on the Fire, Amazon also has a Comics by ComiXology app available to purchase issues and subscriptions through. Although I initially thought the 7" display would be too small, it is actually decent enough to serve as a comic reader. I would definitely prefer a 10" version if they came out with one in the future. A 10" tablet is still the way to go for comics, but if you're looking for a cheaper option and portability, the Fire isn't too bad, and definitely beats a smart phone. It has a "panel by panel" feature that lets you scroll through the issue by different panels, which it will then zoom in on. You tap the panel when done, and it moves to the next panel. This is great for getting a larger view and working around the size restriction, especially since some of the text in the comics is just too small to read. I do wish Amazon's comic reader allowed you to scroll through small versions of the pages (like I've seen on another unnamed e-reader), instead of just using a progress bar. Although it is fairly decent, if you are considering the Fire just for comic books, and you are a Marvel fan, you may want to hold off and look at another retailer's device which I think has a few more options. You can load your own .cbr comic files on the Kindle, but you'll need to use a third party app, like Comicat to do it.AMAZON MP3/VIDEO - Amazon hopes that you will get the majority of your content from them. That is why the Fire is so reasonably-priced. If you currently use iTunes, you will love switching to Amazon Mp3. Unlike iTunes, Amazon music is DRM-free. DRM is copy protection. That means that the record labels haven't locked down the music you buy from Amazon to restrict how you use it. For the most part, music purchased on iTunes can only be played with iTunes-compatible devices. That is why you won't be able to use your massive iTunes collection on the Fire (unless your remove DRM and convert them to Mp3 first). But Amazon MP3 music is playable anywhere, even on your Apple devices. It also has a very high bitrate so you are getting great quality. You don't have to worry about not being able to listen to your music 15 years from now if Amazon goes under. It's yours forever. As far as video, I have always disliked Amazon's Video services. The prices are very reasonable and they now have a huge selection, but obtaining the videos is a huge pain due to Amazon's terrible Unbox player. That changes with the Fire, as everything is native and streams/downloads beautifully. If you make a lot of purchases with Amazon, or if you have several Amazon customers in your household, you should take advantage of their Prime program. In addition to the large selection of free videos now available to Prime members, the shipping advantages are amazing. I once had a 200 lb exercise bike overnighted to my house for only $3.99. Everything I order I get within 2 days. The Prime program seems expensive but it has certainly paid for itself over the years for me, and now is even better that it is integrated more with the Fire. The only problem I have with video playback is that everything I watched did not fully expand to the screen, and was letterboxed. Considering the small 7" display size, this was an annoyance for me. I know shows have different aspect ratios, but some should fit the display, and I think many users will be annoyed that they can't zoom or stretch the display to fit.WEB BROWSING - This is another feature I was initially excited about. I like the idea of being able to use the Fire as a netbook. Amazon advertises "ultra fast web browsing" using Amazon's Silk browser. It is based off of technology that is designed to increase page loading times by pre-fetching part of the content. Sounds like a great idea, but doesn't work as well in practice. I tried out the Fire on several different connections and compared page loading times with other devices (all connected wirelessly). The Fire was one of the slowest. Amazon's own web page, which has actually recently been optimized to work with the Fire, takes an average of 7 seconds to load. Other major portals took a similar amount of time or slower. My iPad and my Xoom both load pages much faster. It is not slow enough to be a problem, but not fast enough to impress me or be worthy of Amazon's marketing regarding it. This needs to be improved.BATTERY LIFE - Amazon advertises 8 hours of reading or 7.5 hours of video playback. As an average, that's probably fairly accurate. During testing I got an average of 7.4 hours of continuous reading, and 7 hours of video playback over five tests for each. This is a big change over the roughly 30 days of continuous reading with the traditional kindle, so it may hamper you a bit if you're a voracious reader. I just got into the habit of charging it every night with my cell phone.VS IPAD - As said, this isn't designed to be an iPad. I have an iPad and there is so much more I can do with it compared to the Kindle. The Fire serves a different (but sometimes similar) function. I just don't ever see Amazon building up the type of app store that Apple has, and that's where you're going to find the major differences. Additionally, the 10" display on the iPad makes a huge difference to me over the Fire's 7" display when it comes to watching movies and TV, and reading magazines and comic books. However, I think there is definitely room for the Fire to steal some of iPad's market share, as many people (I am one of them), will find the functions they want in a tablet can be covered by the Fire.USER INTERFACE - The Fire uses a heavily modified version of Android. I really liked the interface, however I don't think it works as well on the Fire as it does on a full tablet device like the Motorola Xoom. Occasionally I would try to make a page turn and have it not register on the Fire, or have it register more slowly than I am used to. If you have a lot of experience with the iPad, you are going to notice that the software doesn't respond as quickly on the Fire as it does with other tablets. Although this is an inconvenience and something I definitely feel needs to be addressed, I can accept it given the lower price point. I will have a problem though if this is not resolved through a firmware upgrade in the future. The Fire's custom version of Android is very nice. The most recent applications or files accessed will display in a carousel format that you can rotate through. You can also set up commonly-used applications as favorites.NEGATIVES:- No bluetooth and no HDMI. I could really use bluetooth for integration with bluetooth-capable speakers and so I can use bluetooth audio in my car. As a media player, I feel this really should have been included, and I imagine it will with future versions. This is especially important since the audio from the speakers is a bit tinny and weak. I have been using headphones with all my media-playing, which significantly improves the sound. There is also no physical volume button, which is a pain when you need to silence the device quickly. I also would like HDMI output so I can take my Amazon video purchases and watch them on my big screen TV. Another big disadvantage in a device that is made for media. This will also likely be included in a future edition, so at $200, I don't feel bad about possibly having to upgrade a year from now to get it.- Only 8Gb storage space. As mentioned, this device is mainly designed to integrate with Amazon's Cloud, so 8 should be enough, but it would be nice to have at least 16. I imagine Amazon did this on purpose to force people to use their Cloud service.- Touch capability can sometimes be sluggish. iPad and other tablet owners may be disappointed with the touch reaction time and some aspects of the software.- Video doesn't include option to zoom or stretch the display to fit the screen.- Web "Accelerator" is not as fast as other tablets.- No Micro-USB transfer cable included with it. Another way for Amazon to discourage you from transferring your own files to the device. If you want to do that, you will need to purchase one separately, like the AmazonBasics USB Cable - 2.0 A Male to Micro B (6 Feet / 1.8 Meters).SUMMARY: Bottom line, you will not find a cheaper device out there for streaming music, video, and books than the Kindle Fire. The reason that this device is so amazing is not for what it can do, but for what it can do at such a cheap price. The price tag, not the technology, is the story here. Although I definitely feel there is room for improvement and will be interested in seeing Amazon's second generation of this device (which I think will be significantly improved), the Kindle Fire is a solid start. If you can wait a year or more for Amazon to work out the kinks with the Fire (like it did with its 1st generation of the Kindle), you should definitely do that. The next version should fix a lot of the problems that keep the current Fire from being a "Five Star" product. Unfortunately, reviews shouldn't focus on price, so due to some issues with the form factor and touch interface, I can only give it four stars. It is just not "perfect" enough for me to say it is a five star product without taking price into consideration. But aside for that, there is really only one device you can compare the Fire to - The Nook. So for what it is, I would have no problems recommending the Fire to consumers who can take advantage of it. This product more than lives up to what it is DESIGNED to do. If you plan on getting most of your content from Amazon AND you have a Prime membership, I think you will really find this is a pretty incredible device for the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

72 of 82 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNOT a fanboy/fangirl review but a realistic look at a very misunderstood product,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Raghee Horner(Coral Springs, FL.)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Five stars because it does what it is designed and does it well.Interestingly I have not seen such split between  five and one star reviews in a while and I think partly, this is a difficult product to define so here's my take on how I am using it:This is not meant to replace my iPad. I love my iPad but frankly with my 13" MacBook Air so portable, my iPad sits on the coffee table unless I know I am going somewhere that I know I am likely have difficulty finding WiFi.I initially bought an iPad with the idea of using it as an eReader but after 15-20 minutes the 1.5lb iPad feels like it's ten pounds and simply becomes too uncomfortable to hold like a nice light paperback. The Fire is much more realistic an eReader. Is it meant to challenge iPad as a tablet? No. Heck it's not even a challenge as an eReader to the Kindle Touch which has the dreamy eInk. But for most people the iPad is so much more than they need. I am not going to sit &amp; write articles on my iPad even though there are some great apps for that - I'll use my (portable!) MacBook Air! The Kindle Touch is very focused on one thing: reading for longer periods of time. If you're a reader who wants to curl up for two-hours with a book and just read, get a Kindle Touch. If you're a little more "short attention spanned" like me, the Fire is perfect.e.g. I'll read for 15-20 minutes, I may then check out a video that popped into my head as I was reading. Case in point, I was reading Blink on my iPad and then wanted to watch a video on You Tube that Malcolm Gladwell did about spaghetti sauce. Kindle Touch? Can't happen. Kindle Fire? You betcha. It's two different style of media content and that's what the Fire will do: DELIVER MEDIA.Amazon is not in the hardware business the way Apple is. All my cards on the table, I also trade stocks and the entrance of Amazon into the table-wars is the most interesting because it's not about hardware "fanboys" (or fangirls) but the ecosystem you can now inhabit! Apple's ecosystem serves its hardware sales while Amazon's sole purpose to get the content in your hands quickly and easily.In fact in many ways the Kindle Fire will improve because of the Cloud and the ecosystem without the need to upgrade equipment every 18 months. Apples NEEDS and WANTS you to do this. Amazon does not. I've heard complaints that Silk is not impressive but it will take some time to harness the habits of our surfing habits before it improves and I have no doubt it will. I also feel that some software updates are likely going to come sooner rather than later which is address the (growing) needs of the user. All companies do this, Amazon which is so consumer-driven will be no different.Frankly it's going to be a lot easier to toss the Fire in my purse and go than the iPad.Storage seems to be another issue for most people and while I won't judge why someone "needs" more rooms on a device this is a legitimate concern especially when the Nook does have an SD card slot. Frankly this would have made the Fire PERFECT but again this device is meant to have connectivity to WiFi. I can download what I need very quickly. Anyone who uses a Kindle knows that in less than 60-seconds you have an entire book in your hands. I don't keep ALL my books on my iPad even though with 64gigs I could.And the WiFi issue: Ask anyone with multiple devices and the 3G subscriptions start to add up. For me personally I have to pay four different monthly 3G subscriptions for the family, I'd love to be in a world where WiFi is more continuous. And I do believe we're heading that. Amazon known this and eventually this will be less of a concern.Use this device for what it was designed to do: It's not meant to challenge the iPad but I think people will realize that they don't necessarily need a device like the iPad when there is one more focused on content delivery. And if I NEED to play Pocket God or Angry Birds (which I could do on the Fire!) heck, that's what my iPhone is for...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

242 of 286 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSmokes the iPad 1g;  a better choice than iPod 4g for some.,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;Samuel Chell(Kenosha,, WI United States)  -See all my reviews(TOP 100 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(HALL OF FAME REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)[Update: I've encountered the following difficulties which I have little doubt will be quickly resolved.  1st, it takes practice to be able to scroll through, say, a supply of Prime movies without inadvertently calling up a movie that posts a rental charge--a matter of knowing how and where to place your fingers on the screen; 2nd, it frequently has been requiring several attempts before a movie downloaded from Amazon (not my Cloud storage) will actually play. Instead, it's common to see the moving bar register the progress of the download, followed by the message: "An error has occurred. See questions under Connections and contact Amazon if necessary"; 3. whereas the visuals of the Fire are as sharp and hi-def as any comparable high-priced screen, the onboard audio is neither as powerful nor full-frequencied as that of the newest iPad or, for that matter, the much smaller iPod. Though the sound is certainly adequate for personal viewing in quiet surroundings, the user will likely require earphones or a remote speaker to be satisfied with the audio under most circumstances.]The Kindle Fire practically burns away the competition. Not only is onboard storage capacity generous (twice that of the Kindle Touch, which is twice that of the entry-level Kindle), but its speed and instant connection with Amazon's Cloud (not to mention the internet), offer the user inexhaustible access to data of every sort.  It's like having the British Museum, the Library of Congress and the American Film Institute--all in the palm of your hand.I purchased the iPad1 and wish I had waited for the iPad 2, especially after being "spoiled" by the light tweight and convenience of the 11" Mac Air.  Now I'm glad I didn't spring for an iPad2, especially given the attractive price, the speed and practicality of the Kindle Fire.  Moreover, the Fire offers a distinct advantage to Amazon Prime members, for whom it serves as a personal, dedicated "movie theater," providing instant access to thousands of free movies available to Prime members.  I'm still a fan of the Mac Air, especially for composing documents, on-line shopping and doing e-mail.  And I doubt that, apart from Amazon downloads, the Fire will replace my iPod Touch as an audio player.  But if the Fire isn't exactly an iPad or iPod "killer," it's a most welcome complement to them as well as to previous Kindles.PROS:The  SIZE and WEIGHT are just right--not so large as to be an encumbrance or so small as to make following a text page or movie a challenge--even for 2 or 3 individuals. (Just be aware that it's about twice the thickness and weight of a conventional Kindle using e-ink technology.)The SIMPLICITY and CLARITY of operation are more user-friendly even than Apple's, especially given Apple's periodic upgrades and confusing Cloud claims (the trick is to determine whether and when you're protected by their Cloud).  And Apple's MobileMe (now being phased out) has been both an extra expense and a pain (the problems are too numerous to mention, but perhaps the preference, even of diehard Apple fans, for DropBox over MobileMe's exasperatingly slow iDisK is sufficient testimony in itself to the shortcomings of MobileMe).  With Amazon you know where your books and music are at all times, and whether or not you choose to keep them in the Cloud or on your machine is irrelevant to the number of documentary, media and audio files at your disposal.  Moreover, I can't imagine possibly being misled by Amazon's directions into creating 2 user-IDs, as was the case with Apple, and moreover being unable to undo the damage in confusion by reverting to one.Compared to the heavy and cumbersome iPad 1, the Fire is a JOY to HANDLE.  Lightweight, responsive, low-to-no heat, seemingly independent of AC recharging.  You're good to go for as many movies, books, pictures, or audio recordings as you (or a child) could possibly handle for a day or more.  I plan to retain my Kindle, with less power-draining E-ink technology, for serious reading.  But for reading a colorful Golden Book or illustrated Dr. Seuss tale with my granddaughters, the Fire gets the nod.  And for movies, the seven-inch screen is ideal for personal viewing.  Since the resolution is greater than that of a larger screen, the added sharpness compensates for giving up a couple of inches of screen real estate.The device is RESPONSIVE and FAST.  I have yet to experience  frustrating delays and annoying spinning wheels [but see above re: aborted downloads] while the machine is trying to sort out its directions (admittedly, I haven't thrown any heavy duty projects at it, like recording a broadcast, burning a movie, surfing the internet simultaneously (not that uncommon on the iMac). But for the basic uses for which I plan to use this machine, it's practically a flawless, foolproof performer.  One thing is certain: the Fire, with its fast, user-friendly, smooth BROWSER (Silk), is bound to be a huge hit with impatient youngsters--or, for that matter, with those of us who find ourselves spending too much time fixing and fussing over our machines and too little enjoying them.PRICE:  Amazon has thrown down the gauntlet.  The Fire offers twice the screen size of the Touch (3.5") at the same price as Apple's least expensive model.  As usual, Jeff Bezos, who now approaches the combination of vision and practicality that made Steve Jobs a universal and iconic,  practically mythic figure, is showing his savvy about consumer needs and expectations.  His few missteps--the attempt to sell cars on Amazon, then the Segway--are fewer than Apple's, and none has inflicted serious harm to the company he's built--in great part because he's always put his customers first,  willing to risk shareholders' ire and take some near-term hits to Amazon's bottom line in order to keep the company on course for the future.  It remains to be seen if Apple and other internet giants are prepared to follow Amazon's lead.  At present, Amazon's family of tablets clearly represents the best value on the market, with the stakes higher than ever, thanks to the heated-up environment created by the Fire..CONS:None that aren't also pro's.  For example, the inclusion of any sort of camera on a device that isn't pocket-sized is, imo, a negative, not a plus.  Even the music player, which seems competitive with Apple's, is for my purposes unnecessary.  Unless it's a "wearable," or pocket-sized device, I'm unlikely to take the music with me (or slip it under my pillow at night as I do my iPod).  I suppose it would nice if the screen size could be increased 2-3 inches and without a loss in resolution or an increase in price and/or weight. Wait for the 2nd generation Fire, if you choose. Seven inches suits me just fine, especially given the advantages just mentioned.Unlike other Kindles, there's no need for a clip-on light.  And before purchasing a fancy case, you may wish to consider the price of the Fire to begin with--spending fifty on a cover seems disproportionate.  I prefer to use the device with no cover or, if necessary, a soft, shock-resistant, "grippaple" skin for the back of the tablet. (I was able to find an adequate case for under ten.)BOTTOM LINE: If you're a movie buff or someone who reads colorful, illustrated books with children, the Fire deserves a central place in your tablet activity.  With its illuminated screen, the Fire can't begin to hold as many manuscripts or perform for as many hours on a single charge as any of the Kindle readers with E-ink technology.  So serious readers should think twice before setting aside their old Kindles.  For my purposes, it comes down to the following: "Keyboard" Kindle 3 for books, iPod for music, Fire for movies as well as illustrated, colorful books and magazines.  As for serious computing, a desktop machine like the iMac and/or a notebook computer like the Macbook Air still seem indispensable for my own purposes--perhaps because I grew up with long-hand and typing and am not, as yet, totally comfortable with (or especially good at) texting and touching.  Having explained my own niche for the Fire, I have little doubt that it can fill the more "general" needs of those who, primarily because of cost, have had to postpone purchase of an all-purpose personal tablet-computer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (14)

196 of 231 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsNOT "E-INK", AWESOME Color e-reader;  Last Update Feb/2012.  Overall Final Rating: 2,5,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;Luis Angel Betancur F "L.A. Beta"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Final Update: February 06/2012oK: Almost 3 months with the KF: Didn't return it, I think it is a good e-reader ... not a tablet, but I can stand it; I have been carrying it with me a lot of time and KF is comfortable as a COLOR e-reader that let me do some other basic tasks (mail, web, video &amp; music). JUST a good occasional companion.I do still think it can be good for small kids who are starting to use electronic devices BUT PLEASE read "Note to Parents".Outstanding Kindle Fire Features:Dual core processor (TI OMAP4) is powerful enough for those of us who like the device to run smoothly and fast. I feel it almost as fast as my iPad2 (Dual Core A5), probably sometimes it is slower when it has to perform high speed tasks (downloading HD video). Certainly it is slower than my iMac and Macbook pro (but I think this is not comparable because devices are in different levels).Color touch screen: Admirable, awesome, outstanding. Screen is 7", resolution is 1024x600 (iPad is 1024x768), and screen pixels per inch is 169 vs. 132 of iPad and here is where it makes a big difference. I like photography magazines that have many pictures with bright colors, and the reliability of colors is amazing.Price: Change my mind, now I think it is overpriced (Con).Display durability: It appears to be really durable and tough to scrapes without sacrificing anti-reflective properties which is superb including its use outside with low - mild sun. Let the small children play/read with this one and save the iPad for you. Three months and cero scratches but we are careful users.Kindle Fire Pros:Touch keyboard: It is ok for making notes &amp; annotations while reading. Sometimes you have to touch twice the screen but I think it is also that the processor sometimes is busy. oK, must accept that sometimes it is difficult to touch/mark on an exactly point, worst if you have big fingers.Size: Bigger than other options but worth the effort. It only fits big pockets (I have a cotton coat with BIG pockets where it fits) with the cover on, without cover fits suit pockets but it stands out.Probably this shouldn't be your choice if what you expect is a very portable Kindle, I will advice to checkKindle, Wi-Fi, 6" E Ink Display - includes Special Offers &amp; Sponsored ScreensaversWeight: Comparing it to my iPad2 it is really a HUGE difference, Kindle Fire is much more comfortable, it is easy to handle with one hand, it is much lighter, it is smaller and I prefer it to the iPad when I am in bed. I think this is great but just comparing against iPad.Kindle tools: highlighting, notes, annotations, public notes. PDF &amp; TXT files.Surfing the Web: Amazon Silk browser gave me the same feeling as when I changed from explorer/chrome to Safari, just different but oK. Speed is good, but now I don't think that it is getting faster as I use it more, it is just acceptable. Confirmed after 3 months: Browser is just ok (3,0 / 5)Videos capacity: Yes, you can see any Amazon video &amp;/or other web sites. Downloading speed is good (I think it is almost as good as the iPad).Screen size might be a little small vs. other devices but for personal use is great (this is a personal decision, some people just like bigger screens and feel uncomfortable with this size), probably won't be good for shared use.I have been reading outside with bright sun (beside the swimming pool) and I have no problem to see the screen with full brightness. Very good for reading outside.Games: Speed is really good for this type of apps. Colors are beyond good, definitely this is an advantage of KindleFire.Amazon content is huge and you can get it as you wish (amazon subscription, pay for item, etc.)Can be a spectacular option for beginner readers, explore eBooks, etc. I have two daughters, 7 &amp; 5 years old, and they like it a lot and we are more relaxed because it is a cheaper device. Update: After 3 months my daughters have returned to the iPad and barely use the KF.Kindle Fire Cons:The WORST: Your content is exposed for everyone all the time and this is not modifiable. The only way to protect your KF is enabling password to unlock when you turn on your device:* Touch once over "menu", right upper corner.* Touch once over "more" (+): this will display "settings".* Touch over "Security".* Turn on: "Lock Screen Password".Another security advice:* Again: go to "settings".* Search for "Restrictions".* Here you will find: "Enable Restrictions", "Password Protected Wi-Fi", "Wireless Network (on/off)" and "Edit Password".This is how you can protect your KF content.BAD or "Not Kindle" alike: NOT "E-Ink". This is disappointing for Kindle Owners who love "E-INK", YOU WILL MISS IT when you read plain texts in B&amp;W.; AGAIN: KF is a luxury for color books/magazines. Although it is a little bit "eye friendly" compared with "conventional" PC/laptop screens, it is not awesome.Searching books can be difficult: Now I have many books and some magazines and searching for your books can be difficult because there is no classification beyond: "By author, By Recent or By Title" and in: Cloud / Device. Or search in the "home carrousel"..... This is exactly as standing in front of a bookshelf ... you will have to patiently search for the book.KF screen takes fingerprints awful: Keep a microfiber cleaning cloth at hand or in the cover, I boughtVerso Prologue Case Cover for Kindle Fire, RedWeight: Would be a Con if you compare it to Kindle Touch. Kindle fire is 14,6 oz.( 413 g.) almost twice the weight of kindle touch 7,8 oz. (221 g.). Now I think that it is light enough to carrying it everywhere.Battery: Obviously won't last as basic kindle, this device works just as other tablets and with multi tasking activities it can consume battery in less than 6 hours depending in wireless usage. It gives above 7 hours of continuous reading. Update (dec.11): I will advice to turn off WiFi when not need it to extend battery life.Stereo speakers: Just good, don't expect high sound quality, I will advice using a good quality earphones / headphones for better experience with music (3,5 mm stereo audio jack), mines areKlipsch IMAGE S4 In-Ear Enhanced Bass Noise-Isolating Headphones (Black).No Bluetooth, no GPS: Users of maps or frequent users of Bluetooth connection between your phones, computers, etc. will be disappointed, don't buy it. Travelers: beware of this, you should have another device (smart phone, other) if you need maps.No camera: If you don't have another device with you (your cell phone) and you need a picture .... Sorry, you will de unhappy, but it happens that I always have a camera with me in one of my cell phones &amp;/or my Nikon D300s, so I don't miss it. When I wan't to get in touch with somebody else I usually use my MacBook or iMac. So, for me it is not a problem but you should take this into consideration.No text to speech capability: BIG fault for those of us who like this feature.Kindle fire resembles a tablet BUT don't compare to an iPad/Samsung galaxy, Motorola, etc.; these are two different levels and SO is the price.Change my opinion: This device is not good for "basic" tablet fans ... it is "too" basic ... save your $200 for a more expensive tablet.I think that this device is so "Amazon friendly" that price should go down. This is a tool for selling media &amp; products from Amazon, so I expect that Amazon will drop its price. But this is not negative, iPad (iPod, iPhone, iMac) is (are) "Apple friendly" and we are happy with this technology availability and it is a personal decision to pay for the price of these devices. Update (dec.11/2011): Now I am absolutely convinced that price MUST go down, KF is nice BUT it is an AMAZON selling tool.Final Notes:1. Note about storage capacity: Storage capacity is limited to 8GB (No SD port, just USB), and is less This is a CON if you are a heavy storage capacity user (movies, HD pictures, etc.) because you will be limited in a certain way, although you can use USB connection. It is highly recommended that you start to use the iCloud storage. I use a lot of "iCloud storage" (mobile me, iCloud from Apple, iCloud-Amazon, etc).If you feel uncomfortable with iCloud storage (loosing information, not having a WiFi connection, etc.), then my advice is to buy an external high capacity memory. For that, I own a Hitachi 500 GB external memory where I have centralized all my important information that requires a lot of capacity (mainly HD pictures, photoshop archives, etc) and it is easy to share with my other devices.2. Connectivity: micro-USB port. It is the only way to maintain this device "unlocked" (PRO / CON ?).3. For reading the classic "black &amp; white" text books is better a Kindle touch / other basic Kindle reader, BUT for colorful text as magazines the Kindle Fire is the best.NOTE to PARENTS:Problems with Kindle Fire &amp; children: Kindle doesn't have "parental controls", the 1 click buying option is true and all the kindle content is viewable.What we do &amp; what we have learned by experience:1. Turn off Wi-Fi: This will not permit buying options nor accidentally see adult contents on the web, and battery will last longer. Keep your Wi-Fi secured with a password.2. Actually we don't have explicit adult content on our accounts (my wife and I have separate accounts on amazon and other web sites) so this is not a concern for us BUT it is a valid concern and the only advice I can give is that children ALWAYS have to use electronic devices under adult supervision (their screen computers should always be placed in an open area).*Recently we had two (2) bad experiences1. My older daughter (7 years old) with the iMac, which has all the parental controls active and in YouTube has search limits, performed with google a search of "scary videos" and guess what: the search opened a link to YouTube web site and boom .... the most scariest video was unloaded (it almost gave me a heart attack when I lately reviewed the computer). She couldn't sleep alone that night.2. My younger daughter (5y.) clicked on a "funny video" in YouTube while playing with her sister. The video displayed was from a "t.v. parody" and it was full of heavy gross vocabulary...Lesson learned: My daughters use the computer devices only with our company (not even with grandparents supervision).* I have learned to keep my (few) explicit adult items (books, videos, magazines, toys, etc.) absolutely apart and under key.From 4 stars to 3 stars: Overall Pricey but nice toy.Final Update (feb/2012): From 3 stars to 2,5. Browser is not good enough for what I want.Update: Dec.7/2011: If you live or travel outside U.S. you can not download videos nor Apps ..... Absolutely disapointting: 2,5 stars (although it is not KF fault but amazon should warn this issue)."Disclosure statement": I am a very big Amazon fan. I buy from Amazon almost every week (at least 3-4 times per month), so, this can be biased and you should have this idea in mind when considering buying a Kindle device, mostly the Kindle Fire because you will enjoy it best if you are an Amazon user, if you are not I will advice you to think it carefully, probably you have other options to consider.There are some other eBook readers devices, some worthwhile to check: Sony Reader Reader Touch Edition PRS-600B eBook reader (Black), Barnes &amp; Noble NOOK COLOR WiFi eBook Reader Tablet with SanDisk 1 GB microSD Card.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (26)

101 of 117 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsReally Wanted to Like this buuuuuut.....,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;M. Han "fsgirl"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When I broke my Kindle 3G and Square Trade reimbursed me the full purchase price I decided to go ahead and get the new Kindle Fire even though my plans were to wait a year or so before actually purchasing it.  I really wanted to like this device but I just don't.  Most of the features that I loved about my Kindle 3G were not there.  There is no privacy settings so everything you have ever opened, i.e. books, web pages, apps, etc is there for viewing on the carousel and you can't delete them...I don't have kids but for people who do that can't be a good thing.  Here are some other issues I have with the Fire:1) sometimes the touch screen feels like I almost have to punch my finger through the screen for it to actually open what I want it to;2) you can't create collections so you can't sort your books the way you want;3) text-to-speech is not available for the books that do have that option;4) Unlike the 3G and probably other previous Kindle devices I have to buy a separate USB connector instead of just removing the electrical outlet connector if I want to connect to my computer and;5) the length of the adapter is a joke...guess that was my first indication that there would be problems...with my 3G when I was reading in bed and needed to recharge I could plug it in and continue reading because the cord was long enough or I could just remove the electrical outlet connector and plug it into my laptop on my bed...neither is an option with the Fire (check reasons 3 &amp; 4)The bottom line is it's just not the Kindle I have come to know and absolutely loooooove...I soooo wanted to love the Fire but was just disappointed and became more and more so as I kept using it...printed out the return label already...I ordered the Kindle Touch for my mom for Christmas so I'm going to see what it's like (hopefully it's exactly like my old Kindle Keyboard 3G except with a touch keyboard instead of the physical one) and if I like it then I will order the Touch 3G for myself.  If it is also a disappointment then I'll go back to the Kindle Keyboard 3G.  Rarely ever disappointed with an  Amazon purchase but seriously so with the Kindle Fire.  :-(Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

41 of 47 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Android Tablet on the Market Period!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Patrick Louise "chaos09"(nj)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got the kindle fire in the mail at noon. Its a gift for my mom.  I gotta say its a amazing product.  I messed with it 5 hours Straight adding netflix, hbo go, as well as other apps.  Ive been teaching my mom as I was adding apps.  Very easy interface and she picked it up right away. (Shes 50)Ive had a htc evo for over a year and a half so I know android OS pretty well.For those that posted oh the amazon market is closed off really need to learn there android sites better.Also honesty there's no tablet out there that handles flash as well as this tablet does.  Meaning when I go to espn for example and click on the video on the main page it loads the video right there..when most tablets will 1. either crash or 2.(like my evo) ask to load it in a streaming player.I was like..ok are you kidding me?  This tablet loads everything my pc does. And super fast.  Ive seen speed tests on youtube and really the best tests are very heavy flash sites like epsn and cnn.  And it loaded in less then a second.So for those pointing to the ipad. While the screen is of course bigger people ALWAYS wanna forget it doesn't support flash which was always a deal breaker for a ipad for me...that and the price which I think apple is realizing now is too high.Face it people this is the best android tablet on the market period and I tried them all.  Anyone on the fence about this tablet.  Don't be. Its well worth it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

21 of 22 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire Rocks.,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;R. Morel(Santo Domngo, Dominican Republic)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Is there anything else to say about the Kindle Fire?I think there is.First, I was concerned because of a lot of 1 star reviews. In my experience shopping at amazon and reading reviews, anything short of 4.5 stars is a hit or miss purchase. The Kindle Fire (KF from now on) as of this writing has 11.5% one star reviews, and some of them sounded troubling, to say the least.In essence this is what they said and my opinion about each point:1. "No Android Market: this is not true". Installing the android market is not what you would call easy, but it's definitely doable. Instructions for this abound on the internet.2. "The KF is irresponsive very frequently". This is the opposite of my experience. I am a big guy with big hands and I find the KF ability to correctly detect touchs nothing but remarkable.3. "The SILK Browser is very slow": And it is. Compared to Opera Mini or any other browser, the thing is very slow. I really don't understand what amazon is doing, or how they could market this as something revolutionary. The way I see it, they simply had to install it and let people see it. They made it worse creating and setting high expectations about it. Bad marketing.4. "Power button is misplaced/placed in a very inconvenient position": I had to start playing the incredibly addictive Angry Birds in order to experience the accidental power off that so many have been reporting. It has happened three times in a couple hundred hours of use. I think it could have been placed somewhere else but I cannot think of a placement where it would prevent the accidental power offs. I think the people complaining need to understand it is a tiny device. Maybe an interruptor could fix this, not necessarily repositioning the button.5. "No Volume button": it's true. The Volume is two taps away.6. "Bad wireless connectivity/signals": the wireless range is much worse than that of my Dell Inspiron 15, which has the best range in all laptops I have tried and I have tried a few. Connectivity cannot be simpler: just select the wifi lans and password and you are connected.7. "No USB Cable": True. Kind of annoying at the beginning and I see how this could be an issue for the less experienced with computers and networking. You definitely need to order the cable. Here is the link http://amzn.to/tE0cgk8. "It gets hot": mine got hot when streaming a Netflix movie. This is probably the most demanding task the device can handle, and it was much cooler than my laptop or an Ipad I tested. But it does get mildly hot. As I said, it's much less than the heat you get from say a Dell Inspiron 15.9. "Security, people can buy stuff from your device". This is true and I suppose Amazon will work this out because most users have been complaining about it with (almost all) reason. (more on this later).10. "No streaming of your video library, just the content in amazon instant video": might be a deal breaker for some. For those of us in parts of the world where internet speed is still cost prohibitive, that's not something we were going to do anyway.11. "If you are outside the USA, you get a table that is as close to a brick as it can get". Absolutely true and this is something that amazon needs to address now. I took my brand new KF to Dominican Republic and the only thing I could do was download the preloaded apps (they were magnificent; I think everybody need to see and use Pulse and QuickOffice). I did not have access to the Amazon Android App store and was unable to install any apps from the android market. I could download and installed Dropbox, Opera Mini, Adobe Reader and FileExpert, but there wasn't much I could do or that anyone, outside the USA can do, but to ROOT the device and install the Android Market.12. "Scrolling is jittery and stutters". Not my experience at all. In fact reading PDF books (huge 30-50MB Microsoft Press Books) is simply delightful. My desktop PC jitters and stutters a lot more than the KF. I honestly don't know what they are comparing against. I don't own an Ipad, but from what I can recall, the Ipad is a bit better when scrolling web sites.13. "The Carousel offers no privacy"... While this is true (no privacy ONCE you are in the carousel), I don't really understand what are people expectations about this. I think of my desktop pc, laptop and now KF as some kind of underware. I don't expect people to be asking for them because the first two devices hold way too important information for me to comfortably letting them go around. I simply don't like lending my computers. This also applies to the KF. I personally don't have anything on it that I don't want people to see, but the device has security feature to password lock the device when you suspend it.14. "Some books and content from old kindles won't be available to your kindle fire": Amazon put an egg on this one. Seriously. I suspect they are working to fix it, but with the capabilities of the KF, I assume it is only a matter of a small software adjustment, but seriously, not being able to read SOME or ONE of your old kindle BOOKS in your new KF is definitely a major annoyance.Now onto what's great about the Kindle Fire.I am in Dominican Republic, so in order to install apps and get the most out of the KF, I had to root it and install the Android Market App. After I did that, I have been absolutely in love.It is worth mentioning again: You NEED to Root the Kindle Fire and install the Android Market to get the most out of the device, and you MUST do it if you are outside the USA. If you don't, you'll be stuck with a 199 web browsing, news aggregator thingy and not much more.Some could argue that, because you can sideload apps and download some .apks and install them, but the availability will be simply dismal and not enough. The android market opens the tablet to a whole world of possibilities.The screen and image quality can be described simply as stunning, and I'm probably falling short. You really need to see it to appreciate it.The reading experience is awesome. Since most previous kindle users say the e-ink kindle is so much better for reading I am considering getting one of those, since they are now so affordable. But since I am so satisfied reading in my KF, I will pass for now.I have a huge collection of Microsoft Press Books. Most of them come with a CD with the book in a PDF format. Since we are talking about huge books with 900-1900 pages, those PDFs are handy. The big tradeoff is having to read them in the laptop. Not anymore. Using the kindle app to read PDFs is great. Adobe reader is a little faster at rendering the pages, but the feature of the kindle that remembers where you left the book makes up for it, and it's my preferred... besides, the difference in speed is close to unnoticeable.Web browsing with Opera Mini, Google Apps, Yahoo Mail App, Netflix, Pulse, Pandora, Google Maps, Angry Birds, aldico ebook reader make the kindle fire shine.I cannot think of a more responsive screen. I cannot think of a better quality display. The software keyboard is great.Overall, the Kindle Fire is making my laptop take dust. I'm simply not using it as often as I did. I think about 80% of the time spent in the laptop is now spent in the kindle fire, and I don't think that's going to change, as I am now considering developing a few apps and lean tools I need and can't find anywhere.The reason why I am giving the KF 4 stars is because out of the box the device was extremely limited. And this makes me tell Amazon something.I think you guys at Amazon are doubting yourself. And you really shouldn't. Just read even the one star reviews and get a grasp at how deeply rooted the relationship between you and your customers is.I tell you this because by modifying the Kindle Fire's OS to prevent root access you are doubting the power of that relationship, and worse, you are demonstrating a lack of trust that's bad, and a reflection of your doubts about the relationship you have with us, your customers.Believe me, if you open the device and let people install the Android Market, you won't lose a great deal of business. In fact, I'm sure the satisfaction levels of all of us, your customers, will go even higher, and that guarantees that we will stay buying from you because it is and feels like the right thing to do, because it is a pleasure to do it, to support a great company like the one you've built and make every day, one transaction at a time.Prospective Buyers: Remember it is not an Ipad. You won't be able to connect it to a TV, you won't be able to videoconference or even make VoIP calls because it doesn't have a camera or a microphone.If you live outside the USA and you are not computer literate, then this device is not for you, because (at the time of this review) you wont be able to buy from the Amazon Android App Store, and installing the android Market is not necessarily an easy, light experience. It has a few unusual steps. This is important to know!In all, The Kindle Fire is a great device at an amazing price. Most one star reviews are from people who didn't take the time to learn to use the device, or a few who were expecting the miracle of buying a 600usd device at 200usd.Buy one if you need something to browse the web, read books, news, watch some movies every now and then and even play some games. Chances are you wont be disappointed. Read around and learn how to root the device and you will have one of the most amazing devices 199usd can buy.*** EDIT (Dec. 24th. 2011):1.- BATTERY LIFE: I didn't mention battery life although I did noticed that streaming movies from Netflix it only gives ~6 hours. I haven't used it only for reading, but based on estimations after noticing that the actual meter of the battery charge is pretty accurate, I think you could get close to 10 hours if used on night mode (my favorite even for daytime reading). For web browsing the most I've been able to get if 7 hours 25 minutes. That should definitely be improved.2.- AMAZON SILK BROWSER: it needs work. When it is fast it is SUPER fast. But it is mostly slow. Most reports of the Fire having a bad response are probably what users have experienced using the Silk, which at times becomes close to inoperational. A point in its favor is that it really opens everything, a lot of pages that Opera mini, Opera Mobile or Mozilla for Android cannot open, like speedtest .net. Gmail and most Google Apps are much better in the Silk than in any other application (Gmail is beatiful in it, I prefer it to the "real", standard full site display), and that includes the actual Google apps for android, which interfaces I'm not so crazy about.CONCLUSION: This doesn't take another star from my review. I am still in love with the Kindle Fire. :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

21 of 22 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's all about how you use it...,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Mike(Westchester, NY)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire for about a week now and I have nothing but good things to say about it. I want to first start of by saying that if you're expecting an amazing tablet computer that's going remove all you're daily stresses and give you a new outlook on life, you'll be disappointed. I know that I was expecting the Fire to help me manage my time more efficiently and to have a little fun with. It has not only done that, but much more. Honestly, out of the box, the device isn't very much fun; unless you consider the Kindle Fire User Guide a good read. That led to my initial disappointment with the Fire. I kind of a had a 'that's it?' moment. The more I started downloading books, apps, and uploading my music to the cloud, I found myself using the device much more, obviously. At this point, though, I wasn't really doing much on the Fire that I couldn't already do on my iPhone. I would normally just lay in bed at night at watch Netflix or something and, yes, having the bigger screen is really nice, but the added weight and awkward dimensions made me question my purchase.I am currently a college student. I bring my MacBook Pro around everywhere with me. There are a few problems with that, though. First, my backpack can get really heavy, especially if I have anything more than my laptop and notebook or two. If I try to bring my charger and a textbook in the morning, my back is hurting by noon. So I usually have to compromise and leave my textbooks in my room, naturally. Anyways, back to the Kindle. More than half my classes have their notes online that you can download as PDF's or Word Documents to you're computer. I recently started downloading them to my Kindle via emailing to my given @kindle.com address and they download right to my device! Now all I do is bring my Kindle to class most days. It's a feather compared to my laptop. The PDF's look great and I'm not as tempted to be distracted as I normally would be with my laptop. Now I'll get into some of the actual uses and pros and cons of the device.User Interface:The user interface (UI) for the Kindle Fire is probably one of its weakest points. After only about a week the 'carousel' is so cluttered I don't even try to use it for anything anymore. I either just go right down to my favorites or the section I know that program would be in. If you do chose to use the carousel, though, scrolling through it is pretty fluid. The Fire also allows you to use it in portrait or landscape. I find myself using it in portrait most. Rotating the screen makes it lag (a lot) probably due do the endless carousel of items that need to be rotated. It's still only a few second but it's very, very noticeable. I'm glad the option is there, though, because I often like the use the device in portrait mode but upside down. This bring the power button and headphone jack to the top so you have a less chance of accidentally hitting it. This works in all the standard features but not all apps, I've noticed.Books/Docs:I've only downloaded a few samples of books so far. I don't really have much time for leisure reading since it's finals are coming up but it seems great. You have a bunch of options to change the font, type, colors, everything you'll ever want to change. Page turning it pretty fluid, too. Docs are also great. As I said above, I download my lecture notes in PDF or Word .doc format on to the device and they work great. I'm sure there's apps for it (Quick Office Pro, I believe) but you can't edit those from Docs. You also have the 'Newsstand' for magazine but I haven't tried those yet.Music/Video:I was a bit concerned about only have 6GB usable memory on the device prior to purchasing it but Amazon believes in the cloud and so do I now. Like I mentioned before, I'm at college and 99% on my university has WiFi everywhere so it's no problem getting a connection. The only annoyance I have with this is that I have to log in to my schools WiFi each time I unlock the Kindle. But that's not the Kindle's fault. Music and videos play back wonderfully on the Fire. Smooth and crisp, usually. Only a few times have I had issues with the music skipping a little but, again, I believe that is my schools WiFi's fault. I'll be sure to check when I go home for Christmas break. I haven't downloaded anything on to my actual device yet in terms of music and videos. For music, you can use Amazon MP3 Uploaded to upload all your files from iTunes into the cloud. I have about 800 songs and it took about an hour. Now I have access to them on my fire anytime, anywhere there's a WiFi connection. That's pretty cool. I only wish there was an easier way to have it sync with iTunes or something because now every time I download a new song from iTunes, I have to manually upload it to Amazon Cloud. Not  huge deal but a little annoyance. In terms of video, I mainly use Netflix, which is great, but I did want to try Amazon Video. Amazon Video was also great, if not better, in terms of speed and quality. There selection is a bit limited, though, for free items.Web:Reading the reviews for these device, I was really concerned about the web browsing. That's one of the main things I use it for. I had heard it was choppy and slow and laggy but it really isn't. I've had no issues with speed and choppiness in the browser. It also supports Flash which is really great so I can watch a lot of my shows online, too.Apps:The Amazon App Store has a great selection of Apps. The only 2 it's missing are Facebook and Twitter but there are unofficial third party apps to get that, or you can just use the web browser. Both those sites have a mobile version that works great. Also, Amazon has a free app of the day. It's a normally paid app that they give away for free. I was expecting really boring, dumb apps but there are actually some really good ones. One was this airplane game which I could, and have, played for hours. Another was a neat and useful calendar. And then there was the drawing app which is a whole lot of fun, too.  It's a lot of fun to see which app they're going to have there everyday. The Amazon App Store may not be as big as the Apple App Store, but most of the essentials + many, many more are there with more being added all the time.Overall:I really do love the Kindle. It's great to just pick it up and watch some Netflix, play a few games, or just browse the web on my bed without my heavy laptop. I know I didn't say much in regards to hardware before and that's because there's not much to say, and I don't mind that. It took about a day to get used to pressing the home button or adjusting the volume through the menus and it's really not that huge of a deal. So, I would recommend the Fire to anyone really. Whether they're a student, like me, a parent, or a business person, they'll get some use out of the Fire. It may not be the must useful device ever for getting actual tasks done, but once you do accomplish those taks, it's nice to sit back and play with your Kindle Fire. Like I said starting off my review, don't expect too much when buying it. Expect it to work, obviously, but then find out how YOU use it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

25 of 27 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNot an iPad but really a nice unit for the money,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Flmtrain-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Reading internet reviews will make your head spin. Before I purchase a new item, I always try and research it. Problem is now a days no matter how good or bad a product is, there are always split reviews. A ton of people love the product and a ton hate it. I think it all has to do with why you are purchasing the item and how you will plan of using it. Don't get me wrong, some products are just that bad that 95% of the reviews are bad. I researched the Kindle Fire for a week before purchasing one.My story is that I bought an iPad for my wife almost a year ago. She is not one to use computers alot and the iPad made it easy for her to check email, Facebook, surf the web, Netflix, etc. I use a computer all day long and really don't want to spend two hours a night on a computer. I have an iPhone that works fine with last minute checking email, Facebook, etc. but most nights right before bed it would be nice to have a device larger then my phone, that is where the Kindle Fire comes into the picture for me. I have never owned a Kindle but heard good things about them. My wife is usually using her iPad in the evenings and right before bed so for six months I thought about purchasing another iPad but just could not bring myself to spend $500.00. My wife heard about the Kindle Fire and told me I should buy one, which I did one week ago.The Kindle Fire actually surprised me. I am not an Apple Fanboy but I have enjoyed their products over the years. I still have a windows desk top computer at home, my high school daughter uses for school and I purchased a Macbook Pro for my older daughter to use away at college. The Fire does a lot of things very well. I spent a lot of time using it over the long holiday weekend. I watched movies, which they played with no problems. I have checked email, Facebook, surf the web, played games, read a book, etc. Email is OK but not 100% user friendly, yet it gets the job done. Facebook is great, youtube is great, games played no problems. I think the overall physical size is fine. I like the small 7" size, fits in your hand good and works great for movies, games and books. Magazines are the only thing that the size of the unit is a bit small and would work better on a larger unit. For me, since there is an iPad in the house which I have used, I have something to compare it to, but for people who never owned an tablet type computer they will not know any difference. I have Comcast internet at home so the Kindle works great. I brought it to work today and used it during lunch and it works great. I took it to Panera Bread over the weekend and it was running very slow due to their internet connection. It does need a good fast connection or it will run slow.Not going to make this a very long review about how great or better, etc. the Kindle Fire is but if you want a good solid device, this unit does what Amazon put it out to do and for $200.00 you can not get a better device on the market now. Most places have a 14 day free return, buy one and try it out, then you will know if it fits your needs.Good luck!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

42 of 48 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsLong time iPhone/iPad user, first Android experience with Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Ken-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like to think I ordered the Kindle Fire with eyes wide open and having fully read the capabilities it had.  This is my first non-Apple device and it was ordered so I could get a feel for Android and to see if the 7" form factor was something I'd use.  The lack of SD slot or camera is not any issue at all for me, it was clear from the beginning that the Fire didn't plan on having these.The Fire arrived mid-day on Tuesday and I spent yesterday playing around with it, transferring some videos and music from my iTunes library,  and purchasing a couple books.  There is nothing it claimed to do that it doesn't do.  Everything worked, just not as well as I expected.The good:The device feels solid and I don't worry about breaking anything on it.The display brightness and colors are nice, videos look fine.The form factor is good for a "paperback" style of book reading.  People who focus on book reading would probably be better off with a normal Kindle just for the e-ink and being able to read outdoors. This is and area I'm disappointed in the iPad as well, it is just as bad in sunlight.The home screen and interface is a nice change from the standard rows of icons.  It is a good design for a content consumption device.Easy to transfer files to it from a computer (as long as you have a micro-usb cable).Excellent price for this type of device, and there is no complaint I can make that changes this.  It is easily worth this, especially for someone's first tablet.The so-so:The streaming video content with the Prime membership doesn't contain much that I'm interested in.  There may be a high count of things but really nothing I'd use more than once or twice.  Netflix(or something like it) would be much better for me.  (Fire supports Netflix so no problem)Video is just ok on this size of a device.  I couldn't stand watching video on the iPhone and this is better than that, but since I am used to the iPad size screen, watching video was just not worth it on the Fire.The build quality isn't bad, it's just not as polished as I'm used to seeing on my other devices.  I can see the light from the charging led through the top edge of the case when it is on.  That doesn't bother me but it is something I noticed that would have never gotten through other build/design processes.The bad:I cannot stand having to press icons or buttons multiple times to get the device to do something.  This is just infuriating.  I have to hit the back arrow or home button more than once the vast majority of the time before an action is taken.The carousel interaction is not consistent.  You think you've tapped but you actually scroll.  You think you've tapped but nothing happens.  It is very frustrating.  And I've let coworkers and my wife do the same thing and that is their complaint.  They can't stand when it just doesn't do what you expect. This can probably be addressed in future software updates but right now it is annoying.The web browsing is very sluggish and not just in delivering content to the device which may speed up once the servers can cache more intended operations.Turning pages in books seems jerky compared to what I normally use.Conclusion for me:Maybe buying the Fire didn't give me the exposure to Android that I wanted since Amazon's version is a fork from an earlier release.  Hopefully someone will root native Android to the device and I'll probably give that a try to see how I like that.I really believe the device is worth the $199 for people who are already invested in the Amazon ecosystem and want a smaller tablet.  The user interaction awkwardness can probably be corrected in future software updates and I believe Amazon will do a good job of responding to customer issues.It is an ok device.  Anyone with a lot of Amazon music/video content will get good value from it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

1,535 of 1,892 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsTotal disappointment,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;J. schmid "blueapples"(Los Angeles, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)(for the record, we have not returned it yet, but I think we probably will, it's her call)We received the Fire on the 16th.  Luckily it was a 'gift' so it wasn't pre-registered.I bought this as a gift for my girlfriend who is a former PC, and now a happy Mac user.  The hype all lead me to believe that this was going to be kind of a cool in-between device between her laptop and her iphone4S. Not at all.  This device feels like something from around 2004. If this was 2004, it would seem really cool.  but it's not.  Here's my list of complaints and observations so far:* power button is in a TERRIBLE spot - the bottom.  we have both accidentally hit the button more than once. But wait - can't you just rotate the device around that the screen will re-orient so the button is on the top?  No.  Oddly, and frustratingly, some apps, will, some won't.  That should be baked into the OS, not dependent on the App!* It gets hot. uncomfortably hot, and only after 20 minutes of use.  and it only gets hot in the bottom portion - where more than likely you are HOLDING it, oh yeah, and accidentally hitting the power button.* touch screen is inaccurate. If you hold the device at an angle in the sun, you can clearly see the spacing of the touch sensors, and then you will know why the touch screen is so dodgy.  they really cheaped out on this with very few sensors.  I get why, for the price point, but with so many apple devices out there, that's GOT TO BE considered the standard now - the iphone Edge came out YEARS ago, no being able to measure up to that is just not gonna cut it.  The credit card signing pad at the grocery store has better accuracy than this.* scrolling is jittery, stutters, and un-even.  So everything has to have scrolling nowadays, but it's a fail on the Fire.  It actually hurts my eyes to try to watch the screen as it scrolls, it stutters and jitters in a very unpleasant way, I can only describe it as a strobe effect.* screen does not dim enough.  come on Amazon - it's a KINDLE!  I'm guessing that more than 1/2 of all kindle users read in bed!  in a DARK BEDROOM.  even at the lowest setting, the Fire is obnoxiously bright for nighttime reading in bed, and not useable as a reader in that scenario.* not a good Ereader, in general.  The Fire screen doesn't even compare to a Kindle Eink screen.  period.* No lock.  seriously.  there no way to password protect the device.  You leave it in a cab, on the subway, a bus, restaurant, where ever, and whoever picks it up instantly has access to your amazon account, and can happily start making charges, not to mention, if you've got email set up on it, all the security risk potential there.  This, in my opinion, is the second most glaring and epic FAIL of the Fire.  Because it would have been SO EASY to have fixed this when they developed the software. (see below for the worst of all)* Multi-touch?  there's ONE multi-touch gesture.  that's it. zoom. and it doesn't work in a lot of places you'd expect it to.  Basic places.  Like Google maps. Seriously?  Isn't this thing running on an OS created BY GOOGLE?!? But no, you have to use the little + and - buttons for zooming.* Browser.  completely fails to live up the the hype Amazon gave it (I watched ALL the demo videos and pre-release reviews I cold get my hands on).  My iPhone is faster on the same wi-fi connection.  But worse that the speed, the browser isn't even full screen.(the top and bottom go unused.  I'm sorry but when you only have a 7" screen, every little bit makes a big difference.* the 'carousel' GUI.  (graphic user interface).  Okay, this is the big one.  First off, as every other 1 star review has mentioned, there's zero privacy.  When you turn it on, you are faced with a gigantic display of recent activity, on a virtual 'shelf'.  Giant and often poorly rendered icons of WHATEVER 6-10 things you happened to have been doing last on the Fire are there for all the world to see. But what's even worse is this:  YOU CANNOT CHANGE IT.  you can't delete stuff from there, you can't re-arrange stuff in there.  it's just there.  and WAY TOO BIG.  how about a home screen you can customize?  Amazon will tell you that you can use 'favorites'.  But no.  favorites only stack up in whatever order you put them in there - you can't arrange that either.  It really boggles the mind.  what were they thinking?That's all for now.  Hope this helps.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (94)

54 of 63 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAn Objective Look At The Kindle Fire,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Spiritt R. Garrett(LOS ANGELES, CA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've read a lot of reviews regarding the Kindle Fire both before and after receiving mine.A couple complaints are warranted. Others are just ridiculous.WARRANTED Complaints:NO SECURITY: By now you probably know there is no password required for ordering on the Fire. One click ordering is activated from day one and there is no way to turn it off. I can see what Amazon was trying to do. They were trying to make it easy to use. It's a mistake on their part. I'll give you that. But in no way a deal breaker for me. Here's an idea. Don't leave the darn thing behind. You're an adult, be responsible.Also try not letting everyone in your world know when you get one. The device is small enough to "mind it's own business".As far as your children being able to order thousands of dollars worth of products (another very big complaint), here's another idea. Tell them not to. They can browse but not buy. If they still order thousands of dollars worth of stuff the problem is your parenting, not the Fire.SHIPPED ALREADY LINKED TO YOUR AMAZON ACCOUNT: Again, I can see where Amazon was trying to make it easy. Particularly for people who are new to Tablets and not necessarily tech pros. Again, not a deal breaker. If you're afraid of someone stealing and ordering things on your Fire, then de-register the device (in the email they send you when they ship it) and then re-register it when you receive it. There is a fix for this so why complain about it?CAN'T WATCH YOUR OWN VIDEOS FROM THE CLOUD: This one broke my heart. I won't lie. BUT! Life goes on. I don't know why it is this way. It just is. But if you're a subscriber to Netflix, Amazon Prime (which everyone is for at least a month), Hulu, and have rented or purchased movies/tv on Amazon, you have PLENTY of videos to watch. But all some people are paying attention to is what they DON'T have.---------------------------------Look people. This thing was $199. The iPad starts at $499. Do you really think you're going to get what you get with an iPad on the Fire? What are you going to do with it. Watch Videos? Surf the net? Listen to music? Check email? It does all of that. And it does it all well. Stop comparing it to an iPad. It's not! The beauty of it is that it doesn't pretend to be. Now if it's consumers would follow suit, you'd be a lot more happy with it.RIDICULOUS Complaints:ANYONE LOOKING AT MY HOME SCREEN CAN SEE EXACTLY WHAT I'VE BEEN DOING: So what! If you've been looking at porn tell them you to get their own if they ask to see it. And if, say, your child was looking at porn, wouldn't you want to know about it? If you're not looking at anything inappropriate here's what you're saying: "My friend will be able to see that I checked my Facebook status, watched Netflix, and played Angry Birds if they were to look at my Fire".WHOA!! Alert the media.THE POWER BUTTON IS ON THE BOTTOM AND I KEEP TURNING IT OFF ACCIDENTALLY: Get a case! If you're going to watch videos there are dozens of cases that sit the screen upright so you don't have to hold it. Who wants to hold a tablet while they watch a 2 hr movie?NO DEDICATED HOME BUTTON ON THE DEVICE: Yeah. Ok. The only time the Home button doesn't show up on the screen is when the keyboard is up (just tap the screen any time and you'll see the picture of the house on the bottom left). To get rid of the keyboard to get the home button, you hit one button on the very bottom right. Get over it people. Again, it's not an iPad. Now if you told me there was no home button at all, now we have a problem. But that's not the case.ONLY 8 GB OF STORAGE WITH NO EXPANDABLE MEMORY: And you, of course, have probably heard that after the preinstalled application arrive you're only left with about 6 gb's or so. If you're complaining about this, it's because you've conveniently skipped the flashing lights that this is designed to work with Amazon's vast library. Or maybe you noticed but like to complain. If you're accessing everything through the clouds you don't need to store it on your drive. You just need an internet connection. This essentially allows for infinite storage capacity and, depending on your Amazon Library, Netflix Access, Hulu and other streaming access, you have hundreds of gb's worth of videos on your device. No other Tablet can boast that. Have you tried accessing Amazon videos on your iPad? Try it and let me know what happens.BUT! If you're interested in 64 gb of space, then cough up either $699 for a wifi only iPad, or $829 for a wifi/3G iPad. While you're doing that, I'm using that money to get 3 or 4 of the Kindle Fire and distributing them to my family.I could go on and on but this is probably too long as it is. I love my Fire. I am an avid Amazon user. Real quick, I'll tell you how it saves me money.When I had my iPad I liked to buy Blu Ray movies with digital copies. If they didn't have a digital copy I wasn't interested. This allowed me to watch the movie on my tv (Blu Ray in full HD), the standard dvd usually included allowed people in my household to watch the movie on their non HD TV. Of course the digital copy let me watch it on the iPad.Since all my tv's at home are connected to streaming devices that support Amazon Video and we all have Kindle Fire's, instead of buying a blu ray for $30 to include a digital copy, I buy the same movie on Amazon for $15 and it's already included on all my tv's at home and all of our Fire's, through the cloud.Also I like the portability of the Fire and how it's easier to type on it with two hands than the one hand pecking I did on my iPad.Is the Fire the best product in the world? Not at all. But for the price compared to what it does it is a solid product that you will not be disappointed with. If any of the above complaints were deal breakers for you, get an iPad, Xoom, Galaxy Tab, or a Nook and stop your whining would ya. But then again you'll probably find everything that's wrong with one of those products too.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (10)

765 of 944 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsI really wanted to like it - but it is not for me,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey Kemmerer(Allentown, PA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my third Kindle.After two days of mostly frustrating revelations, I am sending it back. I travel internationally quite a bit and want to be able to load video content to view offline (planes, hotels w/o wifi, etc.)as well as have a handy ebook reader. I am stymied at almost every turn.1. Fire can only view Amazon video content, not my (awkwardly) downloaded MP4 files.2. Content can only be purchased while in US. Reportedly I cannot choose and download a movie while in another country.2. Prime videos can only be streamed -- not available for offline viewing -- unless I buy it.3. Videos cannot be downloaded from Amazon Cloud to Fire -- only Music4. Connecting to wifi networks that requires signon has been troublesome - with older Kindle, no problem. Amazingly enough, only Google site can accessed from some sites.5. Anyone who has my Fire has unlimied access to my Amazon account and there is nothing I can do to prevent it.6. Ebooks can be downloaded, and the reader seems OK, I like the E ink better7. Reportedly "fast" web browser is disappointingly slow8. Navagation is awkward and non-intuitive9. No way to delete or order things on the bookshelf UI.... the list goes on.Off to UPS store to return Fire, and then to the Apple Store for an Ipad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (45)

528 of 656 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsVery Disappointed,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Scott Hardin(Atlanta, GA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't normally write reviews, but I feel I have to share my experience with the kindle fire.1) The browser is EXTRAORDINARILY SLOW.  With or without Amazon preloading. Its painfully slow.  After a few hours, I just went back to browsing on my HTC EVO phone. I wasn't expecting lighting fast speeds but 10-12 seconds to load boingboing.net or lifehacker.com is unacceptable.2) There is no text to speech included like there is on the tradition Kindle devices.3) The screen resolution makes reading books difficult on my eyes.4) Many standard Android applications are not available on the Amazon market.5) Privacy: Anything you use or look at will show up on the home carousel.  If more than one person uses this device, it could be embarrassing.6) The lack of volume buttons is a PAIN in the You Know What!  While trying to watch a streaming video and navigated to the hidden volume menu, it is extraordinarily easy to accidentally exit the video.7) The browser lacks a full screen functionality, which is a must if you have a smaller 7" screen.I'll be returning this item.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (21)

36 of 41 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoving the Kindle Fire,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;E. Barlow "Prime1"(Omaha, NE United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was very excited about getting to order the Kindle Fire. I have been enjoying it since I received it in the mail from Amazon. I love using it for reading books and magazines,web surfing,watching movies and tv shows,playing games, and checking my emails. I have had no issues with the device and feel its a great value for the price. My only problem is trying to pry it out of the hands of my husband and kids so I can actually get to use MY device.If I were stranded on an Island I would definantly want this with me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

15 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy Kids Just Love It!!!  Best Value!!!,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Alex Ancheta(Antioch, CA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought two Kindle Fires for two of my kids (4 and 7).  They love it!  And so do I...Pros:1) It's a simple device that does what it's supposed to do...ENTERTAIN.2) We have Amazon Prime so my kids are able to watch the FREE instant movies on their Fires.3) Both Fires are registered on my Amazon account so all our content (Kindle books, apps, music) are synchronized.  We are all able to share the content we buy.4) Size is just right especially for my kids.  Very portable.5) The screen is clear and crisp.6) The processor is fast.  Believe me, my kids would be the first to complain if it was slow.5) Came in pre-registered.  Turned it on.  It updated.  We easily setup wifi.  We buy lots of FREE apps...and a few paid ones...and all the entertaining began.Cons:1) It doesn't have bells and whistles like our iPad2 but then we didn't expect it to have it.  The Fire is $200 and not $500 like an iPad.  And for $200 it's a bargain.  Plus, Android apps are much cheaper than iOs apps.  So the savings keep adding.2) We saw the 1-Click purchase as a potential problem with my kids making accidental purchases.  Called Amazon support and there's no remedy right now.  However, since the devices are on my account, I get automatic emails for all purchases.  Therefore, I can catch and report the accidental purchases if they happen.  We also talked to our kids about asking us permission before making any purchases and so far (3 days as of this writing) no accidental purchases.  Ironically, the issue has become an opportunity to teach my kids responsibility.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

19 of 20 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat for the Price... but some frustrating Flaws,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Daniel(AURORA, CO)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my kindle Fire just a couple days ago and all ready I am having some frustrating flaws with the interface.1.  It came with some preloaded apps... like ESPN... but I don't like sports... can't stand ESPN and want it gone... but I can't.. there it is just sitting and staring at me every time I go to my apps page...its really stating to piss me off too.2.  I love e-pub and e-books.... but I don't want to have EVERY book I EVER downloaded show up on my home page for anyone who picks up my Fire to look through... okay, I have some "Adult" content on my account... on my kindle its okay because its "archived" and no one can see it unless they know where to go digging for it.  On the Fire its right out front where my 10 year old Nephew can see at the flick of the carousel screen. they should REALLY make it so you can edit what shows up on the home page.3.  Which brings me to my next frustration.  I downloaded an app just to see if I liked it... I did not so I removed it from the Fire.... but wait... whats this... every time I go to my my apps page.. there it is... right next to ESPN... laughing at me., saying ... "you downloaded me and now I am here to stay!!" why cant I deleted something from the cloud?  Why do I have to see EVERY app I don't want, waiting for me to download it again... which I may some day do, but I don't want to have to look at it while I think about it... it was free and it can go away until I come for it again.. and if I paid for it, they let me archive it and not have to look at the short cut to downloaded it... it's like every bad decision I every made standing at my front door and watching me when I go out for coffee... CREEPY!the web browsing seems to be okay but a little slow... I impatiently keep hitting the same button to make something happen only to find it was lag and I have just run through 6 different functions as it recorded the button hits and applied them to the next button that would have appeared where I was pressing.video play back seems to be good... more to come on that as I use it more.Update:  I have had my kindle for about a month now and while I do like it, I have found some more flaws.4.  No physical volume button.  It sucks that I have to go into the software to find the volume control.  It appears that some of the videos I watch have different volume levels.  It would REALLY be nice to just hit a button and a not have to stop watching the movie and go find the volume control.5.  The power button is on the bottom of the device.  I am not going to tell you how many times I have accidentally turned off my kindle while reading a book.  I finally hard to turn it up side down in the cover I bought for it, so I wouldn't do it.  Now my wake page (the page where you put in your password.... if you have one... is upside down.  Maybe Amazon could to let that rotate so I don't need to read up side down to put in my password.6.  The head phone jack is also on the bottom.  I kept wondering if I was going to break off my head phone plug every time I rested my kindle on the table, while reading with the head phones plugged in.7.  And while writting this update I discovered one more.... no scroll bars..... boy that makes navigating in a little window hard. There is one line at the bottom of this review that it won't even let me get near.  Also trying to move the edit cursor around is a job for someone with the patience of a saint.  Some directional arrows would REALLY help.OKAY... Everything from this point on(except the last two lines) was written on my computer, not with the kindle fire. The last line was from my original post.  The second to the last line was started on my fire but, because I suck at spelling and went to look at my original post to see how to spell "carousel"... well let's just say that the Kindle Fire feels those two lines are FORBOTEN!!!  The edit cursor would not go there... not in the hour or so I tried.  Hey....I was at work... I had the time and no computer... and BOY was it frustrating!!  I mean, I could see them ... they were right there at the bottom... why did the cursor hate me?!! Did we go on a date and I never called it afterwards?? Was it something I said about the dubious linage of it's Mother?  No... wait... that was after about a half hour of trying to get it to work... so that wasn't it.  What ever its reasoning, those last two lines were not to be edited... no way, no how.Seriously... DIRECTIONAL. ARROWS.  up, down, left, right.... that's all I am asking for.SO.. the second to last line SHOULD have said:8.  They fixed the carousel... kind of.  Now it only shows what books are actually on the Fire, the last apps that you used and the last webpage you were just at.  Okay.  That's a Start.  BUT.... now I can't get to my book archive.... not even in the Cloud.  Now, I have about 150 books that I have bought from Amazon, only about 20 of them are on my Fire.  I know that it is only an over sight that the cloud is now off limits... but I'm just saying.  See, my complaint was not that the book library had every book that I ever bought(that I expect, even want), just that they were on the home page for God and Country to see with a flick of the carousel.  Maybe Amazon should add a "Add To Carousel" options just like they have an "Add To Favorites"8.  They fixed the carouselover all ... for the price... I like it... it could be better.. but for $199... well, its better then a poke in the eye with a sharp stick.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

19 of 20 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFirst Impressions,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;A. Sridharan(Wisconsin)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)UPDATEI've had this for 2 days now, and love it! For $200 bucks, it does more than what I expected it to do. People were impressed when I took it to my office, especially by how good the 7" screen looks...they thought it would be too small, but not!  In comparison, I think the iPad looks obnoxiously big...one of the reasons I stayed away from it...it was too close to the size of a laptop screen, and if it needed to have a bag of its own, it ain't a hand held is it!  Kindle fits nicely in the palms.------------------------------Have had this on my hands for less than 30 mins now...so far so good!The initial excitement of opening it out of the box quickly turned into disappointment as the device blanked out after 5 mins. I thought it was the battery, so charged it for 3 hrs, and still didn't work.  As I was working up my frustration on the product and instantly comparing to how Apple puts so much care into customer experience, I called the Amazon help desk...the technician was extremely courteous and helped me reset the device...had to hold down the power button for 20 seconds...and it worked!!Now for the good part. Web pages are loading reasonably fast...and here's the best part - my acid test - I'm watching a live streaming of a cricket match that is going on in India right now, and it is streaming beautifully, no buffering, no loss of clarity when expanded to full screen.  And mind you, this is off a free website, not like an ESPN paid content or anything.  So, in my books, this is a fantastic start for the product!The device feels good in my hand.  I like the rubberized back, it sits well in one hand. The keypad is good, and you can feel the key touches, which I like. I read elsewhere that this is gorilla glass, and very scratch resistant...I like that.  However, while navigating, the fingers feel a little sticky on the screen...so I'm having to press down a bit harder than on an iPad. The quality of the audio is not bad...it's not great sound even at full volume, but good enough for a device this size.  You can always plug in your earphones. I connected it to my Bose sound dock, and the quality of the output was very good.I'd say this is so far a good product for the price point.  Not an iPad killer, but if you were like me, wondering what you needed the iPad for in the first place, and found the price point to be standoffish, this is a good product.  And honestly, I like the 7" screen...I found the iPad to be too big to be a handheld device, and was part of the reason I didn't find it appealing over a laptop!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

23 of 25 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Review for the Average Kindle User,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Nicole Anne Elizondo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't usually write reviews but I wanted to write one for the average user of a kindle. To start with this is my first Kindle and I do not have an Ipad(too expensive) but I do have an Iphone. I was looking for something that would allow me to use the internet and read while traveling and also just around the house so I didn't have to move my laptop around. I am a Prime member so I thought the movie/tv content and the kindle library were an added bonus. I am an avid reader and usually read about 10 books a month or so depending on my author's release dates and this was my primary reason for purchasing the kindle fire. I should also mention that I have wi-fi via AT&T;'s U-verse (I have the second level of internet of their four) and it was a cinch to set up and connect the wi-fi. I have also connected the wi-fi at my parent's house and my sister and brother-in-law's place without any problems.My ReviewI have had the kindle now for a couple of weeks and I have really enjoyed it's functionality for the price. I primarily use it for reading, facebook, words with friends, email, and occasional internet surfing. I have not had any problems with surfing the internet. The pages load fairly quickly and it is easy to zoom in and out. The keyboard has not been a problem for me but I was also used to the smaller keyboard on the Iphone so the one on the kindle seems pretty big to me. I have also not had any issues with the apps that I have on it and like the larger screen to play words with friends and update facebook. I am NOT a huge app person (even on my Iphone) so I don't have a problem with there not being a ton of apps available yet. The ones that I primarily use have been available.I have read several books on my kindle since I got it and I do like the ease of use for reading. I have not found the weight of the kindle to be an issue but I tend to read with it resting on a pillow or something when I am reading. However, that is not because of the weight of the kindle, I read that way with a book as well. Frankly, I think a decent hardback book weighs more so no problems there. The screen is plenty bright enough when reading and I haven't had any eye strain with it. I really haven't noticed much difference between when I read a paperback vs. the kindle. The turning of the pages is easy and only requires a touch of the side of the screen or a flick of the page. I have found that reading on the kindle while eating is actually much easier than with a regular book since I can now turn the page with my left hand. I have purchased a couple of books from amazon using my kindle and they download quickly and I have not had any problems. I understand that this may be a problem for those users who purchase this for kids and they go out and start buying stuff without permission as a credit card is on file but as my kindle is for me this is not a problem. I have also borrowed a book from the kindle library and that was a very easy experience. I just wish I could borrow more than one a month.I was able to easily put my music that I had on Itunes onto the cloud reader. I put around 400 songs on there and used about 2.5gb of the 5gb that you get for free. You do have the option to purchase more but I didn't buy this to be my primary music player. I have an Ipod for that. However, I did want to put some music on my kindle for airplane travel. The sound has been very good for me and was able to play it on full volume with no headphones in and the tv on with a football game going at a pretty decent volume and can still hear it over the tv.I also watched a movie that was borrowed using amazon prime and had no problems what so ever on it. It downloaded quickly and again I was able to listen to it at full volume with my tv on with a football game on a decent volume and could easily hear it. I was also able to adjust the volume on my kindle without it interrupting the movie at all. Just tapped the screen and the home options came up and I could adjust the volume at will. Once I was done I just tapped it again and the menu options went away. The clarity of the screen is great and the movie looked wonderful.I also put pictures onto my kindle from my computer using a micro USB cable. I know some have complained about there not being a micro usb cable included with the kindle but for $6 obtaining a micro usb cable was not that big of a deal. The kindle shows up as a removable device on your computer and was it very easy to copy pictures onto it. They look great in the photo gallery and I am happy with the way they display. I have also downloaded photos onto my kindle that I received in emails and they look great too.I was able to easily set up all my email accounts (four) on my kindle without a problem and it doesn't take long for it to connect up. I don't use the kindle as my primary email checking device but for when I am traveling I think it will be fine. It is defintely easier to read the email than from my phone.Some final notes based on other reviews that I have seen-The kindle comes with 6.54GB available of space once the operating system is taken into account. I currently have about 400 songs, 6 books, 17 apps, and a video on my device and still have 5.62GB of space left. So for me space has not been an issue. Also, the power button is on the bottom of the device and I have yet to accidentally hit it and either lock it or turn it off and I read with my hand wrapped under the device. I do have a case on it so that it doesn't get scrached up in my purse and therefore I have never had a problem with figuring out which side is up and down. Not that it truly matters as you can rotate it any direction and it goes right side up. As for battery life, I don't charge it every day as I have found that I really don't need to. I can generally read a book (300 to 400 actual pages not digital) plus spend a couple more hours or so messing around with apps or the internet before I get down to a 30% charge or so and then I usually charge it at night. I have found that the charge usually only takes a couple of hours to get completely full depending on where it's battery life was at when you charged it. As for the kindle not having a camera. Frankly, this does not bother me as I wouldn't use it for that purpose anyways. If I want pictures I have a camera for that purpose and as my camera is much smaller and can fit in my pocket that would be much more convenient than any kindle or Ipad device. For example, I recently went zip lining and I would not have been able to use an ipad for taking pictures while zip lining but I had my camera on my wrist and was able to take pictures while zip lining. So since I can load pictures onto my kindle the actual taking of photos was not a necessity nor would I have used that feature much. I have also not had any problems with the kindle freezing up or not working in anyway. Occasionally I have to double tap an app to get it to open but I have that issue with my Iphone as well so it's not really a big deal. The carousel showing everything you have done recently is slightly annoying but hopefully that is something that can be dealt with in a future software update.Sorry this was so long but I really wanted to review this product based on a non techy person's usage.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

27 of 30 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAn Excellent Entertainment Consumption Device,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;herfyjo(Texas, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all, this is not an iPad, but Amazon never claimed it would be.  So let's look at it for what it is...FUN!I have a regular PC computer and an iphone.  I do not own a laptop or an iPad, but I wanted something to carry in my purse for entartainment purposes.  This does the trick.  So far I have watched a movie (great resolution), played Words with Friends, Angry Birds and Fruit Ninja, posted on Facebook, sent an email, read a chapter of a book and listened to Pandora.  And that's just in one day!I can hold the device in one hand.  It fits in my purse.  It's easy to use (I'm over 40 and not a techie).  It cost $199.  What more can I say?  The internet speed is fine, gaming works well, color screen is nice and bright and is much more comfortable to hold than an iPad.If you want to open your documents from the office to write a letter or make a PowerPoint, this is probably not the device.  It does not have a camera but I think people who use take photos or Skype with their iPads look a bit silly.  I have a good camera on my iphone and I just don't skype.When considering what the device is and how it can be used, it is amazing.  Plus with Amazon's great customer service and valuable Prime service, this thing is going to be HUGE for the average user.  Go get one.  You'll be pleased.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

43 of 50 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat product, needs some tweaks to really shine,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey A. Bristow-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I want to first say that I really do like the Kindle Fire. It feels solid, the interface is easy to use and intuitive. Adding apps and books is simple. Access to Prime video content is flawless, and having Netflix and Hulu Plus available make this a perfect entertainment device for me. I have only a few hours of using this as I set it up for my wife, but I liked it enough that I can see our household getting another one in the near future.The two things that stand out for me that cause me to only give this 3 stars are things that I believe can be fixed by Amazon, I just hope they actually do it.Flaws:#1) One click purchasing is on and it is impossible to turn off, or at least it seems as though this is the case. I have kids at home, and they get their hands on things. I would hate to have a bunch of books, apps, or even products bought with one click and sent to my house by my three year old. This needs to be able to be turned off and a password/access code enabled to make this a family friendly device.UPDATE #1: I did find a setting to add a code that needs to be typed in to unlock the device. Which is good in case a child picks it up. But it isn't good for the times I want to let my child play one of the many kids games available.Update #2: I contacted Amazon customer support regarding this issue with young children and they responded already. They recognized this as a legitimate concern and are having the engineers look into this and thanked me for my feedback. So, hopefully a firmware update will come about in the near future to address this concern since it is certainly one of the consistent issues I am seeing in the reviews here.#2) My wife and I share a Amazon account and since this Kindle Fire is hers she sees all of my books in her carousel. Not the end of the world, but it is frustrating. It would be nice if this device could be truly hers, so that only the content she wants is listed and none of my stuff. I don't mind everything being shown in the archive, but to be in the carousel automatically is a bit odd.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

37 of 43 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsNice eReader.  FULL PRIME Membership is required, not just family.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Ryan Reddell(Worcester, ma United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered two of these devices; one for my wife, one for myself.  I'm sending mine back.  My wife loves to read eBooks, she loves it.  I for one would rather have my EVO and laptop.A few complaints against Amazon, and not the Kindle Fire.First- A PRIME Membership is required for EACH family member that wishes to have a Kindle Fire.  Yes, you can invite and allow up to four family members to use your PRIME, but it is for shipping ONLY!  If they want to stream videos, then they are required to purchase another membership for $79 per year.  Pretty crappy on Amazons part if you ask me.Second- If you are buying this for someone as a gift, or thought you might resale it, please note that it ships already activated with your account.  I never had to put my password in for my Amazon stuff.  Scary if you ask me.  It's quick and handy that they already have some of your info, but at least ask for a password.All in all, this is only a 3 star device.  Its close to being a 5, but needs some issues fixed and those are for the non-eBook crowd.So, to make this quick:PROs-PriceSOLID AS A ROCK.  Heavy and feels like its military grade.eBook Reader is impressive and easy to useStreams HD Videos without an issue.CONs-Google App Store is not available.FULL PRIME Membership is required for EACH MEMBER of your family.More limited than a Smartphone.No CalendarHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

30 of 34 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsI really wanted to like it BUT ...,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Steve Goldberg "Steve"(Redmond, WA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like to think of myself as a reasonable fair-minded person. In this case I must give a decided "thumbs down" on my new Kindle Fire. I really WANTED to like it, really I did. In fact, I was all ready to take back the Vizio 7" tablet I had bought from Costco 2 months ago but ...While this product has great promise and while I applaud what Amazon is trying to do, I think they rushed this product out for the holidays without having done proper testing. The touch screen experience is downright horrendous. I swear that I must hit something 4 or 5 times before it registers. (The no-privacy carousel has the opposite problem - it's overly sensitive.)The positives:The minimalistic design is nice. Although I really miss volume buttons.In other ways the hardware is great (screen has good strong viewing angles etc.)Streaming seems to work wellBrain dead simple set upGreat Amazon consumption deviceThe negatives:The terrible touchscreenThe terrible non-changeable keyboard (I'm even writing this review from my iPhone 4S - doing it from the Kindle would have been pure masochism)The lack of volume buttonsThe lack of privacy with the carouselThe location of the power button and headset jackI've even side-loaded many Google Market Apps I'd purchased for my other Android Tablet and though they work and make this device more like a true tablet (including real Gmail email), it doesn't save this device at all.Wait for new firmware or a complete new version (i.e. Kindle Fire 2).  The new Fire will be more of an Android tablet killer (and who know, maybe it will even have a run at the iPad).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

18 of 19 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBought Both Kindle Fire and Nook Tablet, Kept The Fire,December 5, 2011By&nbsp;Charles S. Goddard Jr.-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't typically write reviews on items I purchase, but I feel strongly enough about this one that I will. Short story, I got a Nook Tablet and was disappointed, then reluctantly got a Kindle Fire and was thoroughly impressed. I returned the Nook Tablet, something anybody can do for (I believe) 14 days after they purchase a Nook Tablet.Read on for details of why I switched.My story is that I had been looking into a small tablet since these items were announced, wasn't interested in the 7 inch Galaxy Tab or other small tablets. Spec-wise and price-wise I immediately figured the Nook Tablet would be a better option than and perform better than the Kindle Fire. Some online reviews seemed to verify that. Went into Barnes and Noble and bought it. I was immediately unimpressed. The options for content were VERY limited. B&N; may have more digital books, but they have less of what everyone (particularly me) wants to read for older books. The video button just directed me to Hulu Plus and Netflix which are an extra fee of course if you don't already pay for those services. The expansion possibilities were a big draw for me, but accessing content on the MicroSD card on the Nook Tablet was cumbersome and almost useless, not integrating well at all with the interface for video and music. You basically had to go into an ugly file explorer to get to your content from my experience. The Nook Tablet has a very small app library for download, and almost no free apps at all if you're looking for a fun free experience. Not even Angry Birds was free in an ad-supported form. Books and music were also prohibitively expensive if saving money was your purpose in only paying 250 dollars for a tablet.I've been a Kindle Keyboard user for some time, but in my search for a small tablet I was impressed by the extra RAM on the Nook Tablet and went for it. I found it to be a universally horrible device for consuming content which is the entire point of these mini-tablets.Disappointed, but willing to give what I viewed as the inferior Kindle Fire a try, I picked one up and was immediately impressed. Both devices are snappy, but the content availability on the Fire is stupendous. It's easy to put files on the Fire or upload them to the Amazon Cloud and get to them on the fire. Video plays great and the free trial of Amazon Prime puts literally entire runs of shows at your fingertips including a favorite of mine Doctor Who. It has good battery life, the interface to access your content isn't as horrible as Barnes and Noble's attempt and if you consume any kind of content from Amazon... books, DRM-less MP3s, video it is incredibly easy to either download or stream all of it even over slow wireless connections. There are plenty of free unobtrusively ad-supported apps, including Angry Birds and Fruit Ninja for those with a desire for free fun. Music can be had for sometimes as low as 4 dollars for an entire album! (More often 5 to 10 dollars but rarely higher) Video rentals often are competitive with Redbox in that most are 1 to 2 dollars for a 48 hour rental. Using Amazon Prime's free streaming though you might not need to pay to watch movies or TV shows for the free months you get with purchase.Comixology, the comic book reader app, runs fantastic on the Kindle Fire. The app offers DC, Marvel, Image and other comic book publisher, so don't worry about missing stuff. I did not try it on the Nook Tablet, but on the Kindle Fire the lines are crisp, the options great (if a little pricey) and the reading is as good as it can get on a 7 inch screen from my experience.Get this device. Hardware wise it feels much sturdier than the Nook Tablet, if not quite as sturdy as the Samsung Galaxy Tab 7.0+. It is thicker, but in my hands this makes it easier to hold. It fit into the normal pocket on my cargo pants one day when I was out and about, so its got the small form factor going for it.I know the review was rambling and probably sometimes incoherent, but hopefully you can tell how much more impressed I was with the Kindle Fire than the Nook Tablet and can understand why I kept one and not the other.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

18 of 19 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT! BUT HERE'S A FEW TIPS YOU WILL NEED!!!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;andrea doherty "andrea klimowicz"(michigan)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I LOVE LOVE my kindle fire.  at first i was no thrilled at all and a bit disappointed.  but after much playing  with my kindle fire I have some great tips that will make anyone LOVE  this kindle.  ok, for any books you have stored on your computer that your didn't download from the amazon store and your hoping to put on this kindle you have to convert those books to pdf form.  there are many pdf converting programs on the internet just search in google.  then purchase for free from amazon's appstore ezpdf reader.  then plug your kindle into your computer with usb cord and transfer all the books you converted to pdf form into the books folder. now go back to your kindle fire and install the expdf reader app, this wonderful little app will search and find all your pdf books you just put directly into the kindle folder, not the books folder but directly into the main folder!!  the backlighting on this app also makes it MUCH EASIER to read books and it has a cute bookmark tool. if you want to read epub that is no problem either,  just download the aldiko reader app from any site on the internet as a free download, load onto your main kindle fire folder, and hit sd card in the main menu and you don't have to convert your epub's.  i found that a lot of .mobi files i got from other book sites wouldn't work so i had to convert to either pdf or epub and epub works a lot better format wise for most books.  as far as the 8gb space i was bummed at first until i put all 700 of my books and tons of apps on my kindle fire.  And I still have over 1gb of space left, so I'm not bummed anymore.  as far as watching television and movies, if you want to sideload your own you can if you convert them to mp4 but that eats up a lot of space and memory on your kindle fire.  and unless you have a amazon prime membership after a month you will have to pay to stream movies and shows from amazon.  I found a good solution, all i really wanted was to watch a couple shows and have some good cartoons for  my son if he gets crabby at the grocery store.  well, they have a few good apps that have cartoon shows on them and play about 5-10 min. of a show, enough to calm my son down when he gets crabby!!kid tv, mytube kids, and tv.com, and hulu are some good apps if that will satisfy your need to watch tv on the go.  for me and my son, it's perfect!  overall, after being a bit disappointed I couldn't be happier, I just had to tweak a few things and figure out exactly what to do to make this kindle do what I wanted it to do.  Hope this review helps someone who was frustrated like I was in the beginning of trying to figure out your kindle!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

14 of 14 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsMy expectations were high for the kindle fire...,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Davis(Southern Ohio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'll make this short and save you some time. So you know:I bought this as a simple family tablet.I have an iPhone - only thing I can compare to the Kindle Fire.Things that bother me after a day's worth of play:*No buttons. I would love a home button and volume buttons. (hardware) I hate the way you have to tap the bottom of the screen before finding the home screen. I fumble to turn down the volume at times.*Speakers are ok with games and video, but with music it's not up to par.*You can't delete items from the carousel.*It's not very sensitive. Sometimes I have to press the 'button' I need 2-3 even 4 times before the Fire recognizes it. This is quite annoying.*It's difficult for my 4 year old (whose mastered my iphone). This tablet was bought for my 4 year old as much as it was bought for me and my spouse.And my biggest peeve:1 click payments cannot be disabled. This means I can't even walk away from my 4 year old for 5 seconds without worrying he might buy something on accident.EDIT - IT LOOKS LIKE YOU CAN DISABLE 1 CLICK THOUGH I HAVEN'T TRIED TO MAKE A PURCHASE YET.There are some good things about the fire as well, but I think most reviewers have went over them. For 200.00 - you get what you pay for. I'm still undecided on keeping it. I think I will test it out for the next week and see if it grows on me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

14 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWorth the Price, Big Power in a Small Package,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;contempt(Brooklyn)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I was really excited to receive my Fire yesterday. Now, I'm a gadget fiend. I've had every iteration of the iPhone, iPad, Xoom and about 7 DROID phones. Mostly because I test them but also incorporate them into my day-to-day. Which begged my wife to ask why I would need the Fire. Well, I don't, but wanted to check it out and share my thoughts.Another thing to note before I get to my review, I've been an Amazon Prime customer since 2005 so I have a lot of investment in Amazon and their services. I love the videos and I've been grabbing my free Android app everyday now since they launched the service.Pros:- Obviously price. I'm amazed that this thing costs as little as it does. Now, in the grand scheme of things, it's still pricey. But when you think about what you get, all of the videos, Kindle books, apps and your music collection, it's incredible.- Fire will revolutionize Cloud based computing. Again, not sure how tech savvy people are, but I live off of Dropbox for all of my work and files. I also keep all notes and clippings in Evernote. And services such as Instapaper have changed the way I read stories. So the Fire is great for this since all of my data already exists on the cloud (no Dropbox support yet but they do offer SugarSync). I believe more and more people will get used to this idea that you don't need local storage much longer.- The actual unboxing was a godsend. I mean it this way: 1. take it out of the box; 2. turn it on; 3. choose Wifi; 4. It brings up a personalized welcome message with your name! Nothing to enter, Amazon tied the product sales in with your account info. It just works! I think this is brilliant. No setup. All of my Kindle books, apps, etc. are all ready to download onto the device. It's dummy proof.- This device is all about media consumption. Whether it's videos, books, movies or games. This product shines.- Yes it supports Android Apps, but if you get into the danger of trying to use it like a normal productivity tablet, it's going to be a downer. One, the speed isn't there. But again, that's not the point.  For consuming those docs, such as a presentation or PDF, it's great.  For editing, finessing, etc. I wouldn't recommend.- The size is terrific. It's small enough that you can hold it with one hand and have your thumbs and fingers all around the device like you're holding a phone.- It's really well built. It feels like a tank. Granted, if you drop it, it'll probably get crushed.- Since Amazon is really making money off of the services and other products it's selling vs. hardware costs, it's actually working on me. I ended up paying to upgrade my Amazon Cloud Service. Way to go Amazon. It's something I realized I wanted because they offer unlimited music storage vs. Apple's iTunes Match which only allows 25,000 tracks (I have over 60,000 so Amazon's the place for it).CONS:- The speakers suck. I mean real bad. I had to put the volume to about 70% just to hear something. Also, I really hate all tablet makers who put the speakers on the back (iPad) or on the top, like this device.  Why can't we have speakers on the front? It'll greatly improve the experience and we wouldn't be forced to cup our hands to 'move' the sound to the front- It's a bit heavy. Compared to the iPad2, it feels really heavy. I'm sure it's just perception, but the way it's weighted, which is evenly, means you'll get tired of holding it for a long extended time. Now, this doesn't mean it's a brick by any means, it's just perception. Even my MacBookAir feels lighter.- I like the back rubber grip, it gives it enough friction so you can hold onto it better. However, it leaves oily fingerprints all over.- I really wish the Plex app was compatible with the Fire. It offers no explanation aside from it won't work. For those uninitiated, Plex is a great app that allows you to view all media on your computers, NAS or any other server at your house. It automatically pulls metadata for films and movies. It's an absolute must for an media consuming device and it's the only thing I'm looking forward to with the new GoogleTV upgrade. The Fire really needs to support it.  Not to mention Slingbox as well.If you're debating this or the Kindle Touch because you think, why not spend a little more to get a product that'll do more, think about how you're going to use it. I'm looking forward to my Kindle Touch (arriving today) because I will use it just for reading. The Fire and iPad2 get too heavy and your eyes get tired faster from reading ebooks on it. YMMV. But for what this Fire is, it's going to be a huge hit and has just changed the price point for all competitors.  Good for you Amazon.  Now, how about creating an Amazon Prime Videos app for iPad?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

41 of 48 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat price, great doohickey,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Mumbly Joe "MumblyJoe"(Georgia, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'll start off here saying that I was fairly weary of the Kindle Fire. I'm still weary of it, but less than I was before it arrived. I'd been looking for nearly a year for an android tablet that didn't cost an arm and a leg, but was fairly stable and could run apps without annoying compatibility issues. I had also tried an iPad and that turned out to be a huge fiasco, trying to get my music converted to MP3's and find an app that would read cbr comics and control everything through itunes... anyway, the iPad only lasted about a month before I took it back.So, here we go, things I DON'T like about the Kindle Fire:storage- its only 8 gb. Ok, that's fine for a book reader and the seamless cloud integration helps a lot but still.. This is a tablet, it plays movies. It seems they could have added a Micro SD reader without sacrificing the very appealing price point.The keyboard- this isn't so much a Kindle fire issue as it is a 7 inch tablet issue in general- the landscape keyboard is pretty hard to use. You really have to learn to type one-handed or else just use your thumbs on the portrait keyboard. What is maybe a kindle fire issue is the placement of the portrait keyboard at the bottom of the screen. Given their extensive customization of the interface, moving the keyboard up, maybe 3/4's of the way would really help when holding the thing and typing with your thumbs.Speaker placement: both speakers are on the top of the device. This doesn't make much sense for watching movies as it nullifies any stereo effect and also creates a weird feeling of emptiness on the side opposite the speakers. It's like driving around in your car listening to music with the balance set all the way over to the right.lastly, I have a small complaint about the categorization of books. I added a large selection of .mobi format books and about half of them appear in the "books" menu while the rest appear as documents. I'm not sure what's going on there but will update with a fix if I find one.So- Pros: I really like this little thing because:The interface design is really top-notch. Amazon did a great job with their customized version of Android, both aesthetically and in terms of functionality. The photos that appear on the lock screen are amazing! (I'm an art person)Cloud integration and streaming: Being able to keep track of your apps and books and such but still be able to access them without connecting to your computer is something I've wanted for quite some time. With that this thing really is a stand-alone device, no need to connect to the computer and no iTunes muxing up your library, splitting albums into 20 copies of the same album, each with one song in it.The silk browser is really fast. Also, being able to watch flash videos in the browser and not have them play like a series of still images is a welcome feature.Sideloading apps is a snap. I was worried that Amazon would take a walled-garden approach to this thing and I'd have to root it or something to get access to apps in the Android Market or other places. This is NOT the case. I sideloaded Spotify last night without ever connecting the thing to the computer. However, I quickly found out that Spotify doesn't work too well on it as the on-screen buttons on the Fire sit directly over the navigation and playback buttons in Spotify. Basically Amazon's controlling the experience, cutting out the frustration of trying to find an app compatible with your device by limiting you their Amazon app store, but you're still free to take a chance on whatever app you like outside their store.The whole thing is quite snappy and very responsive. That was one of my complaints about the old Nook (i don't know about the new Nook, haven't tried that yet)Things I don't want and/or don't care about but you might:Camera. There's no camera, front facing or otherwise. I don't want a camera, especially not a front facing one. I never use the webcam on my computer, let alone a tablet and if I want to take photos I'll either use my phone because it's in my pocket, or take a nice photo with a good DSLR.3g. There's wifi literally everywhere around where I live and even on the rare occasion that there's not, I can either use my phone's browser or wifi-tether it to another device. Its carrier has no data cap. Besides, the idea of paying $20/month for a 2 gb data cap or getting stuck in yet another 2 year contract with some other carrier is reason enough to make 3g rather unappealing to me.Content management, aka. iTunes: Having something to keep track of your library and such is handy, but really I don't want to be forced into using it. Besides, I have a content management system- it's called Windows, OSX and sometimes Linux(and occasionally Adobe Bridge if I need to organize a bunch of files at once). I much prefer the "connect device&gt; drag what you want into which ever folder you want&gt;disconnect it" process. I tend to keep my file structure organized on my computer though, so, if that's not a thing you do you might want a content manager. I don't yet know if this thing links up with computer version of the kindle software. I haven't needed to do that. Again, it really doesn't need it as this thing and Amazon's cloud are BFF's.So I guess that wraps it up. The thing is great for reading books, watching movies, listening to music. The cloud integration is my favorite thing about it. If you're looking for that kind of thing and your phone won't do but the $500 price tag of the iPad and general fragmentation issues of Android tablets have deterred you, look no further. If you're more interested in just reading books (and reading them outside in the sun especially) then stick with the e-ink kindles.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

41 of 48 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAWESOME,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;HD_Dude(DC)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is awesome!It is sharp and clear and fast - and exactly what was advertised.Don't you just laugh out loud at some of the reviews? I mean, the Kindle Fire comes out, and clearly - clearly - specs out as having no camera. Yet, people review it and drop a star because it 'has no camera.' What! Did you think only YOURS would have one?The specs said 'no SD card slot. ' And people complain when they get it and it has - wait for it - no SD card slot!This is typical - people get a clear list of what an item includes, then complain when they buy it and something NOT on the list is omitted. To those buyers: you are dumb. Don't buy something that clearly is a bad fit - then complain as if it's not YOUR problem. Dorks.The Kindle Fire is exactly what Amazon promised. It's gorgeous, it's sharp, and it's tied automatically to your Amazon account. Nice.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

334 of 419 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsUsing the Fire is frustrating and unpleasant experience,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;D. Ivanov(New York)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my first non-five star review on Amazon. I've never before posted a negative review here. That is not to say that I have not come across some awful products and poorly written books because I have. In the past, I have simply chosen to only post the positive reviews - I assume you are looking for a recommendation to buy a good product and not for a bad one! This review is an exception. My experience with Kindle Fire was so dreadful that I think it is necessary to share this with others.The problem is that the Fire does not have anything like the functionality or polish or speed of an iPad. As New York Times put it: "You literally feel that $200 price tag with every swipe of your finger. Animations are sluggish and jerky -- even the page turns. Taps often don't register. There are no progress or `wait' indicators, so you frequently don't know if the machine has even registered your touch commands. The momentum of the animations hasn't been calculated right, so the whole thing feels ornery and incredibly slow... It needs a lot more polish; if you're used to an iPad... Kindle Fire's experience will drive you nuts".The Kindle's 7-inch screen is still too small for any semblance of an immersive reading experience -- even if that reading experience mostly involves looking at pictures... Fire's processor appears ill-prepared to quickly redraw pages. Swiping from page to page occurs in disorienting stutter-steps, making any semblance of `reading' a chore. Fire lacks a camera, 3G data connectivity, and a slot for removable storage, microphone and sound speakers.Besides poor load times, the Fire's browser lurches in fits and starts when swiping through already loaded web pages. And sometimes the browser doesn't react to touch gestures at all, requiring that oh-so-annoying second tap or swipe instead. Pinching in and out of magnified views is a test of one's loyalty -- this action looks like choppy stop-motion video on the Fire, whereas on the iPad 2, it's fluid and seamless... Clearly something is amiss in Amazon's tablet. It could be a shortcoming intrinsic to the core architecture of the Fire's chip. It could be a software optimization issue. Regardless, the Fire's web browsing experience is emotionally draining. It makes you work for your page view, and that's a user-experience fail.Marco Arment, creator of Instapaper, summed up really well: "I expected the Kindle Fire to be good for books, great for magazines and newspapers, great for video, and good for apps and games. In practice, it's none of these.""I expected the Kindle Fire to be a compelling iPad alternative, but I can't call it delightful, fun, or pleasant to use. Quite the opposite, actually: using the Fire is frustrating and unpleasant, and it feels like work. It's not an iPad competitor or alternative. It's not the same kind of device at all. And, whatever it is, it's a bad version of it.""Almost the entire interface is sluggish, jerky, and unresponsive. Many touch targets throughout the interface are too small, and I miss a lot. It's often hard to distinguish a miss from interface lag... It's a bad game player, a bad app platform, a bad web browser, a bad video player, and, most disappointingly, a bad Kindle. If I didn't need the Fire for Instapaper testing, I'd return it."Well, I am returning the Kindle Fire back to Amazon today. And this is coming from the BIGGEST FAN OF THE ORIGNIAL KINDLE!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (29)

21 of 23 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGood product, ignorant reviewers.,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Ryan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm truly interested why so many of you give this bad ratings. It's blatantly obvious that the majority of you put no research into buying your tablet. First off, you get what you pay for. It's always been like that. You'd be ignorant to think otherwise.Let's look at this tablet.Reading: It is AMAZING for reading books on the fly (graphic novels look A-M-A-Z-I-N-G); if you turn down the brightness while reading it makes it look almost identical to a "normal" Kindle Reader.Volume Control: All of you complaining about the internal volume control must be technologically deprived or something. You literally hit the cogwheel at the top of the screen and there's a huge button that says "volume" with an easy to control slider that pops up when you hit it. How much easier could that be? In fact, I wouldn't want external volume control due to how easy it is to bump into them and change the volume.It seems people are expecting this tablet to be their go-to computer on the go, or just their go-to computer in general. I have NO idea why anyone would think this would do that. It's absolutely AMAZING for reading books, browsing the internet, paying your bills, and playing games. The internet is very fast, I think the people complaining about slow internet are just on garbage 1 mpbs connections. Sorry, that isn't going to cut it on Wifi kids.The majority of bad reviews are tablet snobs expecting the Kindle Fire to do something it CLEARLY isn't going to do from the get-go. If you're wanting the equivalent to a desktop on the go look at an Asus Transformer or an iPad or something. If you're just wanting to read, browse the internet, or play games while on the couch or at school or something then this is the tablet for you.Also, 6 GB of storage is plenty. I have like 6 books, multiple games, and a couple of songs and still have like 5.3 GB left. Why would you want to put a full movie on a Kindle? For a road trip? Lol? It's a Kindle, read a book and stimulate your mind.  Like I've been saying, the people complaining about this have are just expecting way too much.I've had this for about 2 weeks. Must have apps:Pandora, Facebook, Stumble Upon, Netflix (WORKS GREAT! Better than I expected, I do have a fairly nice connection though 25 down, 5 up), IMO Instant Chat, TV Listings Guide, Angry Birds, Quick OfficeHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

21 of 23 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBang for the BUCK......You just cannot go wrong with this.,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Ullas Bhai "Novo Reveuaxeur"(St. Louis, MO)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Oh goodness, read so many reviews about the fire and was so confused with people pointing out flaws in this cute bookish tablet.......So before you go any further into the review let me tell you a little bit about myself. I am a decent professional, who is NOT a techno guru or geek (which will be clear reading this review lacking in technical details), I am a big web browsing freak, but I do most of my official work in the office &amp; NOT at home, and browsing at home/on a tablet is what I essentially do for fun, and Reading: Im NOT a book worm, (for heaven's sake this is not a derogatory term), and don't spend hours reading books,  but am an avid reader of the books/subjects I like(which does not happen that frequently), and usually read 1-2 books a month, or less, depending on my schedule and work-hours. I do read books usually at bedtime, and again I don't spend many hours each day in reading, as there are a ton of other things to do..I just acquired a Fire after a lot of debate, dilemma &amp; confused orange clouding in my brain about getting a Kindle + a Tablet, vs. The FireFirst of all few things need to be made clear. The Fire is not for you if......1) If you are a big reader, and if that's the primary focus, you would not be reading this review, as you need a device for reading, and are not worried about web-browsing that much. Also the Fire is not an alternative to the e-ink screen, and is definitely glossier than a book page. The fact of the matter is if you are reading these big discussions (including this never ending blabber of a review) a part of your mind wants a browsing tablet also.2) If you are an "apple"oholic, as this machine is not an alternative for an i-pad or for that matter an i-phone. No matter how many words have been attributed for this (un)clash between the i-pad and Kindle. If you are an apple fan and end up buying this, you are actually asking for disappointment. The Panache, the styling, the responsiveness of the screen, and the intuitiveness of use.....it costs some money guys, Im sure we all know that $500 is 150 % more than $200.  There is an Indian saying that "the pudding will be only as sweet as the amount of sugar you add to it..."3) If you like to do a lot of official work, at home on your bed or your couch...So who should buy this.....? I would say that's an average person like, me, who does not have too many expectations, and knows the amount of money he is spending, and what he can hope to get1) If you occasionally read books and enjoy them2) If you have 2 or more computers in the house, and the idea of getting another tablet, is like adding another device, and shedding some dollars from your pocket3) But you like to browse, YouTube, face book, or check e-mail while getting ready to sleep, and chitchatting with your husband/wife/friend4) Always wanted to have the convenience of having a kindle or at least owning it (even if is for the societal pressure of "you still read paper books.....arrrrrgh") and fitting into the technology world.5) You will not spend a sleepless night, if the tablet did not respond to your first touch.6) You do not already own 3 kinds of e-readers, and 4 kinds of tablets (this is a weird  example of course, but I hope it conveys the point)Pros:1) Very good looking2) Great multimedia capabilities3) Excellent display ( not too bright not too dull)4) Combines the benefits of both an e-reader and  tabletCons:1) It's a bit heavy(lighter than most tablets and i-pad though) for an e-reader2) The power button at the bottom, is a nuisance, and gets tuned on and off as it scratches on my tummy (that's how I like to read and browse, while I am lying on the bed), but I found a way to deal with this, I turn my kindle upside down, but I think Amazon needs to work on this on a pronto basis3) Screen is not the most responsive in the world, but I can live with that4) Most resources are limited to Amazon (the reason for the 200$ price tag)Summary: This is an excellent piece of equipment that gives you the conveniences of having a kindle, and the tablet style web-browsing, at a very very affordable price. With 200 dollars spent, you just CANNOT go wrong. I spent about 7 days reading all that people had to say, but after having it I'm sure, this serves my purpose of reading and my craving for the occasional bedroom browsing. If you do not own a tablet before, you CANNOT go wrong with 200$Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

17 of 18 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBeats the Nook 3G/WiFi hands down,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Shell6a-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have used a Nook 3g/Wifi for the past year and a half, however my husband surprised me with a Kindle Fire for my birthday. I have used my Kindle Fire more in just the past month than I ever used my Nook. It is amazing. I also love that with my Prime Membership I can "borrow" one book a month and watch the streaming free movies/television shows that are included in the Prime deal. Another added benefit to the Kindle Fire over the "e-ink" nook is that I do not need a light to read my book at night. I just set the background to black with white text and reading is as easy if not easier than it was with my nook. Great product at a great price. I love my Kindle Fire!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

17 of 18 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDownload a free password app,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Krys-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When I received my Kindle I almost sent it back.  I realized after playing with it and downloading apps it had no password protection. I knew my five year old would be buying Smurf Berries if he got the chance.  I did some research and found a really great free password app (Smart App Protector). Now if I want to purchase an app or anything else I have to enter a password.  I have had the Kindle now since it came out and I can honestly say I love it.  I can surf the Internet, read books, play games and check my email.  It is lighting fast.  I also love the unlimited storage in the cloud.  Don't let that the Kindle doesn't have password protection right out of the box stop you from buying it.  It was super easy to fix!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

17 of 18 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDespite Some Flaws, I am Pleased With My Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Roy Ingle "The Seeking Disciple"(Lexington, SC)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire and will here present a review of the product.  Let me first cover the positives and then a few negatives.The Positives1.  The Size.  At only 7' inches, the Fire is compact but not much different from the old Kindle.  The unit is a little heavier than the old Kindle but not much difference there either.2.  The Screen.  The touch screen is easy to navigate even if you have not used a smart phone or an iPod touch.  The screen could use a little improvement and I will note that below.3.  The Light.  The screen is well-lit.  In a dark room, I needed to turn the light down as it is bright.  For watching videos or playing games though, it is perfect.4.  The Apps.  Much like the iPod, the apps are easy to find and easy to control.  While Amazon doesn't have a lot of apps yet, I am sure more are on the way.  The apps appear along with your books on the front page in a scrolling menu.5.  Books.  Amazon, of course, allows you to store your books in the Amazon cloud that allows you to essentially read as much as you want to and store off of your Kindle.  The genus of this is that you can download as many books as you want to and it doesn't affect your memory on the Fire.  I have plenty of room on my Fire for both apps and books.6.  Navigation.  The Fire is easy to navigate.  Again, if you have used a smart phone or an iPod touch then you would have no problems with the Fire.7.  The Color.  The colors on the Fire are excellent and compare to the iPad.8.  Internet.  The internet works well on the Fire though not fast.  It is efficient.9.  The Price.  The bottom line is that the price of the Fire is worth it.  I paid $200 for mine and after using it now for a good day, I would say that is a fair price for this unit.The Negatives1.  The Screen.  Some other reviewers have noted the glare on the screen.  I noticed this as soon as I opened my Fire and turned it on.  It is a weakness.  The other negative of the screen is that the touch is very sensitive.  If you so much brush the screen with your clothing or hand, you'll turn the page while reading or go out of an app.  This is annoying.2.  Sharing What You've Read via Twitter or Facebook.  I use to share what I was reading from my old Kindle on Facebook and Twitter regularly.  The Fire is not as easy to share with and takes some work to do so.  I have yet to share with the Fire.  It's that tough.3.  Internet.  I noted above that this was a positive but the only drawback of the Internet on the Fire is the speed.  The iPad is much faster than the Fire in terms of the Internet.  However, I don't plan on doing much on the Internet with the Fire so I will not let this worry me.4.  Highlighting.  On the old Kindle it was easy to highlight what you were reading.  The Fire is not as easy.  The touch screen is too sensitive and this makes highlighting tough though not impossible.  Notes are difficult as well.5.  Typing.  The small screen makes it tough to type with.  Unlike the iPad, the Fire was not built to be typed on but the drawback of this is that games that require typing (such as Words With Friends) is not easy.  I keep misspelling the simplest words because of the difficulty in typing.6.  Sound.  Much of the pictures I saw of the Fire before it was released showed people listening to the Fire via headphones.  Now I see why.  The sound is so low.  I tried to watch a video on the Fire and even with the volume turned wide open, it was difficult to hear.  You'll need headphones if you plan on watching videos with the Fire.7.  Battery Life.  The old Kindle had a battery life that would last days with high usage.  The Fire does not.  The battery life has gone down greatly with limited usage.  However, the old Kindle obviously didn't have the amount of things that it was doing as the Fire does so I will let this one slide.ConclusionWould I recommend buying the Fire?  Yes I would.  It is comfortable, easy to use, and while it is not a perfect unit, it is very reliable and useful.  I love to read and have found the Kindle and now the Fire to be almost required for good reading in our wireless generation.  The price is good and with Amazon cloud, you can read as many books as you can possibly purchase (both for money and for free at Amazon) and know that it will not take up room on your Fire.  I am pleased with my Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

17 of 18 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAn Absolute Bargain,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Chris Deeds(Clyde, Texas United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Kindle Fire in the afternoon and I've been playing with it off and on for several hours now. While not perfect this little tablet is absolutely fantastic for the price point!The device is thicker that I was expecting but the rubber coating on the back of the Fire gives it a nice feel in the hand. The Fire is light enough that holding it in one hand for longer periods of time isn't bad at all, just don't expect it to be e-ink Kindle light. The construction of the tablet is excellent, though, and doesn't feel in the least bit flimsy or cheap.The screen on this tablet is amazing! The lower priced tablets usually get it done by installing an inferior screen in the device and I'm glad to say that Amazon has done nothing of the sort. It has very vibrant color and nice pixel density. In a side by side comparison the Fire screen was crisper than that of an iPad 2 but not quite on par with the qHD display of my Evo 3D.My biggest problem with the screen is that it is only 7-inches. I find the Galaxy Tab 8.9 to have the perfectly sized screen for both portability and view-ability. That's not to say that the Fire doesn't get the job done. The screen has a nice enough pixel density that I was able to browse the web comfortably on 95% of the web pages I visited without having to do any resizing.The UI on the Fire is incredibly simple and intuitive. People keep saying how easy an iPad is to use and how intuitive it is but I found the Fire to be even easier to use right out of the box (my first experience with an iPad had me hunting for various things for some time before I got the hang of it; not so with the Fire).Overall the tablet operates quite smoothly. This is the first 7-inch tablet I've played with that has a dual-core and I expected a nice ride. While it wasn't as smooth as an iPad 2 or a Galaxy Tab 8.9 it was on par with my Iconia A500 and far superior to my old, rooted, overclocked Nook Color. The only problems I had might very well have been software issues that can be fixed in future updates. Now and again either the tablet lagged or simply didn't pick up on the fact that I was hitting the back button; this happened several times while browsing through several areas of the device, not just web browsing. Another problem was on especially 'busy' websites scrolling down the page was a touch jerky.I watched several YouTube videos and had mixed results with those. The videos all loaded quickly and ran fairly smoothly but the sound lagged behind on some of them when viewed full screen.I do wonder how performance might have been improved if Amazon had built the Fire with 1GB of ram rather than the 512MB it has.Now, as I'm sure you'd expect, the content integration with Amazon Prime is really where this little beauty shines. The Prime streaming video loads quickly and looks great! I've been an Amazon shopper for quite some time and buy all of my digital books and well as music from Amazon and it is very nice to have it all at my fingertips. I did a little reading while listening to music and the Fire performed quite well. The page turning could be a little smoother but it was on par with using the Kindle App on other Android devices. There were no sound hiccups or jumps as I read.I fired up Netflix on the device as well and compared it to the video quality on the iPad 2. They were roughly on par but the iPad 2 seemed to look a little less pixelated. Interestingly enough due to the aspect ratios of the two devices the video on the iPad wasn't as much larger than that of the Fire as you would expect given the differences in screen size. The video takes up the full screen of the Fire but the iPad 2 has large black areas above and below the video.The speakers on the Fire actually aren't bad. They're not the best but I was pleasantly surprised. The iPad has better volume but about the same clarity.The smaller storage space on the Fire might be a problem for some but not me. On any of the tablets I've owned I've never used more than 4GB of space and with Amazon's Cloud Drive it makes it even more likely that I'll never run out of storage. I don't miss the lack of a micro SD slot either. I can count the number of times I've used an SD card on a tablet with the capability on one hand.Likewise the lack of a camera on the Fire doesn't bother me in the least. Again I can count the number of times I've used a tablet camera on one hand.The lack of bluetooth I do find to be a glaring flaw - especially considering all the speaker sets being released now that connect to a portable device via bluetooth. I think this was a mistake on Amazon's part and hope it is one they correct on future releases of a Kindle tablet.The selection of Apps is still limited for the Fire but there are quite a lot. I did find myself searching in vain for several I'd enjoyed on my other Android tablets. This isn't a deal killer by any means but it is a noticeable flaw.All in all I am more than happy with my purchase. The Fire might not be for everyone but if you're in the market for a tablet for entertainment purposes I'd give this a try before going with a higher priced device. I was actually surprised how well the Fire performed in comparison to larger, more costly devices like the iPad 2. Is the iPad 2 a superior tablet overall? Yes. Is it worth more than double the cost of the Fire? Not in my opinion.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

17 of 18 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsfun right out of the box!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;J. J. Huang(Elkridge, MD USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Setup was a snap and I was watching a movie within minutes of starting it up.  Easy access to my music and books.  It does exactly what I bought it for - a device to access my media files quickly and seamlessly.The display is quite nice.  Althought I worried about the smallish display, it was fine for watching videos.  The built in speakers are serviceable, but not outstanding - what do you expect?  A decent set of headphones works wonders.  The build feels sturdy and hefty - not at all flimsy and delicate.  I would feel comfortable tossing this in a coat pocket, glove box, or carry on luggage.That's my initial take with two hours playing with it.  I'll post an update after the two week mark.  For the money and designed purposes, it's a bargain at $199.  I would've paid the rumored $249, but hard pressed to buy it at $299.  So far, the biggest winning factor is the seamless and smooth integration with Amazon, the Cloud, and Prime.  It's not the sexiest tablet on the block, but what's under the hood makes it a good buy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

16 of 17 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsTransferring DVD Movies to the Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;K. Gibbons "pcnetwrx"(Phoenix, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)With so many positive reviews, I won't repeat what they all say. One of my interests was how to put my own DVD movies onto the device so that they would run without a WiFi connection. After a couple of trials I got it to work. So here is how I did it.First, you need a backup of the DVD VOB file which I won't really get into, but I used AnyDVD and DVD Decrypter. Once I had a good DVD VOB file, then I used Any Video Converter (the free version) to convert the VOB file to a custom MP4 file using these parameters:Video Codec xvidFrame Size 720 x 480Video Bitrate 1024Video Framerate 20Audio Codec aacA/V Sync DefaultEverything else is the default setting.Wait for the conversion which can take a while and then hook up your Fire to your PC using the USB cable and copy your new MP4 file to the Video folder. To watch your video, start the Gallery app and find your video to play it. Each movie you convert this way should be under 1 gig in size and should look pretty decent on the Fire.BTW, I actually did an extra step using the video4fuze program to get an 854 x 480 resolution and then used Original in the above Frame Size, but I don't think that it was necessary so I did not describe it here. The above procedure should at least give you a starting point that you can fine-tune for your personal preference on video quality versus file size.UPDATE: After having the Fire for a little over a week, I had to come back and lower the star rating by one. Although using the cloud for movie and photo storage is possible, it should be much more seamless than it is. Having to go through three different not-so-apparent steps to download a video to the Fire from the cloud is a bit ridiculous. Amazon really needs to do more on their cloud and Fire integration so that photos and videos are as easy to deal with as music is. Here is what you need to do in order to bring a video from the cloud to your Fire:You can download from the cloud, but it is a multistep process and requires an additional app called ES File Explorer. Use the Kindle browser to find your file at www.amazon.com/clouddrive and then tap and hold on the filename that you want to download (the browser download button does not work). A menu comes up where you can choose to save link. Then after it's done downloading, use ES File Explorer to find your file in the Download folder. It will be called clouddrive.bin so tap and hold and choose to rename it to the correct filename.mp4 or whatever. Then tap and hold to cut and go to the Video folder and tap and hold on any file there to paste. Then you can either run it directly there with ES File Explorer or find it in the gallery and view it there.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

20 of 22 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAdvice on buying a Kindle Fire,March 9, 2012By&nbsp;Markbc(Pacific Grove, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After using the Kindle Fire for a couple of months.I recommend buying the Kindle Fire if:1. You have an Amazon Prime account.  I think this is the most important criterion since having an Amazon Prime account makes Kindle Fire deliver the most bang for the buck.  Tons of free videos, you are likely to be shopping on Amazon anyway, and you are likely to be using Amazon bookstore (which I think has the best selection of books, newspapers (and maybe) magazines)2.  You read e-books. (sort of wrapped up in point one, but it you don't read ebooks, then about 30% of the functionality of Kindle Fire is lost to you -get another tablet that does different things!)3. You have steady or routine access to a wireless network. (not 3G /LTE !)4. You have tried out or tested, LIKE and feel COMFORTABLE with the seven inch (7") form factorIf you don't feel happy with ALL of the above, stay away from Kindle Fire, it's not for you.Also if you really want to buy and IPad, but are thinking of buying the Fire just to save money, don't!You won't be happy with a substitute, constantly thinking, "would this or thatexperience have been better on "IPad," or "what can IPad do that this can't"?I think that few people purchase a Kindle Fire without first thinking, "which is better for me, an IPAD or Kindle Fire"?  I own both, so here are my two cents:IPad2 is slick &amp; has more functions. However I found that my IPad seemed more of a toy -not cheap, but a device that was drawing me to spend a lot time -waste a lot of time. What do I mean? Well with the IPAD, I was always trying to create/discover more and more and more uses for the IPad. Some of the apps were constructive; but much of the time was spent trying to squeeze some functionality I normally do elsewhere onto the IPad. This was not efficient, usually was more a waste of time... Yikes!Kindle Fire is more focused in its utility. I sought this in the tablet since I realized that what I wanted was a more focused (some might sneer "limited") tablet tool that fits what I do (and with whom I do business). (with a few tablet tweaks along the way!)Also, after using the Kindle Fire, my IPad2 seemed harder to hold, clumsier to handle. Now when I walk around with the IPad, I feel like I am carrying around a discus or big plate in my hand.I only need or want a tablet for: READING, (books, news, magazines, etc.)Casual VIDEO WATCHING, Light WEB BROWSING for shopping or knowledge.Those are my primary uses for a tablet. Kindle Fire works better for me for these functions.  Of course, it is personal preference; and I really like the smaller, easier to handle size. It just feels more solid and less like a weird disk in my hands.  (Enough IPAD-Kindle Fire).Reading:I replaced my older Kindle reader with the Kindle Fire and have no complaints. Some people complain that the Kindle Fire backlit display is bad in direct sunlight.  Most of my reading is done on the couch, or waiting in a car, or at a table somewhere, or the like. It is rare for me to be reading by a pool, or on the beach, or in direct sunlight. I try to avoid sunburn.Video:When I watch video, I watch (mostly) Amazon movies and TV shows on it (most are the FREE ones that come with the Amazon Prime membership), sometimes our family videos as well.  I watch the commercial video through streaming (no problems!) and have tried and used the download-to device option, but we can't download the free Amazon Prime membership videos!Amazon movie prices are generally the same and sometimes lower than ITunes or Samsung or Google movies.  I find holding my Kindle Fire was quite comfortable. But I don't always hold the tablet to watch -I purchased a traditional style "Marware"cover. It not only is slim and sharp looking, but it supports the Kindle fire much better than the pretty blue, very-flimsy, magnetic cover that I purchased with my IPad2 (OK, yet one more IPAD comparison;-).Sometimes when I am working on the computer I will put a video on the Kindle fire and set it up next to the computer. (Of course, I could watch the same movie on a browser in the computer, but it is more background noise for me and it doesn't get in the way with what I am doing on the screen.)As mentioned above, you can download films to the machine and watch them that way. I think you might be able to fit three maybe four movies in memory (I have not tried to max it out). This is good if you plan to drive on a long trip (or a short trip with kids;-) and perhaps if you are traveling -flying for example. I would not do that as the normal method of watching -unless you are habitually in a bad wifi area.Music:If you are using a Kindle Fire, you might as well use the Amazon Cloud (I uploaded my music library to the Amazon Cloud). Amazon provide something like 2Gigs free, and additional Cloud storage is not particularly expensive. The music interface is via the Amazon MP3 app and it is OK, not the best, not the worst.  Of course streaming music only works when I am in a wifi area, or if I tether from some other WIFI-providing source.I could load my music onto my Kindle Fire, but for the number of times I use the Kindle Fire for music, and given it only has about 6gig of storage space available, I would rather save the time and space.Kindle Fire speakers are better than my IPAD2 speakers (again!), but that is not saying much.  I have a small portable speaker I can plug into the Kindle Fire when I plan to listen in a noisy area. Too bad the blue tooth is not enabled, so (for now at least) you need a cable or wire-connected speaker.Email:It works just like any Android phone and I get multiple email accounts on it. (This is redundant and only used when I feel too lazy to walk over to the computer or pull out my phone to check the emails ;-)Productivity Packages:There are several office productivity packages available that work on Kindle Fire. QuickOffice Pro with PDF is the one I use if/when I have need to deal with files on the tablet. These apps let you open and edit MS Office documents with a varying degree of control.  Most are available in the Amazon Android Market (Amazon still calls their market a market ;-)Android Tablet Functionality:This is an Android tablet, but Amazon has modified it to optimize the "Amazon experience," or something like that. Many folks poke fun at the Amazon interface, but it is really quite clever and useful, once you examine it and use it a while.  I still use it on many occasions.You can easily "un-optimze" the Kindle Fire and turn it into a "real" android tablet simply by changing the launcher from the Amazon interface to a traditional Android launcher like "GO" or "ADW ex" (my favorite).  If you do this it doesn't hurt anything on the Kindle Fire and you can flip-flop back and forth between the two launchers (KF and your choice) very easily.  Doing this provides the user with a more traditional access to applications, but not much else.ROOTINGA more significant step that you can do with Kindle Fire is to "ROOT" it. This is to gain ownership /access to the tablet's system files.  You already own your Kindle Fire, but the file system is protected from you, in part so that you don't break it by mistake.The protected /stock Kindle Fire operating system has a downside of limiting the add-ons you might want to make, or customizations you desire to the look/feel of the tablet.Advice:  If you are using your Kindle Fire simply as a Kindle reader-with-multi-media-extras machine, then I would say don't bother rooting it.  It is not worth the effort.  Stick with the Kindle Fire original interface ("launcher"), or switch launchers and you will be able to get some personalization without worrying about "bricking" or damaging the machine.But, it if you want to do more, (here comes that time-wasting thing again;-) then you can find a dozen YouTube videos to show you, how to root the Kindle Fire.  Even though I have only pretty basic uses for a tablet, I did not follow my own advice and rooted the Kindle Fire and added recovery to it as well. But really, the only advantages for me in doing so are:-- I was able to install some of the Android Phone Apps that I already purchased on the Google Market (Google fun) that fit my use of the tablet.-- I was able to add back the "real" Google market (play!) to broaden my choices of apps.-- I was able to make two complete backups of my setup and applications (one via  Titanium Backup that requires root, and one on device in a system add-on/modification called Team Win Recovery Project (TWRP).-- I was able to personalize/customize the Kindle Fire interface better. I can control the screen backgrounds and some other functions; and changed them to what I was accustomed to on my android phone.-- I have added or tried out new applications that might not be able to be installed on the stock Kindle FireWARNING! if you do root the Kindle Fire you will lose the ability to watch the "Video on Demand" Amazon functionality, even if you are an Amazon Prime member!  To me this is a big loss. Watching videos, most conveniently provided by Amazon, is a big use for my Kindle Fire.Fortunately, I discovered that rooting can be undone, and one can return the Kindle Fire to its unrooted "controlled state" (look for "OTA Rootkeeper") with the touch of a button or two (virtual buttons, since there is only one darn button on the Kindle Fire!).While I have rooted my Kindle Fire to do some modifications, I find that I spend 90% of my Kindle Fire time UNrooted, since I am in and out of the video application several times a week.  (Kindle Fire reading and MP3 listening are not affected by rooting/unrooting -at least it does not appear that way to me!)In addition, rooting also provides the ability to switch or change out the basic operating system version that is used by Amazon (I think it's 2.3) to other versions of Android.  These other ROMs present different styles and even more customized look/feel.  But here is another real warning --if you do change out the ROM, that is if you go beyond simply rooting Kindle Fire and then replace the Amazon version of Android with another version ("flash a different ROM"as it is called), it seems to me that you lose -really, really lose the ability to use Amazon's video on demand.So, while you could "flash" the newest version of Android, Android 4.0 ICS on to your Kindle, if you do that you won't be watching Amazon on Demand Videos after that (OTA won't help!). At least until you flash back to the stock rom!  For me that negates one of the main reasons for having the Kindle Fire -at least the way I use it.  Of course you can always use other video sources, but since this is the Amazon Kindle Fire, it is easiest to stay with the brand.Finally, I have tried the new ONLINE Windows desktop on the Kindle Fire. (That was kind of tricky to install!). It works well and delivers a very usable MS Windows experience on Kindle Fire, However, I have already mentioned my reasons to use the Kindle Fire, and using it as a Windows connectivity tool is not one of them.  While it is a clever and sharp product, it is not for me. I will probably soon remove it;-(The point is that if you want to, you could stretch the Kindle Fire's functionality.In conclusion, I think Kindle Fire is great as it is (with a few tweaks) since I use for the purposes for which Amazon pretty much built it.*If* I wanted to reinvent the Kindle Fire, or if I were seeking all the extra functionality (newest Android Rom, camera, Bluetooth, video teleconferencing, etc.) I could add back a few of those Tablet options and functionality, but in that case I think I would just buy another tablet (or keep using my IPad2 that is currently gathering dust on the shelf!).This is why I think that if you are (1) using the Amazon "eco-system," and (2) understand what Kindle Fire is meant to deliver, i.e. the functionality/limits/purposes of the Amazon Kindle Fire, and (3) like the 7"form factor, then Kindle Fire can be the best choice for a tablet purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (20)

20 of 22 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars5 Things I love about the Amazon Kindle Fire (and 5 things that Amazon should improve),December 10, 2011By&nbsp;freeismylife(Detroit)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Over the last 1 1/2 years, I have had the opportunity to review lots of tech products on my blog. So of course, I had to do a review of the newest technology gadget for the 2011 Holiday Shopping season: The Amazon Kindle Fire.I have wanted a Kindle for sometime now because I enjoy reading Kindle books and wanted to read them on a bigger screen than on my smartphone.  So when the Amazon Kindle Fire debuted at the unbelievable price of only $199, I was as excited as everyone else about the possibility of not only getting a great eReader, but also playing games and movies on Amazon's first tablet version of the Kindle.I have been using my Kindle Fire now for a few weeks to find out both the good and the not so good.  So, here is a list of the things that I love about the Kindle Fire and the things that Amazon should improve on to make the Kindle Fire an even better product.Here's 5 of my favorite things...1. The Size (Perfect!)The Kindle Fire weights 14.6 oz and it just a pleasure to hold and carry in my purse. I have been reading most of my Kindle book collection on my HTC Thunderbolt's 4.3" screen, so it is a real pleasure to now read my eBooks on a 7" inch screen. At 7.5" x 4.7" x 0.45" , the Kindle Fire is the size of most paperback books. While the Kindle Fire is heavier than the typical Kindle, the weight is not a burden. I have reviewed other 7" tablets (Samsung Galaxy Tab, HTC Flyer) and they just don't give me that feeling like I am holding a book. Amazon hit it out of the park on the size and weight of the Kindle Fire.2. Sideloading (My Fire now reads Nook, eReader, and Kobo ebooks)Amazon left the door open to allow you to install apps that are not available in the Amazon Android App Store. Through a process called "Sideloading", you install a sideloading app like GetJar and then use it to install Android applications. You can also use the browser to go to websites (like ereader.com) to download Android apps.I have been able to sideload the Nook reader app, the eReader.com app, and the Kobo reader app. So now I can read any of these eBook formats on my Kindle Fire. There is no need for me to buy a Nook reader and a Kobo reader since you can have them all on the Kindle Fire. Sweet!  I was also able to sideload the Comcast Xfinity Email app so that I can check my Comcast email.3. Magazines (Wonderful!)Amazon has optimized certain magazines to run on the Kindle Fire and is giving everyone that buys the Kindle Fire two months of FREE subscriptions to these magazines. I downloaded both Glamour and Conde Nast Traveler and they were both a pleasure to read on the Kindle Fire. The content magazine pages are optimized for the best reading experience through scrolling bars (both up and down and left and right). This optimization means your eyes never have to read small fonts and you get all the content without widening and minimizing the content on the screen.  Totally awesome!4. The priceAmazon really knew how to get cheap frugal people like me interested in buying the Kindle Fire.  At $199, it is $50 cheaper than the B&N; Nook Tablet and only about $30 more expensive than the other popular Kindle eReaders.  And for only $199, you get a color eReader that is also an android tablet that you can use to play games, watch movies, and check email.5. One FREE Month of Amazon PrimeWhen you activate your new Kindle Fire, Amazon automatically gives you a FREE month of Amazon Prime. This $78 a year service gives you access to hundreds of movies and TV shows for FREE.  Amazon just announced yesterday an extended licensing agreement with Twentieth Century Fox Television Distribution that will bring the popular FOX and FX television shows, Glee and Sons of Anarchy, to Amazon's Prime Instant Video service.And 5 things that Amazon needs to change...1. The Volume Button (Where is it?)There is only one button on the Kindle Fire and that is to turn the device on and off. I just did not believe at first that the Kindle Fire, which is being billed as an entertainment tablet, did not have a volume button.So how does one adjust the sound? When playing MP3's on the device or in the Amazon cloud or watching content from the Amazon Video on Demand store, you touch the screen and a volume slider will appear. But that only happens with Amazon content. When I watch a Netflix movie, there is no way to adjust the volume on the Kindle Fire. So even though Netflix has partnered with Amazon to have it's app be part of the Amazon Android store, you still cannot adjust the sound of the movie with the app.2. The On/Off Button (Why is it on the bottom?)Amazon put the on/off button on the bottom of the unit. So if you sit your Kindle Fire in your lap to read it like you would normally sit a book, you will more times than not accidentally turn your Kindle Fire off. The only way around this is the turn the Kindle Fire upside down (the screen will adjust) for reading.3. Google is a bad word (Bring back Gmail!)The Kindle Fire will not play any Google Android apps. That means no Gmail, Google+, Google Docs. Nothing. And on top of that, the Kindle Fire browser will not let you go to the Google Android Market Place. Now I have been critical of Apple being proprietary in the past, but Apple has nothing on Amazon in turns of locking down a device in this way.Even if you sideload Google apps on the device (which I did), they will not play because Amazon will not allow you to enter a Google Account id. Word to Amazon - Lighten Up. Even Apple allows the Windows OS to be installed on their Mac Books. The only way to get to Google functionality on the Kindle Fire is to navigate via the browser to the mobile versions of the websites for Gmail and other apps. It may not look as pretty but it works.4. Local Newspapers (No Detroit News - yet!)I have wanted to buy a Kindle for a while now because there is one thing that I cannot do with the Kindle app for smartphones and tablets - subscribe to magazines and newspapers. So imagine how surprised I was to find out that I still could not read the Detroit News and Free Press on my new Kindle Fire.It turns out not every subscription publication has been optimized to run on the new Kindle Fire. Some of the big newspapers have been optimized for the Fire, but the list is small. So reading any of my local newspapers is not currently an option.5. No Bluetooth (My wireless headphones are useless)Seeing that this is a tablet that retails for under $200, I was not expecting a whole lot. I knew it did not have any cameras (I would not have used them anyway) nor USB port. I also understood the device only has 8GB of memory - I'm fine with it since I can push my old content to the cloud. But how does an entertainment tablet not have bluetooth so I can use my wireless headphones while watching Amazon On Demand Movies? I actually had to go borrow my son's wired headphones. Amazon, you should really fix this.The Fire is a great Amazon Content tabletAfter having reviewed tablets in the $500 range, I found the Amazon Kindle Fire is a great eReader and a very basic Android tablet that is worth its $199. It is reported that Amazon is actually losing $6 on each Kindle Fire that is sold so the price is more than fair for what you are getting, but don't except a full functioning android tablet.If you are looking for a tablet to give your kids that is reasonably priced and will encourage them to read more ebooks, the Amazon Kindle Fire is perfect.If you read lots of eBooks and want a basic tablet for buying Amazon content, watching Amazon movies and TV shows, playing MP3's you buy from Amazon and reading email, this is a perfect tablet for you.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

20 of 22 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsCompared to Kindle 3G,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Noname-See all my reviews(TOP 50 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own a Kindle 3G and a netbook.  My husband bought the Kindle Fire for me as an early Christmas gift.  He thought it would just be a novelty, since I do like reading on my Kindle.  I've spent more than a week playing with the Fire and here's how it stacks up.E-READERThe Fire is heavier than the Kindle 3G and I do feel it.  When reading for long periods of time, I need to prop the Fire, whereas the Kindle 3G can be held in just one hand.I thought swiping the screen to turn each page would be a minor inconvenience, but I found that the pages turn when I just hit the side of the screen, much like hitting the button on the Kindle 3G.  I just need to remember to keep the thumb off the screen until I need to turn.I was worried that staring at the bright screen would hurt my eyes, but I read a novel through a few days of heavy reading, and my eyes didn't hurt at all.  The only problem is the glare when I'm sitting in sunny areas of the house.  There's never any glare on the Kindle 3G.  On the other hand, I often read at night, and it's hard to do on the Kindle 3G, even with a book light.  I now prefer the Fire for reading at night.  The screen brightness can be adjusted for intensity.Children's books look beautiful on the Fire.  I haveThe Complete Adventures of Curious George, Anniversary Editionand it reads so much better on the Fire than the Kindle 3G.  The illustrations are in full color and are beautiful.I love the bookmark function.  It's much easier to use on the Fire than the Kindle 3G.  Plus, when I want to flip through the pages, I can just swipe.  That's nicer than searching or punching in a location number or pressing the back button.  Searching for a definition or a finding a word in another location in the book is also easier on the Fire.  I just touch the word and I'm there.  No need for the toggle.I noticed the Fire doesn't read the books out loud.  For those who like the Kindle to read their books for them, the Kindle 3G will read.  However, I never use that function.Sorting: What happened to sorting?  Kindle 3G has a sorting function.  Fire does not.  This can present a problem for some people.  I like to sort my books.  I hope Amazon will fix this.*For everyone who has problems accidentally hitting the off button while reading, do what I do and turn the Fire upside down.*  The accelerometer will flip the screen automatically and you will no longer have this problem.  I hope Amazon will put the button on top for the next model.TYPINGI don't like typing with either the Fire or Kindle 3G.  At first, I was cursing the Fire, because of the mistypes, but I got used to it and it's easier now.  Typing with either one is a chore.  If I need to do a lot of typing, I prefer to use my desktop or my netbook.MUSICI don't use my Fire much for music, but I have tried it and it's nice to have the music on while reading or other functions.  I can even turn the screen off and it still plays.MOVIESMovies stream well.  The movie ap lists all the free Prime movies right on top so I don't even have to search for them.  The resolution isn't great, but who needs great resolution on such a tiny screen?  This is good for the kids and when I'm bored.EMAILWonderful app that's easy to set up and go.  It's so nice to not have to go on the web to read my email.AMAZON AND THE WEBI like the shopping ap.  Amazon has my likes and dislikes pinned down.  Web surfing is fun, the screen looks great; but not all functions work on the Fire (I can't get the Black Friday deals to scroll either direction) the screen's touch sensitivity is sporadic.  Sometimes, barely a swipe will send me to a page I don't want to be on and sometimes, I tap, tap, tap, push until it finally clicks and goes.Pages load relatively quickly.  I think it's about as fast as my netbook.  I don't think wow when it's loading, but I'm not moaning and groaning from boredom, either.WI-FI VS. 3GThis difference is obvious.  I would really like to have this Fire have 3G functionality.  I was stuck without Wi-Fi over the past week and couldn't download any new books.  So sad.  I do hope the next version of Fire will include 3G.BATTERY LIFEBattery life is not as long as the Kindle 3G (which can last me a week with the 3G turned off), but I can read the Fire all day before it needs charging.  I mean literally all day, so it's not really a problem.  I consider the battery life to be very good.PROS:+ easier to read in the dark than the Kindle 3G+ great for illustrated children's books+ easier to flip through pages for quick scanning+ easier to search for definitions and word locations+ listen to music as you perform other tasks+ easy to find free Prime movies - streams well+ email function easy to set up and use+ uses Wi-Fi+ good battery lifeCONS:- heavier than the Kindle 3G- screen glare- does not read the books out loud- no book sorting function- typing is a chore- screen's touch sensitivity -- sometimes too sensitive, sometimes not sensitive enough- not all web functions work on the Fire- no 3GCONCLUSIONOverall, I've very happy with the Kindle Fire.  It will replace my netbook for short excursions from the home and my Kindle 3G for reading at night.  For my heavy daytime reading, I will still read the Kindle 3G.  For my heavy typing, I will use my netbook or desktop.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

20 of 22 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsReviewing as a PDF reader,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Turin "Turambar"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really enjoy my regular Kindle as a format for reading books and to an extent newspapers. And the integration with the Kindle for PC to grab my highlights quickly and drop them into a Word doc is a great way to integrate reading and research into producing output.The weakness of the e-ink kindles is in handling pdf's and web site content. So I was interesting in test driving a Fire to see how much better it is able to cope better with those formats.First off- newspapers. Disappointment there as my Times of London subscription didnt download to the Fire automatically and it wasnt in the bookshelf. Looking into it I see that the Times isnt available for the Fire; and in fact that seems to be the status, at least currently for a number of papers such as the WSJ. I'd imagine this will change in the future but at launch its NYT, USA Today, Post and a much thinner collection than the regular Kindle.I did download the Economist to see how it look on the Fire and the color and clarity of the text is good. It would be a very good magazine reading experience and convenient on the go. However if you can selected highlight text, export it or tweet it like you can on a regular Kindle, I couldnt figure it out. Disappointing, as one of the main things to do with magazines is save of a tidbit of knowledge so you can find it later.For e-books I tried two samples- a Cisco router config guide that was about 600 pages in color, and a scanned version of "A Ride to Khiva" by Fred Burnaby from 1877. There are a large number of interesting books that exist only in scanned form or in such a error filled OCR mobi conversion that reading them on e-ink is a major pain, so being able to read them on the Fire would be a positive boon.The kindle automatically opened the cisco document in the Kindle for Fire app and legibility was excellent including on the drawn images and photos. Navigation is done by sliding the pages across or by the progress slider. Major bummer in that the Kindle app is much less full featured than Kindle for PC- you cant highlight or export sections. Major downside for technical reading.I then downloaded and tried the Adobe Reader app, MobilePDF viewer and the Documents to Go (free) pdf viewer from the Amazon App store. Checking googles android store there appear to be a lot more pdf viewers out there but they are not available for Fire. Going through the cisco pdf was most comfortable on the adobe app, although the markup ability was still limited. Mobilepdf required hitting tiny arrow keys to turn pages- ugh quite a comedown after the paddles on a e-ink kindle. Legibility was good on both. The PDF to Go app required purchasing the full app to open such a large document.On "A Ride to Khiva" it was a mixed bag. The Adobe app posts an "out of memory" message and exits. MobilePDF is unable to render any page content. PDF to Go Free version is unable to do anything but tell you to buy a full version. The Kindle reading app just renders the pages as smears. There is a "read online" version available through archive.org and that did render legibly and was useable through the Silk browser although the paging controls are a pain.The other thing I'd like to use the Fire for is browsing the web when I am out at a cafe and taking notes. Obviously the lack of a bluetooth keyboard is a major bummer there, HOWEVER I notice that in hardware reviews elsewhere (theverge.com)that there actually is a bluetooth chip in the Fire, which lends me sufficient hope that it will be eventually turned on, either officially or unofficially.Last note is that the Fire would be a good gift device for a non-tech savvy relative. The out of the box is as easy as pie and there is no computer required so its perfectly plausible that someone with no wifi could stop by the library or McDonalds, get the download of the daily paper or books you lend them, check their email and be off.I am keeping my Fire although for the things that this review is centered on its a 3-star experience. Since most of my gripes are software based I hope that things will improve to a better experience- at the very least newspaper availability should. If you are reading this in 2012 you may want to check for what pdf apps are now available in the apps store and if keyboard support has now been hacked in.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

20 of 22 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsDecent for what it does - but not 100% compatible with the old Kindle,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;K. Rule(Beaverton, OR USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've spent several hours with my new Fire and I'm fairly impressed with it. It's simple to setup. It just works like you'd (mostly) expect.It's definitely not an iPad - but I wasn't expecting it to be so that doesn't bother me a bit.The integration with the Amazon Cloud is pretty darn good. Things general work like you'd expect without a bunch of tweaking and fussing. Kudos to Amazon for that.I think most of the reviews I read covered the good things about the Fire. So, I will mention some of the quirky behavior that I noticed:1) The battery life is probably smidge more than half of the 7.5-8 hours Amazon quoted after I charged it. I suspect the number Amazon speced doesn't consider using Wi-Fi for downloading or streaming during the time that it quotes.2) UI inconsistency between the Kindle UI and some of the UI's the Apps. I especially had issues with the Comixs app and how it doesn't zoom like anything else - you have to tap panels. It also seems hard to get the Fire's attention at times when trying to close an App.3) The Amazon cloud access to docs is non-existent. Everything else in the Amazon cloud seems to work well, but I had a bunch of PDF files in the doc section of the cloud, and was not able to access it from my Fire. I had to connect the Fire to my PC and then transfer them manually. After having done that, the Fire renders them well, but this inability to access docs from the cloud is strange at best.4) A limited email client. It's not well integrated. It's missing key features. This seems out of character with the rest of the Fire experience.5) No calendar. I realize this is primarily an ebook reader, but jeez, this is core (phone, tablet, &amp; computer) functionality.6) No Google integration. I realize Amazon is pushing their cloud, but this is an Android device after all.To be fair, these are minor quibbles with what's otherwise an extremely good value. I hope Amazon will resolve some of these issues because it will make a very good e-reader tablet even better.I think there is a good chance I will be buying a couple more Fires as Christmas gifts, so I definitely would recommend it to others.Update [11/21/2011]I've noticed some incompatibility with my old Kindle. Specifically I have a year or so of back issues of Reader's Digest are not loadable on my Kindle Fire.To get Reader's Digest to work you must get the Reader's Digest App and then purchase a subscription through the app. Though the app is nice, the subscription through the App is double the monthly amount of the old Reader's digest versions. In addition, Amazon won't let me move my back issues to the Kindle Fire. This makes me an unhappy camper.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

53 of 64 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsfeels right,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Russell W Alexander(La Vergne, TN, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am writing this review while sitting at starbucks using my Kindle Fire!  Heavier than I expected, but it feels good in my hands.  Very well put together and easy to use.  Internet has been quick for me.  Love it so far.  It was already registered for me which was really cool also.  Screen is nice and bright.  I ill update in a few days.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

16 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThis was the answer to my IPAD envy!,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Deborah Horne(South Carolina)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire 2 days ago and it has surpassed all of my expectations. I could not be happier with this product!My goal was try everything to see if there were any weak points in the device and frankly I just can't find anything that I dislike. Throw in the great price point and I'm feeling really good about waiting on that much more expensive IPAD purchase!First the the colors are amazing! I love the way everything is set up and integrated. It's very easy to figure out and in fact I didn't even consult the User's guide until last night....just to see if I missed anything that might be helpful.I've downloaded apps and a magazine, played games, checked my email and facebook, added a weather app and watched movies from both Amazon Prime and Netflix. I also set-up Pandora. While the built in speakers are not very loud I found with headphones it sounds great! I love the touchpad but found that some of the apps require a harder tap...however that's the apps and not the FIRE itself which is very responsiveI also surfed the web,loaded some of my photos and watched a video emailed from my sis!!! The Photo Gallery app allows cropping and even  provides a slideshow function...and the photos look awesome!Last night I borrowed a book from the lending library....it took about 5 seconds. I've had no issues with load time on anything...it's just smooth. To be honest...I've had a hard time putting it down!Amazon has hit a grand slam home run with this product and I would not hesitate to recommend it to anyone considering it. In fact I love this so much I bought one for my Mom. Ssssshhhhh! Don't tell her!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

30 of 35 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAs an iPad and iPad 2 Owner,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;J. Geoffroy(Auburn, WA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very impressed by the Kindle Fire. I was skeptical and expected that it would feel like a "bargain basement" device compared to my iPads. It doesn't.Here's my pros and cons after spending 3 hours with it:Pros:Much lighter than an iPadMuch easier to hold than an iPadMuch easier to type on than an iPadBrowsing websites is a breeze (hooray for Flash support)Accessing files on the cloud is much more intuitive than the iPadApp store is great, love the ease of use and free daily appAmazon video on demand is much easier and quicker than a Netflix appCons:I wish there was a mechanical volume control button and not just a touch screen versionSome web pages look small and I need to expand the screenFor what I use a tablet for (namely browsing the internet, reading books, watching videos, listening to music and playing with apps) it's an incredible device at an unbelievable price. If you make good use of cloud storage I see no reason to buy an iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

27 of 31 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNOT A KINDLE &amp; NOT AN iPAD KILLER BUT SOMETHING NEW,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Margaux Paschke-See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was hoping that this could replace a Kindle or be an alternative to the iPad but it turned out to be neither, which isn't a bad thing but means it's yet another devise to add to my "must haves" (Kindle and iPad). Great.  At least the price makes it less painful.  Many others have more detailed specs and are more qualified to provide them so I'll stick to my thoughts after spending hours on it.I wish they didn't tag this device a "Kindle" which instilled the hope that I could trade in my Kindle DX for the Kindle Fire but the lack of an e-ink display makes it the same reading experience as using the Kindle app on an iPad.  Okay but not as great as the regular Kindle line which is close to reading a physical book and the lack of 3G makes this Fire very affordable but not as convenient as the Kindle.  Also, it does not work as a replacement for an iPad since it has no real working document ability, much smaller screen, no cameras and the apps are media oriented.  I do not think these two devices should be compared.The Kindle Fire does shine as a media tablet and nothing else comes close at this price.  It blows the Nook and other super e-Readers away.  The gorilla glass display is durable and the resolution is very good.  The screen is only 7" but compares well against other e-Readers and even close to tablets (Samsung Galaxy has 8" model).  They advertise an operating system of Silk but digging shows Android 2.3; all I know is that it operates smoothly and nothing like other tablets running Android operating systems.  Smooth touch system and screen keyboard.  I found no issues and am very happy Kindle took this direction since switching between Apple and Kindle devices proved frustrating (I'd swipe at the screen automatically and as much as I love my Kindle, it always made it seem archaic with button controls).  It seamlessly provides my Amazon MP3 player, Amazon-on-Demand videos, Netflix, Kindle books, Facebook, Android apps (games) and plenty of cool additions.  My sons really like the comic book option!  It also allows easy import of iTune material.  Yes, the Kindle Fire is Amazon centric just like iDevices are with Apple but at least Amazon is more open and allows non-Amazon material.  Given a choice, I'd pick my music, book and video libraries from Amazon every time over iTunes.  As it is new, I need to test the battery and will provide an update after more usage. Although I will note being unhappy with this charging plug being different from other Kindle devices which were interchangeable.I am less pleased with the fact it only offers wi-fi connectivity, 8 GB option only; and the micro usb port instead of a standard usb port.  I understand the economics behind wi-fi only but it makes this tablet less useful when traveling outside the home and could involve usage fees.  Secondly, Amazon Cloud helps expand storage but at a price.  Offering the first 5GB free (with more available at a reasonable price) and have all Amazon purchases stored free helps but what if Amazon Cloud goes down?  Good luck getting access then and 8 GB fills up quick if you are storing books on Kindle, your Amazon MP3 collection, games and any videos, magazines, etc.  Lastly, having a micro usb port means carrying around an extra cable for use with standard usb ports.  Seriously, who wants to carry around more cables?  which makes this connectivity less useful.  Overall, these are minor when compared to the services and options provided for $199.I am happy with this purchase.  Nothing else on the market can compare to this media based tablet for $199!  And I have tried more than a few.  I wish Amazon wasn't so crafty with their creation of a devise that does not replace either the Kindle or the iPad but the low price point makes it easy to swallow.  If I had to choose just one tablet, I'd lean toward a wi-fi and 3G device but at $199 with no monthly fees, it will appeal to many as the tablet to own.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

34 of 40 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm fired up!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;azog-See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've deliberately avoided reading reviews on the Fire, because the one review (a "trusted name", someone who should know better) I read constantly compared the Fire to the iPad. I know it's not an iPad. I don't have, nor did I ever want, an iPad, and such comparisons are ultimately meaningless. I did not want to find myself being swayed by other people's opinions in matters which have no bearing.This is my first tablet. I've used Android since the original Motorola Droid (currently using a Droid 3), so I'm fairly comfortable with the environment. The Fire is obviously heavily customized to Amazon, but many of the basic navigation tasks and features still apply.I was pondering a Samsung tablet, but once concrete rumors of the Amazon tablet started to surface, I decided to wait. I find no regrets in my decision, as the Fire does what I want a tablet to do. I won't go into gory detail, as I'm sure plenty others have done so.The device is a bit heavy, substantially so. At least it doesn't feel like a toy. Set up was a breeze. Simply turn it on, connect it to my WiFi, and off we go. It took me no more than 60 seconds from turn on until I started to see all my Kindle books showing up. I have the Kindle reader app on my Droid 3, and it's the same app. Since I have a Kindle reader, I will continue to use that for its intended purpose. I'm a heavy reader, so the benefits of the eInk display and battery life of the Kindle reader far outweigh the Fire in that regards.I was initially concerned over the storage, 8gb with no expansion. But then I realized it's not really important. There's not much to store, everything is "in the cloud, man" (I like the concept, but I do hate the phrase).The first thing I did was use my Prime membership to view some videos (the first Star Trek episode, as well as a Chinese military movie, "The Warriors"), and I am pleasantly surprised with the video quality and sound. This was my primary reason for buying the Fire. Amazon has been adding videos for Prime members, and I only hope they continue their progress to acquire more.The screen is very glossy and reflective. It feels like Gorilla glass (not 100% certain on that), but I think I might get a screen protector just to cut back on the glare. Watching a video and seeing my ugly mug in the reflection was a bit of distraction.At the moment, I think I've watched about 4 hours of video. I can't comment on the battery life, but it seemed to be more than 75% remaining at that point. Even so, given my intended usage, if I need to plug it in while watching a video, that is not much of an issue.Connected to my e-mail accounts (disappointed that the official Gmail app doesn't seem to be available), installed a few simple apps. Did some web browsing. All to be as expected, no complaints. Response to screen taps, swipes, etc, was all acceptable with no real lag or sluggishness. I never really found myself "waiting" for an app to acknowledge.In the middle of the home screen is something called the "carousel", which is basically a Rolodex of all your previously used apps, opened books, videos, etc. Unfortunately, it got cluttered pretty fast as I explored my tablet, and there does not seem to be a way to clean it out, or remove something that I'm not interested in seeing on my carousel. There does not seem to be any way to filter, either. I hope Amazon addresses this in a not-so-distant future firmware update.Well, I could go on and on and on, but I won't, and will simply close review by restating my overall satisfaction with the Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

63 of 77 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsLight Bleeding and Ghosting,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;Sara-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiUnfortunately both Kindle Fire's I purchased suffered from severe light bleeding and image ghosting/burn in out of the box.  Must be some quality control issues with this product for both to have this issue on day one, hopefully the replacements will work better.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

23 of 26 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAre You Not Entertained?,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;Philip R. Heath "Gadgets, Music, &amp; Books"(DFW)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Design:  4 StarsFeatures:  4 StarsPerformance:  4 StarsThe Good:* Highly Portable* User Friendly Design* Access to Lots of (Amazon) Content* Exclusive Special Edition Magazines* Strong SpeakersThe Bad:* Occasional Sluggish Responses* Sometimes Touches Don't Register* Few Good Cases (so far)Overall:  The Kindle Fire is a very good device for information consumption and entertainment.  Enterprise users, however, would be better served by one of the many Honeycomb tables available.By now you've probably heard plenty about the Kindle Fire, but I'm to try to give you a balanced breakdown of the user experience.  First and foremost I should establish who the target user of is.  I believe that many of the frustrated owners are those who expected something more than the Kindle Fire has to offer.  It is not a laptop replacement.  It is not an iPad or an iPad killer.  It is really not even the original 7" Galaxy Tab.  Each of these devices is more full featured and diverse.  The target user of the Kindle Fire wants to consume information and be entertained.  If you are looking for anything outside of these two broad categories, the Kindle Fire is not for you.  However those who are still interested should read on.The good thing about the Kindle Fire is that it starts simple and stays that way.  I bought my own so my account came pre-configured on the device.  I plugged in the device to charge it using the included charger, and I configured my wireless information.  There was already a software update which applied automatically and rebooted the device.  After that I was off to the races.The interface of the Kindle Fire is a highly customized version of Android 2.3 (Gingerbread).  If you have other Android devices, you will hardly recognize the interface, but that is not a bad thing.  Below the global search box the menus across the top give you access to Newsstand, Books, Music, Video, Docs, Apps, and Web. This box takes up about an inch of the display.  About half is used by the Carousel - it is essentially a history of the things you have accessed.  I didn't get this at first, but this serves as a psuedo-app switching feature as well.  If you are in a task, press the home button and scroll through the Carousel to find what you want to switch to.  The remainder of the home screen is a shelf for favorites.  It comes with some apps already selected, but long pressing these brings up a menu that allows you to delete the ones you don't want there.The Newsstand will contain items (newspapers and magazines) familiar to previous Kindle owners, but there's something new - Kindle Fire editions of a subset of magazines.  I opted to give Revolver a try, and I found the experience to be pleasant.  One of the things I didn't like about magazines on previous Kindles was the overly simplified format required by the device.  With Revolver I had an interface that let me scroll page by page through the magazine allowing for full experience with pictures and layout just like the physical magazine.  However this view does not lend itself to reading.  No worries, just tap the screen and you can switch from Page View to Text View.  This gives more of a traditional Kindle view the first article on the page along with pictures.  You can continue to traverse the magazine in the mode or switch back to Page View to flip pages.  Text View does skip pages that are full page ads - so may like this feature.  What's nice is that the Kindle Fire manages to be all things to all people with these exclusive edition magazines.  I hope to see newspapers in this format soon.The Kindle family has historically earned their keep with access to Books, and the Fire is no different.  There's not a lot to say about this feature.  If you've used the Kindle for Android app, you will find the experience very familiar.  If reading is your primary (or only) use, you probably want one of the e-ink based Kindles.  The Fire is not as easy on the eyes, and it is not going to work as well in bright (read out in sun) conditions.  This is not an issue for me.  I found Agile Testing to be very readable even with its charts and diagrams.  The discount and portability make all Kindles a win over regular books.One of the areas the Kindle does well is music.  In addition to free storage for content purchased on Amazon, I had 5 GB of storage available to upload music from my library.  If this becomes cramped, there is an option to upgrade to 20 GB for a reasonable price.  Everything I had previously purchased from the Amazon mp3 Store was automatically in the "Cloud" section of my library.  The music player has standard features of Playlists, along with Artists, Albums, and Songs organization of your music.  You have the option of downloading music to the device.  I would do this for plane trips or other times when I don't have Wi-Fi access.  Like all of the Amazon content sections you have access to the "Store" in addition to your "Library".  It is easy (almost too easy) to impulse buy music.  In addition to content and a good UI, you will also have access to good sound on playback.  This comes from both the strong speakers which are clear and loud and headphones.  I used my Ultimate Ears Metro-Fi 220 headphones, and I found the music playback to be outstanding - especially considering that it is streaming.Video is another area where the Kindle Fire does well.  It is the Amazon Instant Video equivalent of the Music feature.  Playback is really good.  Breaking Bad looked great, and the audio track was in sync with the picture.  It does seem to have an initial buffering issue, and it pauses once about 10 seconds in.  However that is the only glitch I've experienced.  My video use is not as heavy as my music use, but it meets all of my expectations.Docs are really not a feature that is important to me, and I have little to say about it.The Apps section gives you access to the Amazon Android App Store.  I also have a Droid X and have been using the App Store since day one.  All of my apps that Amazon has verified for the Kindle Fire all appear in the "Cloud" section of my "Library".  I installed Netflix, ESPN Score Center, Angry Birds Rio, and Seesmic without issue.  All behave properly as I have experienced them on my Droid.  For some reason I was unable to get UberSocial to install.  I have not tried again since the first day since I am happy with Seesmic as an alternative.  Through the Kindle Fire I was also introduced to the Pulse app.  It is a tile based RSS style reader.  I moved my more news oriented Twitter Friends over here and cleaned up my timeline.  Some may say that the app selection is too limited, but I think that it has plenty to offer for its target audience.Last but not least we have the Web menu.  This launches your last session of Silk.  It is a tabbed browser, but it does not have plug-ins like Firefox, Chrome, or even Dolphin (familiar to experienced Android users).  It gives a good browsing experience, but I have not noticed a big speed boost from its split cloud architecture.  If you are concerned about privacy issues with the cloud, it is very easy to go into the settings menu and turn this feature off.  Then you are back to a direct browser to site experience as you would have on any other device.  Full sites are fairly readable without zooming in landscape mode.  You has have tap to zoom functionality as well should you need a larger view.  The experience is adequate, but I don't think it lives up to the hype - yet.  In theory, Amazon will begin getting pages cashed in the cloud as more users surf on their Kindle Fire.  The jury is still out.I'll finish with some miscellaneous items.  I experienced no issues with multitasking.  The Kindle Fire can easily handle streaming music while surfing the web or reading my Twitter timeline.  There are two performance annoyances that I have experienced.  Sometimes a swipe (turning a page in a book, etc.) is sluggish.  While it doesn't ruin my enjoyment, I'd rather it didn't happen.  Second there are occasions when the Kindle Fire does not recognize a touch selection.  I can't explain it.  There is no rhyme or reason for it, but it is infrequent.  Again this is not enough to ruin the experience, but I would rather do without it altogether.  As a final not (and as of this writing) there are few choices that I like among the cases designed for the Kindle Fire.  I am actually using theTargus Truss Case/Stand for BlackBerry PlayBookinstead, and it works great (see my review).I know this was long, but I wanted to be complete.  If there is anything that I have not covered, please ask below in the comments.  I highly recommend the Kindle Fire.  It is a great deal for its intended use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

23 of 26 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire's a Big Winner Over Nook Color, Kindle 3 (keyboard),November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Roxanne Mchenry "eBook Publishing Expert, Wri...(Montana)  -See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've owned a Kindle 3 (keyboard) since August 2010, a Nook Color since May 2011 and now the Kindle Fire. Since I already had a Kindle and Nook Color, I debated whether I should spend the money on the Kindle Fire. I think each device has a distinct advantage in one aspect, but the Kindle Fire is already the overall winner after running it through the paces just today.Kindle FireDistinct Advantage -- a media device that works seamlessly with Amazon's book, video, MP3 and app offerings.Pros: The device looks clean and simple. Once I turned it on, I was able to use it right out of the box. Some reviewers had trouble with the carousel (icons of the last media viewed that you can scroll through). It moves faster/slower smoothly and I had no trouble stopping it on a specific item.The screen has this wonderful smooth, slippery surface that's missing from the Nook Color. It's bright, clear and feels great as I navigate with my fingers.I find my wrist gets tired within 5-10 minutes when I hold the Nook Color up using one hand. I didn't have that issue with the Kindle Fire. It feels more balanced in my hand.The apps I'd used on my smartphone, like Angry Birds and All Recipes, are better than ever on the 7-inch screen.Shopping for new ebooks in the Kindle Store is a new experience. I noticed Amazon highlights books that will view beautifully on the Fire over the B&W; Kindle screen such as comics and children's books. The categories also highlight the new Kindle Lending bookstore. If you scroll down the main Kindle shopping page, the top 100 Free ebooks are near the bottom. The Kindle Fire Kindle store is mainly about bestsellers, suggested books, tablet-friendly books and category book browsing.A BIG PLUS was watching video online on sites like You Tube or any site that has flash videos. It's hand down better than the Nook Color web experience, esp. with video (see more below).Cons: I didn't find much not to like. I wish this device had a microphone or at least offer a bluetooth option. I use an app on my cell that requires a mike for voice recording, a no-go on this tablet.There is no text-to-speech feature for books that is a killer app on previous Kindles. I am disappointed it's missing and I hope Amazon considers adding it back.A big surprise to me was that all the kindle 3 Games that I've purchased by Amazon Digital Services (and Others) such as Every Word do not even appear on my Kindle Fire bookshelf -- and they won't work because of the lack of navigation buttons that are on the Kindle 3. I don't want the navigation buttons--not at all--but I probably won't be buying more games on my old Kindle 3 since it's stuck on that device. Anyway, the game apps for Kindle Fire blow the socks off the Kindle 3's limited game play.Kindle 3I'm still using my Kindle 3 (3G) almost every single day.Distinct Advantage: I work on the computer all day so I find the eInk is very easy on my eyes after looking at a backlit screen.In the car or at the lake in the summer, the Kindle 3 can't be beat.I'm concerned that the Kindle Fire won't have enough content to cover a day traveling where I don't have wifi. That's never been a problem with my Kindle 3. I have over 150 books on there, and I can get more via 3G almost anywhere.As a reading device, it's the most booklike and the easiest on the eyes.Cons: Kindle 3 is not a multi-media device. As I mentioned the games made for Kindle 3 have noticeable limitations.You can surf the internet on the Kindle 3, but it's not a good experience at all. Comparing Kindle 3 web to the Kindle Fire is not even apples and oranges.Nook ColorI was pretty excited when I got the Nook Color with the hopes for something more like a tablet-slash-ereader.Distinct advantage: Being able to buy B&N;'s books and also to view ePub ebooks you load to the Nook.However, B&N;'s interface is heavy-handed and all the advantages of a potential reader tablet isn't there. I finally hacked my Nook to get the apps and Android functionality I wanted, but it was still clunky and when B&N; updated the Nook software I was back to square one. Argh.B&N; added apps last summer, but the selection is ridiculously limited and apps that are free everywhere else, isn't free via the Nook. I can't get apps from the Google or Amazon's markets.I can use the Nook Color for surfing and viewing magazines is a decent experience (similar on the Fire). But the Kindle Fire web surfing is much smoother/faster than the Nook. I watched Project Runway on a Chinese site called Tudou on the Nook Color but only with lagging video and unclear video. On the Kindle Fire, the same videos on Tudou were perfect, clear and ran smooth -- as good as on my new PC. Wow.I don't know about the new Nook Tablet, but I can say the Kindle Fire beats the Nook Color for books, video, music, apps and web--no questions asked.The bottom line is I'm better than happy with the Kindle Fire. I expect to keep using the Kindle 3 for reading in certain situations and I'll no longer be fighting my kids for the Nook Color (they love it). I hope to God they don't find my new Kindle Fire anytime soon.::UPDATE:: My kids finally got to see the Kindle Fire -- the reaction? _Forget_ the Nook Color, I want one of those! SOOOO -- I put the Nook Color up for sale and it SOLD on eBay. I'm selling one more item to cover the cost of buying ANOTHER Kindle Fire for my teenage son as an early Christmas gift.BTW, I'll be getting him an Amazon gift card so I can set up his own Amazon account but without a credit card. He's old enough to take responsibility for these kinds of things and I will monitor his usage like I already do for other devices.My elementary age son tried the Kindle Fire and loves it (Mom, I want one!) but he has other devices for now (although I did consider it for a moment). I'd have to manage the Amazon account for him and I am concerned about him dropping or damaging the tablet.As for myself, I love using it more and more. I got a stand to hold my KF while I'm cooking for reading recipes or watching a video while I cook. The combo of books, apps, web and video is so good I find myself thinking about going to bed early (who cares about staying up to watch TV?).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

41 of 49 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGood, but not for me.,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Theodore Taylor "theodore3"(Washington, DC)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I kept the Kindle Fire for about a week before exchanging it for another Android tablet. A few things lead to that decision. First, the absence of the Google Market and incompatibility with standard Google apps like Youtube or Google Reader was frustrating. Having to sideload apps missing from the Amazon app store become a chore. The lack of hardware controls like volume control or a home button made it a bit more difficult to navigate. While somewhat nitpicky, the lack of customization (such as lock screen background images) bothered me.There were positives. The design of the tablet is solid and clean. I appreciated the ability to install Go Launcher EX if I didn't always want to use Amazon's launcher. Amazon's launcher (the shelf) was easy to navigate and well integrated with Amazon's services. The overall interface was clean and well-designed.I think the Fire is a great deal for the price and good for someone who is dedicated to Amazon's services. It just didn't offer the amount of freedom I wanted in an Android-based tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE my Kindle Fire!,February 29, 2012By&nbsp;ceb111481 "ceb111481"(Fairfax)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I took my Kindle Fire out of the box and I had a hard time putting it down.  This is a fantastic device.  The screen is a good size and has great picture, very clear and bright.  Plenty of apps are available and access to all of Amazon's digital content at your fingertips.  If you keep music in your cloud drive, you can listen to it on the Kindle Fire whenever you are in a place that has a wi-fi connection.  Also Amazon Prime members get unlimited streaming of thousands of TV shows and such.  In addition to all the books available for purchase there are hundreds of free ones, I check out the free books every day to see what new ones they have put up.  My Kindle Fire goes everywhere I go, I don't know how I lived without it for so long.The one and only thing I wish it had: removable SD storage, but honestly, everything else about the device is wonderful so I find that I don't really mind that much.  But it would be a nice little add-on.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

25 of 29 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIf iPad=Escalade, Kindle Fire=Taurus. And more folks drive Tauruses.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;TechTester "TechTester"(NY)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)INITIAL IMPRESSIONS, IN FITS AND STARTS:First-five-minutes impression: FAIL. Initialization is twitchy. Many system fonts too damn small, use of low-contrast gray fonts on black background in places. Twitchy touchscreen. Twitchy screen paints at times. Perhaps an impending OS update will help? WiFi connect ...did go smoothly.* * *Web browsing is alright, sometimes almost zippy (must be that cloud caching). Youtube videos seem to stream just fine, even audio is a decent volume. Flash seems to work just fine.Screen rotate snaps 90 degrees as you rotate device, does not happen fluidly. Pinch-to-stretch / pinch-to-shrink is animated but stuttery. A simple button touch does not always seem to register. Maybe it's my big manly fingers.On/off button, located in the center of the rim of one of the shorter sides, is annoyingly easy to hit by accident.* * *Kindle Fire gives you a deeper appreciation of the finesse of the iPad. Then again, for 1/3 the price, maybe it's not bad. Reminds me of renting an Escalade, then switching to a Taurus. At first you're keenly aware of the downgrade, but as you drive it more, it seems just fine.* * *OK, I've loaded a few free apps. Gameplay is quite swell, very good responsive touch, graphics and audio. This makes me now think that there may be software problems related to the touch, since in some system-places it is consistently dodgy.* * *THE VERDICT: I retract my earlier first impression of FAIL.Many folks -- especially those like me who are spoiled by their slick iPads -- will initially declare the Kindle Fire a fail. However, after getting adapted to it just a bit, and learning to not expect iPad behaviors, I now think Amazon has created a winner. I think the $200 price, compared to the iPad 2's $600+, will make the Fire a success. The synergies they are creating between the Fire, their cloud, their AppStore and Amazon Prime for media, are all going to be key.The iPad is an Escalade while the Kindle Fire is a Taurus. I think there are more people driving Tauruses than Escalades.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

65 of 80 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsToo sluggish &amp; can't uninstall Facebook &amp; other third party apps,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;KindlePad(USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am trying to like the Fire, but its unacceptable to have to press a button 3 times to get it to respond or swipe a page 3-4 times to get the page to turn.Also, I was trying to delete Facebook, IMDB and other apps and could not. I spoke with a CS who said those apps are permanently installed and can't be deleted. Frankly I think that stinks. On a device I paid full price for, I should be able to decide which third party apps reside or not - not Amazon or Facebook.Also, and this is very odd. Amazon makes a lot of press about this being a Cloud device, but you can't directly access your amazon cloud drive from the Fire. That's right - that's not a mistake. I also asked that of the CS. They said if you want to access docs on your amazon cloud drive, you should email them to your Fire. Email them... to a cloud device. That's supposed to be a hugely wifi connected device. I had to ask them the questions several times to make there were understanding me.Why are these important? Won't they be patched soon?You can't assume that will be the case. With the regular e-ink Kindles, software updates were very few and far between. We users waited years for "collections". It's very possible - like many other android devices - that we will never see a substantial update to this first gen Kindle Fire. It's possible that only future Kindle Fire's will get a better, faster OS and not this first gen.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (10)

15 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt does what was intended very well.,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;William A. Nolan "freeholder"(Willcox, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Way too many reviews have tried to compare the Fire to the Ipad.  Silly.  The Fire was never intended nor marketed as a competitor to the Ipad.  Think about the differences between the two companies.  Apple mainly sells hardware, and has now entered the content market.  Amazon mainly sells content.  Remember that Amazon started out as a bookstore.  Other products came later.  The Fire is a Kindle.  It's right in the name.  "Kindle Fire"  It isn't designed, intended, or marketed as a tablet computer.  It is a simple device intended to access content, and mainly Amazon.com content.If you mainly want to read books, then one of the other Kindles would be a better choice.  Their e-ink screens are a bit easier on the eyes, and the battery life is way better.  You can read books on your Fire just fine, although bright sunlight may be an issue, as it is with any backlit device.  Hard for a few LEDs to compete with the sun!  However, the Fire really shines when you want to watch video.  Music is fine, too, but my smartphone will play music.  If you are near a WiFi hotspot, you can stream the video, and if you have Prime, there are thousands free.  If you own a video, you can download it to the Fire and watch it even if you aren't near a hotspot.Some have complained about the Fire having limited memory.  Remember, it isn't intended to be a computer.  It will store maybe 15 or 20 hours of video.  I don't know about your life, but I am VERY unlikely to ever watch 15 or 20 hours of video without being near a hotspot.  8 movies means at least 2 or 3 days before I'm through them, and hotspots aren't that rare.  Traveling?  Pretty much every hotel, motel, Starbucks, and fast food place has WiFi.  While you have coffee or lunch you can delete the watched films and download a new batch.  Amazon stores them all for you.  Same with books.  We've had Kindles since the very first one came out, and we own a LOT of books.  No need to keep them all on our device.  We download them as needed.  If we want to read one again, it takes a minute or so to retrieve it.The screen on the Kindle is VERY sharp and clear, with an excellent viewing angle.  Easy for two or three to watch.  Clear text is easy to read, the browser works well, and Internet pages look good.  Most all Android apps I have tried work fine.  Some have complained about the location of the power button, but it hasn't been any problem for me.  It probably depends upon how you hold it.  I find the interface easy to use, but I do use a Droid phone, so I was familiar with the Android OS.  In the interest of full disclosure I should also mention that I have taught computer science at the college level for 30+ years, so I am kind of a geek.I don't want to give the wrong impression.  I read books on the Fire frequently.  I'm just saying that if you want to read for hours at a time, especially outside, a regular Kindle would be a little better.  I have both.All in all, the Fire is an excellent product that does what it is supposed to do very well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

15 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhat do you want to use the Kindle Fire for is the question?,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;girlpelican(Arnold, MO)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire because I think all the cell phones are overrated for the price you have to pay for them.  I got tired of my cell phone dying, I just needed a phone to talk and another device to do all the other stuff.  So now when we are out and about running errands my son is playing games on the Kindle Fire and my cell phone battery is not being drained.  My husband and I had the greatest night out to dinner for the first time.  Our son played the dinosaur flash cards on the Kindle the entire time.  The children's books cost too much money, I was shocked.  For Brown Bear it is 12.99.  The graphics are neat but that is way too much money for childrens books.  They run from 1.99 to about 24.99.  The free streaming movies on Amazon Prime is awesome.  My son has already watched Jetsons the Movie and Barney's First Christmas; without even charging the battery.  All the apps you can download are awesome, they are the same apps you can get on android but bigger screen.  The touch screen is very good, probably not the best but I was surprised how accruate.  I have been on Facebook and e-mail....works great!  I have purchsed from the Oriental Trading Company and Overstock with no issues.  I am unsure why people have been saying web surfing is slow, I have not found that to be true.  I love the borrow book, 1 a month on Amazon Prime.  I am half way through my first book already.  I do like the E-ink reader better on the old kindle but glad to sacrafice that to have the bright screen for other things.  You can change the background to a vanilla color on the books and that has helped me.  I wish it had the 3G like the Kindle DX, the Kindle Fire says it comes with the Whispernet but I haven't figured that out yet.  There is only 6.5 GB on the device storage but the cloud is unlimited, I can't see me even coming close to that anyway.  I don't really have much from my computer I will put out on it anyway.  Yes, it does not take pictures or video.  There are so many other things that do that so I don't really care.  To me, I am breaking out my Canon anyway because if I am going to take pictures or video I want quality.  I don't need those instant post to Facebook, just use your cell phone for that.  To me the Kindle Fire has a lot to offer and I like amazons products so I don't mind being locked into them and the thought of them coming out with a cell phone in 2012 is really exciting because then I would have access to all the stuff on the cloud.  The power cord that comes with it is about 2 feet long and not good quality.  I have not upgraded because my cell phone USB power cord works just fine.  All this just depends on what you are going to use it for and what you really want.  The Ipad for me was too expensive and I knew that I wouldn't use half of what it could do.  So the bottom line for me is the Kindle Fire is AWESOME!  The only really down side for me is getting it away from my son.  He has asked for it for Christmas instead of the Nintendo DSI XL.  I haven't checked out to see if we can share the cloud and so forth so that is next on my list!  Hope this helps anybody on the fence about it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

15 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat, small tablet. Easy to use and nearly the same possibilities as the iPad.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Thomas M. Mcdonnell(Olivia, MN USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire yesterday and had it updated, registered and usable within five minutes. So far I've used it to read a couple chapters of a book, look through the Kindle Fire user guide briefly, played some Angry Birds, poked around in Quick Office, browsed Amazon and my ESPN fantasy football website and setup a couple of different email accounts.So far everything has worked basically the same as it would on my iPad. The organization is different, but straight-forward and easy to figure out. The one thing so far that is a bit frustrating is there is no way to just randomly play music from your collection. You have to specifically setup playlists, which again isn't difficult, but is a little bit annoying as I'm they type of person that just wants to hit play and hear music. On the other hand, I didn't buy this device to listen to music on a regular basis, so it's not that big of a deal.I find the eBook functionality a bit friendlier and easier on the eyes than iBooks on the iPad. The "pages" are obviously smaller than the larger screen on the iPad, but the device is also smaller and lighter to hold. I also like that on the Kindle Fire I have the option of choosing a different background color when reading my eBooks either white, cream or black background. I found the cream background with black text to be a good combination.As far as App availability, I've found most all of the apps and games that I use on my iPad are also available for the Kindle Fire from the Amazon App Store with the exception of Civilization Revolution. The selection isn't nearly as large as the Apple App Store or the Android Marketplace, but there are a ton of apps listed in both of those places that aren't worth the trouble of downloading.Bottom line, so far I'm am happy with the Kindle Fire, at this point I think I'll use it mainly for eBook reading, casual game play and the iPad will get used for certain games, taking notes during meetings, and apps where the larger screen comes into play.I'll update this review after I've used the device more and have more feedback to offer.NOTE: just read some of the other reviews which mention trouble connecting to WiFi, I've connected to it to two different secured WiFi networks (one 802.11n and one 802.11g) so far and had no problems with either one. The Kindle Fire connected to both networks in a matter of seconds and also reconnected automatically to my home WiFi network when I got back home. That's not to say that other people aren't having trouble, but perhaps it was more an issue of weak signal strength or other issues with the network.I've not had any issues when downloading apps, music or eBooks from my Cloud Drive, either pre-purchased material or new purchases.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

15 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet at a great price!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Tech Man-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been looking for a device like this for a while now and finally found what I was looking for in a tablet.  I wanted it to be wireless, stream Netflix and Amazon Prime videos, have access to my music, check my email and browse the Internet.  The Kindle Fire does all of those things and more.  I love that it also has access to advanced apps that I can use for work like RDP.  It goes with me everywhere.  My kids love playing Angry Birds and other games on it that can keep them occupied when need be.As for the missing stuff like cameras, gps &amp; bluetooth.  My phone has cameras and a gps and I don't ever use the Fire for typing large documents so a bluetooth keyboard isn't necessary.  It's compact, light and very easy to carry and use without fatigue.  Love it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

22 of 25 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starswish it was better,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;turner02(SF, Ca)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)5 things to improve upon:1.  Touch interface is laggy, jerky, and unresponsive.  This isn't all the time.  Most of the time, it works like you would expect.  However, sometimes it just stutters.  I would have to tap on an icon multiple times to get it to respond.2.  On the home screen, there is something called the carousel.  This displays a history of all the things that you have clicked on and/or opened in the past such as apps/websites/books/magazine...etc.  There is no way of deleting this history.  So, if you have been looking at a website/book that is somewhat private then it is there for whoever picks up the device to see.3.  During the initial setup process, Amazon forces you to agree to "1 click" setting.  This is silly, because you could inadvertently click on the "buy it now" button.  Imagine giving the device to a child to play with.  You could potentially end up with a TV that you didn't order....well, this may not be a bad thing.4.  The ecosystem seems too closed.  Even more so than apple.  It feels as if I don't own the device.5.  No physical volume buttons.  I didn't think that this would bother me, but after trying out the device for a couple of hours, I got tired of going into the menu and clicking and dragging.  Physical volume buttons are a must.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

22 of 25 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEasy setup, does what it advertised to do, very good value for $199,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;WendyT(Kent, Ohio, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Fire about two hours ago.  During that time, I have installed several apps, set up my Exchange Server email account, downloaded several books from my Kindle library, and tested the Amazon Prime Instant Videos on it (along with Netflx.)  I have to say that this Fire does exactly what it is advertised to do -- it delivers content well.  I like the display of videos on it. Integration with Amazon (music, books, videos) is seamless..very smooth.Setup was a breeze, although you do need to wait a few minutes for it to update itself once you power it on and walk through the initial setup.  It recognized my home network without a hitch.For the $199 price, this mini-tablet is a good deal.  Of course it will not do everything that my Xoom or my iPad does -- but both of those devices came with much higher price tags.In summary -- easy setup, easy use, great value!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIn Love!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Jessica Ranavaya-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Im going skeet shooting with my old tablet.  I cannot stop playing with my new Fire.  Im in love.  My old no name tablet was such a piece of junk compared to this.  I paid $199 for my old tablet too and could not watch videos, everything was sd based, the video was garbage when I did get it to play something, it was slow, and no apps were compatible. I ended up never using the thing because it would make me so mad.  I cant see myself paying $600 for a base model iPad either so thats my thoughts on iPad.This Fire came preloaded with my amazon acct so all my books were there out of the box.  I pre-ordered mine. I liked that amazon sent me the link to my cloud so I could upload my music, pics, etc whatever I wanted on the Fire, and was ready to go out the box.  Since the Fire is new to Amazon I was honestly hoping for the best but expecting the worst.  I couldn't be happier.The web is fast, the processing is fast, the keyboard is great and responsive. Its light, easy to hold, good screen size. Very user friendly.  The cloud is very easy to manage. Syncing is easy.  The color is beautiful. I can finally play Angry Birds! I can load documents for meetings. Reading books is great on it, like the personalization options. Its just all around fun.  I have never owned Kindle before so I was nervous about figuring out how to use it, its very user friendly.  Im still finding things that it can do. It comes with a power cord of course but not a cord to connect it to your computer but really you dont need it.  You can upload or email documents straight to the cloud, same with pics, music etc. and it just appears on your Kindle when its done uploading.I cant think of anything I dont like about this Kindle.  Maybe if I wanted to be "that person" I dont like how expensive covers are for it because its new...whaaa. Luckily the sleeve for my old tablet fits it nice.  My old tablet is about to be destroyed office space style so it wont be needing it anyways.  Hope this helps.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA Good, If Not Great, Device,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Avid Reader(Willow Springs, MO United States)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I went into this purchase with an open mind.  Unlike some of the 1-star reviewers I never expected the Kindle Fire to be an iPad "killer" or even an iPad replacement.  Amazon was pretty much upfront about what this device is meant to be, which is a device designed to consume mostly Amazon content.  When you look at the Kindle Fire from this perspective it's a good device.  I've used all aspects of the device -- books, newsstand, apps, music, video, and web -- and each of them has their positives and negatives.BOOKS:  there's not really a lot that could go wrong with a built-in e-reader especially when Amazon has had the same type of reader app on several other devices already.NEWSSTAND: This is one of the downsides of the Kindle Fire.  I've downloaded a couple of magazines and found the experience less than enjoyable, but I also haven't found it to be much better on the iPad.  I doubt I will find much use for this option.APPS:  I already had several apps purchased previously on my Android phone and all of them were available and ready to use when I took the Kindle out of the box.  Right now, Amazon's Appstore is a little lean on good apps, but that will change in time.MUSIC:  I made the switch to Amazon Music and Cloud Player several months ago when I purchased by first Android phone so I already had by cloud drive full of /music.  From minute one all of my songs were available to listen to over a WiFi connection with Cloud Player.  The Amazon music selection isn't as large as iTunes but it's a rare occasion when I can't find something I want and as long as the iTunes song isn't DRM I can upload it to the Cloud Drive.VIDEO:  A minor hiccup here.  My home internet connection is 1.5Mbps and it seems like neither the video player nor Netflix will work with it on Kindle Fire, yet when I have a faster connection -- at least double my home connection -- they work just fine.  This is a bit of letdown for me but I can live with it.WEB:  Now here is one of the bigger negatives so far.  My experience with Amazon Silk has not been all that great.  Pages that load almost instantly on the iPad take much longer with Silk.  Based on other reviews I've read Amazon is saying this will get better as more people use the app, but considering the hype surrounding Amazon Silk this is a big negative for me.All that said, I have to say I'm mostly happy with the Kindle Fire.  If you go into this knowing what you're buying I'd say most buyers would be happy, as well.UPDATE 11/19/2011:  So I've been using the Kindle Fire almost nonstop since I got it.  I've encountered none of the issues that so many 1-star reviewers are writing about.  I had no problem updating to the 6.1 software and zero problems with wireless connectivity.  In fact, I've connected the Fire to my home wireless, work wireless, a university wireless, and two mobile hot spots with zero difficulty.  I'm also getting very good speeds (at least according to Speedtest.net). I also don't get the issue with weight.  Unless you have problems with your hands due to a disease or an accident I can't see how it's too heavy to hold in one hand.Due to the problems stated above with web browsing (better, but still clunky) and magazines I can't change my 4-star rating, but if I could give it 4.5 stars I would.  For the price of $200 this is a great little device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

21 of 24 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKINDLE FIRE ROCKS,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;3dogs1cat "3dogs1cat"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First and foremost, Amazon could have charged a lot more for this INCREDIBLE piece of technology. I own an iPad and the Kindle Fire could be the baby version to the iPad. Visually the screen is so clear and crisp. There are many features to discover. When your 1st start it up Amazon will download the latest software and then install the software. It takes about 5 minutes. You will go thru the process of setting up the time zone etc. It instantly recognized my router. I typed in the pass word and I was online. It took about 30 seconds. I downloaded the Netflix app. OMG, the movies look and sound great. The volume is not as loud as an iPad but it is sufficient. The free Prime membership movies look great! All of my books were already downloaded. There are many different fonts and viewing methods for reading a book. At the top of the home screen press the "sun looking" icon --- this is where you control volume,brightness, turning on wi-fi, sync and more. I only played with it for 15 minutes and currently it is charging. On the home screen is the word "Docs" go there and there is the guide to use the KF. From fresh start up until it downloads a website---- it's about 30 seconds.  If you can afford  $200 BUY IT!!!!!!!! As I stated in the beginning Amazon could have charged much more. I think APPLE SHOULD BE SCARED --- this is NOT an iPad killer but it comes real close.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's silly not to buy a Kindle Fire,April 21, 2012By&nbsp;Mark(Idaho, USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had been looking for a pad for a while to use in my house for quite sometime.  I thought it would be good to use it in the kitchen to browse recipes, in the living room to browse or relax with a movie, or read a book before bedtime.  The Kindle Fire does all of these and more.  The email application is very good, although if you sync too much, Amazon blocks you.  So if you are an extremely busy person with emails flying in and out, you'll have a problem with the fire.  But if you simply sync once or twice an hour, that's no problem. The email application works well with my Yahoo account AND with my MSN account. Yep, you can sync with multiple accounts on the same email app.  I don't know why amazon doesn't make that a feature of their menu instead of an embedded app is a mystery to me, but it works good, really really good! I give the Email App an "A-".The photo application is good.  The best way to use it is to email yourself a photo and use the email app to download it to your Fire.  Once the photo is saved to memory, the photo app will automatically read the photo.  So far I haven't figured out a way to make folders or categorize the photos, but the app is fine. I give the Photo app a "B".  It would be nice to see a Flickr app for the fire that would solve that problem, although you'd need a Wifi connection which isn't always available.Of course the movie application is embedded in the fire, and its simply amazing.  If you like movies, the fire is totally for you!  I am a movie buff, and the Fire satisfies me in every way. Purchase movies on-line, see the movies on your fire with streaming capability, or simply download them to your Fire when you are out of WiFi range.  On my lunch breaks at work, I watch movies and everyone is always looking over my shoulder to sneak a peek.  The movies play very smoothly, there is no jitter, freezing or skips when playing a movie from memory.  I'll give it an "A+" on the movie application.  In fact, you may be tempted to toss your Netflix membership for the Amazon Prime membership as I have done.  HOWEVER, realize that streaming movies to your home computer or your streaming capable TV from Netflix is not nearly the same experience as streaming from Amazon.  I have a 12 meg connection and I have never had a problem streaming a movie from Netflix.  I have freezes, stops, and more issues regularly on Amazon.  It appears that they have a server capacity issue with popular movies, which can be frustrating.  My hope is that Amazon will put a little more attention into the TV and Computer movie apps as it has done with the Kindle Fire movie application.The embedded music application is good.  Its shows titles, artists and albums.  It would be  nice to see an equalizer function, but the sound reproduced with an optional set of ear buds is quite good and plenty loud.  I give the embedded music application an "A".The embedded Internal Web Browser is fine.  The touch screen is just about the smallest it can possibly be, and still be functional, when using your finger as a point and click mouse.  Everything else on the browser is functional but nothing to write home about.  You'll gravitate to apps rather than browsing for this reason, but thank goodness there are plenty of apps. I give the browser a "B+"Hardware:  The internal speakers are poor, sometimes I can't even hear them and really, there isn't much point in actually having them there since I can't hear them.  I give the internal speakers an "F".  Get yourself a decent set of headphones or ear buds and you'll be fine.  The Fire's operating system crashes about once a month I give that a "C".  Its easy to reset, not really a problem.  The touchscreen is not perfect, it doesn't always read your finger, and with no optional keyboard currently available, well that's a little silly.  But, its not a huge issue, I just usually leave the application, re-enter and it reads my finger fine on the second try.  I only run across this problem once a week.  I give the on-screen touch capability of a "B".  The screen picture however is an "A".  The case of the Fire is a work of art, I give it an "A+".Optional Applications:  There is a vast array of apps.  And yes, there is a really good one for Spreadsheets and Word Documents.  There are applications for magazines, some really good, some just plain lame.  I absolutely love the USA Today application and highly recommend it.  Also The Weather Channel has a decent app. The Facebook app is crap.  It's not correctly configured for the screen size of the Fire and the programmer of it should be put out to pasture.  You'll find it so frustrating that you'll simply use your computer or even an app on your streaming TV would be leaps and bounds above the Kindle Fire Facebook app. The Facebook app gets an "F".  However I will give the availability of apps a "B" overall.Accessories for the Fire:  When I first got my Fire about 4 months ago, there were only a few covers for it, and even fewer on Amazon!  I did end up with an awesome leather cover that also serves as a stand.  I also found a really nice neoprene zipper top cover when I take the Fire to work.  I am very disappointed in sync cables that are available.  To me that's silly and obviously a problem with the Fire.  Amazon, please please please, just make a BLACK (not white) power cord/sync cord combo.  My fire is black, not white.  I am a techno geek, I dont work in a hospital!  White?  Really?.  Further, I have heard horrible reviews about the quality of your cables.  The rant on cables is now over.  Next ... there are no keyboards available that's dumb too.  In fact, if you search for accessories for the Fire on Amazon, you'll get a list of covers a mile long, but not much else.  To me it would seem a marketing goldmine with all the Kindle Fires out there.  So, that's an unsolved mystery to me.Overall:  The fire is awesome, and yes, there are a few things that tic me off about the fire when it comes it, but I still love my Fire.  No, I cant program a website with it.  Nor can I take my camera memory card and read pictures from it, nor can I edit them.  But it comes back to the original reason I purchased the the Fire, and it satisfies those 100%.  And for only $200 bucks, what are you waiting for?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire fills a niche other tablets do not,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Cheryl-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre-ordered the Kindle Fire and was anxiously awaiting its arrival.  However, I foolishly panicked when I read some of the critics' reviews.  I tried to cancel the order, but it was too late.  I couldn't back out, but now I am so glad my timing was off!First, some background about us.  Other than the purchases we've made from Amazon, we have no affiliation with Amazon whatsoever.  My spouse and I, with our computer engineering (hardware and software) degrees, were doomed to become gadget junkies.  Our children (ages 12 and 14) have been cursed with our affliction and have also become tech junkies.  We have computers, tablets and phones from a variety of operating systems:  iOS (Apple), Android, RIM (Blackberry) and Web OS (Palm).  Each gadget and each operating system has its pros and cons, of course, and while there are rabid fans of each who will vehemently defend their favorite product/company and vengefully and single-mindedly attack any competitor, I'd like to think we are rather objective, given our diverse collection.Despite my initial fears, the Kindle Fire has rapidly become one of our favorite tech toys.  It's versatile, easy to use and fills a niche that our other gadgets do not.  Every gadget has its faults, though, and we do have suggestions for the Kindle Fire 2, if Mr. Bezos and company are listening.  Now, on to the review:Size and weight.  The size and weight are ideal for reading, working, playing games and for holding the tablet in one hand for an extended period of time.  Another plus about the Kindle's size involves my irrational fear of robbery.  When I'm carrying my larger gadgets in their special cases, I'm always concerned about making myself look like the perfect target for a would-be robber; the cases are like a shining beacon announcing to the world that I am carrying an expensive gadget.  For the prices they charge for those gadgets, it would be painful if they were stolen!  The small size of the Fire allows us to discreetly tuck it away.  My daughter carries it in her purse, for example.Apps.  Amazon's free app of the day feature has saved us a considerable amount of money and headache on our android devices, and it continues to do so for the Fire.  You can try a game or app, and if you don't like it, you can remove it from your device with no money out of pocket.  If you do like the game or app, you'll like it even more because it was free.  Amazon allows purchasers to download all apps without additional charge to all the person's devices, so all of the apps we purchased for our phones are also on the Fire (however, you can choose to keep the apps in the Cloud, rather than download them onto the Fire).  We do use the official Android Market on rare occasions, but it is becoming less frequent as the Amazon market continues to grow.  I know there are those who complain about the "low" number of apps available (about 10,000), but I honestly don't understand the complaint.  Granted, my Apple devices have a lot of apps loaded on them, but the number of apps in iTunes is almost too numerous, and a large percentage of them are repetitive.  It takes a fair amount of time just to wade through the sea of apps I've loaded on my devices, even with the help of the folders and the search function.  In order to search for the most useful or fun apps in iTunes, I follow several Apple reporters on Twitter/Facebook or use apps that navigate through the endless ocean of new apps for you.Video.  Amazon has a huge selection of movies and TV shows available, and with your Kindle Fire comes a trial of Prime, which gives you free, unlimited streaming of over 10,000 movies and shows.  The movies and shows I've watched are clear and smooth, and the selection is much better than I expected.  I spend a large amount of time away from wi-fi, so I download the movies onto the device and watch them later.Books and magazines.  I've read several books on the Fire already, and it has been a pleasure.  Many people prefer the e-ink readers, but I've grown so accustomed to bright screens that I find reading with e-ink readers to be difficult.  No doubt I'm odd in that regard, but in my defense, my spouse and children have had no difficulty reading books on the Fire.  I've had no problem reading graphic-heavy magazines, either.Web.  The speed at which the Fire surfs the web is more than adequate.  I haven't noticed a huge difference between the speed of our phones and the speed on the Fire.  I used it this morning to edit one of our websites with no trouble at all.Music.  In addition to the music we obtained from Amazon, I copied all of our iTunes music into Amazon's free cloud service so we can listen to all of it on every device we have.  The sound on the Fire is clear, and it is loud enough for everyone in a relatively quiet room or car to hear (you probably can't hear it in the midst of a loud party).  Amazon's selection and prices are outstanding.  They frequently have sales and free songs or albums, and none of the items you purchase or download from Amazon count toward the 5GB of free Amazon cloud storage.Price.  It's hard to beat the price of the Kindle Fire.  At $199, it's affordable for most families, and if something goes wrong, the loss of $199 is easier to swallow than the loss of the other devices we have.  In our family, the low price makes this the only device to use in certain circumstances.  My son uses the Fire while tutoring differently-abled children.  My daughter is a volunteer naturalist at a state park and uses the Fire's apps to help children identify and learn about birds and other animals.  In both cases, the device must be used and passed around by a group of young children.  My children love it, the children they are teaching love it, and I don't have a coronary watching the Fire make the rounds; the Fire is tough and has stood up to rooms full of rambunctious children.  If it ever loses that fight, it's inexpensive enough to replace.Now for the cons.  It would be nice if the power button were on the top of the device instead of on the bottom.  I accidentally hit the button twice the first day I had it.  I'm used to it now, but I would still suggest that Amazon move it on the next build.  A physical volume button would be nice, but it's not a deal breaker.  Adjusting the volume using the screen is fast and easy.  It would also be nice if the Fire had Swype.  I can "type" extremely fast on the devices that have Swype; typing on my Apple devices and on the Fire seems quite slow by comparison.  Those who are accustomed to the one- or two-finger poking-type of typing won't notice a problem.  For some people, the lack of a camera is an issue.  I don't miss it at all.  The Fire is not quite as smooth as the iPad, but the difference is not very noticeable.  It would also be nice to have a micro SD and battery accessible to the consumer.Conclusion: The Kindle Fire is easy and fun to use.  It works as a great introductory tablet for a novice, or as a portable, carefree addition to any tech junkie's collection.  Everyone in our family is quite pleased with it.  Would I buy it again?  Yes, without hesitation.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsWait for the next version,December 3, 2011By&nbsp;A. Rickey(Georgetown, DE)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've used the Fire extensively for a few weeks, and I'm happy with my purchase, but I'd highly suggest waiting for the next version. The Fire right now is a neat device at a cheap price, but it's not ready for prime time.The good: it's a low-price tablet with access to lots of apps and Amazon content. Reading books and documents or watching TV or movies normally just works. I wish they'd put a little more RAM in so that streaming was less choppy, but if you have a good internet connection you'll rarely have a problem.The bad: The excellent hardware is let down by the obvious Apple Inferiority Complex in the Amazon Interface Design Department. Put simply, the desire to do "world winning" design has led to a lot of annoying interface decisions, such as:1) The Carousel.  Whose idea was it to create an interface that takes up over half of your home screen, cannot be easily customized, cannot be removed and actively makes it harder to start programs? The Carousel has a very hard time differentiating between the a swipe and a tap, so actually launching an application may take a few attempts while you wrestle with your chosen icon. You can't turn the Carousel off, and you can't remove any book that you've purchased from Amazon. In other words, your entire reading history is visible at the swipe of a finger. The Carousel violates so many rules of good interface design that I can't imagine how it got green-lighted.2) No folders. iOS has had folders for a few generations now. Other Kindles allow you to put content into folders. Android allows folders. The Fire? It gives you absolutely no way to separate light reading from serious fare, business documents from leisure content. This makes it particularly less useful as a tool if you have a lot of content.3) Crazy keyboards. Each program appears to be able to choose from a variety of keyboards. Unfortunately, some of the keyboards lack important keys, such as the not-so-commonly-used "enter" key. Wunderlist seems to have pulled its app from the Amazon store because users weren't able to add tasks without the carriage return. And it's not the only app that I haven't been able to use because the keyboard lacks a key or two.4) No Google Apps. This one is really inexplicable, like leaving iTunes off of an iPod. The built-in email application reminds me of Eudora circa 1998, and I wish Amazon had spent half as much money on it as they did on the Carousel. If you use Google applications to organize your mail, calendar and contacts, and had the expectation that an Android tablet would synchronize with your life, prepare for absolutely avoidable disappointment.Many of the design decisions appear motivated by the desire to sell content, and Amazon does make it very easy to buy new movies, books and apps. But Amazon has crippled what could be a great multi-purpose tablet. Using the Fire to do anything other than purchase content can often feel like work.My guess is that the next version will address the issues above, allowing users to limit (if not remove) the Carousel, put books into folders, etc. But until these problems are addressed, I'd stay away, because there's no way of knowing if any potential Amazon fix will come in the form of an OS upgrade for the current generation, or the release of a different tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNook convert,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Michelle "Michelle"(white plains, NY, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a long time Nook user so when Amazon and B&N; came out with the Kindle and the Tablet simultaneously, I bought both.  (Caveat - I have not used any type of tablet before and I am not particularly tech-savvy.)  So, I used both for several days (I Really wanted the Nook Tab to win) and the winner is -- the Fire.  The ease of navigation, the web interface, the audio and the visual layout were all superior on the Fire.  I have heard reviewers say that the Tablet is better for video - I found the opposite.  The Nook Tab Netflix could not have been grainier or jerkier.Navigation on the Fire is as easy as the back button, and all my recent activity is on the front page carousel.  Getting around the web was much easier on the Fire and the pages loaded with pictures much faster.  As far as audio, the speakers on the Nook were tinny and difficult to hear even with the volume way up.  The Tab does have physical volume buttons, which is nice. The screen brightness on the Fire just pops in comparison to the Nook.However, the e-reader interface on the Nook is much nicer. Amazon - please take a close look at the Nook e-reader interface.  There are many more options for customizing the reading screen and the font is crisper.  This was the only feature that made my decision less of a slam dunk.But it really came down to which tablet I wanted to reach for, and which made be happier when I opened it up.  That was easy - I love my Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (18)

14 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Drop and Scratch Test,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;BlogKindle.com-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)&lt;!--

function fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix,w,h)
{	
  try {	
    var ifrm = parent.document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "movieFrameID");
    if (ifrm) {	
        var h2 = h + 35;
        ifrm.style.height = h2;
      }
    } catch(err) {
 
    } 


  if (h &gt; 0) {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height=h+"px";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height=h+"px";
  }
  else {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height="";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height="";
  }
  document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "flashcontent").style.height="100%";
}

function fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix,divName,html)
{	
    document.getElementById(nsPrefix + divName).innerHTML=html;
}

function embeddingPopup(nsPrefix)
{
  alert("placeholder function for embedding code");
}
--&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NembeddingPopup(){	
alert("Embedding code will be displayed here.");
}

--&gt;&lt;!--
function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nrefresh_preplay() {

document.getElementById("cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NchiDiv").innerHTML = document.getElementById("cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NhiddenPre").innerHTML;
};
cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nrefresh_preplay();

--&gt;// &lt;![CDATA[

var cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso;	   


function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NloadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes) {

  try {
      cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso = new SWFObject(swfLocation, "cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NAMPlayerProd", swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor);	   

      for (var v in swfParams) {
        cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addVariable(v, encodeURIComponent(swfParams[v]));
      }
      for (var v in flashParams) {
        cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addParam(v, flashParams[v]);
      }
      for (var v in embedAttributes) {
        cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.setAttribute(v, embedAttributes[v]);
      }

      cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addVariable("swfEmbedTime", new Date().getTime());

      var agt = navigator.userAgent;
       
      var reFirefox = new RegExp("firefox/", "i");
      var regx = agt.split(reFirefox);
      var ffVersion = 8;
      if (regx[1]) {
          var pts = regx[1].split(/[.]/);
          ffVersion = parseFloat(pts[0] + "." + pts[1]);
      }
      var minorVersion = parseFloat(navigator.ap);
      if ((navigator.appVersion.indexOf("Mac")!=-1) || (ffVersion &lt; 1.5)) {
          cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.setAttribute("height", swfHeight);
          cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.setAttribute("width", swfWidth);
          cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addVariable("oldFirefox", "1");	     
      }

      if (cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.write("cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nflashcontent")) {
          fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62N', 
                               320, 
                               283);
      }
      else {
          var nsPrefix = 'cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62N';

          fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix, 0, 0);
          fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix, "flashcontent", '&lt;br /&gt;To view this video download &lt;a target="_blank" href="http://www.macromedia.com/go/getflashplayer" target="_top"&gt;Flash Player&lt;/a&gt; (version 9.0.115 or higher)');
      }
  } catch(err) {
      fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62N', 0, 0);
  }
  return false;
}



function _cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
    var swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
    var swfWidth = "320";
    var swfHeight = "100%";
    var flashVersion = "9.0.115";
    var bgColor = "#FFFFFF";

    var swfParams = {};
    var flashParams = {};
    var embedAttributes = {};
    swfParams.amazonPort = "80";
    swfParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    swfParams.telemetrySubPageType = "VideoReview";
    swfParams.nsPrefix = "cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62N";
    swfParams.locale = "en_US";
    swfParams.logUrl = "gp/mpd/l";
    swfParams.canResize = "1";
    swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    swfParams.sessionId = "000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.marketplaceID = "ATVPDKIKX0DER";
    swfParams.salign = "LT";
    swfParams.preset = "detail";
    swfParams.mediaObjectId = "m27CDADXOJ0IDG";
    swfParams.autoPlayTimer = "";
    swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = "m27CDADXOJ0IDG";
    swfParams.playIsUserGenerated = "1";
    swfParams.enableShare = "0";
    swfParams.permUrl = "gp/mpd/permalink";
    swfParams.telemetryPageTypeID = "R18YE9NIW1T4A0";
    swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/m27CDADXOJ0IDG/000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.amazonServer = "www.amazon.com";
    swfParams.scale = "noscale";
    flashParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    flashParams.salign = "LT";
    flashParams.bgcolor = "#FFFFFF";
    flashParams.allowScriptAccess = "always";
    flashParams.quality = "high";
    flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
    embedAttributes.title = "Flash Player";

    if (movieID){
      if (playerVersion == '3'){
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
        swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = movieID;
      } else {
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/legacy/20101014901/AMPlayerProd._V197491872_.swf";
      }
      swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/" + movieID + "/000-0000000-0000000";
      flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
      swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    }

    if (document.getElementById('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nduration')) {
      document.getElementById('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nduration').style.display='none';
    }
    cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NloadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes);

  return false;
}

function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
   return _cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion);
}


	
		// ]]&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NnewHeight(h)
{	
    fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62N', 0, h);
}

function cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NresetPlayer(w,h,bw,cc) {
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NnewHeight(h);

  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addVariable("resetBandwidth", bw);
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.addVariable("cacheCode", cc);
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.setAttribute("height", h);
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.setAttribute("width", w);
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nso.write("cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Nflashcontent");
}

--&gt;m27CDADXOJ0IDG / mo9MX4R3H3N62Nvar cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NRollOverImg = new Image();
cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NRollOverImg.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/71ipF%2BeF2KS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";

var cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay = document.getElementById('cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NpreplayImageId');
if (cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay) {
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay.onmouseover = function() {
    cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/71ipF%2BeF2KS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay.onmouseout = function() {
    cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/71ipF%2BeF2KS._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  
  var node = cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62Npreplay.parentNode;

  var cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NcurrentClick = node.onclick;
  node.onclick = function () {
    var head = document.getElementsByTagName("head");
    if (head[0]) { 
      var logTag = document.createElement('script');
      logTag.type = "text/javascript";
      logTag.src = "/gp/customer-media/du/log.html?ie=UTF8&amp;s=CustomerVideoPlay&amp;p=CustomerImage";
      head[0].appendChild(logTag);
    }

    if (cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NcurrentClick) {
      return cv_mo9MX4R3H3N62NcurrentClick();
    }
  }
}Length:: 3:43 MinsPractical demonstration of how strong Kindle Fire gorilla glass is. It is practically impossible to break or scratch - see for yourself.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



13 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's perfect for what it is.,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Nancy Pollard "oneclicker"(Amesbury, MA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the kindle fire for myself because I've never had a tablet and I could not afford an ipad.  That said.  I've grown very very fond of it.  If you take the time to read the manual and play around with it does many things that the negative reviewers say it does not.  I find the screen to be very responsive.  The carousel is easy to hide. Wifi is very easy to connect to. Prime is awesome.  I've been bringing it into the kitchen and cooking with Julia Child.  Yes all of her pbs shows are free to stream. I've been borrowing books from Amazon and my public library and reading more than ever.  I've been connecting to facebook and my email without incident. Angry birds. Well it's addictive and fun.  I've been reading kids books to my grandchildren.  The color screen really makes them come alive.  No there isn't a camera.  I have a very nice camera already.  I don't need an inferior tablet camera.  Text to speech.  I don't need or want that either.  The description from Amazon is very true and accurate.  You get exactly what was promised.  I love it.  Perfect size to fit in my bag. Not too heavy but with a solid feel that to me means quality and durability.  If this is what you want I say go for it.  No nasty surprises and a few unexpected perks.  I didn't know about all the borrowing options for books.  Love it!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsPerfect web/email/media device for those who never wanted an iPad,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;James J. Mahoney "JJ"(Fairfax, VA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire for a few days now and figured I could provide an adequate review for it. To give a bit of context, I love my Kindle 3G but I've never been a big fan of tablets. I've never wanted an iPad. But with my switch to mostly Kindle books for my reading and Amazon MP3 for my music, and since I was looking for a cheap replacement for my Windows desktop (which was mainly a web, email and music storage box), the Kindle Fire looked like it would meet that need perfectly.I can say without a doubt that it definitely meets that need. It was great turning my Kindle Fire on for the first time and seeing all my books there on the home screen. They weren't downloaded yet, but to see all my purchased, cloud stored content right out of the box was fantastic. It definitely felt like, "This is MY Kindle Fire", right out of the box. There was very little setup. It even said "JJ's Kindle Fire" at the top. I love that.The limited storage space (only 6.54GB of the 8GB is available), isn't a big deal thanks to Amazon's cloud storage. You can easily switch between what's stored on the device and what's on the cloud for each media type (There are Device and Cloud buttons at the top of almost every screen). And adding and removing content from the device is a snap. And when I brought it to work I was pleased to see that I could still see all my cloud content. While I obviously can't download it, I did add it to my download queue. [I'll update the review if it automatically downloads when I get connected to Wi-fi.] UPDATE: To my pleasant surprise, when I got home after writing this review my downloads started automatically. So you can queue up downloads when you're Fire isn't connected and they will start automatically when it is. Gotta love that!As much as I love the device I do have a few minor gripes which keep it from getting 5 stars (I would have given it 4 1/2 if the ratings let me). First off, the power button is poorly placed. The first few hours after I got it I accidentally turned it off more times than I can count. Even showing people how poorly placed the button was..."Opps, yeah I just turned it off by accident. See what I mean?" The Kindle 3G's power button is fine on the bottom because it's a slider. To put the Kindle in sleep mode you have to slide the button. It's possible of course (I've done it), but it's hard to do by accident too frequently. The Kindle Fire's power button on the other hand is an actual button. Hit it slightly and it goes to sleep. Holding it for a few seconds gives the prompt to power down. But just a light press and it goes into sleep mode. It's even more troublesome if you have a password set on it since you'll have to login again. It's happened less and less as days go on, but those initials hours were almost maddening. I suspect a case will probably help (it's back-ordered), but overall it was a major annoyance right out of the box.Another minor gripe is that it seems unresponsive at times. While overall navigation seems fast enough, and I have no complaints about the Silk browser, opening apps is sometimes slow. I can click something on my home screen, wait a few seconds, and it doesn't open. I click it again and it opens right up. Now is that just poor timing on my part? Am I pressing it too fast to register? Am I trying to click between apps too fast? I don't know. But I often have to press things twice to get them to open. Again, like with the power button, it may just take some time to adjust to having a tablet and not trying to click between apps too quickly, but it can be annoying. And thinking about my iPhone, where I often inadvertently open apps if I barely touch them, I don't know which is worse. Too sensitive (like the iPhone) can be annoying. But not sensitive enough is too.But all that being said, overall the Kindle Fire is a great device. Neither of those two gripes make me wish I hadn't bought it, and in the case of the power button, I've learned where not to put my hands (and like I said, a case might help with that). Regardless though, I love the Fire! I don't think it's an iPad killer, but I don't think it's supposed to be. What it is is a great media/web/email device. I often wonder how many iPad owners just wanted a web/email device to begin with, but didn't have any other legitimate or worthwhile options. Well, now you do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHappy with Kindle Fire,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Shoe Lover "Shoe Lover"(Southeastern U.S.)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is my second Kindle. Set up was very easy and intuitive. All my Kindle content appeared on the Fire and it just took a very short time to get started. One reason I got it was that as much as I like my iPhone, I read a lot and that screen is small. My other Kindle is easier to read, but has no color. I think I am going to like this little device. Getting a free month of Amazon Prime was a nice perk too.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Nice Device,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Gizmo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a student, and for me this is a very nice device. I realize that it may not have all of the functions other tablets have, or the amount of space, but with a price tag of $200, that's to be expected. The web browser works flawlessly, as does all of the other features I have tried so far. Everything loads quickly and without error.  I purchased this mainly so that I could have textbooks in e-book form and not have to carry such a heavy backpack. For me, the other features are just a nice bonus. Having access school texts, movies, music, games and web all on one device, at a cheaper price... I'm loving it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Fire is everything I needed and expected.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Bluemoon226 "SoBlue"(Texas, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been interested in tablets for awhile, but most were too big, expensive, and/or lacking the apps I wanted. Then the Fire was announced. I was immediately interested due to the fact that I already own a lot of Amazon content. Being just the right size, in my price range, and offering all the features I needed, sealed the deal.If you're looking for an iPad knockoff or a tablet packed with features like cameras and 3g, this isn't the product for you.Pros:portability, fast web browsing, popular apps, gorilla glass, easy access to amazon content, cloud storage for 5gb of non amazon content. Very easy to use. Amazon's incredible customer service is probably the biggest plus.Cons:The screen size isn't the best for reading comics or documents, but workable. The adapter needs a longer cord. No manual volume control on the device (you have to go to your settings in order to change the volume).What I'd like to see in the Kindle Fire 2, but can live without for now:bluetooth so I can use my wireless headsets and at least 16gb of on board storage.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

23 of 27 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNote about Content on the Fire,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Mom in Phoenix(Arizona)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got my Fire. Very simple to use, all my content downloaded instantly, videos download in a few seconds and stream seamlessly, and it registered me instantly. The brower is very fast -- those who say otherwise are either just wrong or have a slow Wi-Fi connection.  All in all, it does exactly what was promised, and does it well as far as I can tell so far.Important to note: all the content you have on your Amazon.com account/in the cloud shows up on the Fire. So, let's say you have a book with a racy title that you're reading on your other Kindle -- an icon for that shows up on the Fire, and there's nothing you can do about it short of deleting the book from your account entirely so you can't access it any more.  Same thing with video.  Same thing with web pages -- once you open one, it shows up in the carousel, and you can't delete it. So, if you're planning to share the Fire with your family or friends, make sure you want to share all your content too.  Amazon, please fix this! Please change the software so that icons can be deleted without deleting underlying content from the account.Another significant flaw: if you are not going to have access to wi-fi for any length of time, you are in trouble with regard to video rentals. Without wi-fi you can't stream, so you have to buy or rent videos.  If you rent a video, the rental period does not begin when you _start_ watching the video, it begins when you _download_ the video. So, if you are going to be without wi-fi access for a week, or maybe you don't want to pay expensive hotel fees for wi-fi, you can't download a video and watch it more than 48 hours later. Thinking maybe you'll just pop over to Starbucks and download the movie there? It takes quite a long time to download a movie, so be prepared to wait. This is a real problem that Amazon needs to fix immediately. Rental periods should start when you watch videos, not when you download them.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

13 of 14 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIn the eye of the beholder,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Bobby  W.(USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Before you buy, my advice would be to read Amazon's promotional material, check out the reviews here (both pro and con) and talk to others that actually own the Fire before you decide whether it's right for you. I'd skip the silly one star reviews from people who returned the device 5 minutes after opening the box - like anything, there's a bit of learning curve, and the Fire may do certain things differently than what you are used to. Also note that this is not a budget Ipad, and many of the apps that make sense on a phone-sized device won't be practical on the Fire.I own an original Kindle, and the Fire will not replace that device for reading. I much prefer the E ink display when reading for long stretches at a time, the only exception being viewing .PDF files (see below).I bought the Fire primarily because of all the free/low priced Android apps, and I also wanted a small device for quick web browsing.The Fire is well constructed and was easy enough to add to my network.I wish I could say that my first impressions of the whole Fire experience were good, but they were otherwise:Product Delivery - If they haven't changed this yet, I want to add my voice to the chorus - For the sake of your future customers, Amazon, please don't ship a pre-registered device in a box that basically states : "Contents: One Kindle Fire - Please Steal Me!"Keyboard - The virtual keyboard works ok, but even with a stylus, I still get an "o" when I swear I entered a "p".You can turn off auto spell check, but there is an annoying ribbon of suggested words that appears at the top of the keyboard when you type, and I haven't found a way to disable this feature and for some reason it really bugs me. In some apps, certain words I enter at the beginning of a sentence STILL auto correct to a word I don't want - I don't know if this is a problem with the app or with the Fire.PDF Document Handling - As I said, Fire won't replace my E-Ink Kindle, but Amazon's promotional material led me to believe that the Fire would handle PDF files with aplomb. My experience was that the native PDF reader on Fire is not too good, the Adobe reader was worse (!). I finally found a paid app, ezPDF, that works halfway decent. This may not be a fault of the Fire directly, but as Amazon promotes this device's ability to handle such documents, it should ship with the most robust PDF reader available.Basic Tasks - Fire's approx. 5x7 size makes it wonderful for certain tasks like web surfing, creating virtual  flashcards, sketching and games, but "mobile-centric" apps that make sense on a smaller Android device (phone) will be less useful - as a guy, I won't be taking my Fire on shopping trips or to the restaurant. Might work in a big purse, though.*****Web Surfing - Fire's Silk browser works well for short jaunts on the Web. Very handy to have a device that I can quickly boot and surf on. If I need to power surf, I'll boot up my laptop.Movie/Show  Watching - I didn't buy the Fire for this, but test-viewed a couple of streamed videos that were free through Amazon Prime. For a 7" screen they looked fine - as the Prime library expands with more quality titles, this will certainly add value to the Fire.Music - I didn't buy the Fire for this either, but test-listened to an MP3 I had purchased from Amazon. The tiny speakers are pretty good for what they are. For better sound, the headphone jack handled my full-sized headphones with no problem.Games - This is what saved the day for me. For the cost of one Nintendo DS game, I've purchased tons of wonderful games, and I still have over 4Gb of space for more.For all my gripes, I admit that I've been using the Kindle Fire for at least a half hour a day since I received it about a month back. Warts and all, as an entertainment/learning device, the Fire works for me. And since this a new device, all the components of the interface should only get better as time goes on.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

13 of 14 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire does what it is supposed to do... WELL,December 2, 2011By&nbsp;J. Vizzini-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I did it, I bought a Kindle Fire. And I must say I'm not sure why there are so many negative reviews. If you understand what the device is, it does what it is supposed to do very well.What it is:1.) A media consumption device, and this is what it excels at.2.) A BACKLIT e-reader, if you understand this then you wont be disappointed, if you want an e-reader only, definitely look at the E-Ink Kindles. I personally read in bed and backlight doesn't bother me, I have an e-ink reader and finding light can be very annoying.3.) A CASUAL Email device - it isn't for enterprise or heavy emailers and don't believe it is meant to be. But for just casual checking emails it performs well.4.) A web browsing device. The silk browser is much faster after update 6.2 and I can only imagine it will get better.What it isn't:1.) A laptop replacement. It wont replace your laptop or desktop, infact I would say no tablet out there is capable of this.2.) AN IPAD - I can't believe people actually compare this to a device that is 2x as much and bigger. But even that being said I would rather have this then an iPad. The 7" form factor is much more portable for a media consumption device. If you want a good comparison it should be done against the Nook or even the Galaxy 7" TABS.. but those are significantly more money.3.) A wireless 3G device. Why do people think that Amazon would give free 3G access to the internet and video streaming? The only reason other Kindles have 3G is to download books.. that's it. Amazon I believe pays a carrier for this access and the bandwidth required for thousands of Fire users streaming video would eliminate any profits, it just isn't feasible. I think this is just lack of knowledge on peoples part.I wanted a device that I could access with WIFI since most places I go have this, and I don't want to pay extra for a data plan. It is perfect for my needs, media consumption, web surfing, and checking my emails when I want to lay in bed or sit on the couch. I don't think it is an effective WORK device, it is a leisure item and that is how it is marketed.NEGATIVES:No device is perfect and I am sure the fire will improve over time with software updates. But there are a few things Amazon should address:1.) Parental controls! The fact is many people buy these for there kids and the fact that there is no parental controls is kind of a head-scratcher, on the Kindle Fire purchase screen at amazon.com they show a kid playing with one, so to say this isn't targeted as a family device is crazy talk, in the ad they even say:"Kindle Fire is great for parents and kids. Stir your child's imagination with over 1000 beautifully-illustrated children's books, including favorites like Brown Bear, Curious George, and Circus Ship."Kids will be handling these devices and the 1-click purchase requirement is dangerous, in addition to the rated R movies. This is toted as a family device.. just like the beloved IPAD. Parental controls should be in there, and I am sure Amazon will listen. Also there should be an option for a pin on one-click purchases, what if someone accidentally presses a button while checking out your Kindle. This needs to be fixed and there are plenty of people who want it.2.) Power and Volume buttons... this is the biggest fop-ah that Amazon made with the hardware, the power button is a poor design that is too easy to accidentally push, can't really change that in V1, but hopefully V2. (this is not a deal breaker, but it is an error.) There is NO external volume button, this is an odd omission on a media device like this, maybe there is a software tweak to make the volume more easily accessible.While I do mention the negatives.. no device is perfect and for a V1 device it is great.. but most importantly it works for my needs. But if you are considering purchasing this device, make sure it will provide the expected experience and needs you are looking for. READ reviews and READ the product info from Amazon, to make sure you will get a device that meets your requirements.Good job Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)













9 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsa satisfied consumer's concise commentary on some Fantastic "Fire" Features,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Roger Barone "aroba"(philadelphia)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The heavy hitters have weighed in earlier with exceptionally detailed reviews. My comments cover a few short hours exploring this fantastically affordable device.The Nook has an uphill battle competing against Amazon's amazing and enthralling content library. I've been watching the "Lost" TV series and some documentaries from the smorgasbord of available videos. The initial "content connection" took longer than expected due to the limited transfer speed of my Verizon DSL line.Once the program was "loaded" the content played seemlessly without the nauseating buffering delays I experience with my high-end Dells. The video quality also surpassed my Dells'. I don't know why I have buffering issues on my desktops as both devices are connected to the same WIFI network via a Verizon DSL modem and lynsys router. In addition, I've sampled several audio books that automatically synced from my Kindle 3g.I prefer my Kindle 3G's E-ink display over the backlit "Fire." After an extended period of reading, it become uncomfortable on the eyes, but at least I can use it in darkness, a convenient feature over E-ink.Amazon's cloud service is incredible. I've uploaded 10cds previously, and they played without any problems. A few months ago, I purchased a Lady GaGa album a for 99 cents, and received a bonus of 20 gb of free cloud space.The "FIRE" delivers the value and it's worth the price.  I recommend a glare screen and a support stand: I've been propping it up with pillows.The Fire is an ideal device for my purposes:  reading and listening to books, viewing FREE movies, television programs and web content and listening to music.NOTE: This is a first-day review that will be updated in a few months to report on performance over a period of time.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Device for the Price,April 10, 2012By&nbsp;Kevin C(Decatur, AL USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased my Kindle Fire as a "remanufactured" version from Amazon Warehouse Deals for only $140.00.  I could not be happier with my purchase.  As an avid iPad owner and fan, I was only considering a Kindle because I wanted something less bulky than the iPad to read ebooks on.  I only went with the Fire because its price point had brought it down to the prices of other Kindles in the lineup.Though I use the more powerful iPad for more powerful apps (mostly music apps) and gaming, the Kindle has become my go-to device for quick tasks like checking e-mail, Twitter, Facebook, weather, and, of course, reading.PROS:- Size.  The Kindle Fire is perfect as it can be held with one hand much easier than the bulkier iPad.- Screen.  Screen is bright and easy to read.- Interface.  Though many have encouraged me to "hack" my Kindle to make it an Android device less dependent on the Amazon store, I have not done so.  As an Amazon prime user and as a user who buys .mp3s more from Amazon's mp3 store than iTunes, the interface is quick and easy - especially with the simple tools to set up and interact with the Amazon cloud.- Speakers.  Surprisingly loud and clear.CONS:- Limited internal memory and no external memory options other than the cloud.  Sure, the cloud works great in wi-fi settings, but lack of memory and the ability to expand it are its biggest drawbacks.- Battery life.  My larger iPad lasts several hours longer on a full charge while running more intensive apps.OVERALL:  Not a replacement (or even a real competitor) to the iPad, but a very convenient device in terms of size and speed when it comes to needing something not as bulky as an iPad (or larger tablet), but bigger than a smart phone.  For me, this device is the perfect go-between.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNot an iPad, but good for what it is,March 29, 2012By&nbsp;ifgriffi-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let's get this out of the way: the Fire is in most ways a compromise product. If you have a bit more to spend and are looking for a more full-featured device, consider a refurb iPad 2 for $349 from Apple, as well as a number of brand-name 10-inch Android devices in the same price range. If you're on a budget though, the Fire is a nice tablet that's worth taking a look at.The Kindle Fire runs a custom version of the Android operating system. The interface Amazon has built consists of a "carousel" that displays all of the content you have used recently, with tabs along the top to navigate through the various types of content on the device. This works reasonably well, though the carousel can get cluttered. Overall, navigation feels a little bit laggy; the carousel sometimes stutters, and it sometimes takes a second to refresh when you quit an application. It's not a big deal, but it is noticeable.The e-reader functionality works about as expected. Obviously this is a back-lit LCD display, so it isn't as easy on the eyes as an e-ink reader. Kindle formatted books look good, but the small screen means a lot of pinching and zooming on PDFs. Video playback looks very acceptable, and if you have Prime membership you get access to a large selection of videos to watch for free. I was very excited about the Kindle lending library before getting this, but unless you're a fan of romance novels and self-help books the selection is pretty thin. If you don't mind waiting, a lot of public libraries have Kindle books that can be checked out online. The Fire can run Android apps, but out of the box the only way to get them is to use the Amazon App Store. Most of the major apps are on here, and they give away a paid app for free every day, but the selection is not as broad as on the Google Play store. Most games come in special "Kindle Fire" versions, which are formatted for the Fire's screen but cost a couple of dollars more than the standard version for no discernible reason. It's annoying, but the prices are still pretty reasonable.The Fire isn't going to blow anyone away with its specs, but its dual-core processor and 512 megs of RAM are more than decent given its price point. It has 8gb of built in storage, which hasn't been an issue for me but if you plan on loading it up with a bunch of videos you'll probably fill it up pretty quickly. As mentioned above, navigation feels a bit laggy. The much-vaunted Silk browser unfortunately also feels not-so-quick. Surprisingly, 3D games fare much better. Games like Dead Space and Shine Runner look really good and play smoothly. It's not going to give $500 tablets a run for their money, but for a $199 device it's hard to complain.One thing to keep in mind is that the Fire comes out of the box tied to your Amazon account with 1-click ordering enabled. This is neat, and if it is for personal use it won't be a huge problem. However, it is something to be aware of if you're thinking of letting kids or others use it. Given that they've been pushing this as a "my first tablet", I'm surprised that they didn't do a better job of making it kid-friendly. It seems like a missed opportunity.If you can swing the extra cost for a 10-inch tablet, the additional screen size will make your experience better. If your budget is $200, the Fire is probably the best you can do (barring the occasional super sale). If nothing else, you can be assured access to a ton of Amazon content and continuing software support (they have released 3 software updates already). At the time I write this, Amazon is offering a refurbished Fire for $139, which makes it an absolute no-brainer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFor My Teens,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Laurie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Love Love Love the new Kindle Fire. I tossed back and forth with the idea of a Kindle Fire for christmas for my teens. I read the reviews of the parents complaining about the credit card issue which made me a little hesitant also. I solved the problem by going to PayPal and getting them a student card to use for their account. I have to say I am SO happy I did. I love it and they will love it!!!! I set them up an account under my name. If I want to purchase something I just transfer the money from my account to their account via Pay Pal and its all set. This way, they do not have access to my credit card. I have been playing with it getting it all set up for them. This truly is the closest thing to an IPAD without the hefty price tag. You are not restricted to ITunes for everything (Which I hate). The video quality is unbelievable, the sound quality is great and volume level perfect, easy to use, easy to figure out. I will be purchasing a 3rd one for myself after Christmas. Thank You Amazon for creating such a wonderful, cost effective device, and thank you Clarke Howard for recommending it!!! I highly recommend this device to anyone who is looking for a decently priced tablet!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat for what it is supposed to be.....,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;David W. Lesko(Gilberts, IL United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ive had this for about a week now.  I love it.  Allows me to surf the web, play games, check email, watch videos and read my books whenever i wish.The Good:Works great.  Very fast.  Ive had no problems getting use to the interface, which i think is very intuitive.  The tabs across the top make things idiot proof.Video streaming is seemless and very good quality through both Amazon Prime and Netflix.  The picute is great and the screen is very nice.The App Store has the perfect amount of cultivated apps and is easy to use and quick to download.  Words with Friends is my new favorite game.  Lots of fun.The Silk Browser works well and is pretty quick.  Its not blazing fast but its fast enough.  The bookmark feature is nice and it is able to play FLASH.The book section is nice.  I like that i can see things in color now.  Books load quickly, pages turn fast and it looks great.  I like that you can change the screen to sepia and mess with the font.The not so good:The carosel is a bit much.  It should be where your favorites are saved.  The fact that it shows everywhere youve been is overkill and i hardly ever use it.  Hopefully Amazon will change this.The touch screen is not as sensitive as it should be.  I find myself having to hit the home or back button a few times to get it to respond.  It does not happen often but it should not happen at all.  I dont think this is a lag issue, i think its a sensitivity issue.The menu at the top of the screen should be easier to access.  Another place that is not sensitive enough.  Either that or the touch area to activate it is too small.The email is not integrated very well.  You cannot use microsoft exchange in it.  You have to download an app for that which gives you a free month but then requires payment.I wish it had a volume toggle on the side.  Sometimes its difficult to turn the volume down when needed.I miss being able to save books into folders.  I had my old Kindle organized with folders like Science Fiction, History, Military History Etc.  I want to be able to do this again.  AMAZON FIX THIS!Overall, the Fire is great for what it is supposed to be, a media consumption device.  It is not an IPad killer nor was it designed to be.  With it being integrated into Amazon Prime you get yourself a really cool litle device that allows you to read, watch videos, surf the net and play games.  Just what i wanted.  Hopefully Amazon can fix the small issues i brought up but they do not detract from use of the Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsPerforms as advertised,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Tanya R. Whitner(Woodbridge, VA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire last night and have had no issues getting it up and running.  It knew immediately that it was mine and updated itself without any problems.  I was able to login to my Verizon Fios WiFi without incident, even though I have a really locked down system at home.  All of my books and subscriptions were waiting on the device when I accessed it.  I was able to download 3 new magazine subscriptions and a movie from Amazon Prime in less than a minute.The device does feel heavy, but it is to be expected.  The specifications listed how much it was going to weigh so that shouldn't be a shock to anyone.  It feels sturdy and I am thankful it's screen is made of gorilla glass for extra protection.The graphics are great and magazines, webpages, apps and movies view well.  Books however hurt my eyes, but this is no different than reading on any other color screen computer or tablet.  I will use the Kindle Fire as I intended to, as a light weight option to bringing my laptop with me and for entertainment.  I will keep my Kindle Original for enjoying books, but the Kindle Fire for games, movies, TV Shows, Apps, internet access and my cookbooks (they are easier to navigate on the Fire).On flights, taking the bus to work, hanging out at the Doctor's office, road trips, and kicking it at the coffee shop are all places I would use my Kindle or Kindle Fire.Please decide why you want the Kindle Fire first.If you want to replace your Kindle Original I don't think you will like it because it doesn't have the e-ink and it will strain your eyes.  If you want other forms of entertainment at your fingertips for a low price then I think you will be happy with it.  Do not compare it to anything else, just make your list of wants out of a device and decide if this fits that bill.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsnice,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;ben-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Got my Fire a few hours ago and I love it! It's a speedy, responsive little thing that feels solid and comfortable in my hands. What a fun way to spend 200 bucks! The Kindle Fire is everything it promised to be. My experience with the device has been smooth thus far - very intuitive setup and UI.There are a few software issues, but Amazon seems to be on top of things by rolling out updates as they receive input from customers who are using the device during its debut. The only major annoyance Amazon should prioritize at this time is the lack of privacy and setting options for the carrousel.The hardware seems well-balanced and attractive. Lack of cameras, sd slot, and limited onboard storage were all part of the game from the beginning, so Amazon loses no points from me on that front. However, hardware volume control, bilatteral speakers, and a more thoughtfully placed power button would have earned the Fire 5 stars from me.Bottom line: Two thumbs up! I can't wait to see what Amazon does with future generations of e-readers/tablets. The genius of Amazon has always been founded in the value they place in customer feedback. The Fire's Silk browser is a perfect example of a design that allows the consumer to create his own experience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExactly what I wanted.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Michelle R(Minnesota)  -See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I knew if Amazon came out with a tablet that I'd probably get it, and so I was pleased when the Fire was announced. The fact that it was designed around the top things I wanted a tablet for, as opposed to everything and the kitchen sink, was what made my "probably" become a "definitely."So, I've had a few hours to test out all the things I wanted it to do. Okay, that sounds way too restrained -- I spent the last few hours treating it like a smorgasbord, and I nibbled on this feature and that one, set up some apps and games, listened to my personal music and Pandora, streamed part of a Buffy episode, flipped through a magazine, sampled a graphic novel...I'm quite happy with my choice. While I'm still learning, my policy of not being afraid to explore has led me to think I pretty much got the hang of it. Most technology like is user friendly, and there's nothing wrong with testing out different things as the quickest way to learn. There are times for the manual, but diving in works best.It was very important to me that this was all simple and integrated. The more you are an Amazon shopper, the more a Fire rewards you. For people who shop here for their ebooks, music, TV shows, it's all going to be there for you at the touch of a finger, ready to go. I don't think you have to be as tied in to here as the cynics say, but my experience matched a line from a Wired article that I read just a few days ago: "When you pay $199 for Fire, you're not buying a gadget--you're filing citizen papers for the digital duchy of Amazonia." All the content I want is here, and when I turned on my device, it was all presented to be on a carousel -- my music and soundtracks, my books (including the ones where a little something was compromised with the usually superior eInk black and white screen), and magazines I'd pre-subscribed too and which looked completely yummy. Between the apps and a little familiarity with the keyboard, all my favorite internet hang-outs were soon there too. I was so immersed in this that I'm going to have to rewatch Glee tomorrow to find out what actually happened.Not too much in the complaint department that shouldn't be cleared up by increased familiarity. I know some people have found the browser sluggish, but I've been quite impressed. While I find it mostly intuitive, there could probably be more done. The on button is in an awkward place.It's pretty, it's fast, it's easy-ish, and it's shiny in both the literal and the geeky Firefly reference sense. I know this is not the right tablet for everyone, there is no universally right tablet, but this is the best one for me at this moment.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWhy all the negative press?,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Kyle_A-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I never write reviews, but I felt compelled to do so for the Kindle Fire due to the negative press I've seen.  If you read these articles (New York Times, Yahoo News, etc.), you would think that the Fire is pretty much unusable and is a $199 paperweight.  However, these articles are not based in reality.I've wanted a tablet for a while now, but the prices have been outrageous.  There was no way that I was going to spend $500 plus for an iPad - you can buy a laptop for less and it will be able to do more!  There were cheap Android tablets out there, but they are an obvious case of "what you see is what you get."  Therefore, when the Kindle Fire was announced, I was intrigued.  It was affordable to me and was supposed to do the things that I would use a tablet for: surf the internet, use apps, check my e-mail, listen to music, etc.  I ordered the Fire on a leap of faith based on the Amazon name.I have not been disappointed.  The Fire does all the things that it was supposed to do, and contrary to what the media says, does them well.I have heard various reasons why the Fire is a poor tablet.  For example, the power button is supposed to be in an awkward place that is susceptible to being accidently hit.  I have had this tablet for a month and have used it for hours each day and have never accidently hit this button.  Further, I have seen complaints that the Fire lacks a microphone and camera.  I am glad that it does not include these things - it would have driven up the price!  I never video chat, and even if I did, I have a laptop and a cell phone to do that on.  Last, people have said that the touchscreen is poor and that it is not easy to use.  Again, I have not run into too many problems here.  I've had to double tap items a few times, but that has been the extent of my issues with the touchscreen.  I have played many games that require you to extensively use the touchscreen (Cut the Rope, Slice It, Tetris) and I have never had a problem.  It almost seems like the media is making up issues to try to make this device fail.Let me end this by saying that if I had the money, I would have bought an iPad.  However, I don't have the money to spend on one (and I'm a lawyer!!!), and there are millions of other people out there that don't have the money.  The Kindle Fire should not be compared to the iPad, but it is a great tablet for what I use it for.  All of these articles/negative reviews miss that point.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsUnderstand the intent of what the Fire is, and you will love it.,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Mark Hodges(North Little Rock, AR United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There are many reviews that do a good job describing the feature / functionality of the Kindle Fire.  I won't attempt to repeat those, but rather to detail what the Fire really is intended to be.I have been an iPad owner for over a year.  Since the Fire has arrived at my house, I have not used my iPad.  The Kindle Fire works best for those who wish to CONSUME CONTENT such as books / video / etc.  If you are looking for a tablet computer, this is not it (nor was it ever intended to be).Granted, it runs a forked version of Android..but if you buy it for its intended purpose, you will actually like this as it makes accessing content very easy.ATTENTION CORPORATE TRAVELERS:  If you want a device that you can use for reading / video / etc. AND wish to occasionally flip-over to check your corporate email while sitting in one of those airport restaurants, the Fire is able to deliver.  You will need to spend $9.99 and install Touchdown from Nitrodesk (available via Amazon app store), and you then have true Exchange ActiveSync access to your corporate email.The size, for me, is actually a plus.  Last week, while walking in NYC (in the rain), it was easy to slip into an overcoat pocket (not possible with my iPad).  Don't get me wrong...the iPad is a great device and a better true tablet than the Fire (even though Fire is "Flash Friendly" and the iPad is not - you cannot watch Amazon video on the iPad).  However, if you are looking for a gateway to media and content, the Fire is a great alternative.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest bang for the buck.,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Superman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire does what it's supposed to do very well-browse the web, watch movies, listen to music,read books and magazines and well, what you'd usually do with a tablet. There are some restrictions set by Amazon here and there but hey, it's no big deal, if it doesn't ruin the fun why should you care!?The Fire is actually my second tablet, iPad 1 being my first one and seriously I think I spent my money wisely because I don't see too much of a difference.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my fire,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Rev Shoshana(USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have several "portable" devices that I generally have with me in addition to my Droid Pro Smart Phone.I have an IPad2, The Kindle FIRE (aka FIRE), an IPod touch, and a netbook.If I could only have one it would be the netbook because a tablet is not a computer.I need a computer. I need a real tactile keyboard to handle my business email. My Ipad2 has a really good keyboard but it is not the same as the keyboard on my desktop or laptop, as good as it is.But a tablet has its place as a toy and educational device.  It is also much more comfortable than a netbook when sitting on the couch or in bed.If I could give one item up it would be the Ipod Touch.  It offers nothing that I need that I do not already have on my Droid.I prefer the FIRE over the IPad.  There is nothing that I need on the Ipad that I do not have on the FIRE.I prefer the smaller size of the FIRE and I the keyboard is very good for a touch keyboard. When I hold it horizontally I can use two thumbs easily.I don't find the loading times different. No, I do not sit with a stop watch, but I do use both and both load fine.The sound is so much better on the FIRE.  My grandkids cannot sit in a room with other people when they watch a movie on the IPad but they can with the FIRE.The app selection is far greater on the IPad but I expect that to change.  There is a free app on the FIRE every day which is very cool.  It eases my compulsive need to buy apps.I would have liked the FIRE to have blue tooth so that I could hook up an external keyboard but as I said, for me, for real email, I don't like any device other than my a computer.3G would have been a good option but for me (and this is about my experience) when I need to log on I use my netbook and I use PDAnet on my smartphone (androids only). It is great and free.The price is the clincher. My tablets are 90% for my grandkids to use with me and I am much more relaxed with a 4 year old holding a $200 device than a $700 one.For traveling when there is no wifi the FIRE is limited as to how much you can download but that is not an issue for me. I can hold enough of whatever we need for any trips that we take.The FIRE is perfect for folks who don't know what in the world they need a tablet for.  It is a cheap way to find out and have fun with it and a great gift.It is not perfect but I still think it is a 5 star product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBetter than expected!,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Stephen Moore "smoore"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)To start off I own an Android Tablet, Ipad 2, and now the Kindle Fire.  The Kindle Fire has been much more than I expected especially for the $199 price.  Here are some pro's and con's with a comparison to other devices I own.***Pro's****Cloud Integration-Kindle Fire integrates the cloud into the OS very well.  Cloud is easier to use than Apple's iCloud (which I love also.)  With the Fire you can choose to download your media content to your device or stream it when connected to wi-fi*Operating System-The Fire uses a customized Android System.  I was unsure of how I would like it but have been surprised to find that it is very similar to the standard Droid operating system.  I still prefer Apple's iOS 5.0 but this is also a very nice and easy operating system.*Media-The media (video/music) library is very complete with lots of free content for amazon prime members*Screen-Besides being a very nice High Def Screen with very easy touch control, it is very durable and very very very hard to damage or scratch.*Silk Web Browser-Very nice and fast web browser.  Easy to use and can have multiple tabs open for web browsing.  I would rank it a 9/10 same as Apple's Safari.*Easy to Manage Content-Add, edit, or delete content right from your device or online at amazon.com/myk*Very Long Battery Life***Con's****No Camera-If you are looking for a device with a camera or a device to use skype on this is not for you.*No Calendar-There are Calendar apps available, but I would have liked to see this come loaded with one that could sync with online Calendars such as Google.---OVERALL---This Tablet really surprised me.  I was expecting more of an ereader with web browsing and limited apps. But was surprised that it was more of a full function tablet. The Amazon App Store is not as complete as many of the others but was surprised by the amount of apps available.  Also many Android apps are available for the fire.  This is a perfect device if you are looking to browse the web, check email, read and edit documents, read books, listen to music, and watch movies (including HD movies.)  There is no need for an Android Tablet or Ipad if you get this device.  Really great tablet that really blew me away.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent price for excellent product,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;W. Lawrence "W. Lawrence"(VA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is superb! I am so excited about getting this reader and have been using it mostly for reading, light web browsing, and email on the go. I don't really need anything else and certainly not the subscription that other devices force you to have. I love the size, the screen, the colors, and easy reading. No complaints at all. They've really impressed me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStop Comparing the Fire to the iPad,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;Atlanta, Ga "Atlanta, Ga."(Atlanta, GA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I continue to read negative reviews on the Kindle Fire from what would appear to be uninformed customers wanting to compare apples to oranges.  This is not a $500 8gb iPad.  It is a $200 Kindle Fire.  Stop comparing the two.  Would you compare a Lexus to a Kia?  Of course not.  So why are you comparing a Fire to an iPad?First, yes all the complaints are valid.  The on/off button is in an awkward place.  The screen isn't the best for reading a book on for hours.  It needs an external volume control.  It is a branded shopping tool for Amazon.  So, now that we have that out of the way, let's talk about positives.1) It is $199 compared with $400 and $500 competition.  What you get for $199 is way more value than what you get for the $500 iPad.  (Amazon actually loses money on each one sold as it costs them more than the $199 sales price.  This is fact, not my theory).2) It connects to WiFi that works brilliantly.  The browser is fine for what you need it to do.  Sure, it is not Safari, but it does the job.3) Easily add music, pictures, etc. with a micro usb cable.  Now, that is something you can not do with the iPad.  This is huge to me.  Put whatever music or images or videos I want right on it without having to go through some third party application.4) Applications to download are simple and plentiful.5) Cloud is available up to 5gb (though I wish they would run the special to have 20gb available again)6) Good size.  Not to0 big, but not too small.Look, what are you expecting for $199?  Let me reemphasize again that Amazon loses money on each one they sell in hopes you use it to buy things from Amazon.  This means if you paid to have everything on this tablet made for you, with Amazon's volume discount, it would cost you more than what they are selling it for.  People must stop comparing this to the iPad or the Samsung Galaxy tab.  Those are $500.  This is $199.It is a perfect starter tablet.  It is not the iPad, but it is also 40% of the cost of the iPad.  Stop comparing and start enjoying a great tablet that costs less than half the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsQuick Tips to Correct Kindle Fire Complaints,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Professor-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is great, and it does so much for the price!  However, some naysayers are complaining about issues that can easily be corrected:1.) Security: Go into "Settings" in top right. Turn on "Lock Screen Password." Create a password. Then, hit the "Back" arrow, go into "Display," and select time for "Screen Timeout." Whenever you turn off the device or exceed the timeout, your password has to be entered. For additional security, on the home page, click on the "Web" tab. Then click on the bottom center icon that looks like a page. Select "Settings." Make sure the "Remember passwords" button is not checked. You can also select "Clear passwords" as an option.2.) Power button location: Buy a Kindle case. I use the Marware jurni, which folds behind itself and has a hand sleeve. The Kindle snaps in perfectly, and the plastic tabs that hold in the Kindle have spaces for the speakers at the top. But, I imagine any Kindle case will do. You don't ever have to take the device out of the case, and you'll never hit the "Power" button until you want to.3.) Slow Web Browser: Your Kindle Fire is set by default to enable Flash, accelerate page loading (which actually tends to slow the browser), and give you a desktop view (basically treating your Fire like a desktop computer, which is a lot to handle for a small device). On the home screen, click on the "Web" tab. Then, click on the bottom center icon that looks like a page. Select "Settings." Disable "Enable Plugins" (takes off Flash), disable "Accelerate Page Loading", and change to mobile view under "Desktop or Mobile View," (which will give you mobile versions like you would see on your phone, should they be available). Silk will run faster, and, unlike an iPad, when you want to watch a Flash video, simply turn on "Enable Plugins" with a quick finger swipe.4.) Outgoing E-mail: If you're not using a mainstream e-mail provider such as Google, Yahoo, Hotmail, or AOL, you might have trouble with setting your Outgoing Mail Server, which loops a question about a certificate authenticity. Even though it costs, the Enhanced E-mail app does the trick to solve this problem. Plus, it has great features more like a desktop e-mail would have, such as access to folders and starring items. It also highlights what you haven't read.5.) Touch interface: Yes, there can be some lags, but you can quickly adapt by just holding your finger on the device a bit longer than an iPhone or iPad. It's worth a few bugs to be able to do so much on an inexpensive device. The more you use it, the more you'll unconsciously adjust, and you will think the device has magically improved.Great app: Handrite Pro: write on your Fire with your finger or a stylus, in any size, and it will convert it to a smaller size in your writing on a "piece" of notebook paper. You can also use a keyboard on this app.Would like to see: An alternative keyboard design app to get rid of the period being next to the space bar. Android already has these apps, so it's just a matter of time before we can have a similar app.Check out: On amazon.com, check out "Kindle Deal of the Day."  On your device, don't miss the free books available in the Kindle Owners' Lending Library. If you have Prime, some great new books are free!  Access this directly on your Fire through "Books" and "Store."Keep the faith in the Kindle! A few bugs will likely be ironed out in updates. You won't find such an affordable device that does so much! I love my Kindle!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

70 of 90 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsWas so excited...,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;bb-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)And it finally arrived.  DOA of course.  I am just slightly upset with Amazon for a number of reasons.  Top of the list, I pre ordered the Fire moments after it became available on amazon for pre oreder, and yet it only arrived on the 21st.  Packed very nicely, plugged in, turned on, knew who I was, then tried to update, and became a brick.Customer service was less then helpful, even accusing me of mishandling, dropping or even spilling liquid on the device.  After reading through the amazon groups, this appears to be a pretty big problem for them, and they were not very helpful in sending a replacement.  I had to demand that I get it next day, (which is actually 2 day as we apparently "passed the shipping cutoff").  We were on a im chat at 2:45 pst.  I don't get it..  I could have walked into a Best Buy the day it came out, and bought one that worked.By the way, sending them both back after doing some extensive reading through the groups on amazon.  I will stick to my Ipad2 and call it a day on small screens, just use the iphone for thatHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

15 of 17 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsiPad Lite,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Sophia-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I know, you're probably sick of hearing about this being compared to the iPad. But I was confused before I purchased this, due to all the weird reviews. I'd heard that this is NOT an iPad, it's not as nice as an iPad, and you can't do as much on this as an iPad. Well... duh. This is only $200, where the iPad will cost you $500 at the very least. Some reviews praised the Kindle Fire, while others said it was simply a cheap tablet.Let me start by saying- I own an iPad, and it's absolutely lovely. It really is. It's a wonderful little device. However, it's sort of completely unnecessary for me. I have a computer, and I have an iPhone. I'm pretty much attached to my phone, so the iPad was sort of... pointless. (It is, after all, just a giant iPhone.) There's hundreds of thousands of apps available. Out of those hundreds of thousands, I probably used... 10.Which leads us to the Kindle Fire. I'm not looking for a notebook/desktop replacement. I want a nice portable device that I can comfortably watch Netflix on, read books, and play a few games. This is that device.In the Amazon App Store, there are PLENTY of games for the average user. All of my favorite iPad apps were available on here. The internet browser is just as good as the one on the iPad. Everything here is just as good as the iPad, it's simply a more limited version when it comes to the amount of apps available. The first thing that came to mind when I started playing around with it was that it was a Lite version of Apple's device, which is perfect for most people.A lot of people noted that there's no camera on the Kinde Fire, and my response is "Who cares?"We all have mobile phones, and we all have actual cameras. I don't need my tablet to be able to take pictures. In my opinion, they're way too big to be your go-to camera anyway.I can honestly say the only things I don't really like about the Kindle Fire (and it's a short list) are:-The touch screen isn't nearly as buttery and "flowy" as that on the iPad, but that's to be expected. Not a huge deal. If you've never been on an iPad, you're not going to notice at all.-You can't customize the "desktop" area. It's just grey. Ho hum. Again, not a big deal. I'm simply obsessed with customization of that sort of stuff.-You cannot hand this device to anyone that you don't trust with your life, because they can very easily start buying stuff from Amazon on your account. There really needs to be a password or a way to disable one-click ordering on the actual Amazon site.-The carousel. It's a nice idea, but you can't delete anything from it. It's just there. Always. Call me crazy, but I really value my online privacy.Simply put, if you want the iPad experience, but you don't feel like spending nearly $1,000 (add a couple hundred more and you could get a really nice computer) on a tablet, get this. I'm really enjoying it, and I'm not missing much at all. Unless you're a hardcore Apple fanatic, you'll be more than satisfied with the Kindle Fire. For $200, it's a great investment.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

15 of 17 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsThis Kindle Fire isn't all that hot...,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;NickisratingstuffonAmazon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased the Kindle Fire without the expectations that it was a PC replacement or an iPad killer. Knowing this, I still expected more.The hardware is a bit boring, but a slab and a screen is never going to be the most exciting in design opportunities. It is very sturdy and solid feeling, and is easy to use either one or two handed. The screen is decent quality, not as high res as most other tablets, but for the price I would not expect it to be. There really isn't all that much to the hardware because it is lacking a few things, which turns out to be an issue.The lack of a volume rocker or buttons is nothing short of insane. Relying solely on software for volume control is a hassle whether watching a movie or playing a game. Having to open up the top options to work the slider is very inelegant.Move from the lack of volume control to the speakers. At highest volume, they are about half the volume of my single phone speaker and a little louder than an iPod Touch single speaker. The Fire is technically a stereo device, having 2 speakers and all. In reality the speakers are so close together that there will never be any sort of stereo listening experience. Watching a movie in landscape with both speakers meagerly firing off to one side does not make for a pleasurable experience. One ear ends up getting all the cool movie sounds while the other ear is forced to listen to silence. Headphones or buds are almost a necessity.The lack of an SD card slot is a letdown as well. I understand that Amazon has the intent to push the services it provides, but some sort of expandability would have been nice.The power button. Out of  all the nerdy electronic devices I have owned, I don't think I ever had something with a power button placed in the worst spot that it could have been placed until now. The Fire is a lap device, and I would think that something that will likely be placed in a lap would not have a power button that would directly interfere with that. Unlike standard Kindles, the button is not flush or recessed, but is a slight bulge on the bottom of the Fire. The button pushes in with the lightest touch, as I learned within the first five minutes of using the Fire. It almost takes a conscious effort to make sure that the tablet sits light enough to not push the button and tell the Fire to go to sleep or turn off. It is a power button. There should never be an issue with something as banal as a power button, yet there is.The software is interesting. The bookshelf with swipeable list of media on the top row is nice looking. Cluttered and not as easy as marking apps and media as favorites or using the app list, but it works well with smooth transitions. The beakdown of media by type - Newsstand, Books, Apps, etc. makes it easy to navigate to what you are looking for. There is not much in the way of settings or options to change things up like the standard Android world, but Amazon did a fair job of keeping this simplistic and useable. Useable until you actually try to use something, like the reader app or the Silk browser.I didn't plan on reading many books on this because I am a proud papa of a e-ink Kindle, which is a good thing. Trying to read is a jittery stuttery mess. I have the Kindle app on 5 different devices which all work wonderfully, with the exception of the Kindle fire. Books take too long to load and page turning is a hassle. Pages can be turned either by pressing on the left or right side of the screen to load the previous or next page, or by swiping across the screen. The latter method is useable, but the page turn transitions are very sloppy. I figured for a color screen e-reader this would be one of the bright spots of the fire.The Silk browser, touted by Amazon as being the next, biggest, baddest, fastest, best-est tablet web browser is by far the biggest letdown. It is slow. Bordering on dial up slow. I compared this browser with the standard browser on my Droid Incredible 2 for a variety of full sites and not mobile versions, with cleared cache, history &amp; cookies. My phone beat the Silk browser almost every time, a couple times close to 10 seconds faster. I found that turning off the "Accelerate page loading" option in the web settings seemed to speed things up a bit, or I may just be imagining it. HTML5 videos run well, but most videos seem to have issues. Watching cat videos on YouTube is very unpleasant with all video artifacts and stuttering. Trying to watch anything in a high or HD resolution is just short of pointless. The browser also tends to force close on its own. It seems like it gets too tired to bother trying to load websites and decides to take a break.Movie watching, both from Amazon and Netflix is a pretty good experience. The new Netflix interface fits right in with the Kindle theme. Playback is smooth for both, though Netflix seems to take longer to load and the quality does not seem as high.Apps and the app store are constantly growing and changing. Amazon does not have a giant selection at the moment, but it is constantly getting better. The email app is basic but works, Facebook is a shortcut to the mobile site, and Twitter is broken at this time. While the choices are slim compared to the Android Market or iOS, there are quite a few high quality apps. Time will tell, but if the Fire sells like crazy I think that there is nowhere to go but up for the number and quality of apps.I'm hoping Amazon keeps updating the Fire and improves on what could be a great little tablet. Right now I feel a little bittersweet about owning this. It is a great price, but with that great price maybe I was expecting too great of an experience. As a stock device the marketing played this up to be something it definitely is not. In time hopefully that will change.If you read all this, go get yourself a cookie. You deserve it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

15 of 17 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsHuge Kindle/Amazon fan says "Buy an iPad instead",November 18, 2011By&nbsp;L. Cole(Los Angeles, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a big Amazon fan--- I have had several regular Kindles which I absolutely adore, and use the Amazon store constantly to buy books and watch video. I've been a Prime member for years.I also own an iPad, which I think it too heavy to carry around all the time so I was very much looking forward to the Fire. Therefore, I'm disappointed to report that while I've only had the Fire a few days, virtually nothing that I tried with the device has worked without problems. Some of these issues will improve (I hope) as the App Store improves, but others are just inherent in the device.I'm comparing a lot of these issues to my iPad experience. I know that it is not supposed to be an iPad, nor do I expect it to be for $199, but I would suggest that users put the $199 toward buying an iPad instead. $199 is too much to pay for a device that doesn't work well.Plus:- Minimal set-up required since it was already linked to my Amazon account.- Amazon Video looks phenomenal.- Facebook app works fine.Minus:- Can't zoom to change text size (as far as I can tell) and text can be quite small. Not a big issue if you are 20 or 30, but I'm in my 40s and at the reading glasses stage of life, and I know a lot of Kindle users are older than I am. My husband can pinch and zoom on his Android phone so not sure why it doesn't work here.- HORRIBLE App experience to date. Hopefully this will improve, but none of these are issues with an iPad:- Can't link to most of my print subscriptions- I've tried New York Times, Wall Street Journal, and the Economist and all expect me to subscribe a second time. Apple fixed this months ago, and I can read print subscriptions on my iPad with no extra charge.- Could link to Vanity Fair but only have one old issue is available, not the most recent one in the app. Why??- USA Today has a phenomenally good app for free on the iPad, but Amazon App Store expects you to pay $11.99/month for a subscription. Why??- I've searched for most my favorite apps and virtually none have been available (or at least I couldn't find them): No Google Maps or Yahoo Maps, No Twitter, No Yelp, No HBO Go, No Slingbox app, No Super Why (4 year old nephew's favorite app), No Toy Story 3 (another kids favorite) or any other Disney app. I'm running out of apps to look for.- Netflix video was choppy and fuzzy.- Yes, Angry Birds is there, but what AB fan wants to start over again at Level 1?- I started to read a book on my Fire, turned off the device, and went upstairs to my regular Kindle, expecting it to sync to the furthest page read---- but it didn't!- Other "Web Pages" are the mobile versions, so just a list of headlines like you would see on a Smartphone. With an iPad you can see the web page. This makes the iPad an immensely better experience if you are looking at newspaper sites. While I have not been able to view many newspapers that I read(since I'm not paying twice for something I already subscribe to), I suspect that given the small screen size that if I were to get a NYT or WSJ app they might also be headlines, not the newspaper-like versions I see on my iPadSo as much as I would like to recommend the Fire as a low cost alternative to an iPad, I just can't. Save up and buy an iPad instead. And if you read books, buy a regular Kindle not the Fire. I'm giving it 3 stars instead of 2 since I expect the apps to appear sometime in the future, and because iPads are quite pricey so can't really suggest that everyone buys one. This is definitely "a poor man's iPad".Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

15 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKicks iPods butt,  why does everyone think it's an iPad,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;C. Dillman(North Yarmouth, Maine USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It costs $199 same as an iPod which was what the kids begged for last Christmas and it knocks it's socks off.  Why are people trying to compare it to an iPad (which by the way I'm writing this on).  It will never live up to an iPad,  it should not have too.  iPad is 250-400% more money - hey my Subaru does not ride as nice as a BMW 7 series - no kidding.  My review is simple,  the kids have put down their iPods unless they want to listen to the music stored.  What do you want to play a game on a 3" DS an iPod touch or a 7" Kindle - guess.  Netflix on an iPod or a Kindle ya no brainier.  Please dismiss the reviews from those who have no idea how to disable features or get upset with simple software glitches and blow them out of proportion.  For $199 the kindle has driven a stake in the ground.  You can buy it enjoy it knowing the company is not going to bail out after 90 days and leave you holding a worthless brick,  without a doubt they will be a player for the next several years.  Apple does not need to be scared but everyone else should.Buy it and have fun,  at least you won't have to sit there as you wait for a Microsoft device to boot up only to send an error message back to the mother ship every time you need to check your bank statement.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

18 of 21 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLives up to expectations,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;killbot100011-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This product has not disappointed. It does everything I ask for which is pretty much checking email, web surfing, playing games, watching videos, and reading books. Had an ipad2 and used it for those reasons but sold it two months later. This is much more affordable. I think it's a little ridiculous how there are some idiots out there who give it one star because it's lacking one feature. Wake up people, Amazon never said it was a tablet. You should have done more research. I'm very happy with the speed and overall features and the fact that we now have hulu and netflix is huge. I know I got what I paid for and much more.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

21 of 25 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!!!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Emma(Lincoln, NE)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was pleasantly surprised to receive this a day early! It is smaller than I had expected it to be, and maybe a tad heavier too. But all in all, my first impressions are very positive. I will update my review once I've had a chance to play with it a little more, still trying to figure out the app part of the device. The one thing I noticed is that the keyboard that comes is is a little small and chances for typos could be high. I guess it will take some getting used to. Overall, I'm loving it and cannot wait to know the device better!PS: Note for all folks writing useless 1-star reviews without even owning the Kindle, please STOP!! This is the place for customer reviews of the product, not a place to air your complaints.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

49 of 62 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStop posting ONE STAR Reviews unrelated to Kindle Fire,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Joe C(NY)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Seriously people... Reviews are based on the product itself, and your experience USING the product. You don't post ONE STAR reviews based on shipping and other nonsense. As for my review on the Fire, I actually give it four stars. I gave it 5 stars just to make up for some of the dumb one star ratings.In sum. This is NOT an IPAD KILLER. This device is meant for people who love AMAZON and want a smaller device with less capabilities than a iPad to carry around.People who are relying on this one device for all your needs are out of luck, you should just get an iPad.I have an iPhone 4S already, so I do not need all these extra things the Fire doesn't have. An iPad is basically a big version of the iPhone.The general: This is a short review. Not meant to be in depth.PROS: Small, lightweight, various multimedia content available, great internet browser. 169 PPI, the iPad has less PPI or pixels per inch at 132. Though the screen is smaller, the picture quality is better than the iPad. Fast processor, similar to the iPad. Supports flash, unlike the iPad. Good battery around 8 hrs. Lots of free books and apps.CONS: No camera or Microphone, however I already have an iPhone 4S for that. Small storage internally, has only 8 gb. In the future Amazon should be upgrading the Amazon cloud storage space, currently we are allowed 5gb of non-amazon content. Does not support all e-reader files, for example ones from B&N; or Kobo Vox. However amazon e-reader files are very popular since it owns most of the market share in e-readers.I will update more on my experience with this device in a couple of days. When you first power on the device there is a nice presentation that guides you on how to use this device. It is pre-loaded with the amazon app and pulse. There is a very wide selection of apps to choose from, all the well known ones we all use like facebook, twitter, foursquare, angry birds, IMBd, espn.. etc are all available.Day Two: I am experiencing problems with the touch screen on the web browser. At certain times when I just loaded a web page it seems as if the browser froze, where I'm scrolling on the screen and it doesn't move. To get out of this, I have to zoom in onto the screen a little bit. If I zoom more out, the problem still doesn't fix itself. Note this this issue only occurs on some websites, especially ones that are complex, this is something Amazon needs to fix.Second issue is documents on the cloud. I put documents on the my cloud and am not seeing them on the kindle fires document section for cloud. It says send documents to -----@kindle.com, my kindle email. I did that and so far no good. I am hearing reports that this is an issue Amazon is trying to fix.Other small problems. The amazon app is terrible, unorganized and not the same as the browser version. Its better to just use amazon.com on your web browser where its exactly the same like if you were on a computer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (8)

8 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire IS NOT a Tablet!,January 5, 2012By&nbsp;Valencia Michelle "Be blessed in all things"(South Florida)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok I received the Fire as a Christmas gift from hubby (he is OFFICIALLY my new favorite person if he wasn't before lol).  I decided to wait and play around with it a bit before I wrote a review.  I read TONS of negative comments, not only on Amazon but all over the net.THE KINDLE FIRE IS NOT A TABLET! It is not/was not/probably won't ever be designed to be a tablet.  If you want HDMI, SD slot, bluetooth, Marketplace, Apple store, facebook/twitter apps, etc THE KINDLE FIRE IS NOT FOR YOU!!! Fork over $399 plus and buy a tablet or IPad.The Kindle Fire (you DO realize what the name KINDLE is synonymous with right?) is a wonderful, colorful, crisp BOOKREADER with TONS of extras that make it so worth the $199 price tag. If you expect it to do more than read books, surf the net, play games, download Amazon store apps you will be thoroughly disappointed!For someone like me, the Amazon store has a variety of apps, games, books etc (both free and paid)that make it beyond worth while.  I love that I have access to my email, facebook, twitter, access my banking info, listen to music and any and everything else I use my laptop or desktop for.I LOVE the Netflix app and how beautiful the picture is.  I am also enjoying my 30 day trial of Amazon Prime, but I don't think I'll subscribe once the trial is over. I've been able to cut my cellphone bill by $60/month thanks to the TextPlus Gold app. I have been able to download free apps that help in every aspect of my life.One gripe I have is that magazines show up HORRIBLY! I will not purchase anymore of those.***Another gripe I have is that there appears to be a software issue regarding connecting to public wifi that has a splashpage requiring you to "logon" to the wireless network such as airports, hotels, government buildings, libraries etc.  Just the fact that a splashpage pops up will cause your device to reboot itself repeatedly until you a. turn off wifi completely, b. tell it to "forget" that connection or c. (which has been working for me until they figure out a true solution) immediately load "yahoo.com" or "google.com" in your browser which will give you the option to logon to the wifi network. It can't be twitter or facebook it has to be a page like google or yahoo.Other than that... I am TRULY TRULY TRULY pleased with the Kindle Fire and it rarely leaves my hand!***2/2/12 UPDATE- Forget what I said about magazines and hating the way they appear onscreen.  I just learned (by trial and error actually lol) that if you highlight the "Text View" option at the top of the screen, magazines/newspapers will show up like books do! BEAUTIFUL and now I'm totally in love with the Fire (with the exception of that software issue when connecting to public wifi spots that have a splashpage requiring login).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

88 of 114 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsTap Tap Tap Tap Tap  So disappointing.,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;LuLuS(Seattle, WA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is the first time I pre-ordered a brand new device as it was coming on the market.  Now I know why I don't do that. I love my regular kindle and took the plunge with the Fire because it was Amazon that was offering it.  The touchscreen would swipe but it took many "taps"  to get a response if any.  Many Many Many.  So  I could never even get into my email because no amount of "tapping" would allow me (or my friends who tried) to type in the correct short id and password.  I sent it back today.  But I want to say that the return processing was very easy and I thank Amazon for that.  I also was astounded that the box in which it was delivered clearly said kindle fire on it.  What were they thinking?  Glad I was home when it was set on the porch.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

48 of 61 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsVery disappointed,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;searad-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my new Kindle Fire today.  Despite many attempts I am unable to register it,  even though it is connected to wifi with "good" signal.  I called customer support. The first support person said my problem was too complicated for her and she forwarded me to the "Kindle Fire specialists".  This support person tells me that I need system 6.1, but my brand new Kindle Fire is loaded with 6.0.  It would automatically update the program via wifi - if it was registered.  To upgrade to 6.1 she tells me I must purchase the Kindle USB cable which has the kindle proprietary plug-in on one end and a regular PC plug-in on the other.  I am so disappointed - all of my prior kindle's were perfect!  They won't guarantee that the new cable will slove the problem.  I am returning my Kindle Fire as I consider it to be defective.  The support person also told me I will have to pay the shipping charges for the return because they do not consider this a defect - all I need is to buy another part - and I'd probably have tp pay return shipping on that too.!Since the registration problem is reported widely on the web, Amazon is aware of this problem and has chosen not to address it.  If you are considering buying a Kindle Fire, I recommend you wait a few months until Amazon solves this problem.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

127 of 166 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsDon't Buy for Kids,December 2, 2011By&nbsp;RobMiller86-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Gave my 2 boys (4 and 6) early Christmas presents of Kindle Fires tonight. We are driving to NY from FL next week and thought some tablets would be fun for them in addition to their DS's and DVDs. Plus with mobile hotspot on my 4G phone, they'd have streaming video on the ride. They were very excited as they always play with my Xoom and Thunderbolt.So I set them up with Amazon accounts and shared my Prime membership with them and set up the Kindle. Turns out Prime is not shareable for video, only shipping. First bummer but not that big of a deal.The huge deal breaker is that the Amazon App store requires a credit card to even get free apps. Once you put in your CC, you have no way to disable 1- click ordering. So now your young kids can just click around and charge the crap out of your credit card.I should have researched more before ordering I guess. I have no problem with having a CC on the account, but at least give me a way to turn buying power on and off so we can sit down together and buy apps and such and then turn it off so they can't accidentally buy everything.Yes I could root it but Amazon does automatic OTA updates that disables root again and I wouldn't be surprised to see them make it even harder in the future. I don't feel like killing warranties and such by loading custom ROMs, nor do I want to deal with headaches as issues pop up with that stuff. I wanted them to be trouble free for my kids and not turn into more tech projects for me.TLDR: Don't buy Kindle Fires for kids unless you want them to have 1-click ordering at any time on your CC. Big FAIL Amazon. At least give parents some control. Now Amazon has 2 opened Fires being shipped back for such a simple stupid issue.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (31)

279 of 368 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsCarousel of embarrasment!  (software update corrected!!!!!)  Way to go Amazon,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Tech buyer ND-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Updated 1-31-2012Ok with the software update the main privacy issues have been corrected.With that, it's now 4 stars.  This is after many months of use on the device now.  The power button and no volume control still drive me crazy.  The need for an external volume control is a MUST!!!!!However, I have found myself using my Fire a lot, even with an iPad2 sitting next to me.  You ask why...well I found that I leave my iPad2 at home and take the Fire with me when I leave the house.  Reasons are twofold.  First it's smaller and more portable.  Second it's inexpensive, so if I lose it or drop it, I don't care as much.Now for the function of the device, I find myself playing games on it and watching shows while I run on my treadmill.  My daughter plays games and reads books on it at school.  I would NEVER let her take my iPad2, but the Fire.  Sure why not.  My wife also plays games and reads on it.Still not close the leave of the iPad2, but it's not supposed to be, but it's a good buy at this price point.Still not good for web browsing or magazines, but maybe I feel that way because of my iPad2.  Can you do it... sure!?!?  Just not a good user experience.Original review:Well I was going to review how the Fire functions....  However...I think its important to let people know that ANY AND I MEAN ANY item you have purchased, watched or website last visited on your kindle is gong to show up in this items carousel at the top.  Even if you dont have it on the device.  Which is fine unless yor wife doesnt want everyone who touches the device to know what romance novels she has read, or self help book you may have bought, or movies you have watched.  NO PRIVACY ON THE DEVICE AT ALL.Hope I get to update this soon saying they have fixed this problem.Ok I need to update...lowing to one star on the carousel issue alone.Now that I have used the product more the major short comings are annoying as heck.  No external volume control...it's a complicated process just to get the volume to go up or down.The power button is in a horrible spot.  The Fire is being "put out" all the time by accidently hitting the power on the bottom...really...the bottom.  Speakers are weak and the touch screen is hit and miss.  I did not expect this to be nearly as amazing as my Ipad2 or my Iphone or iThis or iThat at this price point, but I expect the device to have the simplest design flaws covered.Don't get me started on the android market.  You can tell that these apps are all designed to cover a wide range of phones not tablets.  Having used an android phone, in the past, and that's where it will stay, nothing there has improved.  Hit and miss.... ugly and buggy.I wonder if the individuals who designed the product have ever used other tablet products out there?????  or actually use them for the purpose they say this is for.  A media tablet without external volume controls.....REALLY!Update #2Still trying to like this device....still having a hard time.  Last night my daughter picked it up and tried to play a game and the first thing she says is "where is the volume control???" I show her and she says "well that's stupid".  Which I totally agree!!Tried using the web browser and it is painfully slowwwwwwwwwwwww.  Won't even load some pages I have tried.  Small and hard to read full pages.  Mobile versions aren't too bad.Tried browsing apps and the device kept freezing and shutting down.  Finally gave up.Tried some sample magazines.  Impossible to read as normal pages and the text view is very disjointed.Notice...lots of "trying" to use!Books.....hard to read on a screen that doesn't adjust to different lighting conditions and not that sharp.  Also not near as polished as the iPad or the new nook.  On those devices you can actually "turn" the page.  A much more enjoyable experience than the touchy jumping to the next page.Movies look good, sound bad.  Have not loaded music yet.  Too many other devices in my home to waste my time there.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (33)

8 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI tried.......,April 9, 2012By&nbsp;Shubydoo(MD/WV)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I tried - I really truly tried - to love my Kindle Fire a little more than I already do.  Just couldn't do it.  I can't possibly love it any more than I do now.I've played with "I-this"'es and tablets and notebooks and all manner of electronic web/game/music/video/reader gizmos that all my friends have amassed over the last couple of years up through this latest "I-whateverisoutthisweek" devices, and none do even one single thing more than my Fire does that I want to do, and Fire does it for me at MUCH less cost.To those who inevitably say "But MY (insert trendy device name here) does THIS, and Fire does NOT!  HA!  Haaa HA!!!" I say - whatever the fringe difference is between your device and my Fire, I DO NOT NEED IT, AND I DO NOT MISS IT, AND I WOULD NOT EVEN THINK OF TRADING AT THIS PRICE JUST TO GET IT.So HA!  Haaa HA!!I use this Fire daily, I never get tired of it, I keep FORGETTING I got it to read books on because I keep surfing and playing and watching and listening and forget I'm supposed to be READING, and am very very VERY well pleased.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFirst one bad, second one good,March 31, 2012By&nbsp;Eric(Freehold, NJ USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered the Kindle and was very excited to receive it.  Once using it, it crashed every couple of minutes and the boot screen and green flecks on it.  My wife had read that if the Kindle crashes often, it is probably a bad unit.  I called Customer Service and we determined the unit was faulty.  I received a new unit two days later which has not had crashing problems.First, if you are expecting an iPad for $200, you will not be getting one.  What you will get is a very functional tablet that can you can use to play videos, read books, do some light web surfing, etc.  It is especially handy if you are an Amazon Prime member and have content stored in the Amazon cloud.  I was at a hotel last week and was watching Amazon Prime movies via WiFi since there was nothing on TV.I prefer the size of the Kindle when compared to an iPad since you can hold it in one hand.It would be nice if there were volume control buttons, but this is a minor inconvenience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIf you're going to spend $200 on a tablet, spend it on Kindle Fire,March 7, 2012By&nbsp;E. Tam(Antioch, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I had this device since late November 2011 and after using this device for about three months, the Kindle Fire power connector broke, but Amazon was excellent in handling the situation (see details below in the warranty section of this review).For $200, you can't go wrong. Granted the device is not perfect, and it's not a Galaxy Tab, but for the price, you get a lot of bang for your buck. Some complained the power button is in a bad location, but I don't think there is a good location for it. Actually, I think it's good where it is because when you're charging the device the power button lights up orange to let you know it's charging.Screen: 4.5/5Responsive to touches and the screen clarity is excellent. Watching movies on it was very good, no lag. Color and skin temperature was very accurate Only wish is that the brightness control can be controlled better. Granted there is a slider, but at it's lowest setting, it's still bright. Once you try to adjust the brightness in the lower 25%, I couldn't see any difference.Interface: 4.5/5The carousel takes a bit getting use to, but once you get accustomed to it, it's not bad. If you don't like anything in the carousel view, you can remove it.App's: 4/5Most of the apps work with this device. I see there are more and more apps that are designed for the Kindle Fire device. Most of the Apps on Amazon's website are reasonably priced. I do look at their free app of the day and have downloaded a few; works great.Books: 4/5The Kindle Fire uses the bookshelf interface, and it looks great. One nuisance is reading it darkness is a bit uncomfortable because of the bright screen. Regardless of how you try to dim to screen, it's still way too bright. After about 15 minutes of using the Kindle Fire reading in the dark, my eyes start to hurt. In normal bright lit room, I was able to read for longer period of time without any eyesore.Video: 4.5/5Most of the videos I watched are from Amazon Prime. Granted you can copy your own movies to the device, but it won't show up in the video tab, and you'll have to access it from the Video Player application. Watching movies on the device was excellent.Audio: 4.5/5The player works... don't expect Bose sound quality, but then again you're not paying Bose price eitherPower: 5/5I was able to get a 7+ hours on the device with normal use watching videos and reading books. Another positive point is that this device uses a standard micro-USB connector for charging and syncing. One less cable and one less proprietary charger to carry...Design: 5/5This is more of a preference. I personally found the simply square design easy and pleasant to use.Warranty/Support: 5/5So I had this device since late November, and today, the USB port quit charging because it looks like the connector on the Fire device was broken. I was preparing for a long phone call with Amazon and being bounced around different country speaking to different people and hoping they were willing to repair it and be without the device for a few weeks. Instead, it took me less than 1 minute to get a live person. And, it took less than two minutes for the rep to authorized a replacement device (which is being sent 2nd day air). Altogether, it took less than 5 minutes to call this in for warranty. Unbelievable service!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)













11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I hoped for,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;SusiQ-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Kindle at Best Buy today and have been playing with it for a couple of hours now...I have to say that the image is amazing, far better than I expected.I downloaded a few magazines, a couple of books and a couple of games and everything works great.I don't see why people are complaining about the speed of the internet, I think it's fine. You can't expect it to fly, the same way you can't expect it to cook you dinner (although a lot of people seem to be expecting that and more from an E-Reader).I think my only little complaint (so little it won't affect the rating), I have uploaded a few pictures to the cloud so I can get them into the Kindle and I just can't seem to figure out how to transfer data from one to the other.Can't wait to see what else this wonderful device has to offerHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAmazing and solid device with some caveats but perfect price point,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;R. Santo Tomas(Pacifica, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The $199 price point was pretty compelling, I thought. Surfs the web, magazines/books, email, and Android apps plus Angry Birds? Sold.I received the Kindle Fire the day after scheduled release.The device is solidly built. It fits in one hand much like a paperback would and in line with previous Kindle models. The device comes plainly packaged with the Fire and a USB recharging power adapter.It boots up after about a minute and required an update after I had registered the device. The walk-through of the wireless setup was simple enough. Remember, that this device offers no 3G so you need to have a wireless connection if you want internet access.It has a modest but serviceable 8 GB of memory with only a little over 6 GB that is actually usable. The screen is quite nice but is highly reflective much like the iPad so unlike other Kindles, don't think about using this thing if there is glare from behind. The weight feels a tad hefty for its size but never cumbersome or fatiguing to holdMuch like the iPad is not quite a giant iPhone; the Fire isn't quite a giant Android phone either. That is both good and bad. It doesn't have a camera - which I frankly have no need for. It also uses an Amazon custom interface that is put on top of the Android OS. It is missing some welcome features like an SD slot.The Home page isn't your collection of apps as you may expect. Instead, it's 'recent apps/books' along with a collection of Favorites that you can setup. Considering that I wil go back to the Home page quite often, I would have preferred simply having all my Apps in one full page.I connected the device to a MacBook Pro and it mounted like any other external hard drive. There are obvious folders to place movies, pictures, etc.  Less clear is where to put other files such as PDFs.Email works as advertised. Nothing amazing but more than serviceable. I did, however, have to download a separate application in order to get Exchange email server working. I would have loved to have this application included as I see many people using this for work purposes as I am. Once setup, however, all my emails and contacts synced without a hitch.The 7" screen may be a showstopper for some as text can often be quite small unless you zoom in. I found that books fared better than say magazines (depending on the publication) because fonts seem to be more consistent. I also used the Comic Book application to check out some DC and Marvel offerings. Those worked about as well as I could have hoped though I am disappointed that Amazon has yet to create a partnership with comic publishers to provide subscription models as they do with magazines.Navigation is mostly easy. I say mostly because you often have to go to the Home page before being able to access the different pages of the Fire: Apps, Books, Web, etc.  There is no easy way to jump from page to page without going Home first.I did some streaming of some Amazon videos and they looked great. The same can be said of the personal pictures that I have put in the Fire. I don't really plan to use it for music much but that works well enough as well.There are a surprising number of Android apps that you essentially download from the Amazon application that are readily available. I downloaded WORDS and Angry Birds along with a few apps for Chat. I use Quickoffice for basic MS Office compatibility for Excel and Word. You can download Adobe Reader or simply use the provided Kindle reader for pdfs. Once you register your device, you can send yourself documents via email and they will be pushed to your device via [yourname]@kindle.comYou may think that I am being overly critical but I'm not. I realize that this not have to compete with the iPad 2. At about 1/3 the price point, it doesn't need to. It has its hiccups but everything that should work - does. The only caveat is that it isn't as smooth or as graceful as I would like especially since the barriers are merely design choices in the software as opposed to hardware limitations.I hate to overemphasize the price but it really is an awesome device for the price point that it is being offered. I'm keeping it and recommending to a broad number of people that want to get into the tablet market without plopping $500.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot an iPad Killer; an Android Pad Killer,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Karl F. Arps(NEW HOLSTEIN, WI, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So, just before my new Fire is ready to arrive, Newegg has a one-day sale on the Toshiba Thrive 10" 16GB for $299.  So, I ordered one, figuring it's another no-brainer.  Priced right, open Android, 4 grandchildren I can give it to for Xmas if I don't like it, etc.  It arrived yesterday, and the first thing I did was load the Kindle app and continued reading "The Abbey".  Today, my Kindle Fire arrived, already charged and almost ready to use.OMG, what a different "getting started" experience!  Great job, Amazon!  I just need to remove my identity from the Thrive, de-register it, and buy some gift wrap for it.  The display is brighter and the screens seem more friendly.  It is so much easier holding a 7" device than a 10".  My duplicate investment has truly paid off.  I now know what my future will be: a new desktop computer to replace my old laptop.  Keep the laptop for long trips where I want to do some serious report-writing, and always take my Fire for media consumption.  For a person like me, Amazon hit the nail on the head.  I am now aware that I don't want a tablet as a computer, just as a tablet.FOLLOW-UP CAUTION:  Perhaps this is a non-issue for others.  When shopping, it is easy to buy stuff by accident.  The touchscreen can be so sensitive that you select a book or subscription or catalog item, and one-click (if active) pays instantly.  My advice is to turn off one-click under "My Account".  This isn't a complaint, just something to be aware of.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhy Everyone Should Love the Kindle Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Veeravich T. Thumasathit(Sunnyvale, CA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There is nothing I can do with my Kindle Fire (or an iPad) that I can't do on another device I already own.For watching / streaming movies and TV shows, I have a big-ass TV that is connected to the internet. I subscribe to Hulu Plus, Netflix, and Amazon Prime.For listening to music, I have big-ass speakers, and they are hooked up to my receiver.  My receiver, in turn, has an iPhone/iPod jack.  I also have a gift subscription to Pandora One which my wired DVD player can access.For real work / productivity / typing fast with all 10 fingers, I use my work-issued laptop.  I also use the same laptop for video conferencing and web surfing. If I want to surf big, I connect my laptop to my 32 inch monitor.For telephone calls, I use my iPhone 3GS, and it still works like a charm.For photos, I use my iPhone 3GS in a pinch.  When I know I want to take a boatload of good photos, e.g., while I'm on vacation with the boys, I use my Panasonic Lumix F27.For playing Angry Birds and Planets vs. Zombies (I don't play -- my kids do -- really), they commandeer my iPhone.For a GPS, I use my iPhone. For turn-by-turn directions in a robotic voice, I use a very cheap Magellan GPS unit that works just fine.For reading books, I actually use the Kindle for PC application on my laptop or the Kindle application on my iPhone.For all these reasons above, I absolutely LOVE my Kindle Fire.For me, a tablet is all about *convenient entertainment*. Yes, I can already do anything and everything a tablet does with a different device -- but with a tablet, I can do it more conveniently.  I can read a book more conveniently; I can surf the web in bed more conveniently; I can watch several movies on an airplane more conveniently.At the end of the day, it's an adult toy. And, as far as toys are concerned, I'm downright opposed to spending $500 (or more) on a toy that can easily break and that will be quickly obsolete, etc.To the iPad Fan Boys / Nook Lovers out there, I say take a chill pill. You too should love the Kindle Fire.  Sure, it's speeds and feeds may not be totally awesome and it's missing this hardware and that and some of the software seems to be buggy.  But who cares?  Let us keep in mind the big picture:- This is a 1.0 product.  It can only get better from here.  The software is already improving as I write, and the hardware will certainly improve as well.- This will put tremendous downward pricing pressure on the rest of the market.  Because of the Kindle Fire, iPad Fan Boys will eventually be able to buy new iPads for 50-60% of its current price.So I say, rock on, Kindle Fire.  Amazon has taken a big, bold step in the tablet market, and the winner isn't Amazon or Apple or Barnes &amp; Noble -- it's the consumer.P.S.  To everyone that accidentally hits the power button -- you can rotate the Kindle Fire upside-down.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy Favorite Thing,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;MARK J LEFLER-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After a full day of use, the Kindle Fire is my new favorite thing.Huge benefits:Very easy to use and fast software.  By "fast" I mean you can more quickly get to your stuff than in a standard tablet (like a normal Android or iPad).  Amazon has rethought the tablet and engineered it around the content.  One touch and you are watching a movie, reading a book or listening to a favorite song. Most PCs and tablets require you to open something (file browser, video player, music player) then select what you want to play or see.  Fire keeps content at the top son one tap and you are using it.  An the things you last used (web pages, music, book, video...) are all in a stack with the most recently used at the top of the stack.  Huge time saver.Weight: It is light.  After using an iPad for a while (22 ounces) I frankly grew tired of holding it.  It is not a practical device to hold for long periods (but is fine propped up on a table).  The fire weighs 14 ounces, about half the weight.  Less than many books, and much less of a strain to hold.  I bought a very thin case that lets me prop up my Fire when I want hands free operation.Size: It slips easily into a baggy pants pocket or carrying bag, so you are much more likely to have it with you than a heavier netbook, laptop or tablet.Cost: $199 is killer.  So cheap, if I lost one, I would not hate it too much, since I know I can get a replacement quickly and still have all my stuff. If I lost an expensive laptop or iPad, the cost is cash and worry is a lot more.Browser: The silk browser just works.  On most web sites it is very fast, much faster than the original nook color.  Flash content works great so you do not have empty spaces in many popular web pages like on the iPad (hopefully HTML 5 will eventually solve this).  And as Silk learns the browsing habits of the masses, it should get faster and faster over time.  Someone should record web page load times every day for the next month to see how this goes.  I would love to see the browser even more like Chrome, with more screen real estate for the content, but what the Fire already has works great.  Note at the present, the "Accelerate" option does not seem to speed up most web pages, so I generally leave it turned off.After your initial boot up and software update, the device switches on instantly.  One power button press and a slide on the screen and you are at your content.What they forgot to mention in other reviews:I find you can easily install non-Amazon App Store items. Just touch the settings * icon in the top right of the screen, "More", and set "Allow Installation of Applications" to "ON".  Go to getjar.com to get the APK files for your favorite Apps.  Many work just fine.No GPS: true, but the Fire has Location Services installed which uses WiFi signals to find location, assuming there are WiFi signals in your town.  So download the free Mapquest application for the Amazon App store, and tap the upper left Green symbol, and it will show you where you are, were nearby coffee shops and stuff are, and how to get to where you want to go.  You do need a WiFi signal to get the maps and directions.Amazon Prime gives you lots of content (monthly free book, TV and Movies).  Amazon Video is just so much better than the crude system they started with years ago.  Videos start fast and I had no issues with jerky videos of the past.  The videos remain synced across devices, so you can start a movie on the Fire and continue it on your televisions Roku. Using Netflix and Hulu Plus is easy and greatly expands your choices of video.Music: just awesome. Amazon lets you download all your DRM free music, even from your computer's iTunes library, to the Amazon cloud.  A quick tap on "Music" then "Cloud" and there your songs are. You can download albums and songs to the Fire, or play them directly via the cloud.  If you will be out of a WiFi zone, make sure to copy songs you want to listen to to the fire.  Playlists are easy to create.Bad things:Glare from the screen is appreciable.  Since glare is all based on reflections, you can often control this by tilting the screen so it is reflecting a dark background.  For example, a favorite coffee shop has a black ceiling, which makes it easy to eliminate the glare by holding the tablet so that it reflects the dark ceiling.  Or if you are wearing dark clothes you can do the same thing anywhere.  I will experiment with glare reducing screen savers.  The glare is no worse than what you would find from a glossy laptop screen.  I wish more makers would use matte screens which spread out reflections and reduce glare.Future Desires:An html output would be niceSupport for bluetooth would also let me use Skype and other internet chat services (the chip in the kindle supports this but they would have to add software support for this)Overall: I love it.Edit:I left off customer service.  I just got this email from Amazon:"We wanted to let you know that the price on the Marware MicroShell Folio Cover for Kindle Fire has dropped. You previously paid $39.99, and the price has been reduced to $29.99. As a result of this price change we have added a $10.00 promotional certificate to your account, which will be automatically applied to your next purchase on Amazon.com. You can use this balance the next time you order an item shipped and sold by Amazon.com."Name another company that gives you back money when a price drops!  BTW, the Cover is quite nice, so maybe I should review that as well.I corrected the fire Weight above.Update 12/20/2011:The software update 6.2.1 now being rolled out improves the handling.  The touch screen is more responsive, restrictions have been added giving you more control of purchases, and you can remove items from the carousel.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsJust perfect!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;S. Gould "gouldpjaks"(Woodmere, NY United States)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Yes, it arrived today! I, like many other Amazon fans, was concerned that others were receiving their Kindle Fire before me. I called to question the way this was handled. Today, just one day later I received my Kindle. I didn't have to go to the stores, look for parking or wait on lines. The Kindle simply arrived.This is an amazing piece of equipment. It is not an iPad but it packs so much into a smaller size and with a much smaller price tag. The box comes with the Kindle Fire and a charger. If you are a current Kindle owner, as I am, and purchased the Fire on your Amazon account, your Fire will load itself automatically when you plug it in and turn it on. Then the fun begins. It is pretty intuitive to use with just the few lines of instruction that are included in the box and the tutorial that appears when you turn it on--using the small button on the bottom. It is loaded with your books and many of the apps that you will want like Amazon, Facebook, Youtube, Words with Friends. I roamed Facebook and watched two YouTube videos--Nassau State of Mind and How to be a DJ. Both were great! Many others Apps are available at no cost or for a very small charge--usually $0.99. I downloaded Netflicks, Angry birds and Solitaire in just a few minutes. I quickly played (and won!) my first game of solitaire!Then I went to check my mail. I signed on to AOL which now remains as an icon on my screen. The pages opened quickly and easily. The size of the screen makes it easy to read and send mail.And finally I read my current book. It was easy to download from the archives which appeared on my screen. The book loaded and found my place from my other kindle. I lowered the brightness of the screen to make reading very comfortable. This didn't really affect the other screens when I returned to my email, etc.So far I'm loving this device. I do wish it had the 3g, but I'm sure there will be a 3g Kindle Fire soon.So ignore those fake reviews by folks who were just angry or never even considered getting this device. The Fire is hot!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSimple, affordable, and fun!!!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Mwallace08-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)To make it simple, this device has gone beyond what I thought it would be. The app store, movies,books and comics, internet, and even the physical construction of the device has impressed me. The only negatives I have would be the volume control, app design, and the speed to a certain degree. I wouldn't even call them negatives, just set backs that I feel could definitely be improved on.I miss having physical volume controls because with certain games like angry birds, I haven't figured out how to change the volume in game. It's not big, but I will add physical volume buttons to my wish list for the next revision of the Kindle Fire.The next would be app design. The way apps like pulse news reader are set up, I feel they can be improved. The only complaint I have with Pulse new reader is where the back button is positioned. When you hold the device in landscape mode, you have to physically move your hand over to touch the back button to get back to your Pulse home screen. It's small, but I feel this can be fixed in a software update.  I"ve only experience this with Pulse, so i'm not sure if any other apps have changed.The last would be the speed. Sometimes if you are on an internet site that has a lot of flash content, the Kindle Fire will slow down. It's nothing major, but it is noticeable. Sites that don't use flash though have been perfect. Zooming in and out and scrolling were seamless, just flash heavy sites didn't fare so well, which is to be expected on a mobile device. Speed in the rest of the device was surprisingly quick, all my normal sites I visit have loaded up within seconds! There were a few slow down's here and there, but overall, the Kindle Fire has been a lot of fun to use. I can't put it down!!The majority of these "complaints" I have with the fire are based around the software. These little things can easily be fixed over time, and I have a feeling they will. After only a few hours with the Kindle Fire, I believe Amazon has got a winner on their hands. Without touching on everything about the Kindle Fire in this review, this device has gone beyond what I expected it to be. Solid construction, fresh UI, content coming out of the ears, beautiful display, and all at a price the masses can afford. I do not regret this purchase, and I have a feeling you won't either!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent E-reader + Tablet,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Zack S(Tempa, FL)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had Kindle 3 keyboard for a while and both my wife and I love it, and we were considering to get another.  When Kindle Fire was announced, it was no brainer to get a Kindle Fire instead.  We were luck enough to receive the Kindle Fire early.  After trying it out for several hours, I absolutely love it!  The Kindle Fire had all the features that Kindle 3 offers, it can be used for an E-reader and much more.  The user interface is very easy to navigate: easily access books, movie, music, and browse online content.  I have not tried many apps yet, but the games I tried so far are easy to download and really fun to play with.  Overall, I am very happy that we made the decision to get a Kindle Fire for us.  Now that both my wife and I like the Kindle Fire, the dilemma is who should have the Kindle 3 vs Kindle Fire.  Maybe we'll wait for next generation of Kindle Fire or we may simply get another Kindle Fire instead.  I just love Kindle Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

16 of 19 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsno issues...,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;bookfinder "bookfinder"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my kindle fire... The only thing that I see a downfall is that their is no usb cord for transferring files, but you are warned ahead of time that their is none... It is just like an ipod touch/ipad... It actually for me runs faster than my iPod touch... I like this  better than the nook... The tabs are a little tricky to get used to, but eventually you get used to it...I am editing my review for many reasons...Kindle has officially won me over :) ...I have had experience with kobo, ipod touch/ipods, kindle, and nook color/regular nook... Of all the ereaders I believe this one is the best... It can do everything your iPod touch can do + more and it is faster... seriously... i don't know if it's just with the age of my ipod touch or what, but I find it faster on loading web and everything...Between kobo, ipod, nook color, and kindle fire email featureskobo their is nonekindle and ipod touch/ipad are somewhat tied... They can both load almost every email, however... I am having tech issues getting my college email set up on the kindle fire... I did however, have issues getting it set up on the ipod touch, so it may just be me typing something wrong... Nook color/tablet email only lets you use gmail and hotmail... no one else...Documents... The only document I believe that nook color/tablet supports and kindle fire doesn't is epub... I could be wrong on that, but I don't use many of the others... However, that issue doesn't bother me because epub can be converted through calibre... The kindle fire however, can support comics and you can read comics while on the nook color/tablet you can't...Kindle Fire applications are larger than the nook color/tablet applications as well... basically you are looking at the ipod store applications when you buy kindle fire... nook color does not have many applications... I actually look to seeing farmville being on the amazon store in the future... they already have that word game from zynga, so farmvilles probably next :)Price wise the kindle fire is the cheapest tablet... well next to the kobo... I think kindle fire and kobo are the same price, i haven't checked on it, but the ipad, and nook color are more expensive...Kindle fire uses the previous kindle cables if you need to transfer files, it is strong and reliable... what I have been complaining about to other people about the nook color/tablet cord is that it falls apart were it gets plugged into the device... I realize that it hasn't happened to all people, but for a majority of us it has happened to... If you look at the B&N; website search and find their cord... you will see what I mean it has a 2 star review I think... The adapter for the kindle fire is like the original kindle cable/similar to it... It looks strong enough, but I guess we'll see as the time comes... I didn't have problems with the nook color cable until about a month or 2 after I purchased it...Kindle Fire will allow you to transfer microsoft office/word documents, which I now see as a plus... I didn't expect that feature... it will be handy for my homework assignments since I am an online student... I don't think nook color has that feature, but I may be wrong... I have not really used the nook color a lot since the cord kept breaking... I got P/o'd with it...The Nook color does have the sd card slot for adding additional memory, but kindle fire has cloud memory that makes up for it... you can basically buy unlimited memory in cloud... i don't have the prices, but it was showing me when I registered my kindle fire to cloud... then you can upload your own files into cloud, so really their is no need for a sd card slot...Kobo, is a good device, but I wouldn't really recommend it to anyone... They have a neat feature with the reader awards... basically you can get awards for reading at certain times/books... You can't really buy many accessories for it or do much with the kobo now though, since borders went bankrupt, so I don't see a point in buying one...The sound is also much much louder on the kindle fire than the nook color...That's pretty much all I can think of... The kobo kind of went out since borders went out of business, so their kind of competition, but their not... you can buy different colors which I see that as a plus because I was drawn to their pink kobo, but you can more or less buy accessories and make your kindle fire/nook color pink... Then the kobo software is very tricky... like after how many uses it ask you to format their device and you basically loose everything... :( You don't get that with nook color or kindle...I am still with my previous post in the forum though... I am pretty much boycotting nook color/tablet until they fix the cable... I just don't see what the point of buying a device that in the future you won't be able to charge it because your cable will break and their will be no warranty to replace the cable... When I look to buy a device I expect nearly 100% of the device and all it's functions/what's included with it... I have not had any problems with kindle fire cable, but I have not owned it long enough to experience any problems... however, if i do, i will edit my review... Their is the plus side though that the original kindle cables are compatible with the kindle fire, so if you have a previous cable from another kindle, you can use it with your kindle fire. :) nook color/tablet doesn't offer that otherwise I'd switch to the nook simple touch cable... it's a lot stronger...Ok I have found a couple flaws to the kindle fire...1... no more sound buttons... you can only change the volume through the settings... I see this as a downfall, but i also see this as a plus... sometimes unless I have the hold button turned on my ipod, I accidentally change the sound, so that can be a plus in that way2... the kindle fire doesn't keep a charged when plugged in usb mode... it is like the nook color and the only way you can charge it is through the adapter not when you plug it into the computer... i assume that is why their is no usb code...3... itunes purchases aren't supported... well i'm not sure about music, but I tried an itunes mp4 file, and it wasn't supported, however i never expected it to be.and the kindle fire still continues impresses me... I just found a feature in the settings, but you can change your notification sounds... theirs like 7 or so to choose from... I set mine to pixie dust :)And hopefully this is the last time I have to edit, but I just found something amazing again :) If you are on the home menu, and you click and hold on the book/document you can delete it... even if it is a personal document that you transferred onto it... No other device can do that, that I know of... All the others you have to plug in to deleteKindle fire seems to work with every email, except I am still struggling to set up my kent email to it... It was hard getting it set up to my ipod though... I don't know what's causing the issues, but next time I go up to campus, I'll see what I'm doing wrong... The nook color/tablet only let you use certain emails such as gmail and hotmail, but yahoo it doesn't work with or like aol... unlike the kindle fire... almost every email works with the kindle fire, it has the same set up as the ipod touch/ipadAnd found more positive things about the kindle fire... For the microsoft office documents, go to the word application... not sure if that's what it's called... anyways click into that... don't enter those programs inside it though... click browse and you can load all your personal documents including files under microsoft office... This is what I am excited about because all my homework is due using microsoft office, so I can edit on the go...Then if you are a prime member, you can stream certain movies for free... they only have certain movies right now though... I think it's 10 movies total...My only complaint about the movies is that you can't view/stream your flixster movies... i think it's because of the way the app is designed...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

17 of 20 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThoughts on the Negative Reviews,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Ruvare-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought a Kindle Fire 3 days ago, and I've had nothing short of a blast with it. At first, I was hesitant toward getting one because of all the negativity surrounding it in most reviews. However, I decided to give it a shot. So far, I've discovered that most of the nitpicky complaints (and most of them are just that) are unfounded and probably rushed. So I've decided to comment on several and even point some things out to anyone who may still be confused or leaning toward the other tablets because of some of the negative reviews.1. From my experience, the power button is not obtrusive, as some have said it is. My guess is that they accidentally hit it once or twice and overreacted. You could just flip your Fire around so it's on the top (for some things).2. The touch screen works fine. Sometimes you have to hit the back arrow a few times, but what device doesn't have minor faults? I've experienced issues like that on desktops before!3. Streaming content with Amazon Prime, Hulu or Netflix works fine with a good signal. Unfortunately, some people seem to be ignoring or are unaware of how a wireless signal will be divided up if more than one person is using it at the same time. So if you're at a hotspot with 20 others or streaming a movie in your household while your kids are on Youtube/streaming movies and the video is choppy/audio is out of sync... that's probably why.4. The Silk browser isn't quite as fast as they made it sound before the release date, but it's certainly not as slow as many reviews claim. Not once have I become impatient waiting for anything to load.5. The lack of an external volume slider has not bothered me at all. However, most negative reviews twist this issue too. As of this date, all you have to do to change the volume on all 3 streaming services is:a.) Amazon Prime; Tap the video while it's playing and a volume slider will pop up near the upper right corner.b.) Netflix; Tap the white line at the bottom center, then tap the top right corner for the quick settings menu. The volume slider will pop up.c.) Hulu; Tap the video while it's playing and a volume slider will pop up near the upper left corner.6. The carousel moves too quick? Not for me. Maybe YOU'RE moving too quick.7. "The carousel stores my history." Rumor has it that that is going to change with the next update sometime before 2012.8. "Amazon's appstore doesn't have as many apps as...." Seriously, people? The Fire is a month old!There are more things to comment about, but I'm going to stop here. I hope I've made a point for anyone that was just as confused as I was before actually buying a Fire and adapting myself to it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

17 of 20 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I'd Hoped For...And I knew it wasn't an iPad,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Matt-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm an Apple guy.  I wouldn't trade my iPhone for anything Android, nor would I trade my MacBook for anything PC.  So when Amazon debuted the Kindle Fire, I was skeptical.  Would it really deliver?  I waited until well after the Fire began shipping before making the decision to part with $200 (maybe a pittance to some, but not to me!).  I read reviews for days, and I kept going back and forth on "should I hold out for an iPad?"  In the end, I decided that the Fire was the tool for me and that I'd keep the extra $300 to buy diapers and baby food with.In all the reviews I've read, I think that the common denominator on the poor reviews is that everyone expected an iPad-like product for a cell phone like price.  I know full well that the iPad has more functionality, more apps, more screen size, etc.  However, like many of the reviews I've read, if you don't need all that, then the Kindle Fire will blow you away.  It certainly did me.As an e-reader, it's already replaced my Kindle keyboard, due to the simple fact that I can read late at night or early in the morning without turning on a light and waking up my wife.  And no crazy priced lighted case to have to worry about, either.  Books display well, and the features imbedded in the Kindle work great.  I certainly like typing notes much better than with the Kindle keyboard. No problems with weight or anything.  I hold it just like my old Kindle.  I really like the ability to see the books in the Carousel and the home screen.  Much easier to find than on the Kindle 3.  Yeah, having the ability to organize the books would be nice, but it's not that big a deal.  You can always click on the "book" tab and go to the author view if you don't like looking at all your books as once.Second, playing games (which my kids LOVE) is a blast on the larger screen, a huge step up from my phone.  No, it's not the iPad screen, but for $200, it works really well.  And who cares about all the apps not displaying in every screen orientation?  Have we really become so lazy that we can't flip it around?  And a free app a day is pretty cool, too.Third, my experience with Silk and email has been good.  I'm not going to sit and compose major emails, or browse through a ton of web pages on this thing.  That's why I have a laptop.  But if I want to check something, or respond to a quick email, the Fire works great.Fourth, the touch screen works fine for me.  Yeah, every once in a while it doesn't respond as quick and I have to tap again, but you know what?  My iPhone is the same way.  And yeah, every so often I fly past something in the carousel.  You know what I do?  I SLOW DOWN HOW I SCROLL.  Not that difficult, really.  As to the touchscreen keyboard, I've had no problems with it.  Maybe it's because I'm used to typing on my iPhone, but I wonder what people were expecting.  Touch screens on every device I've ever used are kind of hooky, including the iPhone.  And you know what?  Operator error enters in more than device error.Fifth, the Cloud storage is great.  I've loaded quite a bit of music up, and the Fire streams it seamlessly.  Volume is good for a small device.  Haven't tried headphones yet, but will do that soon, I'm sure.  Video from Prime is seamless, too.  The combination of Cloud storage, free shipping, and free content will probably entice me to become a Prime member when the trial runs out.  Tough to beat for under $7 a month.In the end, the Fire does everything I hoped it would do and it does it well.  I was struck when reading many of the reviews by much of the criticism that we are truly a spoiled people nowadays.  The Fire is not going to change my life, or complete me.  It's a fun gadget that allows me to do fun things in an easy and convenient way.  It's for ENTERTAINMENT, and  it does it extremely well.The only thing I would seriously like to see change is the one-click option.  C'mon Amazon!  We WANT to put our passwords in to purchase!  It's not that big an inconvenience!  It's certainly easier than your having to deal with 100 cancellations and refunds when my kids purchase that Barbie Playhouse they've been wanting, but dad doesn't think they need!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

20 of 24 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA truthful review of the Amazon Kindle Fire,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;&#34;Rocketman&#34;-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok.  So I've seen all of the reviews that were talking bad about the Kindle Fire and it made me a little worried.  I am getting one for Christmas and didn't know what to expect.  So I got an idea.  I borrowed my friends for one day and I have to say those who give the Kindle Fire a bad rating, probably don't even try to learn how to use it.  The device IS AWESOME!DELETING HISTORY-You most certainly canPeople talk about issues that there is no way to delete history and keep what you do private.  Thats either a lie or someone just didn't know what to do.  There are two simple ways to delete the history.  There is one way in the history that pops up at the bottom of the screen when you hit the options arrow while looking at a web page.  You can delete websites one by one, or you can clear the history.  Also, when you first hit the "WEB" button to go surf the web, it my show some of your favorite sites you've looked at first.  If you don't want them there, just simple touch and hold your finger on them until it gives the the option to delete it.  The other way is you can go into the settings and clear the history, clear the cache, and the cookies too.  The setting button can be found beside the battery icon, just tap it and options will open up.  If you don't see the battery or settings icon, you need to tap the bottom of the screen to get the arrow to appear.  Then they will appear too.  This is what you would have to do if you're playing a game or watching a video.LOCKING OR PASSWORD PROTECTING DEVICE-You most certainly canIn the settings you CAN go into the security features and turn on the lock password.  Once you turn it on it lets you type in the password of your choice.  So there is no worry of having someone getting your Kindle Fire and going through your stuff.THE POWER BUTTONI've seen complaints about the location of the power button, which is always the lock button.  Just like the iPod touch, you tap the button to lock, or hold it in to power on and power off.  When you are powering off, it just doesn't turn off like some people have said.  The device asks you if you would like to shut down.  Just simply hit cancel if you don't want to shut it down.  The power button is not a problem at all.  Its so small I don't know how people hit it by accident, but big deal if you do hit it.  Just hit cancel when it asks you if you want to shut it down.THE TOUCH SENSITIVITYI think the touch is just as good as apples products.  In using my friends Kindle Fire I noticed it was exactly like my iPod Touch.  I've read some comments that you have to have skinny fingers to use the device and that you're doomed if you have fat fingers.  I have very fat fingers and it worked great for me.  With the pinch-to-zoom technoloy, I made sure the webpage was totally zoomed out to make the text as small as possible.  It never once opened something inaccurately.  Everything I touched, it was right on the dot.  So don't let people scare you about having fat fingers.  I was very impressed with it.LOADING SPEEDWhen opening up videos on webpages, on Amazon Prime video on demand, and on sites like youtube, the buffering rate was very impressive.  The speed of the videos were super fast.  The speed of loading websites was very fast too.  There is nothing slow about this device.One big hint I'm throwing out there that I think all the people that had bad reviews for this product should know, is that there is a little settings icon up in the top right hand corner of the screen beside the battery icon.  If you tap it, every option you can think of to customize your Kindle Fire is there at your finger tips.  From Amazon user accounts to add with passwords, to security features, to volume, to web options and history.  Everything everyone said this product wouldn't do, couldn't do, is there.The Kindle Fire is a great product.  I'll definitely be a satisfied customer when I get mine for Christmas.  Anyone who wants one or is thinking about it, I think you should try it out.  It truly is a fun little device.  From the newsstand, to books, movies, tv shows, music, games, and all the apps, it truly has everything.  Except for a camera.  But I'm not worried about a camera on it, I have a digital camera.  No big deal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

26 of 32 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat product; does what it is supposed to!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Ambam-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)[...]Product does what it is supposed to! Not an ipad, but not supposed to be. Very impressed with Amazon server and options available; smaller screen than i would like for a tablet, but makes it very portable. enjoying the free month of prime that comes with the fire and i love how fast the silk browser is! I would say if you are not wanting to spend 600 dollars on a tablet that can pretty much do everything, spending 200 on one that is pretty close with some really great stuff to go along with it is a real deal!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

40 of 51 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starscan't give to kids,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Jennifer Willoughby(Leonardtown, MD United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire does not allow you to turn off 1-Click purchasing - so unless you want to give your kid free access to your credit card you're out of luck.  It would be so simple to add a setting that prompts a parent to enter a password to authorize purchases (a standard feature on all other devices I've seen) - there is no option here.  It's so easy to accidentally order stuff that I want this feature for myself!  There may be work arounds like creating a separate account for your child, but they lose the Amazon Prime benefits and it defeats the point of sharing books etc.  My kids were really excited and I feel that Amazon has ruined their Christmas with this shortsighted and selfish im[lementation.  We are longtime Amazon fans that will be sprreading the word of this insanity until it gets fixed and will be jumping to Apple if not fixed soon.  What a disappointment!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

40 of 51 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsWhat a Disappointment,November 26, 2011By&nbsp;Cat Lover "Just buy it!!!!"(Santa Rosa, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received the Kindle Fire last week.  I tried several times to log onto a Wi-Fi connection with no luck.  You have to register the Fire before you can do anything, including reading the User Guide.  After speaking with four technicians it was determined that I need a System Batch Update, which requires a USB cable.  It is my understanding that the Kindle Fire is the only Kindle that does not come with the USB cable.  So, I have ordered the cable and once received I am to call back to see if they can perform a System Batch Update so that I can register the darn thing.  Basically, I've had it for almost a week and I still cannot use even one function on it except for the on/off switch AND I had to pay for a USB cable for an system update that should have been corrected before it was shipped.  The topper is that the last technician I spoke with stated he wasn't completely sure that the system update would cure the problem!  While I do not have a regular Kindle, my friends rave about them, which is why I really thought the Fire would be a great item.  Unfortunately, I will most likely ship it back and shell out the extra money for an Ipad.  I hate to do it, but I really want a product that actually works.  Bottom line.....if you buy one, make sure you buy the USB cable also, but really....don't waste your money on either of them.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

16 of 19 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI was suspect... until I held that sweet Kindle Fire in my hands,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Shanghaifanny-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Honestly, just reading all these negative reviews had me a little nervous about purchasing a Kindle Fire. In fact, the morning after I purchased one online, The New York Times ran an article basically remarking on  how lame a product the Kindle Fire is compared to the Nook Color tablet. That was when I decided that the only way to really understand what was good or bad about the Kindle Fire was to wait until it arrived and make my own mind up about it. According to what I had read in these reviews, I feared that it might not recognize my at home wifi network... I feared that it would be slow and hard to use. It arrived and I unpacked it, turned on and unlocked it... and it already knew the name of my wifi network! All I had to do was punch in the passcode and voil&agrave;! It works great and I haven't regretted my purchase for even one second. I'm reading, I'm on Facebook, I'm emailing, I'm watching Netflix --- and I am very, very happy. I've done my own product comparison between a Nook Tablet and a Kindle Fire and have decided that they both offer the pretty much the same exact service to consumers. It's not an iPad -- and it doesn't have to be!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Satisfied Ereader/Tablet Newbie,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;RaRamon(California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Well let me first start off by saying that I have never owned a Tablet or E-Reader for that matter. I had looked into possibly getting an ipad but it was waaaay to bulky and I just didn't like the way it felt. When this was announced i got excited and knew I had to get it. I got it today on launch day and have played with it for a bit,  it has actually blown my expectations out of the water. I had read some bad reviews, so I was really scared I wasn't going to like it or be very disappointed. Thankfully, I am not!This review is based solely on the perspective of someone who was looking to buy a reasonably priced tablet/ereader for the first time.*PROS**Love the look, it sleek, sharp, and the display is beautiful. I was amazed at how chic it looks. Love the feel and security of the rubber back.*The audio is actually a lot louder than what I expected, ALWAYS a plus(we can raise the roof with my KF)!*The response of the touch screen so far has been extremely responsive and have had no issues.*THE SILK browser is FAST, I don't know about the people who feel that it isn't as fast as they thought, because quite frankly to me it is. I would almost say it's on par with my laptop on wifi! Very pleasantly surprised.*All the stuff I have downloaded has had no issue and was lighting fast in installing. The email function is great, I have read a review somewhere where they did not like it but, it was sooo easy to set up!*Video is crisp, sharp, and very vivid, my netflix videos stream quickly and with great resolution(obviously depending on your connection)as well as my prime videos!****There are several apps in the android market that let you turn your android device into a mobile hotspot for free. Someone said it didn't support ad hoc connection or something, but I found that my kindle easily connected to my phone, so now I have an unlimited constant 3g connection on my kindle wherever I go!!!!*THE PRICE!!*Items on my cloud are so easily accessible, I forget they are not physically installed on my Kf.There is honestly so much more that I love about it so far, I could go on. So for the sake of not making this too long I'll move on.**CONS***For some reason it's a bit smaller and heavier than I thought, but I quickly adapted and got use to it. So not really a major issue, I could see where if you are use to a bigger device/tablet it might take a bit getting use to. On the plus side it is heavy enough to bludgeon a nook/ipad fanatic with... JK;)*While I charged it, it got pretty hot where I'm assuming the battery is. I didn't read anywhere that it could overheat, so it is an issue that does concern me, anyone else notice this?*The interface with all your recent/views and apps piled in a row might take a bit getting use to, but not a deal breaker at all.Perhaps it's because I have never really owned anything like it before that makes me really love and appreciate this little amazingly priced guy. If you are new to the tablet/e-reader experience I definitely recommend this product. Although I know some people don't like reading on back lit devices. If you own a smart phone I recommend downloading the Kindle app and try reading something on it for a while to see if it bothers your eyes. I have read a whole book on my android phone with no problem at all, which is what actually swayed me to buy this as an ereader too. I plan on doing a lot of reading on this.If you already own one, I hope you are enjoying it as much as I am, if you don't own one, GET IT:)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA wonderful compromise for the traveling reader,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;J. B Kraft "lonestargazer"(Palestine, TX United States)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)FIRST THOUGHTS:I already owned a Kindle DX, which I love, but when I saw the first ad for the Fire, I thought I had to try it. One of my office mates has an Ipad, which seemed pretty neat, but I thought it was a whole lot of money for a device that didn't have a real phone, plus I just wanted a real e-reader that could also surf the net and run a few other aps.After 5 days, I am very impressed with what $199 bought from Amazon. Every piece of technology we own, whether it's a car, a refrigerator, or a set of headphones is a compromise, and the Kindle Fire is as well. The compromises Amazon made just seem to be the right ones to me.First of all, the display is superb as a reader. Is it clearer than my DX screen? My wife and I think so, but it's at least as good. Books are not good -- they are great. Illustrations and other graphic data leap out at you, and once you get used to the touchscreen, it works pretty well. I do miss the quick ability to share notes and highlights as I do via Whispernet, but there is quite possibly a way to do it and I've just not discovered it yet.The handfeel of the unit is very solid, but light enough to be comfortable reading in one hand in bed or in the car. The screen is plenty bright and also fast enough to show regular definition video from Netflix in gorgeous color. While Amazon says it's not high-def, it certainly seems as high def as I need on a screen this size. My impression is that Amazon gave this the absolute best display, considering the tradeoffs of power consumption and weight.Another thing you need to be aware of is that although the Fire uses the same size and shape connector as the DX does (a USB micro), your USB charger from a Kindle DX or other USB micro device will not charge your Fire, I'm guessing the Fire needs more current to charge. I'm pretty sure this was a tradeoff to get this sexier display charged quickly.Sound is a bit different, though. It is absolutely adequate in a fairly quiet environment for audible book or television audio, but in a noisy environment such as a plane or office lobby, you will definitely want a nice set of noise-reduction headphones or earbuds. With a good pair, the music quality is quite good, as is movie audio. If you have purchased MP3s or videos from Amazon, then you will really enjoy them via this device. This device DOES play Audible audio-books, but I have not found anything about read-aloud ability (which I enjoy on my DX when riding in my car) on the Fire.Music brings up storage. I have over 300 books on mine, and used a bit over a GB of the 6+GB of storage claimed. I don't plan on using my device to listen to music that often when I'm away from Wi-fi (I have an Ipod with about 10,000 songs), but I've made the decision to leave almost all of music "in the cloud" with Amazon. I may download a few in case I need to "drown out"surroundings while away from wi-fi. Could there have been more storage included, including external smart cards of some kind? Sure, but I think it would have created more risk of allowing dust or water into the interior.The web and connectibility. One disappointment was that this device does not have Whispernet, which works well even in the rural community I live in. On the other had, the wi-fi is increadibly easy to set up and is getting rather close to ubiquitous when one travels. Suffice it to say that surfing and download speeds on both my home and office connections are sufficiently fast for me depending on the wi-fi signal, although I don't get books and other Amazon downloads as quickly as I did on Whispernet. Surfing the web is surprisingly useful and quick. Websites generally look great, but I look forward to learning more about how Amazon uses the cloud to supplement this with purchasing websites, before I trust all of my purchase or bank info to it. (Hey, I'm still not trusing cellphones, yet.) The Web is not my favorite implementation, but the typing interface from the touchscreen is absolutely great.I have heard some people complaining about processor speed, but I just don't see it with what I use it for. Aps seem to load fairly quickly -- dependent on the wi-fi signal. Video from YouTube can be choppy. My take is this is more a reflection of the signal than processor speed.A GPS would have been handy to interface with Maps and Aps, but would probably have significantly increased the weight, power consumption, and the price of the device. The aps themselves -- weather, video (Hulu+ and Netflix and I'm sure Amazon), and select other aps are there but not nearly as much as the Ipad. Haven't come upon must-have aps that are missing. You can do maps, for example, but the lack of a GPS just makes it a bit more work. No camera, but I can't see why I would miss one. I have not sent any documents to it from my computer network, but I haven't needed to. Documents I wanted to read came via the regular way -- emailing them to my Amazon Kindle mail for the device, and those documents have looked super.So, in my viewpoint, this isn't an Ipad, but it really fills my needs at a much cheaper price. With the smartphone I already own, I really don't think I needed to duplicate the GPS, the camera, and other things an Ipad would give me. The compromises Amazon made really fit a consumer like me. My advice is to find one of the available covers to give it protection (I use one by Marware), and then put it in a small bag with a little extra padding and room for your ear-buds and a charger. Be careful of the charger, because I ordered a spare and a prong broke off in shipping. For that reason, you'll want to wrap it up in some kind of padding.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNot Perfect ... But Getting There,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Jo-Ann Hague(Dayton, Ohio)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is outstanding IF ...1. You want an ebook reader that can also function as a fully-interactive, color tablet.  YOU MUST WANT THE EBOOK READER FIRST because other tablets on the market (notably the iPAD) are superior.2. You want a device that is totally integrated into all the AMAZON services, including ebook reading, audible listening, video viewing, cloud storage.3. You want an ebook reader that can showcase COLOR content (magazines, children's books, etc.).If any of the above considerations do not motivate you, then look elsewhere for your device.I happen to want all of the above.  I already own the original Kindle, Kindle 2, Kindle DX, Kindle 3 (International) ... and, now, the Kindle Fire and Kindle Touch.  Although I am ashamed of my conspicuous consumption, I offer no apology.  After all, I have a collection.The Kindle Fire is the most advanced of the lot; I find that I gravitate to it first of all my devices.The single negative design feature is the placement of the on/off toggle switch.  It is on the bottom center of the Fire, and I accidentally turn it off.  The solution is to operate the tablet upside-down.  ($200 to buy an expertly crafted tablet that must be operated upside-down?  Come on, guys!)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat value for Amazon fans,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Mark Lautenschlager "Addicted to Tech!"(Fort Lauderdale, FL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Unboxing the Amazon Kindle Fire is probably the most boring task you will ever have. After all the anticipation, it comes down to pulling one cardboard "zipper" on their "Certified Frustration-free Packaging" (you just have to love anyone who would print that on the shipping container), and lifting the lid.Inside is your Kindle Fire...and a power cord. That's it. Of course, it's a KINDLE, so the user's manual will be on the device itself. That makes sense. But the fact that for $199, the USB data cable is an extra cost option, should you wish to transfer something from a computer and not through the Amazon Cloud Drive, strikes me as a wee bit on the cheap side.The Kindle feels like a BlackBerry PlayBook. It has only one button, a small power button located on the bottom edge of the device (in portrait mode, anyway), next to the micro-USB port and the headphone jack. The internal speakers are located on the top edge. It weighs 14.5 ounces, and while that is quite a bit lighter than an iPad 2, it is quite a bit heavier than a standard Kindle. It seems well constructed and solid.Powering up the device for the first time, it immediately sets about finding a Wi-Fi connection. There's no 3G option for this tablet, but that isn't a huge issue for me. Our regular Kindle is the Wi-Fi only version and we've had no issues with that. Given the amount of streaming from the Amazon cloud and general web surfing you will do with the Kindle Fire, however, you might want to consider a "hotspot" feature with your smartphone, for data access anywhere you are. Once the Fire had connected to my home Wi-Fi network, it immediately downloaded and installed an update to the latest version of the "Kindle System Software."That software is a HIGHLY customized version of Android 2.3, aka "Gingerbread." When I say highly customized, I mean that in an absolute sense. You are completely walled off from the standard Android user interface. The home screen has a row of icons in a "Cover Flow" display (sorry, Apple, to borrow your term) that show things you've recently accessed. Books, magazines, videos (TV shows and movies), music, apps, and web sites will all be shown there. It's useful, but it's bigger than it needs to be. I never chased back more than three or four icons before I'd just tap the category at the top of the screen and find what I wanted that way.The row of categories across the very top are your primary command interface. Newsstand, Books, Music, Video, Docs, Apps, and Web. Right out of the box, my Fire had been pre-configured to my Amazon account, so the Books section was filled with our Kindle e-books that we'd already purchased, the Music section held all the music I'd purchased from Amazon or uploaded to the Cloud Player, and the Video section had the movies I'd purchased for online viewing.Selecting Apps shows you any apps that you've purchased or downloaded from the Amazon Appstore on your smartphone, and allows you to download them again to the Fire (assuming that they are "Fire compatible," not ALL apps in the Appstore work on the Fire just yet). That's a nice touch, not having to re-purchase apps.Docs is an interesting option. Amazon refers to this as your "Personal Documents" and you can get them on your Fire by uploading them to your Personal Documents list under the "Manage My Kindle" option at the Amazon web site, or by emailing them to your Kindle or Kindle Fire from a pre-approved email address. Just attach the PDF or Office format document to the email. I'm sure you could also transfer it via the USB cable...if you spend the extra money to buy one.I subscribed to a magazine in the Newsstand and found browsing it on the Fire's bright screen to be a pleasure. You can view the original printed pages or select "Text" mode for easy reading of the articles. I found myself flipping back and forth frequently. It's a simple option you touch at the top of the screen.The performance of the Fire was very good. I felt no lag or slowdowns at any time. Several earlier reviewers talked about these problems, perhaps the software update my Fire downloaded first thing out of the box corrected it for my unit. Web pages load very fast and scroll smoothly. The dual core processor of the Kindle really flexes its muscle. Video playback was smooth, but buffering on the Netflix app caused some dropped frames at first. Amazon's video streaming seemed to suffer no such issues.My usual media apps worked perfectly. Netflix, Hulu+, Pandora, TuneIn Radio, etc., all ran without a hitch. My email experience was a bit more difficult, however. I assumed that I would be able to download and run the Gmail app just as I had on my smartphone. Not so. Amazon walls you off COMPLETELY from any app made by Google. It's not just the Android Market, it's ALL of the Google apps. Frankly, that's just silly, and I expect customer pressure will force them to add the Google apps to their Appstore. I understand about not wanting Android Market on the device, because you want to check and approve the apps (ala Apple and iTunes) before people can download them. But this seems petty and pointless. (By the way, if you're an ubergeek, there are already Kindle Fire hacks to put the Android Market and Google apps on the Fire. I'm not trying them, because I prefer to run, and review, stock machines.)The built in email program, however, has support for Gmail accounts, and it grabbed my contacts from there also. Once my email and contacts were on the Fire, it felt very much like "my" device, and the entire process took only a few minutes from unboxing. Maybe that's the magic of the Fire, how quickly it feels like "your" device. This is heavily dependent on how much content you already buy from Amazon. We already owned a Kindle device, we were already Amazon Prime subscribers (allowing free video streaming to the Fire), and I had already purchased virtually all of my digital music and movies from Amazon. For us, the Fire was a no-brainer. Using it was as easy as falling off a log.If you're a Barnes &amp; Noble person, however, and have already made the investment in a monochrome Nook e-reader, you will likely find just as much happiness with the Color Nook Tablet as I found with the Fire. Just don't expect Barnes &amp; Noble to have the depth of TV/movies, music, and Appstore offerings that Amazon has, because they don't. Much has been made of the Fire's limited on-device storage, 8GB as compared with the Nook's 16GB (expandable by up to 32GB with a micro-SD card). I've been running my Fire almost non-stop for two days and it's used hardly ANY of the on-device storage. It's smart about fetching things from the Amazon cloud and keeping them on the Fire only when you tell it you want offline access (for things like airplane trips, where you won't be near a Wi-Fi connection).I still insist that the Kindle Fire is NOT an Android tablet. You are locked out from too much of the Android interface and too limited in what apps you can run for this to be viable as a general purpose Android tablet. This is a KINDLE, first, second, and third, and only an Android tablet as a very distant fourth. If you know this going in, you will not be disappointed in the Fire, but if you're expecting a small iPad for $200, you're heading for a letdown.I like the Kindle Fire, very much. I'm pleased with my purchase. But, and this is a BIG but, I was already plugged in heavily to the Amazon ecosystem of content. And THAT is where the Kindle Fire lives.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCore iPad features at a fraction of the price!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;John L. Miller(Redmond, WA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)[ Note - edited. See the bottom of this review for 'pro-tips' / warnings ]I *love* this tablet.I've got an iPad, several laptops, a netbook, several PC's, two smart phones, a Kindle 3, and now a Kindle Fire. Of all of these, the Fire is officially my favorite. At least, for home use.Why? Because it does what I care about, it does it well, and it is incredibly cheap!Amazon could have chosen to make the Fire solely a kindle media reader. Instead they've provided a general android tablet with a reasonable sized, bright display, good battery life, built-in networking, a nice touch interface, and an AWESOME price.My core requirements are listed below, all met flawlessly by the Kindle Fire:+ Effective kindle reader. I like my Kindle 3, but I *love* this. I read in the dark a lot more than I read in bright sunlight, and with the new display, I can read easily in bed without bothering my wife! The reader also feels snappier than my Kindle-3 reader in terms of responsiveness, and the color is nice for color media.+ Decent web browser. I'm able to browse the parts of the web I care about easily. Also, for academics it's easy for me to find PDF files for scientific papers and be able to read them. Hooray!+ Good video. I'm able to watch youtube, Netflix, and amazon videos, all with no problems. The widescreen display shows the videos at a size not much smaller than my iPad, and wonderfully rendered.+ A reasonable app store for extensibility. I'm still exploring, but so far it's adequate. I haven't found as much high-quality free content as I found for the iPad, but there's certainly a ton of stuff available.The Fire is about the same size as my Kindle 3 in its case, but is surprisingly heavy. I chalk this up to the battery which is supposed to let you watch video for a shocking 8 hours! The weight is noticable, but I wouldn't say it's annoying.Overall I love this device! I am looking forward to being able to read at night, and to having my own private netflix, youtube, and amazon video viewer!!!Pro:+ cheap!!+ Good display+ Nice battery life+ Good web browsing+ can read PDF's, watch youtube, and watch netflix+ Can view JPG photos, watch my own MP4 movies, and presumably play MP3 audioCon:- interface is a little spartan, takes some getting used to. Maybe this is Android in general?- a little heavy.- Looks like no proxy support for browsing across firewalls. No work fun for me :(I love it! I think I'm going to buy another one so we have two in the house!PRO-WARNINGS:Here are some issues I tripped across while playing more extensively with the Kindle Fire- NO PROXY SUPPORT FOR WEB BROWSING. I brought the kindle fire into work. I was able to connect to the corporate wireless network just fine, which was impressive (windows domain account). However, there's no web proxy setting in the browser, so I can't use the corporate proxy, and hence can't reach any of the internet services (including amazon's!) I wanted.- NO TTS (TEXT TO SPEECH) SUPPORT. I got hooked on having my Kindle 3 read books to me sometimes. This isn't an option with the Kindle Fire, the current version does not support speech output of your books.- NO NATIVE SUPPORT FOR WMV / WMA files. I copied some of my ripped music and ripped movies to the Kindle, but they were unable to play. I usually rip with windows media player formats, which are WMV's and WMA's. If you want your media to work on the Kindle, rip MP3's / MP4's and you should be alright.- ALWAYS CHARGE FROM AN AC OUTLET. You can charge from a USB cable hooked to your computer. However, USB has a limited amount of juice, and I've found that the Kindle Fire charges very slowly from the computer. If I hook it up to the included AC adapter and charging cable, then I can charge from almost no power to full power in about 3 hours.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire blazes it's own trail,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;G. Cline-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been playing with my Kindle Fire tonight, and here are some of my early observations. I have to warn you, I am an Amazon fan boy (I have a lot of friends that are Apple fanboys, I won't name them, they know who they are, and I might be one too).I don't think it is fair to compare it to an iPad 2, but that is about the closest thing you will find out there and I own both, so it makes it easy. The screen size is 7" (16x9 ratio) where the iPad is 10" (4x3 ratio), the picture on the Fire is pretty awesome, it has a higher ppi (pixels per inch) than the ipad2.It doesn't look like an Android tablet at all, Amazon has really put a lot of work into making it not look like Android (not to mention the fact that they never use the term Android in their marketing material). It is very responsive and it feels very solid.I have loaded up a video in mp4 format, works great. The Prime Video streaming is a really nice feature (if you are a prime member). I still dislike the interface to prime video. They don't have a queue system, so it is really hard to find (and remember) videos you want to watch in the future.I have a good amount of my music in the Amazon cloud, you get 5GB of free storage, and 20GB for $20/year. They had a deal a while back, buy any album, and get 20GB for a year, for free. The big difference between this and the Apple Cloud is that you can stream from Amazon, you don't have to download first, then play. This works for videos too! If you buy or rent a movie from Amazon, it can download to your device, and/or you can stream it. So you don't have to wait for it to download.The form factor is nice, super easy to hold in one hand (I do have big hands). The 16x9 viewing ration is really nice for watching videos. I am not crazy about the speakers, they are on the top (the end that points up, not the front) it is kind of odd, but they sound pretty good (not great).The downside is definitely the storage. It has 8GB on board, 6.5GB of useable space, with no expansion. That is a serious bummer for me, but not a deal breaker. You can store a lot of apps on there, and a few videos. Amazon does one thing really well, they no how to sell and everything they do is done to bring more people to their site/apps, and this is no different. I did notice that a few times I hit a button on the screen, I either missed it, or it wasn't responding. Not sure which. It has no lag, which was an issue in early Android phones.If you are looking for a tablet, and don't want to spend $500, this is a good option at $200. I still prefer my iPad, but if you want a tablet and and don't want to spend $500, this is a nice alternative.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's about the ecosystem and Fire is off to a great start,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;JMC(NC - USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Here's the bottom line.  There are people out there who want a totally open device that they can load anything and everything they want, in any format, from any source they choose.  This is not that device.  This is a device that is taking a play out of Apple's playbook and creating a device where it's really really obvious and intuitive how to get content (Amazon Book Store, Amazon App Store, Amazon Video on Demand, Amazon Prime Video, Netflix, Hulu, etc.) along with email, social networking, and the web.  This obviousness is good for Amazon and the Fire.I own an iPad and have since they came out.  The magic of that device is that it just works exactly as you expect all the time. I also own an Android tablet.  It's good and runs stuff from any source, but you kind of have to have some geek in you since with openness comes complexity. The Kindle Fire is squarely in the iPad camp of being an integrated system of software and hardware, and I expect it will have that key attribute of working exactly as you'd expect all the time.Here are my pros and cons;PROS:- Feels solid and well built- Interface is simple and obvious to use- Screen is bright and clear- Video playback is smooth from Amazon, Netflix, and Hulu- Email is simple to set up- Social networking apps (read: Facebook)- Adding apps was every bit as easy as it is on an iPad- Network configuration and other settings are obvious and easy- Wifi performance was really good.  Detected network access points with good range.CONS:- Web Browser is a little slower than expected, but I suspect Amazon and tweak in time- Interface can be a little jerky when scrolling and not quite as smooth as expected, but again I'm sure this can be tweaked in time- Geeking out for a moment, I did not find a DLNA client app in the App Store.  Hopefully Amazon will certify one so I can stream home movies from my PC to the device.So, my bottom line is that this is a device that's built around the Amazon services and that's good.  Really really easy to use and expect the little bit of interface and browser performance issues to be resolved in time (and they are minor in the grand scheme of things).This is a really good device in general, and at $200 is a bargain.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIncredible product which will be a great seller.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;globiz-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There are a lot of people who will be nitpicky with the Kindle Fire considering how many other tablets there are out there from Apple and the other Android-based manufacturers, but I can tell you right now that Amazon has a winner. I went into this purchase with no pre-conceptions, never having owned a tablet or a smart phone before and I can tell you that whatever research Amazon did in the creation of the Kindle Fire was dead-on. It's simple and easy to operate straight out of the box. Most of the problems with the operation will come from people who haven't got a lot of experience with tech-y gadgets. I found that even without the separate Android home button, etc., it didn't take that much time to learn how to use the touch-only controls.I think the one sure way to tell whether a product is a winner is that no one in our household could put the Kindle Fire down for hours after I took delivery. From me, a 51-year-old sort-of technophile, to my landlord's 20=year-old son amd a 17-year-old friend of the family, once I began downloading apps and accessing the web there was something for everyone that kept us enjoying this product for hours on end. It's like electronic crack! I love this thing and any trepidation I may have experienced was quickly dispelled by the response to it which we had. The Kindle Fire is FUN...it's EASY...and did I already say it's FUN! I can't encourage anyone who has been on the fence enough. BUY this product. Even if you don't use the Amazon Prime subscription, you still have Netflix and the thousands of other apps you can get in the Amazon apps market and the thousands more that I'm sure that they will have because  of the enormous sales the Fire will generate.There are a few things that I had problems with- my Fire was registered to someone else when I received it. Understandable since they have sold so many in advance. "Nancy",I have your Kindle and it's now registered to me after a few easy keystrokes. LOL I downloaded the apps for a couple of the Conde' Nast magazines and have gotten error messages while trying to generate my trial subscriptions, but I plan to take care of that situation tomorrow with the Amazon customer service people who rapidly responded to my email about the situation. I can't see these things stopping me from giving the Kindle Fire a five star rating. They are a relatively simple fix and you have to be pretty bitchy to allow these things to keep you from buying the product. We even have someone at the house who doesn't watch television who we have been enticing with Youtube and "Angry Birds". He hasn't surrendered yet, but I did get him to fiddle with the keyboard. He was concerned that he might spend too much time enjoying himself with the Fire, but I'm sure that eventually we will have him as "one of us".The screen is fabulous. The ease of access to Amazon products, is, of course, amazing. But you are not necessarily limited to only Amazon apps and products. Once you have used the browser for a bit, it learns and gets faster. You have apps for Netflix, Pandora, and slacker.com(one of my favorite internet music venues). I only hope that the Amazon app market picks up apps for sites like crackle.com and others with even more free media product.If you are an older user, don't be afraid to try something new. I have a laptop and I don't always feel like carrying it to the coffeeshop with me. Sometimes I just want something to read, listen to, or watch while I'm having a coffee or sandwich and the Kindle Fire is perfect for that. So it doesn't have 3G or 4G, just wi-fi. Well,wi-fi is pretty much ubiquitous in many areas and you can get tethered service to your cell phone in others. I think that most Starbucks had free wi-fi and one of the shops I go to gives you free access for the cost of buying a coffee. Enjoy yourselves, people. This is a wonderful media-consumption device which will ultimately be easy for everyone to use.I'm sorry if I gush, and i'm sure I'll be criticized for it, but anything that has this disparate group where I live enjoying themselves in so many different ways for hours at a time just has to be praised. I hope that everyone enjoys their Kindle Fire as much as I and my roommates/friends do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHow an Apple Disciple became an Amazon Convert - Kindle Fire, Excellent Value. No regrets.,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;RickMc-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a fan of Apple. I have been since my first Apple product, the iPod Touch. So, of course, I have been considering an iPad since the 1st generation tablet was introduced. I waited and waited, and the price remained a deterrent.Enter Amazon and the Kindle Fire.After becoming a near-expert on Kindle Fire reviews, I felt adequately informed to make a decision. Even after test driving the iPad, I still pre-ordered the Kindle Fire. After a couple weeks of enjoying my new tablet, I have no regrets. So far, the Fire has almost everything I wanted, and has everything I needed from the iPad.Here's what I love about the Fire and I think this list provides a little insight into how Amazon convinced me to branch out from the Apple tree:1) Portability: The Kindle Keyboard reader (a recent gift from my wife) sold me on this feature. I wanted a tablet that would slide in my coat pocket just like the Kindle. Being able to hold the device in one hand while watching videos or reading magazines was a big selling point for me. One sign of the Fire's success: iPad owners are starting to dream of a 5x7 iPad. Did anyone ever think that another company would create a format that Apple devotees would want to adopt? Especially a format that Steve Jobs so readily dismissed.2) Key App Selection: Yes, Amazon has a limited selection of apps compared to Apple. Really, though, how many of those million apps from iTunes are junk? How many of them just clutter the marketplace as you look for ones you really want or need? Don't get me wrong, I like a greater pool of choices. But I consider the limited selection something that will soon change once app developers see the number of Fires sold. Until then, there were a few key apps that I wanted on the iPad, and when I saw them available on the Fire, it helped me make my choice. Email, art, media, and document production and editing apps all gave me the full features I wanted. From a customer satisfaction standpoint, I am really impressed with Amazon's free app every day. To everyone labeling the Fire as simply an entertainment tablet: I've been pleasantly surprised at how much productivity it offers. I've got apps to create full documents and presentations, email access, and Sketchbook Pro, just to name a few of the apps that are helping me create and not just process others' creations.3) Magazines: I get too many print magazines. Most come free from old airline miles I cashed in and I enjoy them, but the stacks are growing and I've wanted to recycle them. The Kindle Fire's digital magazines look great, notably Wired magazine, which I've read for a couple years in print. I saw complaints in other reviews about the magazine format on the Fire. I don't have that complaint. The Fire doesn't have the real estate that the iPad offers, but I feel the magazine format doesn't lose its impact on the smaller screen. Note regarding the screen-size comparisons and reading complaints: I got the feeling with many reviews I read that most of the reviewers were reviewing the Kindle Fire from a stepping-down perspective, i.e., comparing everything to how it looked on the iPad. That's fine, but I think it's also unrealistic. I think many customers are moving up to the Fire from their smart phones. I've spent three years reading magazines, articles, and websites on the iPod Touch, zooming in and out to get the page view I wanted. That's not a complaint. It's a statement of how accepting we are of that format. For all the big numbers of iPads sold, the iPod Touch and iPhone has sold more. Isn't it possible that millions of people will feel like the Kindle Fire gives them extra screen-size in comparison to their phones?4) Comic Books: Yep, this was an attraction for the iPad. Marvel Comics' app was one of the early iPad apps promoted in various reviews, and not just by geeks and comics fans. As soon as I saw the Comixology app for the Fire, I knew I was getting closer to making my decision. I don't think the iPad or any other digital device gives the true reading experience of a comic book. There's something about the timing of comics and sequential art that can't be captured in an eReader in the way that a traditional book can be transferred. However, Comixology does a good job with their digital comics and for economic reasons, I love the option of buying comics for less than the typical $3.99 cover price, not to mention the free comics and previews available.5) Freebies: The Kindle Fire has been criticized as nothing more than a sleek portal into Amazon that allows you to spend more money on Amazon products. I disagree. After two weeks my Fire was loaded with apps and I hadn't spent a dime. Amazon has actually made this possible with free apps every day, a number of free apps available from developers, and the free trial subscriptions to magazines and videos. After two weeks, I finally purchased a couple apps, as Amazon knows will happen for other Fire customers. I like the fact, though, that I can be productive and entertained without feeling like I have to send a constant stream of money to Amazon. The customer service impact from this is incredible.For hundreds of dollars less, I got a tablet that does everything I wanted the iPad to do. As someone who wouldn't consider any product outside the Apple orchard until a couple months ago, I'm glad to say that the Fire has converted me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent!,March 6, 2012By&nbsp;Snoosh "snoosh"(New Jersey)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We got a Kindle Fire for our tech-savvy teen daughter at Christmas.  At first, she was mildly disappointed, had wanted an Apple iPad and didn't think a Kindle could do much.  She played with it, though, and within a day or two we regretted giving it to her because she doesn't put it down now, she loves it.  She has a bunch of free and paid books and several magazine subcriptions on it, uses it for email, found that it has a GPS function that works even when it's not supposed to be getting a signal (but it does, not sure how), and looks up movie times, weather, train schedules, etc. via the Internet.  She uses apps to post and view photos and probably many other things we don't know about.It's a quick study to learn to use and our daughter loves it.  Hers developed a problem after about three months, could not charge, possibly the charger plug or socket broken, but Amazon has exchanged it free of charge and no hassle.  How a company deals with problems is at least as important, if not more, than whether it has problems or not, since everyone has some.An iPad will do more and has a wonderful, big, bright display, but the cost-to-benefit ratio is not good (MUCH more expensive for somewhat more capability), and it's bigger so more of a pain to carry or pack.  If you need a capability that an iPad has and a Kindle Fire doesn't, go for the iPad, but I suspect that for most people, unless they are blinded by the "toy value" and prestige of an iPad, a Kindle will do fine.Barnes &amp; Noble makes comparable Nooks that also should be looked at and are great products as well.  I don't think you'd go wrong with either a Kindle or a comparable Nook.  We chose the Kindle from comparing some subjective factors such as book and magazine databases, cloud storage and memory size, tiny pricing differences, etc.  We've also enjoyed a good relationship with Amazon and found them to stand behind purchases, which by all reports B&N; also does, but the devil you know vs. the devil you don't...In summary, this is a product that is still being developed and I'm sure more apps and better features will be coming, but for the price, the Kindle Fire is an excellent product, both very useful and a lot of fun.  Actually, too much fun, it's tough to get our daughter to do homework and such, she won't put the thing down...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLooking at which to buy Fire or Nook?,February 5, 2012By&nbsp;mommybell-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After going back and forth for weeks about which to get..the Kindle Fire or a Nook..I went to Walmart and they were sold out of Nooks. That was my sign. I brought it home, plugged it in, searched my house for my WIFI password for 20 min and I was ready to go. I thought I would buy this item to read more. I like to read in bed, but its hard with a booklight because my 2 yr old is sleeping right next to me.In the first couple days I read two books. I started to play with it a little more due to a lot of doctors appts. At first, I would stop breathing if my daughter even looked at the thing, this past week she was sick and admitted to the hospital for a couple days. The Fire is what kept us sane and laughing. We download the most silly apps we could find and she loved them! By the end she was pounding on the screen and I wasnt thinking about it. I cant believe how durable this thing is. I get to read her books before she goes to bed at night and play games together when we have downtime.(She gets a little carried away with the keyboard on the laptop, which is not an issuse here).Anyway, if you are reading this review and are on the fence about which one to buy...buy this one! It has everything you want and sooo much more!! I like the fact that I can go get an Amazon gift card and load it to my account and I dont need to use my credit card everytime I buy a .99 app.This is the first review I have ever written, about anything, thats how much I love my Fire! If you are not sure which ereader to get...get this one! I work with a few people who have a Nook and everyone of them wish they got a Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBad reviews are wrong!,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;Drew-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Hello all, I purchased a Kindle Fire 2 weeks ago, after weeks of research comparing it to other tablets around (especially the Nook tablet). And I must say, after going through all the reviews on Amazon that say not to buy the Fire, I found them all to be totally incorrect.One of the repeating "cons" that I saw, was that the power button was on the bottom, making it very easy to accidentally turn off. I've never had this problem. I read, watch movies/tv shows, play games, write emails, go on Facebook, all the time on my Kindle, and I think you'd have to try REALLY hard to "accidentally turn it off".The next thing I saw was the Fire has a lack of privacy, with everything you just watched showing up on the Carousel. Well guess what, if you hold your finger down on any icon on your main menu/Carousel, there's an option to remove it from the Carousel. So there.Various reviews complained about the browser being slow.. but I say unless you're some computer geek with a really souped-up computer system, it's not slow at all. It's incredibly easy to type on the keyboard function, and web pages load pretty quickly. It's super easy to sync all your email accounts to the Kindle Fire, and the notifications let you know when you have new messages.I haven't been able to put my Fire down since I got it, I love everything about it, and encourage people to take poor reviews with a grain of salt, because most of them are misinformed or biased!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Few Things To Note,December 23, 2011By&nbsp;Student-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm not going to cover all the basic stuff that is in thousands of other reviews.  Here are a few random things that may help someone out there:- The latest firmware update (12-22-11) greatly improved touch response and browser speeds as well as letting you delete things from the carousel (which some users don't like but I find it useful and a lot of fun).  It also let's you password protect wireless which can help if you have kids or other people using your device and don't want them purchasing things.- You can sideload apps onto it; meaning you can put apps/games/books etc that don't come from Amazon.  No, this doesn't have the Android marketplace but it is easy to load stuff from say, your phone without having to root the Kindle.- If you don't like the default web browser I would recommend sideloading Dolphin HD which works great and provides a few extra features.- You can also change the default interface this way by installing a launcher such as GoLauncher from the Android marketplace.  This gives you a bit more control and pretty much makes it like an android phone.  I tried this but quite like the stock interface because it reminds me that it IS a kindle and not my smartphone.- This isn't as fast as the iPad and it isn't supposed to be.  I find it to be very usable however I did suffer from unregistered taps and a bit of lag overall.  With the latest firmware update it feels much smoother and I don't have nearly as many hiccups.- For some reason uploading anything except music to the Amazon cloud WILL NOT appear on your Fire!  This is a big issue that needs to be addressed.  I don't find it to be a problem because books are so small and I'm fine with having 1 or 2 videos loaded for a trip.- The Fire takes a bit longer than I would like to charge up (it comes fully charged fyi which was a pleasant surprise).  The battery life in general is pretty good, I can usually go the whole day and just charge it up at night.- There is no camera or microphone.- There is glare from the LCD which makes it difficult to read/see outdoors.  I do enjoy reading on this very much though, but if you read primarily outside or with a lot of bright ambient light you should be aware of the glare issue which all LCDs suffer from.- If you read at night I would recommend sideloading an app called screen filter - which reduces the brightness even below the lowest you can normally do on the Fire.  It is still a bit bright in a completely dim room and this helps.All in all I am very happy with the Kindle Fire!  I was planning on paying ~$500 for a bigger tablet and I am so glad I didn't.  That is a lot of money for a luxury device in my opinion. The Fire is very solidly built and the screen is killer.  The only thing I wish it had was a front facing camera for video chats but I can live without it.I really like the size and weight as well.  I picked up a case that makes it look like an old book (from Versa) and I have been loving this thing ever since.  Apps and games run great, you can tweak it a bit by loading a custom launcher or sideloading apps, even root it and install cyanogen mod if you like.  I haven't felt the need to change much of anything though.  I like the stock look and feel and everything is well integrated and very easy to navigate.  I use this for listening to music/audio books/pandora, surfing the web, email, streaming vids, playing games, reading news and of course reading books.  It does all of these things perfectly well.  I love the size and most of all I love the price.  It isn't a 7" ipad and if you expect it to be you will probably be disappointed.  I didn't expect it to be and I am one very happy camper!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSTOLEN! JOKE ON THIEVES!,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;whacky_lady-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely LOVE my Kindle Fire! Thieves stole my Kindle...&amp; the joke is on them! I had it DEREGISTERED &amp; now it is totally useless to the them! LOL! It is reported to Amazon as stolen, so it can't be re-registered by anyone but me (if recovered)! This is a wonderful feature of the Kindle Fire. I reaslly miss my Kindle Fire &amp; am ordering a new one right now.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTotally pleased with the Kindle Fire!,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;C. Keppen "Carol K"(Arkansas)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am totally happy with the Kindle Fire.  I originally purchased the Kindle Touch because of the WiFi and 3g capability, but was quickly unenamored. When I found out the Touch did not have the rotating screen, I wondered about the power button being located on the bottom.  I wanted an ereader for distraction while on a treadmill or elliptical machine and was concerned the Touch would get bumped into powering down at an inopportune time.Consequently, I traded in the Touch for the Fire and gave up the 3g.  I am so glad I made the switch!!! LOVE, love, love the Fire!  It is extrememly easy to use, downloads apps and books quickly, and the rotating screen is WONDERFUL.  I also love the color vs. the black and white screen.  Not only do I read, I play games (Words with Friends is so easy to play with the Fire), check my email, Facebook and Twitter.I am still exploring all of the different things the Fire can do, but am very pleased with the purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhat's the problem?,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;RMS-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've read so many bad reviews for the Kindle Fire on websites across the web.  Most of the reviewers are forgetting how much this costs - $200.  They complain that it has a small screen, no GPS, no camera, and it's not called an iPad.  They can't stop comparing it to the iPad, which is more than twice the cost.  I don't get it - have you ever seen a review comparing a Chevy to a Mercedes and concluding the Chevy is no good because the Mercedes is better?So what are you looking for in this item?  Do you want an e-reader that1) fits in your pocket?2) plays music?3) plays video?4) stores and displays your documents?5) allows you to download and read your favorite magazine?6) browses the web?7) has access to thousands and thousands of apps - including one free premium app EVERY SINGLE DAY?8) costs only $200?If you answered yes to the above questions, then buy the Fire.  It's a great product.  Is the interface a little sluggish at times?  Maybe once in a while.  Does the touch screen on occasion not respond to your finger?  Yes, sometimes.  Do either of these minor issues ruin the Fire as a product?  Not at all.  Don't believe the so-called "experts".  Most people probably won't have any complaints at all.This is a consumption device.  You can connect to your computer and transfer your own photos, videos, books, and music - but what Amazon offers is instant access to their wealth of content offerings.  And with a membership to Amazon Prime, you get even more, including thousands of free Amazon Instant Video shows and movies, and the ability to borrow one NY Times Best Seller every month.Bottom line - buy the Kindle Fire, your whole family will love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFire as an ereader.,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;bluishlights-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ive had the Kindle Fire for less than a week, but I have been reading the whole weekend. I purchased it solely for this purpose. I don't really need a tablet. I have all the gadgets I need for that. I just want a touchscreen colored Kindle. Yes, I refuse to buy a Nook because I am a very loyal Amazon.com customer. I didn't preorder it, I got it in a local Best Buy store. Quicker than 2 day shipping. Ive read a lot of negative reviews about the Fire as an ereader, but for me it's doing its job. I usually finish a book in a week. But I'm now on my 2nd book in my 3rd day, so my rate has become faster.The ereader has an option for grayscale, black or beige. If you're reading in the dark, the black screen with white font (though i wasn't a big fan with any other device) was not bad. It didn't hurt my eyes after a couple of hours. The gray background is almost like the Kindle, especially if you put the brightness all the way down. It looks so sharp and looks like it glows. Like a Kindle without the need of an external light. The pages look like its going to pop out of the Kindle that it makes me think for a split second that it is a real page in a book. So it works out for me.The cons to the Kindle Fire for me:1. It's probably twice as heavy as the old Kindle. It gets tiring after a while. I get more tired holding it than my eyes reading.2. I wish it had the text-to-speech feature, for when you get tired of holding or doing something like washing dishes, I can still 'read'.3. The highlighting part is wonderful. Touchscreen really is a marvel. But the thing is, after highlighting, there's no option to share it to Twitter or Facebook. So I end up going to my Kindle3 and sharing in Twitter and flooding.4. I wish the pages option will be available to the Fire as well.5. I can't organize my books in folders. It's just all in one place. I would like to separate my books as Read, To Be Read, etc. But. I just have to go to the books section if I want to do that I guess.6. I can't delete books lent to me. It just gives me an option to add as favorite or buy. Doesn't make sense.Thats all i can think of right now. Hope this helps.:)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsReview from a college student,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;E. Luna "FPS Connoisseur"(Austin, Tx)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had the kindle fire for a little bit less than a week now, and I have to say that I am mightily impressed with the quality of this product. In the span of a week this device has literally become an indispensable tool for studying and for some off the cuff fun as well. I am currently in finals week in my university, and my Kindle has allowed me to study while I am on the bus without having to take put my unwieldy laptop from my backpack. In fact I have largely neglected my laptop while I am on campus. The ability to have all my .pdf and .doc files readily available for me to read is something liberating for me. I am studying in a big university so almost everything that is handed out by professors is electronic in an effort to alleviate the dependency on paper handouts. As I write this I am reading all the necessary books and notes for my English final. The Fire is a primarily a media hub for Amazons extensive library of movies, apps, magazines, and books. In a way, the Fire was created to accommodate nearly all of the services that Amazon offers for prime members under one roof. Having Netflix, and the Amazon video service gives me a plethora of videos that I can choose from. As soon as I received my Kindle I downloaded "The Hunger Games" as part of the Kindle lending library. I am thoroughly impressed with the reader program that the Kindle offers. Make no mistake, the e-ink is obviously better than a back lit display, but nonetheless the Kindle Fire gets the job done admirably. In my opinion the 7" display is just right for this type of product. It allows for portability and easy-access when in a tight room. It's also big enough to be convenient when surfing the web or reading a book. I use glasses, so my vision is far from perfect, but I have no difficulty reading the text on the Kindle. Speaking of surfing the web, the Silk browser is spectacular. At first it may seem to be a little slow, comparable to the browser on my Droid X, but with constant usage, my most visited sites load in a pinch. This, in essence, is the point of the Silk browser. It picks up on repeated usage and it pre-loads websites that are constantly used by you. Given more time, I'm sure that the Silk will continue to improve its performance. One of the benefits of being in a big campus is that I am literally on wi-fi nearly all the time. Watching videos on the Fire is also something that is easy and fast. As of my purchase I have seen a few episodes of American Dad on Netflix and a plethora of videos on YouTube. Every single time I have had a wonderful experience. Some consumers have gripes regarding the hardware itself. The power button being on the bottom makes it easy to accidentally turn of the Fire. The lack of physical volume buttons. Some even complain that the Kindle fire is to plain looking. First off the power button issue can be resolved by holding the fire upside down. No, I'm not crazy. The screen adjusts itself to however you are holding the device. The volume buttons issue is not a deal breaker in any way whatsoever, because lowering or raising the volume is easily done through the quick-settings tab that can be accessed by tapping on the gear in the upper right hand corner. As far as the device itself, I love the design. I love simple, elegant devices that  are not garish or tacky. The back is made of a slightly rubberized material that is easy to grip on to. The only thing that is embossed on the back is the word "kindle" and an amazon branding is printed on the lower end. The screen is vibrant and bright, and it is made with gorilla-glass so scratching the device won't be easy unless you deliberately are trying to do so.On to the memory space. The kindle has about 6.5 gigs of available memory. It's not a lot, but the cloud service that is included with the device is downright impressive. It is so easy to download books, apps, or movies that are saved in the cloud. In a way you have unlimited space on your Kindle Fire through the Amazon cloud service.For the price this product is amazing, phenomenal, stunning, and a true bargain. For those of you who love tinkering with your devices, you can root the Fire and make it run just like a normal Android tablet. I, myself, am an "out of the box" customer, so I tend not to mess around with the software like that but it's nice to have that option. So as a college student, I give the Fire two very enthusiastic thumbs up!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsI might return mine. Definitely NOT for parents with kids.,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Sam Johnson(Florida, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really wanted to like the Fire and it's not horrible for 1.0 product, still, I might return mine. It's just not what it needs to be and is actually a hazard to leave around the house if you have kids.  By "hazard" I don't mean that it can break and hurt your child.  I just mean content wise there are no parental controls and lots of opportunities for kids to view things that many parents don't want their young kids to see. I'm not trying to sound prudish, but in addition to it's many other flaws it doesn't seem like a good idea for Adults and Children to both use this device. I'll explain a bit more below.But first, the Fire might be worth it if...- You have Amazon Prime and no kids. I have an iPad which I love.  But I can't access any of Amazon Prime's video content on it because there is no Flash support. The Kindle Fire does allow you access that content well and I enjoy it for that. If you don't have a Prime account, honestly I don't think it's worth the money.  So unless you are willing to pay $80 a year for Prime, then I wouldn't get the Kindle Fire.Don't Buy it if...you have kids.- I have kids and I don't want them to touch this thing by themselves.  Why? There are many reasons:No parental controls that I can find. Kids can view racy videos and racy book covers from Amazon pages. Could they do this in theory on my iPad. Yes, probably.  But the kids would have to go out on the web, go to Amazon, navigate the site to get to the right pages, they would have to know my password, etc. But with this Kindle Fire, everything is right there and easily to find.  Plus,whatever you look at immediately shows up on the front "carousel" and there is NO WAY to delete it that I can find (at least not at the time of writing this review). So that means if my wife picks this up and decides to watch an "R" rated movie, let's say, it now appears in the carousel and the next day if the kids pick this up they see this movie front and center and may think, "Hey, what's this?" and start watching it.Sure, you may be thinking.  Then just keep it away from the kids.  Yes, I can and am doing just that. But one of the whole selling points of the Fire (at least in the initial review I read), was that this low cost device is perfect for kids because of the low cost and thus lower worry level for parents if they drop it or mess it up somehow.  And Amazon is clearly targeting this device for use by kids, with everything from kids books, to games, to learning apps. I wouldn't be surprised if they even advertised it as a perfect device for parents who have iPads, but don't want their kids on the iPad so they can get this lower cost Amazon device for the kiddies to use. I wouldn't recommend that.  There are just too many ways for kids to find stuff they probably shouldn't and no useful parental controls that I can find.Here are a few other nit-pick dislikes:- No external volume control. This makes the device a huge hassle in many situations. And even though you get used to it after awhile, the annoyance factor never goes away.- Small "touch screen" elements. Here's the thing, I don't have a problem with the small screen size, what really is annoying is that so many things on the screen that you have to touch are so small.  I suppose this could be fixed with a software update--and I hope it will.  But right now there are many little "buttons" you can touch that are so small that I often have "tap" errors (i.e. pressing the wrong thing).  This really needs to be fixed.- Really limited number of apps. I'm sure this will improve over time, but right now there are really only a handful of apps worth owning.- Web browsing experience is SLOW. You know, after seeing the Amazon promotion video about the "Silk" browser and how speedy it was I had high expectations. Great idea, I thought. Ummm, not so much. This is really slow browsing. If this is what Silk can do, I'd rather pass and download Google Chrome...but Amazon doesn't give you an option to use any browser but their own.- Touch screen trouble. About half the time I have to touch the touch screen more than once (or twice) to get something to activate.  It's just annoying and frustrating.  The weird thing is, it isn't consistent.  In other words, some days the touch screen seems to work pretty well, other days it's rather unresponsive. Don't know if this is a hardware or software thing. Hopefully software so they can fix it with an update.In the end, I just don't think I can recommend this to people to buy.  Especially not for parents.  Right now, I can't decide if I'm going to keep it or not. Since I do have Prime, I might keep it.  But here's the truth.  If I had had the chance to actually USE the Kindle Fire for a week or two before making my buying decision I wouldn't have bought it. It's just not ready for Prime-time yet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsIpad Killer ??,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;A. Shaw(Chicago Illinois)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all let me give you a basic background on myself.I consider myself Android/Technology enthusiast.  I currently own the original iPad 1, Motorola Xoom, The original Samsung galaxy tab 7 and the current 10.1. I currently own a samsung Galaxy S II cellphone and will purchase the Nexus within the next 12 months.When the Kindle fire was first introduced  it was described as a potential iPad "killer"In my opinion the Samsung Galaxy 10.1 meets that description.I felt the Kindle fire was priced nicely although I knew at that price there would be some "shortcomings".1. Look: This device tremendously resembles the Blackberry Playbook (which turned out to be a total flop).2. Camera: Although I knew before I purchased the Fire it didn't have a camera, this was an issue that constantly "nagged" me whenever I took it with me.3. Book reader : The Kindle fire is simply too heavy for long term reading.4. Internet use: It frequently disconnects from my home wifi and after 1 week of heavy useage the "silk browser" was a total letdown (its no faster that the galaxy browser).5. Screen: there are very noticable sensitivity issues using the device . Many times I needed to press the screen with more pressure before it responded.6. Power button: The poorly placed power button on the bottom of the device would frequently turn the device off when it was placed in a "portrait" position.7.Volume control: Its rather awkward to adjust the volume as u will need to "swipe" down from the top of the screen to get to the volume control as there are no physical buttons to accomplish this.8. Battery life: This is an area that I feel is adequate.Personally speaking: I would have rather paid $300 to $350 dollars for this device with a camera and an SD card storage option.Conclusion: Although this is the first release of this device, its far from an iPad Killer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsBest for reading comics, web browsing is annoying,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Carl Martinez "Carl Elvis"(New York, NY)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Even though I own an iPad I picked up the Kindle Fire because I wanted something more portable.  After two weeks playing with the Fire I find myself just using it to read comics, which it does perfectly.  When browsing the web you'll find yourself constantly zooming in because most pages load too small.  The software is buggy and you'll find yourself touching a button on the screen 2 or 3 times before it registers as a click.  Overall I'm keeping it just to store and read my comic collection, as the size is just right.  For books I recommend getting a device with E-ink like the regular Kindle Touch or Barnes&Noble; Nook Touch.  For web browsing I'd say get an iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNook vs Fire - an honest review from an ereader fan,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;tfremon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I wanted to share my thoughts comparing the Nook Color and the Kindle Fire.  I am an average housewife looking for a good book and a game every now and then.  I was not wanting a "tablet", just an ereader with more capabilites than reading books.  This summer I purchased a Nook Color and I preordered the Kindle Fire.  I wanted to compare them and whichever one I liked best I would keep.  The loser would go to my kids.After using both, I have decided the kids will get the...Nook Color.  But I might add, that I believe the Nook Color was the best choice for my kids also. For the following reasons:I love the Nook Color childrens books.  They are interactive and keep my kids attention (ages 4, 6 and 9).Most importantly, they have parental controls for downloads.  The Fire lacks parental controls, therefore only getting 4 stars.  My 4 yr old has already figured out how to order apps on the fire, to my dismay.  The nook color also has great apps for children, although a lot of them you have to pay for, whereas, you can find many of the apps on the Fire for free.The Fire weighs less than the Nook Color.  I believe the Nook tablet weighs even less than the Fire.  I don't have an e-ink reader, so I had nothing to compare the weight issue to.  I can hold both the Nook and Fire easily and I can hold them for hours reading books on them.  In my opinion, the weight is a non-issue to me.The Fire was the best choice for me over the Nook Color for the following reasons:1.  Smaller in size.  It is nice for me because I don't carry a big purse and it fits nicely in there.2.  Wi-Fi.  It is a tie between the Nook and Fire.  I don't need 3g because my intent was not to be able to browse the internet from anywhere.  I would get a smart phone if I wanted that.  The wi-fi suits me just fine.  Although on the fire, it tends to loose its signal more in my home than the Nook did.3.  Keyboard:  I like the keyboard a little better on the Fire.  It is easier to tap and with auto correction, it makes typing emails a breeze.  If I had to type a long email or document, like this review, I prefer the standard keyboard on my laptop.  But with the need for minimal typing the keyboard on the Fire works great.4.  Apps:  By far the winner is the Fire.  It has great apps and many I have found are cheap.  I am not a professional and need a lot of utility apps.  I just mainly browse the games, both for myself and my children.  I have found that many I had to pay for on the Nook, were free on the Kindle.5.  Streaming:  I tried to stream one video on the Nook.  It didn't go so well...it had lots of hangups and was very choppy.  Although I really don't stream a lot, the Fire does a much better job of that. I have also downloaded a couple tv shows to keep on my kindle in case my kids get restless at the doctors office, store, etc.  That comes in handy quite a bit.6.  Music:  I don't really download music so I don't have any comments on this area.  I do, however, have the pandora app and listen to music that way.  Works about the same on the Nook and Fire.7.  Speakers:  This is one area the fire lags.  Both speakers are located on the bottom and when you are watching a movie, all the sounds come from the left or right side.  But it is not a problem if you use earbuds.8.  Amazon Prime:  I am disappointed with the free shows or movies amazon offers for their Prime members.  My kids wanted to watch Edward Scissorhands, which was made YEARS ago, and I had to pay to rent it.  It was not offered to Prime members, which was disappointing.  But I do love prime for the book lending.  I noticed they had a Chelsea Handler book that I paid $13 for to read on my Nook, and I could have read it for free on the Prime book lending program they have.  The free shipping is also great, but everytime I order something, it takes 3 days to get to my door instead of 2.  I am not upset by that because I would be just as happy with ground shipping, but Prime does offer 2 day shipping and for me it is not 2 day.9.  Memory:  This was a big one for me because the Fire does not have a memory expansion slot.  Before I got my Fire, I looked on my Nook and found out how much memory I had left.  I had a multitude of apps and a lot of books and I used less than 1gb.  I never used the expansion slot for my personal need.  I was still concerned about the Fire with the memory, mainly because of all the reviews out there.  I LOVE the cloud and it suits my needs just fine.  Again, I don't watch a lot of movies or videos on the Fire, so I have plenty of memory for me to use.  I have 1 hour of video, many books and about 50 apps on my Fire and have used less than 1GB.I know there are a lot of consumers out there that are trying to figure out which ereader tablet to buy this holiday season.  Honestly, you can not go wrong with either one.  But in my opinion, I feel the Fire has more features on it than the Nook.4 stars for the Fire.  I will change to 5 if they put on parental controls soon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Notes and Observations,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;C. K. G.-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Initial thoughts, the Kindle Fire is much "meatier" than I suspected it would have been. It is a solid piece of hardware and its weight, although not heavy, gives it a very sturdy feel. Time will tell if this is an illusion or a truly robust system. The rubber backing is pleasing to hold and the screen large and crisp. The micro-USB link uses the same chord as the older Kindle (Keyboard) although this is not supplied and must be purchased separately. If, however, you own an older Kindle then you can use that cable to connect the Kindle Fire to the computer. This makes transferring your mp3 files to the music folder possible. Transferring video--at least in the MP4 format--can be done but the files do not play after dragging the files into the video folder until you look at the "Gallery" app. This is the icon that looks like a photo of a mountain scape. Click on that and the videos will appear. Apparently, the cloud does not let you upload your own videos, only those bought by Amazon.  The stereo headphone jack is next to the USB plug, which in turn is next to the on/off button. Since you cannot use the Kindle Fire while it is connected to the computer, space for jacks is not a problem. If you are charging the device this section is tight, but not terribly bothersome. Just to be clear, you can use the Kindle Fire while charging it, although if you are connected to a computer you are locked out until you eject it.There are some reviews that have complained about the placement of the on/off button being inconveniently located; so much so, that the Kindle Fire is often inadvertently turned off. I find this complaint extremely exaggerated because like the Android phones and iPads, once you rotate the device it orients the screen to accommodate the vertical and horizontal. In other words, if the button is on the bottom, after the initial login (if password protected) simply turn the Kindle Fire 180 degrees and the button will be on the top and out the users' way. This seems pretty self evident, but maybe it is just me. I am not concerned with any minor software glitches since I believe most will be corrected with software updates later on. So far, these amount to some lag and some repetition of button pressing during operation. Another example is email which syncs with your account--in my case Hotmail which I used the Hotmail app--but after deleting an email, a subsequent sync will resurrect the deleted emails as if they were new. Again, I think software updates will correct this.I have only downloaded a few apps including Netflix that does not come pre-installed. The movies streamed beautifully and with only a brief and minor loss in resolution, which I suspect is a product of my wireless router trying to keep up and not the Kindle. Angry Birds--the app most people will probably get--worked just fine. Reading, the main reason for owning this device, is similar if not identical to an Android phone with the same options: black, white or sepia backgrounds, text size and font are all available. What is not available is having the text read back to you. Again, just to be clear, Text-to-Speech on the Kindle Fire is not enabled and for me this oversight is a major reason why this review only has four stars instead of five. Also missing are the page numbers which was added on an update to previous Kindle. Hopefully this will be corrected soon. Reading in the full sun is possible with the brightness turned up to 100% although this may limit the battery life. The only concern to outside usage is that buried within the User's Guide (pre-installed) it states that the Kindle Fire has a maximum operating temperature of 95 degrees so having a black device on a hot beach may not be a wise choice.Web surfing is, again, similar to an Android phone and most websites load as if it were a mobile device which is strange considering you must be tethered to a wifi source. It may be due to the screen size which could limit larger webpages readability. This means that most web pages load a "mobile" web page, which can drop videos and photos especially if you are reading your favorite blog. That said, if you go to YouTube you could easily access and watch any video without any hiccups. Pandora is also available and if you really want to open it up you could install the B&N; Nook app to add more books to your collection. This option, however, requires unlocking the device and downloading the B&N; app from another vendor. Just do a Google search for instructions. Having added the Nook app I am apt to rename this the "NooKindle".Overall, it is a solid reader and worth the price tag of $199 although I am not about to discard the e-ink version just yet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA lot of features and solid performance for an inexpensive tablet,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;BobN2Tech(Orange County, CA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had the Kindle Fire for about 1 week now. I am very pleased with its interface, performance, and the content it can access. I bought a 2nd one for my wife as a gift for the upcoming holiday as well.  While I've read critical reviewers that expect the world of features and compare it with the Ipad, they really miss the purpose, value, and quality of this device. The design is simple and uncluttered. Why do we need a designer look? Why do we need a camera, bluetooth, GPS, or mic on a player device? I am carrying an Iphone that does the communications very well and don't need another device for that. Do I really need an HDMI output? If I want to watch on TV, I use my Apple TV or Roku the same content. Or use one of the Apps to stream to the Apple TV.I appreciate the content delivery of music, movies, photos, and the ability to put many "apps" on it for fun and games. I find it to be quite responsive in web browsing, perhaps not as quick as the Ipad or my PC, but it certainly is by no means slow as others may have criticized it.  Movies play back both streaming and on the device in great color with smooth motion. The battery life on streaming seems to be around 5 to 5 1/2 hours, and 6 to 7 hours on movies on the unit with Wifi turned off. This is fine for most situations, even a long flight (how many movies can you watch in a row?). Yes, I would love to have a 24 hour battery so I don't have to charge it, but it's not a deal breaker. The unit is very stable, I have not seen it crash at all. Perhaps, occassionaly it exits the application rarely. This means a lot to me, because that is one of the best virtues the Iphone and Ipad have - stability.Now that all being said, there are 3 items I find somewhat annoying and should be addressed in this model as a firmware update, or the next model:1) No hardware buttons for volume control.What makes this worse, is that the speaker volume and headphone volume are tied together. You can't set the speaker volume independently from the headphone volume. So if you are using the Fire for listening to a movie without a headset, then next time start music or a movie with the headset plugged in, your ears get blasted since normally the speaker volume has to be all the way up to hear it at normal room volume. So Amazon, at least seperate the volume levels! This does not require a hardware change.2) The power button is in a rather awkward spot. It should be on the upper right or left, but not in the center.It's so easy to grab the unit, then rotate it for a movie in the landscape mode and your hand touches the power button momentarily and turns it off.  Now, again Amazon, a simple software fix will take care of this, by requiring the user to hold the power button for 3 seconds to turn it off, and even in that case, a prompt could come up asking if you want to really turn it off.3) A home button would be handy.Again, why not use the power button to get you home by double clicking? That's an easy fix.Although not in the list - because it is not too important, but would be nice - is a light sensor to dim the display at night. It's not a big deal to turn it down, but that would be a nice convenience. As a software feature, maybe something tied to the clock on the unit, so after a preset time, the unit's brightness will lower to some specified percentage.I highly recommend this device for most people that like an easy to use, content rich device. It's reliability is key to not being frustrated with crashes or ill behavior. I would give it five stars if Amazon can address my 3 issues.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt is what it is trying to be.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey Niccoli(North Wildwood, NJ United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got mine today and my first impression of this is positive.  It looks sleek and is pretty responsive.  Mind you, I have an original Droid phone that is NOT very responsive any longer (even with custom kernels and such) so me thinking this is responsive should be taken with a grain of salt.When I first turned it on it was already set up as mine.  I didn't have to configure a thing other than log it into the wifi and let it download updates (and log some apps in and stuff).  This is awesome as it could be a good gift for someone who is intimidated by electronic gadgets.When using it, it is not obvious that it is an Android device.  Everything is custom.  I have no issue with this, but I think others might be expecting an "Android Tablet"... which this is not (in my book).  There is a lot of things you do on a Droid that work slightly differently on this (for instance, the notification bar at the top you usually flick down and up, but on this you just tap the left side of the bar to bring it down and touch the right side to bring it back up).I have the amazon market installed on my Droid and all the apps I have bought (or gotten on the "free day") are available to me for free on the Fire.  There is NO access to the Android Marketplace that I can find.  There is, however, a setting that says "Allow installation of Applications from unknown sources" which leads me to believe you can sideload apps.  I haven't tried this though.I have Prime and did play with the prime streaming on this and I'm impressed.  It was quick and looks very nice! I briefly tried to tether it to my Droid wirelessly to test streaming this way but was unsuccessful (Fire didn't see my phone).  Not sure why.  Will try this again later.The built in speakers exist... but are not awesome.  Good for in a pinch or listening to music randomly, but I will be bringing headphones with me for this.  Also, the speakers are both on the top of the Fire... and you turn the thing sideways to watch a movie...  so both speakers are at your left ear...The power button is on the bottom.  This is my biggest gripe about this thing.  In just the little bit I have used this I have accidentally hit the power button 4-5 times (on the table it is sitting on).  I am hoping the case I end up ordering will make this problem go away.  Cross your fingers!  But this should have been a switch like on my 2nt gen. Kindle.  This being a button is just silly.It has easy access to the Amazon cloud.  I effortlessly streamed some music from my Amazon cloud account.  Very smooth.  That said, I have all of my music on the Google cloud (Google Music - I have like 30 songs in my amazon cloud just to play with it) and can stream to my phone just like it was playing from my SD card.  I can not find a way to get the google cloud on this.  But, again, only put a bit of effort into it.Web browsing is pretty smooth.  Fast and looks very nice.  The Amazon Silk web browser is a thumbs up in my book.I love the size.  This was the main selling point to me (after price).  I didn't want a massive device i wouldn't bring with me places because i had no where to put it or it was bulky.  It becomes useless at that point.  This is much larger than my phone but still portable enough for my uses.The main drawbacks to me are the lack of a mic, the lack of GPS, and the power button placement.  It has no camera, but I don't care.  Not like I go places w/o my phone anyway.  What do i need 2 cameras for??I would, without question, recommend it to friends.  That said, if you want a new Kindle because mostly what you do is read, then this is not the device for you.  But I love it and for price, it's well worth the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFire, heh, Fire, Fire (said in my best Beavis voice),November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Candy Beauchamp "CandysRaves"(Austin, TX)  -See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At the time of this writing, I've had a day and a half to play with the new Kindle Fire so I thought I'd take some time to leave my impressions... the good and the bad.The set up was pretty easy, upon arrival and opening they were already attached to our Amazon accounts so there wasn't any registering to be done. My content was already showing as available, we just had to download the apps, books, etc that we wanted to have available.At first glance, I was really surprised by how thick and meaty the Fire is. After playing with e-ink kindles for so long, it felt heavy, but sturdy enough that I didn't worry about dropping it and shattering it into a million pieces. We turned on the switch and up it lit - super pretty display. It's crisp and clear and we have nothing but good to say.The software is pretty self explanatory. It didn't take me long to figure out where to tap, move, hold, etc. This is not complicated. Amazon really went all out on the KISS factor (keep it simple, silly). I like that. It means that I can give it to my kid and they can't screw it up too much like they do with my cell phone. It also means that, beyond the favorites area, it's not really customizable. You kind of get what you get.The screen is super responsive. I have yet to have a problem getting it to open or move anything I wanted. It scrolls pretty smoothly, with a few stutters if you really push it too much.Reading books is basically out for me on this device. I'm keeping my e-ink kindles, the backlit just kills my eyes and ruins the reading experience for me. Having said that, I've heard that others don't have this issue, so it might be a non issue for some. I just really am in love with e-ink for long form reading.Watching movies and shows using Amazon, Netflix and Hulu is really great. Turn it sideways and it's actually perfect for viewing on the go. The video is super smooth. I tried it with and without headphones and it was absolutely fine.Listening to music is easy and the cloud service is fantastic. I can see me taking this device on a plane, listening to some tunes while reading a magazine or something. BUT you really need headphones. The speakers aren't bad, not overly tinny, but they also aren't fabulous. I must admit that I was actually pleasantly surprised. This is not some expensive device and the speakers are better than I expected.The really bad for me is that there's no Google apps, there's no native app or anything for Gmail or Google Calendar. Because so many rely heavily on Google, I think this is probably a big negative for the Fire. It's kind of annoying because the thing is built on top of Android. So, either you work around it (the built in email is okay with Gmail, but I need the powerful features) or you figure out a way to hack or side load it. Not having the calendar on there at all right now is just REALLY annoying. Nevermind Google Docs (which my company uses a lot!) and Google Reader (which I was REALLY looking forward to - using my Fire to catch up on my feeds). I hope Amazon rethinks this.Speaking of apps, right now there is a limited selection available for the fire. Amazon is vetting each app separately to be included in the Amazon Appstore. Hopefully they'll get on the ball and get some more in there. Business and productivity apps are really limited.Hardware wise, the power button is a little awkward. I have hit it a couple of times. I just turn it upside down so I don't hit it when I'm resting it on my leg or whatever. I do wish it had bluetooth. I would have been willing to pay a little extra. I have a wireless stereo headset that I've come to adore, no wires to worry about, and I would really like to be able to use it with this device.I keep hearing people compare this to an iPad. I don't think that's exactly fair. This is a nice toy. It's mainly for personal use, if I'm being honest. Then again, I think the iPad is just a fancy iPhone and I'm not a fan, so there you go. I do believe that as we see more apps coming into the Amazon Appstore, we'll see more business applications. Painfully absent are things like Dropbox that many of us mobile folks have become to rely on.Bottom line? It's a small form tablet. It's $200. It's a great toy and I have enjoyed laying in bed and tweeting and playing around on it. I'm not sure it's quite there yet for business users but I'm hopeful that that piece will come - perhaps along with a larger 10" screen version. I don't regret the purchase at all, it's a great tablet at a great price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsDespite no 3G, still outstanding!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Jaynee "jaynee"(South Carolina)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is everything I hoped it would be! The moment I read about this new mini-tablet, I knew I'd be getting one. Streaming through Amazon Prime? Sure! Ability to save all my music/books/movies on Amazon Cloud? Woot! Access to the "Angry Birds" app so my kids can play to their hearts' content when they are bored in the car? WINNING! There really is only ONE negative for the Kindle Fire - no 3G. I'm sure later versions will have 3G, and I'll probably get that when it comes out. Until then, I content myself with only being able to stream when I have access to WiFi networks. Fortunately, I have WiFi at home, at work and in a few other spots where I'd likely be using the KF. And if worse comes to worst, I can always purchase and upload a movie or two if I know I'm going to be stranded somewhere without WiFi connections readily available.I've read that if my cellphone was on 3G I'd be able to run my KF through that. At the moment I am NOT on a data plan with my phone - I only use it as a phone. But when the day finally comes that I turn in my antiquated phone for a new-fangled 3G smartphone, then I predict my Kindle Fire will go from just being awesome to being "my precious."Before you think me a Luddite who shouldn't review a Kindle Fire just because I don't have a smartphone, be aware that while my cellphone is old, my love of technology is not. I just don't believe in replacing a phone just because a two-year contract is done. If you are happy with the phone, don't upgrade. I'm happy with my phone being just a phone.Back to the Kindle Fire. The connection to the Amazon Cloud is great. However, the upload time for adding files to the Cloud on your regular web browser is not. It took about 18 hours to load 425 songs to my Amazon Cloud. Ouch. However, once loaded, I was happy that I now had access to songs on the Kindle Fire that heretofore were only on my home computer. Not only that, but the two small speakers on the KF are actually pretty decent and the headphones I plugged in proved to show that even the headphone output is decent.I ran a few minutes of "Shaun of the Dead," a movie favorite of mine which I bought from Amazon Unbox last year - it looks FABULOUS on the KF. Amazingly clear picture.I uploaded a few photos of my family into the Gallery app and they are crystal clear when zooming through. Love that I can now see my kids' faces whenever the urge strikes.I haven't tried the lending function yet since I only got it yesterday, but I'm looking forward to using that.Basically, the conclusion I've come to is that if you want a tablet strictly for basic entertainment (books, movies, music, basic email, basic web surfing), then the Kindle Fire is perfect for you. If you want a tablet for entertainment AND the ability to videochat, create a Powerpoint presentation, and use GPS to keep from getting lost while out driving - well, then another tablet would be a better bet. But for those who don't need all that, but just want easy access to their own media content with a couple perks on top, then this is the way to go.But the day the Kindle Fire comes out with 3G? That IS an upgrade I'll sign up for even if I'm satisfied with my current Kindle Fire!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat If You Side Load Apps from Full Market on Android Phone,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;greenhawk-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For everyone complaining about this wonderful product, you must not yet have discovered that you can transfer all your Android apps from your Android phone, which has full market access, to your Kindle Fire easy as pie, that is if you have an Android phone.  The process is easy.  Enable unknown sources in settings on your Kindle. Backup your apps on your phone to your sd card. Transfer your apps to your computer. Plug your Kindle into your computer. Transfer apps to your Kindle and install after you unplug your Kindle from the computer. Simple. For example, I am using the Miren Browser right now to write this, which is faster and less laggy. Everyone can do this if you have an Android phone with full Market access. This will be especially helpful for international purchasers, who can't even access the Amazon market. Written from my Kindle Fire :-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExceptional value, but with limitations....,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;D. Porter(UT USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)THE VERDICTI've been playing with the new Kindle Fire for about 8 hours now, and overall I am impressed with it.  It is a good item at a fantastic price.  A few conclusions:- This is a good choice for 60% of the tablet users out there.  Once set up, it is just as easy to use as anything else (IPad included).  While there are a few items that true power users will miss (camera, etc.) most people will find this device does most everything they will ask it to do.- There is a bit more skill required to set this up than an IPad, certainly having either Android experience or a technical friend will help.- Absolutely necessary if you have been purchasing Kindle books, using Amazon Cloud to manage your music and other content, and are an Amazon Prime member.- At this price point, I can't think of anything that can compete in with the hardware.  I feel like I stole it.I bought this as a gift for a non-technical user.  After seeing how easy it is to use, I'll be buying more.  Honestly, my retired parents (who can barely use the remote control to their cable TV) could use this tablet.  So could my grandmother.  Un-freaking-believable for $200 bucks.  Just be ready to embrace the Amazon.com content world.THE DETAILSI work in technology, and have used many similar devices including ITouch, IPad, Android phones (several, current is an EVO 4G), and both Motorola and Samsung Android tablets.  I bought this for my wife's birthday (for her, not me ;) ).  She uses email, web, etc. on our home PC but has never really tried mobile devices.  Having set this up and played with it, I am very satisfied with my purchase.  I am also confident that my wife will easily be able to use the Kindle Fire immediately.While the interface lacks the traditional Android buttons, it took no time for me to figure out.  Amazon has done an excellent job at layout of functions, and overall the interface is simple to drive.  Setting up wireless took seconds.  I was then able to log into my Amazon Prime account, and quickly download both kindle books and audio I had stored on the Amazon Cloud.  Installation of about 10 apps took a few more minutes.  I like the interface to the Amazon App Store better than the default Google marketplace apps on my other Android devices.  With this as a starting point, I began playing with the device.The form factor is elegant.  I particularly like the rubbery-feeling grippy material on the back.  The display is beautiful, and the resolution is crisp even at an angle.  I could have three kids watch a movie on this no problem.  While it is a little heavy to hold one-handed for an extended period of time, it certainly feels better in the hand than an 10".  Due largely to the high screen resolution, I didn't feel like I was missing much real estate from the 10".The web browser is responsive and easy to use.  I added a few bookmarks in minutes.  Amazon claims that they do some pre-processing of web sites in the cloud to optimize your web experience.  Whatever they are doing is seamless, I was able to browse multiple types of content without issue.  I spent some time on YouTube, looking at Flash-enabled content, and reading news.  All worked fine.I installed Angry Birds, Plants vs. Zombies, Cut the Rope, NetFlix, Doodle Jump, and several productivity apps.  All tested and worked fine.  I've had problems with NetFlix on my phones, so I spent 30 minutes or so playing with that app.  No problems, which surprised me a bit.++ATTN New Users - One note on the email client - I spent about 30 minutes searching for the default email app, and then reading online to find out what I was doing wrong.  About 2 hours after I started up the Kindle Fire, it downloaded an update that placed the email app in the application repository.  I had already checked to see that my Kindle was up to date, it said it was.  Obviously Amazon had pushed down an update with the email app (and who knows what else).  So, if you just fired up your new Kindle Fire and can't find the email app, give it an hour or two to wait for that initial update push.The email client, once set up, works great at managing my wife's multiple email accounts.I did get a little frustrated when I could not find several favorite Android apps in the Amazon App Store.  However, I quickly found the setting to allow 3rd party apps to be installed (under settings in the device menu there is a switch to allow apps from unknown sources).  I was then able to install a 3rd party app, but struck out on 3-4 others (errors about the app not being in the Amazon store).  A little frustrating, and something I'll need to work on in the next few days.The only other thing I felt was lacking was a social networking app.  Honestly, I'm a little surprised there is no pre-installed app for Facebook and Twitter.  I poked around the Amazon App Store, but have not yet selected an app for social networking.  The web browser is just not the correct interface for social, and I'm a little surprised there wasn't a pre-installed app for this.Overall I'm happy with the device hardware and interface.  As a long-time Amazon.com user and first-time Kindle owner, the experience of accessing my Amazon content was superb.  I'm a little worried about getting apps from outside the Amazon App Store installed, more that it is going to be harder than it should be than I won't be able to do it.++UPDATED 11/16I spent several more hours trying to install third party apps not available in the Amazon App Store, with no luck.  I tried several app stores (GetJar, etc.) and while some things do work, the 6 or so particular apps that my wife wants are not available anywhere.  While I appreciate that Amazon may want to insure that apps will function on the device (don't install an app that needs a camera for instance), I wish I could truly take of the safety net and install apps on my own.  A little big-brother feeling to me, and part of the reason I left Apple.  It's not like I'm trying to install a Barnes and Noble Nook reader or anything, although some have.To anyone with previous Android experience, I'd recommend pre-screening your apps on Amazon.com before purchasing a Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSo far so good :),November 15, 2011By&nbsp;GirlyGirl "luvinlife"(Atlanta, GA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased the Kindle Fire for reading online books for college. I already have an iPad and as other reviewers have mentioned, it can get bulky at times. I held the Kindle for a good 45 minutes without any discomfort. Another downside to the iPad is trying to read in bright light and outside. I get really bad headaches from trying to look past my own reflection on the iPad. I thought the screen on the Kindle was going to be matte like the previous editions, so I was taken back a bit when I opened the box and the screen was glossy. But it's nice that I can change the background color and the contrast as well as the font style. I didn't get a chance to test it outside today because it rained, but I already see a difference with reading my textbooks. I have an HTC evo so I'm familiar with the Android market and honestly, I'm partial to it and I'm glad the Kindle is a part of it as well. Lastly, I'm glad there is a user manual already installed on the Kindle, it took a slight learning curve to figure out how to adjust the volume.**I gave it four stars since I've only had it for one day and I haven't had a chance to use all the functions to see where there is or isn't room for improvement.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsOutstanding content device for Amazon,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;B. Anderson(Queen Creek, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a pretty big gadget junkie, and I love (pretty much) all things Amazon, so when the Fire was announced, I knew I had to have one.  I've owned Android devices over the past year, so I have a good idea as to what to expect from the operating system.I'm not going to go into huge detail about all the pros and cons of the device; this has been done in exhaustive detail in other reviews, and I don't want to bore you by regurgitating the same details.  However, there are a few things I noticed pretty quickly about the device:+++ It's pretty responsive.  I've used other Android devices, and they all seem to suffer from stuttering of the display when you swipe or press on something. The Fire does a good job of allowing for a smoother experience.+++ Amazon has essentially gutted the Android interface and replaced it with their own, so the Fire will decidedly not be your mom's Android device. When you start up your Fire, it will walk you through the interface, which is a nice touch. It's pretty easy to navigate, with all the categories of the things you can do at the top of the screen.  They've also replaced the standard Android web browser with their own, which - I hate to say it - works a little better than the native Android browser.--- You can *not* go to the Android Marketplace at all. I tried going to the Marketplace through Google and every other way, and it always neatly redirects me to the Amazon App Store. People concerned with their devices being completely open will probably freak about this, and I don't know of a jailbreak for the Fire just yet (give it a week or so, I'm sure).  Personally, I don't mind this - the apps through Amazon tend to be kind of "vetted", meaning there are fewer junk apps on Amazon. However, this is why I rated the Fire 4 stars instead of 5.Overall, if you're looking for an excellent and intuitive content device for Amazon that you can also play games, surf the web, and send email from, this is for you.  If you're interested in hacking your Android device or installing Android Marketplace-specific apps, you should definitely look elsewhere.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I use my ipad for, this does too.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Mary S. Scott "Mary Sue"(Debary FL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love it!  I have an ipad 1 and use it to go on line, get mail, read and play a few games.  I ordered the kindle fire mainly to read books on.  I used the kindle app on the ipad until apple changed the in app purchase rules.  It was really annoying to have to go to safari to find a book, or have a sample and not be able to buy it from the kindle app resulting in another trip to safari.  I have watched movies, gone on facebook, downloaded apps, etc on the fire and its great!  I actually love the size, I can hold it in one hand.  Internet pages load just as fast as my ipad.  There are definitely not as many apps available.  I hope zite plans to add their app soon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)









Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

51 of 67 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsGetting What You Pay For,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Martin "M"(Okatie. SC)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First, I am a loyal Prime Amazon customer and have purchased thousands of dollars of products.  I purchased a second generation Kindle several years ago and it was a sub-standard product from a mechanical and operational aspect - it was returned.  Having read all the promotional material I pre-ordered a Fire in October.  Why Amazon evidently feels products they produce themselves must be "cheap" for the mass market is a mystery and appalling.  People are willing to pay for a well designed and well functioning product.  The Kindle Fire is neither of these.  When holding the unit on your lap the on/off switch on the bottom is easily activated - just poor design.  The firmware and software is by any measurement not fully developed.  The unit is difficult to hold and absolutely requires a cover.  To grip with one hand requires you to place your fingers on the display and the sides of the unit are gloss plastic not conducive to a secure grip.  Activating and operating the touch display is buggy requiring hard taps of the finger to cause various functions to change and sometimes nothing happens requiring a soft reset .  The entire unit has a non-attractive appearance and would best be displayed in toy store environment.I could go on, but come on Amazon - unloading these poorly developed products on the purchaser is eventually going to establish your reputation as, don't be first to buy a new Amazon produced product.  In a few years and later iterations it will probably will be an acceptable product, but I do not have the time or money to invest in Amazon's development process.  The Kindle Fire may be low priced but it is without a doubt a cheap product.  This does not equal valueI looked at and purchased a Barnes &amp; Noble Nook Tablet after returning the Fire - what a huge difference in the product hardware from an appearance and operational aspect for an additional $50 - even less if you have a B&N; membership.  Amazon has  the content superiority versus the B&N; Nook, but to access it will be a continuing and frustrating experience using the Fire, in my opinion.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI would Recommend the Kindle FIRE,December 3, 2011By&nbsp;Rich S(Providence, RI United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok here it isMy review of the  KINDLE FIREI own a Kindle Keyboard 3G and have had it for almost 2 years and like that but wanted the color screen and web access First let me say this..I really like the FIRE. Its size and weight is comparable to the reg kindle.But depending what you're going to use it for a regular Kindle may be better.Pros:The touch screen is nice. The quality and clarity of the picture is very goodIt is easy to maneuver and to switch from one feature/application to anotherBack lite screen is nice to read in low light environments (no night light needed)The CLOUD everything that you have purchased for your Kindle is stored at Amazon you can access on your kindle via the cloud..This is an internet storage area where your books, music, pictures, video etc are stored. However, you can only access them when you are connected to the internetIf you want to read a book while not connected to the internet you have to download it to your device this only takes seconds. If you already own it in the cloud its no charge.What is the purpose of the cloud and what's the difference you may ask. Well if you are home in your comfy chair there really is no difference you can read the book easily assuming you have a wireless connection. However if you are say on a plane or at the beach or in the park and want to read , then you will not have access to your cloud books. You have to download the book movie to your device when connected to a wireless internetOnce they are downloaded you can now view them anywhere beach, lake, park, plane train, or automobile etcThe WEB this is my favorite aspect of the Kindle Fires' functions. I do not have a smart phone so having this capability on a relatively small portable device is nice.Accessing various hot spots (WIFI) is easy the device picks up the local wifi and accesses that. If there is a secure site you will have to enter the appropriate password of courseYou are able to go on any website just like any computerThe browser is surprisingly quick and responsive (some times my fat fingers get me to somewhere I don't want to go) but it's easy to get back to where you want to be..I checked my email with easeI also went on my fantasy football team and made changes quickly it and updated the scores nicelyYou can have multiple tabs open on your browser like Google ChromeThe APPS aspect of the Kindle is fun as wellYou can check the weather in your area..get a recipe a day, an inspirational quote, and there are several free games (ie Angry Birds,  Paper Toss... etc )The only problem with that is you may never see your Kindle again that day especially if you have nephews like me..How can you say no when this cute face comes and says "Uncle Richard can we play Angry Birds". Also if there are more than one be ready to dole out the justice "he had it too long..he is touching it when it's my turn etc"  LOLThe VIDEO aspect of it is awesome and since I'm an Amazon PRIME customer (only 79 bucks a years and you get free 2nd day shipping on all Prime stuff which is most of the stuff on the site. Also allows you to view FREE videos Movies and TV SHOWSThere are entire seasons of TV shows you can watch (any season any episode) of many different showsLOST, 24, The TUDORS, BULLWINKLE AND ROCKY, DICK VAN DYKE, BARNEY MILLER, FRASIER, STAR TREK Original Next Generation),  Many DOCUMENTARIES all of Ken Burns stuff  not to mention Movies ALL FREEThese are free to watch if you are with in range of a WI-FI connection you cannot watch them outside a WI-FI unless you actually download them to your Kindle FIREto download them to your device to view on a trip or at the beach cost money but not a lot .99 or 1.99 each ..Again if you are within an internet connection there are a lot for freeThe NEWSTAND you can get newspapers delivered daily and magazines (weekly monthly)I haven't tested this yet so can't give you details..I did do it on the regular Kindle and found it lacking because of no pic or color but the FIRE solves that so I'm sure it will be great.The BOOKS..There are tons of books available and the are easy to load and to readThe built in dictionary is wonderful if you don't know a word tap it and keep your finger there and the definition pops upfor instancelandlubber (some one who love to stay on land and not go on the water in say a boat) ...my whole life I always thought the word was LandLOVER not Landlubber..Landlover it's and honest mistake I and makes more sense if you ask me but NOOO thanks to the KINDLE LOLThere is also a huge KINDLE Lending Library Thousands of book you can get for free including many bestsellers.  You can only borrow 1 book at a time but who cares I only read one at a time LOLCons:The battery life isn't that long. If you are reading a book or playing game after about 6-7 hours of continuous use the battery needs to be recharged. (and my nephews go through that easily) I was used to the older Kindle where the battery lasts for a couple of months without a rechargeThe FIRE screen is tougher to read in direct sunlight then the Regular Kindle..The screen is nice but its not like the regular kindleThe FIRE  screenhas glare and direct sunlight can make it difficult to read.There is no TEXT to SPEECH..The regular kindle had this. It is able to read to you any book you download it's a computer generated voice but still it's a nice feature. As far as I know the Kindle FIRE does not allow this if it does I haven't found it.(my niece pointed out how often have you ever used it.) I didn't use it much, but still I think it would be nice to have it. The software is available to do it and the FIRE has speakers so why not keep this feature)Please note: I believe that it can do AUDIBLE.COM books and read to you via that mediumResponsiveness of the touch screen I don't know if this is a con per say but sometimes you have to tap several times to get the screen to respond (not all the time or even most of the time but some of the time) The touch screen is nice overall and is better than hitting this button or that button)Overall not really too many significant consIn conclusion, I would absolutely recommend the KINDLE FIRE.With that being said, If you already have a smart phone that does all the other functions like WEB, APPS, VIDEO, MUSIC..and you are looking for a device for mostly to read books. I would recommend you just get the Regular Kindle with the patented Ink Pearl Screen for easier reading and a much longer battery life.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWORTH EVERY PENNY!,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Rogue9-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I decided to order my own Kindle Fire after my husband ordered one for me to send to him in a deployment care package. I received his Kindle about 2 weeks ago and he asked for me to download some books and games onto it for him before I mailed it off. Right away I was amazed at what this thing could do. The vivid display and the touch screen are what I noticed at first. The colors are so bright, the display so detailed and the touch screen has the perfect sensitivity to it. Next thing I noticed about it was its convenient size. Its not too big nor is it too small. Its thicker than an iPad but it fits a lot better in your hand. I have no problem holding it in one hand and typing with the other at all and I have relatively small hands. Tried out the Netflix app and the picture is super clear. I was considering purchasing an iPad sometime during the holidays since I wanted something bigger than my iPod touch but the price tag for the lowest end iPad turned me away every time. This however can do pretty much everything I need it to. Facebook, email, web browsing, video, games, music and of course BOOKS! I needed something to put a library of books on for when I leave for my own deployment next year so I could save room in my locker from so many books as well as save my wallet from a heart attack. The only thing I can think that I don't like about it is that it has no external volume button. Thats really I could find that bothers me about it. Also, I've read in other reviews that people didn't care for the fact that it doesn't have a password lock on it so anyone who snags it can get into your personal info, well I don't know how they could miss the "Security" section under the settings menu. I was able to set a security password just fine. So long story short, after I played around on my husbands Kindle Fire, I ordered my own. I am very satisfied with our purchases! 4 THUMBS UP FROM US! :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsImpressions of a non-Geek,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Cairn Parent "Kathy"(Indiana)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)OK, so I am a late middle age lady who can use a computer but is not even close to being a geek.  So, having read some of the reviews i was concerned about my purchase.  Maybe I should have only ordered a Kindle e-reader - after all, I probably couldn't figure the Fire out.  Wrong!  Got it yesterday afternoon and only wish I was home today to play more with it.  I had not trouble getting started - once I figured out my WI-FI password, it was easy.  I won't pretend to have mastered all the features, but I did already hook up my e-mail, configure the weather app, and browse around.  I am a Prime member, so have already borrowed a book and started reading.  I have no problem with the visual display or the sound, and also no issue with the keypad.  I find it easy to turn pages.  Maybe my expectations were lower than others - I have never had an I-pad because of price, so I can't make comparisons.  For me, it's a great buy and I know I will have many hours of pleasure from it.  Thanks Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starswhat fun, and it has a Netflix app,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Pat(Austin, TX, United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)No need to add to the many hundreds of comments.  I wanted to get my 5 stars in.  This is a fantastic $199 deal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsexceeded my expectations,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jacob Andrew Lewis "Nice ReviewBro"(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading alot of the poor reviews on here on launch day my initial expectations had become somewhat diminished. Then my Fire arrived and I quickly realized just how wrong all those people were.This thing is an amazing value for the price Amazon has it at.Within minutes out of the box I was browsing the web, surfing my Netflix que and reading comics that were rendered in fantastic color. The web browsing was extremely fast , I have no ideal why people are complaining about it, and it will only get better as the system gets used to your browsing style.Good work Amazon, I really like this product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 14 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTheres A Fire Starting In My Heart,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;M. guimond-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The best $199 ive ever spent. The device is solid, the user interface is fluid and responsive. For anyone complaining about the lack of features(camera, bluetooth, gps..etc) go spend $500. For $199 this is a steal, to be quite honest i would have spent $299 for this device. ITS THAT GOOD. It does exactly what it needs to, plays video(quite beautifully i might add), the apps are great, and its very easy to navigate. There are just a couple of cautions that i should throw out there. 1) it does have a USB port but does not come with a cord, if u have a smartphone the same cord can be used so its just a minor detail. Also 2) You do get a free month on amazon prime which is great but afterwards im not sure its worth the $79/yr. The movie/tv show selection is very outdated(which is understandable considering that im sure itd be rather expensive for amazon to let members stream new movies/shows)..just thought id warn people that altho its great for the first month, dont expect to stream Rio or Pirates of the carribean because current movies arnt available for the prime services (however you can "rent" or buy current movies)..overall though the kindle fire is a must have for people looking to buy a tablet for entertainment purposes.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

26 of 33 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWell rounded perfection,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jason-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let's just say that this is exactly what I was looking for.  I wish I could bold the letter "I", so I don't have to hear all the IPAD Dooshes talk about what this thing is lacking.  I know how to spell by the way.  This surfs the web, plays movies, tv shows, apps, and music.  It does it all very well and is pretty much seemless.  I would not have spent the money on a tablet had this not been offered at this price.  "I" honestly was not looking for anything more, or anything less.  I just wanted something that sits on the coffee table for me to grab anytime I wanted to look something up on the web, or wanted to keep one of my kids busy.  I knew that was not worth $500.It does stink that many of you did not get one delivered when you were first in line.  I am sure the people at Amazon hate that fact, and know things got f'ed up.  You will eventually get yours, and you will be happy to have access to everything the Fire has to offer.As for the Apple people..  we know!  We know it doesn't have 2 cameras.  We know it doesn't have the memory.  We know it is not an Ipad so shut up already.  We also know Apple will sell a lot fewer Ipads which in the long run will have no effect on anyone except the people up top who only get a $5,000,000 bonus this year instead of $10,000,000.  Stop defending something that has no bearing on your lives.By the way, this thing is pretty sweet, and I actually really like the size.  Enjoy!Jason (neither Android or Apple user)Sent from my Verizon BlackberryHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent EReader With Benefits,November 29, 2011By&nbsp;Amy C(Kansas City, MO USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)BACKGROUND:I/we do not own ANY Apple products, tablets, or previous e-readers.  Consider myself fairly tech savvy as I own 2 desktops (one for gaming, the other custom built for myself), a Dell laptop, an HP netbook, and we are heavy HTC/Android users in the family.OK, so let me just say that reading some of these reviews almost made me NOT buy the Fire because no one compared it apples to apples.  First of all, it is NOT a tablet or iPad; it's an e-Reader with benefits.WHY I BOUGHT IT:My daughter loves to read. She loves to listen to music.  She absolutely loves TV shows and movies.  She plays games on her phone.  She gets on the internet almost daily.  She carries around a VERY heavy laptop when traveling.WHAT FIRE PROVIDES FOR MY DAUGHTER'S NEEDS:Books! Music! Movies! TV Shows! Games! Internet! Lightweight in comparison to a laptop!In playing with the Fire for the past week, I have fallen in love with it.  So much that my family jokes about me not giving it to my daughter for Christmas.WHERE FIRE EXCEEDS MY EXPECTATIONS:- The EASE of set up.  I basically opened the box, turned it on, logged into my wireless network and BAM - I was off and running.- The screen.  I feel like I'm watching HDTV on a 7 inch screen!  Incredibly crisp and full of color. Definitely works as a replacement to a portable DVD player when taking long trips (under 8 hours).- The battery life. I played two movies back to back, read 8% of a book while listening to music, and played on Facebook &amp; Words with Friends for about an hour before the battery icon started to look helpless.- The sound.  While not extremely loud, it still is fairly loud in a quiet situation like airplane travel, or library or coffee shops.  I would suggest headphones.- The use of Amazon Prime. Now I get a discount because I'm a student so I did not pay $79.  BUT I love Prime and the benefits; so having a Kindle now only makes my Prime account more beneficial! Plus if you break it down it's like $6 a month...WHERE FIRE DISAPPOINTS:- I have not taken the Fire outside of the house, because the games I like to play need an active wireless connection.  So depending on the games you download; this "could" be a problem.  That and it's a gift, HA!  Along the same lines, the TV Shows only "stream" so if you don't have a connection, this part is really worthless while traveling.- Weight. Double edged sword.  While lightweight in comparison to a laptop or netbook - this little sucker is heavy enough to make it feel uncomfortable holding in your hands. I always feel like I'm going to drop it after a while.  So I normally set it on the table while using it.  I would suggest a cover that props up the unit.SILLY LITTLE THINGS THAT SHOULDN'T MATTER:- When you buy it from Amazon, and log in with your Amazon account - it picks up YOU as the primary user and also loads your shopping preferences.  The are two ways to get around it, one is to DEREGISTER it, have the person using it sign up for an Amazon account and register it there. Or two, you can go in and change the name in the "manage kindle" section of Amazon. I was able to change her name &amp; email - but it still said registered to me. Both of these do NOT work for me. One, I don't want to pay for TWO prime memberships and two, she has access to my preferences using my account; and not hers.  Vice versa when I search for preferences I have hers now included.  This should be an easy fix on Amazon's side - get your programmers on it!- The forcing of 1-click set up even to download FREE items.  This is annoying. I went ahead and set up the Kindle one-click with a bogus credit card, so it doesn't allow unauthorized purchases.  But once my daughter gets it she can load her own credit card into those separate settings. She's 17 and has a job - thank goodness!- The price of accessories &amp; warranty.  My daughter is prone to dropping items. Getting the warranty, cover &amp; headphones - is another $100 worth of items!  That's a grand total of $300.  Something I really neglected to think about before buying her this. Although, I will buy it (grumble).- The bookshelf/memory/carousel screen. The main screen saves your favorites and then shows you your past history, even of websites.  Not really an issue as I don't view questionable material, but it is kind of annoying and really not necessary.  I'd rather have a full screen of favorites instead. Also even if you clear your browser history, when you open your browser again the old sites sometimes still show up.  I am not sure if this is a glitch or I'm doing something wrong - but annoying to say the least.OVERALL - FINAL ADVICE:If you care more about books than other media - don't buy it!  Buy a regular Kindle and enjoy the long battery life.If you want a fully functional, internet driven, media powerhouse - consider a tablet.  I just saw that the HTC EVO View tablet is on sale for $249, pretty close in price but remember you'll pay a hefty monthly fee for that constant connection and you'll need accessories too!For me, I love it. A few annoyances, but nothing that will force me to send it back. I can't wait for my daughter to open it on Christmas (reset to factory default of course) .. I hope she loves it as much as I do!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome!,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;becs0909-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love it! For what I use it for it is the perfect little companion. When they launched the ipad, I wanted one, but at the price point of $499 I couldn't justify it. So when Amazon.com launched the fire for $199, I pre-ordered it and couldn't wait for it to come. I use it several times per day for reading, web, and several apps. The battery lasts a long time. Two complaints 1) the accessories are overpriced 2) some of the apps are not compatible with the fire and they run slow or kick me out of the application. I never leave home with out it. With so many places offering free wi-fi, I rarely find a place I can't connect to the internet with it. My daughter loves it just as much as me and asked for one of her own for christmas.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAlmost Perfect,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;fpastr-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all this is not a tablet.  It is stupid that people keep comparing this to a tablet like iPad or Galaxy.  This is an ereader that has the benefits of apps.  If you buy this thinking you are getting a high end tablet for $200 then you will be disappointed, just like the other idiots who thought the same way.That being said, this is the best ereader out there.  IT is AWESOME.  Does everything you expect from an ereader with the benefit of a much better screen.  it IS difficult to read in the sun but nothing an antiglare filter can't fix.You can sideload books and apps.  Obviously, some apps won't work and some will have weird looking icons on home screen.Doesn't have cammera, mic, bluetooth, or SD slot, because again this isn't a tablet.If Amazon continues to be open to customer input, the Fire will only get better.Weight, size, screen, speakers all great.Amazon needs to allow the cloud files to be accessible by the Fire. (right now only one of the folders is accesible)Sugarsync has an app so that allows for more cloud storage and Microsoft will have the skydrive app available soon which gives 25GB of cloud storage.Videos look great but the Amazon video library is not up to par.  You can sideload videos though.  Depending on size, maybe only one movie at a time.Browser works good and is pretty fast.  Other browsers are sideloadable.Best thing is that while Amazon has restricted some stuff (like gapps) they have left it pretty open to do as you wish.  Thank you Amazon for not being like Apple!!Nice that you can be reading a book while listening to Pandora and not missing any important emails :)If you aren't a multitasker, get the regular Kindle, don't complain about the Fire.If you don't like the position of the pwr button, flip the Fire around and continute as usual, don't complain because you can't think outside the box.If you don't like the fact that it has no rocker volume button on the outside and it is too difficult to move volume slider on the screen....well you just shouldn't be allowed to buy electronics.If you are complaining it doesn't have all the stuff that the iPad and Galaxy have, quit being cheap and buy one of those. (it is not the Fire's fault you are too dumb to know what device you are buying)The Fire has great hardware and the software is only going to get better.  Buy it!!  (if you know what you are buying)(btw it is rootable and ICS roms are already in works)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWorth the $$$,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;jasonsfolks-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Had my Kindle for a couple of weeks now. Got to try it out this past week on a trip as well.Downloaded movies from Amazon and watched them on the plane. Everyone around me was in awe over the beautiful HD screen.Battery lasted for the movie, and then I read a little until we landed. Using it for about 3 1/2 hours at a lower screen setting and I still had about 74% battery power left. No issues. In a plane, you only need to have it on a low backlight setting which saves battery power. Also when you turn off WI-FI it saves battery life.I'm using it for reading books, Netflix, Movies &amp; TV Shows from Amazon, Games, and the Entertainment Weekly App which is really great. Can even take out Kindle Library books from most libraries at no cost.My wife wants one now for Christmas.Overall very satisfied. As everyone has pointed out, the next version will probably have the power button on the top or side and most likely have a volume button.If you want a Reader, device to watch media, read e-mail and play games, this is perfect!It's not an iPad. I did not want an IPad or I would have bought one. Have my iphone with 3G and camera. I do not need 3G or a camera on Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for what it is,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;Dontu-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire.  It seems to me that most people who gripe about the Fire are generally upset because they did not get iPad functionality out of this device which was never created to be an iPad killer or replacement.  The Kindle Fire is a great android device with some apps that are nice and some functions that work very well.  While I am every satisfied with my Fire, I do have a few gripes which I will start with and then move on to address complaints I've heard others make and talk about what I feel are the highlights.  So, first the gripes.The things that I have found that I don't really like are:1) The screen does not darken enough.  I have not been in a situation where I couldn't read my Fire during the day, no matter how bright it was where I was at.  I have, however, found that I often wish that I could darken it much more, especially while I am reading in bed.  Even at its darkest setting, it still illuminates my room more than a night light.  I have my reader set to white letters and black background (which helps a little bit) but it still illuminates the room to the point that it often keeps my wife up and I have to read under the covers.  While this may make me nostalgic for my youth (reading under the blankets with a flashlight as a child) I find it more irritates me as an adult.  I hope that this is something that they can resolve with a software update, I'm not sure how things like that work.  This said, I have several devices (iPad, Nook Tablet, computer, iPod Touch) and none of those seem to get dark enough either.2) I don't like the lack of password protection on the device.  If someone were to get their hands on my Kindle Fire (I'm very careful where I leave it), they would have full access to my account.  This is not a deal breaker for me and I always keep my Fire with me when I'm not at home, however, I could understand why this would be off putting and would like a little additional security in the event it got stolen.3) A small gripe is that the power button is on the bottom of the device.  While this is somewhat irritating, I have leaned to adjust for it and now have hardly any problems hitting it.  Design-wise this is probably the only flaw in the system, I'm not sure why they didn't place it on the top.  With time though, you'll get past this small annoyance, plus, you can always turn the device and make the bottom the top easily enough.  I haven't experienced anything that doesn't adjust to this shift.That's really my only complaints, now on to addressing other complaints I have heard many times over:1)  People that say their apps don't function fully or as well as on other android devices (such as their tablets and phones).  My response to that is, this is not meant to be a tablet.  It is an full color e-reader and it functions awesome as such.  The apps are secondary to it's primary function as an e-reader.  This was not intended to be a major game playing or business software device and so it doesn't necessarily offer full functionality on these.  It does, however, play Angry Birds and Facebook very nicely and most of the "frivolous" apps like that work wonderfully on the Fire.  On the plus side, one app that I found works great on this is the "Splashtop" remote desktop works awesome.  I added that on my fire (also have it on my iPad) and it works great.  I use it in my classroom so I can work the computer attached to my SMARTboard and it has all the functionality on my Fire that it has on my iPad.2)  You cannot download Amazon Prime movies for viewing offline.  Amazon Prime is not meant to be a downloadable movie program, it's like Netflix, it's meant for streaming.  Netflix members cannot download movies to their devices for offline viewing either.  When you buy Amazon Prime you are buying a streaming service and it works awesome as that.  I am a Amazon Prime member and love what it has to offer.  It has all of the Star Trek series available (I'm a huge Star Trek fan) and, for my son, it has a ton of Sesame Street seasons (he's a huge Elmo fan).  The streaming works great, I've never had a problem watching a streaming movie on my Fire.  If you choose to buy a movie, they download quickly and look wonderful.  Also, the renting service works great as well!3)  I cannot access my own movies that I put on the Amazon Cloud.  I can understand a bit why this would frustrate people, however, movies are secondary to the ereader functionality of the Fire.  If you want a device you can put your own movies on and watch them, then get a tablet.  That is one of the highlights of a tablet, not of the Fire.Finally, why I like the Fire.  I like the Fire because it has great ereader capability, the magazines that I subscribe to are wonderful and priced really well, the Amazon library is amazing in how much content is offered, and Amazon Prime is a wonderful, easy to use service.  I have around 100 books on my Kindle and they all work great.  I love the features to customize my reading experience, it provides everything I really want in a ereader.  I am working towards my Masters right now and Amazon has offered every textbook I have needed on Kindle format with one exception.  This is amazing!  I have saved more money by buying Kindle texts and the Fire in six months than I would have spent buying the used textbooks.  This alone makes it worth the value to any students.  In the classroom, I have found that if I let my 9th graders read off of my Kindle, they are more responsive to reading than they are reading from a traditional book.  I am looking into getting a technology grant for my school so that we can purchase a mobile Kindle lab for use in my classroom.  The prices on the Kindle are phenomenal, the magazines are well prices as are the books, music and movies (well on par with other services and sometimes even better) and renting movies from Amazon is a snap.  I have nothing but praise for these services as they are so easy to use and download quickly.  I love the size of the Kindle, it's very portable and, even with a case on it, it easily fits into my briefcase without taking up much room.  Although I have heard others complain about the touch aspects of the Kindle, I have never had a problem with its accuracy or with its sensitivity.My recommendations for people buying a Kindle Fire:  If you are looking for an ereader with additional functions, if you want to read magazines on your ereader, if you want to watch the occasional movie and play a game here and there, then the Fire is right for you.  If you want something to watch a lot of movies on, if you want to listen to lots of music, if you want to play lots of games or have something that you can do all of your business functions on, if you want to do a lot of web surfing, if you want something to take notes on, etc... then you should look into getting a tablet (either a Galaxy or an iPad).  If you do decide on the Kindle Fire, I would recommend getting a case for it and a ZAGG shield (they may be a bit pricy, but they are the BEST on the market and are worth every penny you pay for them).  I hope this was useful to you and you enjoy your Kindle Fire as much as I have.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes Everything I Need It to Do Well,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Ken Staffey "Ken Staffey"(Bridgeport, CT United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I read a story in the New York Times this week where some 'analysts' had some pretty over-the-top criticisms of the Kindle Fire.  They were so melodramatic that I almost think they had a vested interest in seeing the device not do well. In fact, some of their complaints were unfounded.  They said that the device has no protection.  That's not true, you can password protect it.  Also, they said if you have 'fat fingers,' you cannot use the device.  Well, I certainly do not have 'skinny fingers' and I use it just fine - just like a touch screen phone, it takes getting used to, but you can do it.So, I am posting the review I had on Facebook a few weeks ago to show a true user and not some analyst who's paid to say God knows what.After two weeks with the new Kindle Fire, I have to say I love it. A few people have asked for a review in time for holiday shopping, so here goes. If someone wants a tablet to read, watch movies, surf the web, listen to music, the Fire's just fine. If photos and videos are important, you may want an iPad or something else. Cameras and smart phones seem fine for that anyway.So, what is it good for? It's great just to check e-mail, browse online, surf everyone's status on Facebook without having to start up your computer. The display really is crisp and clear, perfect for browsing or reading. I would say that if you want to type a long message, the touch keyboard takes some getting used to and the auto correct is definitely quirky.I have read a book on it and what I really liked is that you can change the font size and background quite a bit (white on black, black on white, etc.) and it's really easy to use. I did get a few magazines and they are easier to read on paper, but they do look nice.As for apps, the Fire's really a version of a Droid tablet, so there are plenty of apps from what I can see. Some have complained that Amazon minds the gates on the app store, but I found plenty of apps that were free or very inexpensive covering all kinds of things.While it's a brilliant marketing and sales device for Amazon, it's also easy for owners to order books, watch movie and download other items right from Amazon. And it's also really handy. If there's something you need and the Fire's nearby, just add it to your shopping list. (On Thanksgiving, I noticed I needed new oven mitts, 20 seconds later, they were ordered.) Some may not like this arrangement between the device the store, but you can buy from anyone else on the web, too. As for books, I have had people tell me that they read more with an e-reader than ever. I may go back and forth between traditional and e-books, but I can see how it can be very helpful if you read a lot. Hear or think about any book and you can have it on the screen in seconds.The early buzz was very positive for the Fire and I think they were on the mark. However, David Pogue reviewed it and said it has a lot of catching up to do with the iPad, but I haven't seen some of the more severe issues he noted with web viewing, etc. I would say that some sites do not load as well, but overall, it is extremely usable.  Also, the Kindle is $199, which is a whole lot less than the iPad's $499-$750 or more price tag. So, you may not have all the bells and whistles, but you do save a lot of money.So, what's not to like? Well, when you first get it, you definitely notice that at 7.5"h x 5"w, it's smaller than the iPad's 9.5"h x 7"w, and a little heavier but you get used to it for the most part. For most things, it's fine. I think it's the perfect size for travel, you can load it up with books, movies, and music and have it only one a small device.What else? Well, in order to get online you have to use it with Wi-Fi since it's not 3G or 4G. If you have wireless at home, it's fine, but you'll have to download what you need for the road. The storage can hold 80 apps, plus 10 movies or 800 songs or 6,000 books.... and you get free cloud storage for Amazon purchased items.Still on the fence, well, this is the first version of the Fire, so there will definitely be upgrades. But if you're ready to make the jump, I'd say the Kindle Fire's a great introduction to using a tablet. While you may not be able to point it at the Eiffel Tower, take a picture, and get a ton of background information on your screen immediately, you will be able to do lots of cool things. Besides the person I watched doing that looked pretty silly.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThrilled with this little tablet,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Sean K. O'Brien "seannyob"(Yorktown, VA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I chose to purchase the Fire for my wife for Christmas.  We went in for Prime, and are trying out the CloudPlayer service.I was hesitant to buy into Amazon's walled garden, but I have no regrets. Everything just works, and it's all there at your fingertips.I think the size of the this tablet is pretty much perfect.  I could see that a larger one might be better for gaming, and maybe heavy-duty web use, but other than that the Fire is awesome.My wife said that it was the best Christmas present she'd ever received.My Dad got the Nook Tablet; we played with them both side by side.  I think that CNet's reviews are pretty accurate: the Nook has better specs, and I think the screen is nicer, particularly for video. However, I don't think the improved specs really made much of a difference.Especially because content is king.  And here, Amazon comes out head &amp; shoulders above the competition.  As an IT professional, I don't want to spend my weekends troubleshooting my wife's tablet.  I want her to be able to use it without calling me.  And the Amazon system is easy, and deep: the B&N; app store, in particular, is devoid of content, and the only video Dad even knew how to find on his Nook was through Netflix, which we've given up on.All in all, I can say that early results point to a real winner of a system for Amazon, and as hardware, we're happy with the Fire too.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSO VERY SATISFIED!!!,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;fschranzjr-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)MY husband got this for me as I'm an avid reader and this is so much MORE than a reader. FOR THOSE OF YOU WANTING A TABLET, GET A TABLET!! The Fire is not a tablet, which is good since I wanted a reader that is easy to use with the added plus of playing games. PLUS, I can carry it everywhere I want.  THANKS, AMAZON!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoving my Kindle Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Rae of Sunshine-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am in love with my Kindle Fire!  The picture is beautiful, the navigation is smooth, the browser speed is pretty quick and the price is awesome.  The only drawbacks I've seen are that it's a little heavy, but you quickly get used to it and there are some pre installed apps you can't remove.  So glad I purchased my Fire.  It does everything I need it to do and it does it quickly and enjoyably.  BTW this review was submitted via my Kindle Fire :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI LOVE LOVE LOVE Kindle Fire,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Christine-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been aching for a tablet for some time now, so when Amazon announced Kindle Fire and I read up on the features, I knew I had to have one. My dad immediately bought it for me as an early birthday present (thanks, Dad!). I've had it for two days and I already love it.First, the size. It's perfect. It's so easy to hold, it's not too heavy, it fits in my purse so I can take it anywhere.The resolution is outstanding. All my apps and streaming video look fantastic. The speakers are pretty good, too.I love the newsstand feature. So far, I've only used the Vanity Fair app. I have a LOT of print magazine subscriptions that I'm still receiving so I will not subscribe electronically until the print subscriptions expire.Reading books is a real treat, and the access to the Amazon store is super easy. Plus, Prime members have access to one free book per month from the lending library.I have very few gripes about the product. The touch is pretty sensitive and can be quirky, but it is really easy to get used to. I wish the keyboard had the "Swype" function found on many Android-powered phones.A lot of people have complained about the power button being on the bottom, but when you're using the device, it adjusts to however you're holding it. I read my books with the device upside down so the power button is on top, because the content adjusts accordingly. Problem solved!All in all, I have no real issues with this product. It's only been a couple of days, but I've been using it a LOT and have not encountered any issues. It has all the features I need and want at a price less than half the price of an iPad. Plus, the size of Kindle Fire is better for me. I don't need anything larger, so unless you have some need for a particularly large screen, Kindle Fire is preferable because it's powerful yet compact.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat and loving it.,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Carlos A. Moreno-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There is so little I can say that has not being said already about the Kindle Fire. However, let me say this: this is an incredible device for the price. The first thing you have to forget if you want to buy this, Is that it will never, ever be able to be compared to an Ipad. If that is what you have in mind, then forget about the Kindle Fire. The Kindle is great in many ways but don't assume that it does everything the Ipad does. Read the specs first, see if it is what you NEED. I really like the Kindle very much. It is what I need and can afford.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove at First Sight!!!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Ms. Riss(Midwest, United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all, for anyone doing reviews or reading, you must keep in mind this is a Kindle.  It wasn't meant to be a tablet or an iPad competitor, although I would say it does a pretty good job.In my opinion, this is a big hit.  I am an avid Amazon customer, with a prime account, and I utilize all of Amazon's services including the cloud player for music and file storage and unlimited streaming.  With that said, the Kindle Fire works great with those services.  I noticed a lot of people complaining about the size, but I personally love the compact design.  Remember the size of the Kindle is supposed to match that of a paperback book and I think it is great.It has exceeded my expectations.  I love the size, the amazon services that it integrates with, the Netflix app is definitely an added plus and all the Droid apps the Amazon app store has makes it very versatile.I will be honest and say there are a few things that could have been added:1) The 8 GB storage space.  It would have been nice if the Fire was offered in different sizes like the iPad or iPod Touch.  Or even having an SD slot so things could also be stored on that.  With that said, if you use the cloud service like you are supposed to with the Kindle, space shouldn't be an issue.  I do use the cloud, but I found myself wanted to download all types of different apps to the device, magazines and such so I could run into issues.  At that time, i will have to delete other stuff to make room.2) It is a little heavier than I expected it to be.  If you drop it, I don't think it is going to have that much give room and seems that could be a disaster.  I have accidental damage coverage which I would definitely recommend.3) I wish it had a built in calendar.  Hopefully the Amazon app store will come out with a Google calendar app, because I find myself needing it on there.4) Wish it had some sort of desktop screen so you can pin things to it like the normal droid devices that have widgets.5) I find myself looking for a volume control toggle on the right hand size like my Droid.  It would be nice if it had an external sound control.6) I have an HTC EVO phone and my phone has a built-in kick stand so I can use it when watching movies etc.  It would have been nice if the Kindle was built  with a kick stand for easy viewing.  With that said, I did order therooCASE Executive Portfolio (Black) Leather Case Cover with  Landscape / Portrait View for Amazon Kindle Fire 7-Inch Android Tablet. This case has a kick stand for easy viewing.7) A camera for Skyping would have been a nice added feature.I was pleasantly surprised with the sound on this device.  I was playing music and it was a lot louder than I anticipated.  That is definitely nice.All in all, I love it!! I think it is worth it to upgrade to the Prime membership if you don't already have it, so you can have access to the free library rentals of books, unlimited streaming of movies and tv shows, and the upgraded cloud storage.  If you do, you will be able to maximize the benefits with the Kindle and your Amazon account.When you remember this is only a Kindle it does some amazing things.  I loved my Kindle keyboard 3G + Wifi and now I am in love again.  I am not an Apple fan so I would much rather spend $199 on my Kindle Fire than a small iPod Touch.  I am very happy with my purchase of this device and plan on using it to its full potential.  Have fun with it....I know I will!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsEarly Review &amp; Reaction to Reviews,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Richard Heruska "Stlthdvr"(Granbury. TX)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First,  I would like to preface this review by noting I don't do a lot of reviews, but there is a lot of information on previous reviews that would scare some people away from this device.As a lead in - I am a bit of a junkie when it comes to Gadgets.I have owned the Orignal Kindle - Kindle II &amp; III - and found them all to be great in their timeI own 2 Original IPADS and an IPAD 2I have also always purchased the latest Apple Iphone &amp; have 2 4S unitsNoting that - the Kindle Fire was not expeted to be an APPLE IPAD killer or replacement for me.I purchased 2 - 1 as a gift and one for family.The over reaction to the 1 click - is just that - an over reaction - it prompts you immediately and notes it can be turned off.There are also several security settings that will allow you to adjustThe extra unit - I purchased as a gift - was easily re-set to factory defaults - allowing me to easily gift the item.My first impressions are that this is a nice quality product, exceptional value, and seems very easy to use - even with 300 + books in my library.Knowing Amazon - and knowing this is a 1st rev unit - it will only get better.IMHO - The 7" screen provides excellent resolution- nothing higher is required on this size screen and price pointYes - I wish you could hide or filter items bought - as this could ruin a Christmas or Present surprise - but that is no different than Amazon's Web site.- I called Amazon and asked if there was a way to do this through the background - and it is not available.- An alternative option was to create a new login - and share my prime membership- (4 are allowed) - unfortunately - this doesn't share your library- I would suggest we all send in request - and Amazon will take it into serious considerationAs for the the rest of this mini review - initial impressions is that it is much better build quality, and has a solid feel.Screens move adequately - and overall ease of use is nice -  I agree with other reviews - a volume up/down and home button would be a plus....but aren't deal killers for me.The real value will be the Amazon Prime content - streaming TV - Movies - and the lending library - combine that with the thousands of free and low priced Kindle books and this appears to be a great early unitThe reading experience - though not as easy on the eyes as E-Ink- is easily modified with a change of background - and doesn't require a case with a separate reading light.  The light with the original Kindle is great - but adds a premium - when you factor in a back light on this unit - it is like saving $50-$60I like the soft tactical feel of the back - and the screen does not appear to need a Zagg Skin - for extra protection - another $$ saverI have not fully tested the unit - but hope some of the hysterics about 1 click and all can be put in proper prospectiveHope this helpsHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot gonna lie....it's pretty awesome,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Cole Everman "Coleman"(Seattle, WA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been on my Kindle Fire non-stop for 2 days now. I've put it through its paces and think I've done enough on it to write a well-informed review.First, I'm amazed at how fun and easy the device is. It's very intuitive. I have an iPad and have spent a lot of time on a friends Motorola tablet...and I like the Fire better than both. It fits in your hand, it feels very nice to hold, it's easy to use, it's fast, and it gets me to the things that matter (email, web, Facebook, kindle books collection, Amazon Prime movies/content, Hulu+, Netflix, Pandora and Magazines) much faster and easier than the endless sea of apps that are on other tablets. The Silk web browser (for the most part) has been extremely fast. Web pages render faster than they do with my iPad in a side by side comparison. I'm really happy that Amazon allowed the Hulu+ and Netflix apps as well. I think that was an extremely classy move on Amazon's part. Amazon could have forced all Fire owners to use the Amazon ecosystem and buy all their content. However, they allowed two other content competitors onto their own device. Now I have access to a TON of content that streams pretty seamlessly. I'm impressed.Now, there have been a few hiccups. In the two days of use I managed to freeze the device once...but I also had Pandora playing and 10 or 11 web pages open. I held the power button down for 20 seconds and restarted the device and it's been all rosy from there. There have also been a few times when the web browser was a little slow and unresponsive. However, it remedied itself. I think part of this was the device and part was my internet connection...which can be horribly spotty sometimes.PROS: Feels great, great size, totally portable, great ecosystem, easy to use, Hulu+ and Netflix support, fast browser, good email client, great screen, funCONS: Limited storage on the device (I'm a fan of the cloud but it could use a few gigs more), no way to password protect or create folders to keep people from accessing your content (I don't want to hand the device over to my friends kids for Angry Birds with my R-rated movies on there)Overall, the thing that impresses me most about this device is that it's fun. It's hard to not pick it up and play with it. Yes, there are a few issues, but honestly I don't think there are any that can't be fixed with a software update from Amazon (which I'm sure they're working on). Good job Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSolid, interesting, dependable, versatile,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;J. Paul(Huntington Beach, CA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)See updated review below.*******************Received my Fire yesterday. Immediately tapped into my 'stuff'. Yes! I instantly logged into Wifi at my office and a few hours later at home. No problema.I purchased the Fire to test the tablet waters. I have been looking at iPad, Samsung, etc for months and wanted to put an end to this part of my little life so that I can get on to the next whatever that my desires point at...Anyway, the price point was perfect, the gift card opportune, etc.; and I know that I can return it in the next 30 days if ultimately unsatisfied.The tablet is my answer to getting past walking my laptop and wires from one room to another every night to use it in front of the tv. It looks like this tablet is fine for that application.One thing that I ended up wanting was a device that works simply and quickly right out of the box; I have long since passed the part of my life that is interested in spending a lot of upfront time figuring how a device works, configuring it, adding content spread out all over etc. The ability of the Fire to come to me already set up was a significant benefit. I will eventually, at my leisure, poke around the Fire and learn from others in the discussion forums about the little shortcuts, etc.In thinking about tablets, I thought alot about size. The 7 inch form is small but I have adjusted to this within a couple of hours of use. I watched a couple of free Arrested Development TV programs and was instantly enjoying the experience. Downloaded a weather app, and then I went to a couple of websites I often visit and read them. Yes, I had to scroll some, but this is my trade off for a smaller more portable form factor. I also read some books and listened to my music. The back-lighted reading experience is not so objectionable (I do have a wonderful keyboard Kindle to compare). I used the white text on black background, reduced the brightness and it was no problem. Yes the Kindle keyboard is unsurpassed in readability, but the Fire is very nice as well.Now, back to the 7 inch form... The other side of that size equation was the much bigger size of the iPad and other android tablets that I had shopped. I always felt that it was like I was carrying around a sizable device and it just did not fit how I saw using such a device. I have my laptop if I want a laptop.So, my first impressions are very positive. It is what I expected and more. I am not looking for a perfect experience; everything has its trade-offs and the trade-offs here are - so far - well within tolerance.My rating is not about the perfectness or some comparison to another device... it is about how it stacks up against my original, well researched expectations.*************************Update 11/26/11So I am now a couple of weeks into the Fire. For reading I am picking up my Kindle Keyboard... not the Fire.The video experience is good; vivid and works at about a B+ level. Apps are interesting but I am not really using them; the email reader is fine (Hotmail and Gmail).Web experience - I look at a couple of web sites and dont really like the scrolling around to read. The text is too small for me. I know this is 7 inches but now that I am doing all the scrolling, I am thinking that a larger form factor is more to my taste.Playing music is fine, the speakers are adequate but a touch tinny to the ear.As mentioned in my first review, I wanted to use the tablet in place of the laptop in front of the TV, but I need a better web experience than what the Fire affords me.I like to buy things that really add to my life. The Kindle Keyboard did that, the laptop does that, the TV does that. The Fire is pretty much another device that I have to kind of squeeze in because I think I should... not because it has earned a  niche in my life.I like the concept of a thin, light, portable, easy to hold, simple, video and web player device that is easy to read on that I can replace the laptop with but I am starting to think that maybe a tablet device is just not additive enough to deserve my money and attention.I will revisit the ipad and samsung 10 devices, maybe...******************************Well, my wife said that this was a birthday gift so I decided to keep it. So I am looking at it differently.I still really like the Kindle Keyboard (KKB) for reading. The Fire is a little bright but doable. If I had just the Fire, I would use it fine for reading. Reading outside is inferior to the KKB. The fact that it does so many things makes it more generally an entertainment device vs. the KKB. I enjoy the music playing. The video playing is fine as a personal device. Sometimes I watch a video while doing something on my laptop. I use the web in a fairly circumscribed way because of the small viewer. It is something to play with in front of the TV - but I have to admit, the laptop is better (damn the wires; only 100 or so minute battery). Anyway, as I play with it I learn more about it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI love it.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Mykella-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Most of the negative reviews seem to be from people who didn't do their research. The kindle works exactly as advertised and is awesome for what it is - a media consumption tablet. I only give 4/5 stars because of occasional software glitches that will hopefully be fazed out with updates. Otherwise, I'm in love with my Fire. The size is perfect for my needs, which is primarily reading and movies/TV shows. I'm an apple fan girl and have never been impressed with android so I appluad Amazon's smart redesign of the interface,which is incredibly User friendly and aesthetically pleasing. I bought my dad an Ipad2 for father's day and the ipad is definitely a sexier, more capable supermodel of a device. But the fire is the humbly attractive girl next door. I love apple's elegant iOS5, but the kindle has shown me that there can be a place in my heart for android too.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,March 29, 2012By&nbsp;C. Minor(Mount Vernon, WA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased my Kindle Fire at Best Buy last weekend.  I wasn't intending to purchase the Fire on that visit...I had a gift card and was just browsing for options.  I have a Kindle Keyboard (older version), and I love the eInk because of the ability to read it outside in the sunlight.  I wasn't sure I'd be happy with the screen of the Kindle Fire for that reason.  However, I have to say, this is a great device.  I didn't expect it to be a mini-computer, but a way for me to carry along my entertainment on one compact device.  (That said, I won't be using it for music.).  The Wi-Fi was extremely easy to set up, and wow, the browser is fast! I've watched movies through Netflix, and was impressed at that quality of the video and sound (and I didn't have any buffering issues). I've downloaded a few games, and been pleased with the speed and quality.  The keyboard works well and is easy to use, though I imagine I will not be typing out any long emails. :)  Reading books on the Fire works well, though it was tough to learn, at first, turning the pages needs to be done on the right only, no the left (which will go back a page, not forward...I'm used to the two buttons on the Kindle Keyboard).  Overall, GREAT device, and I'm very pleased with the purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect little tablet, as advertised.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;M. Jones(Boston, MA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Please stop talking about it being an ipad killer, or its not an ipad killer, etcIt was NEVER marketed to be that.This is the perfect little tablet for messing around, checking e-mail, facebook, twitter, reading booksbrowsing the internet and shopping with Amazon.I had the HP Touchpad, which could do more, but was much much slower than the Kindle Fire.I absolutely recommend this product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsUnbeatable for $199,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;C. Kim(tinton falls, NJ)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Despite what people are saying, for the average American this is an ipad killer PERIOD.  I played with mine for about 4-5 hours last night.Top three things I do with my iPad:1) Surf the web2) Watch videos3) Listen to musicThe Kindle Fire does all of these for less than half the price of an iPad.  Also, Amazon can go toe to toe with Apple on content.  With Prime Membership, Apple doesn't even come close considering the free books.  Plus songs and movie rentals are cheaper on Amazon than Apple.The 7" screen is just right and fits perfectly in one hand.  The only complaint is that it is a little heavy.  Reading a book in bed last night, my hands and wrist were a bit fatigued from holding it up.The OS is a bit clunky, but again, for $199 I'm not complaining.  Go get your Kindle now!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Devryck Weaver "Dev"(Portland, OR)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This Fire is everything that has been advertised. The Silk browser is speedy enough to never feel like you're being slowed down in your endeavors! The screen is slick looking and turns heads at coffee shops (mine has already). Scrolling through your recently opened media is a breeze and very zippy. The size is perfect for holding as long as you want without your hand feeling fatigued. All of this for only $199? It's actually kinda crazy not at least to consider this richly packed device. The fact that it's not jam packed with cams, mics, and extra things is actually refreshing.  All of those things are on my smartphone and probably yours as well. Besides, how ludicrous is it to have a back facing camera, anyhow? Holding my tablet up in the air to take photos and videos is every bit as absurd as it sounds. Amazon has intuitively pared down this tablet to all the things you ACTUALLY want, without all the bells and whistles which really only serve to justify charging $500 for a base model. Don't pass this by without at least giving it a glance!Cheers!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome entry-level device,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Joanne(NJ, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I confess; I've always wanted an iPad.  They're just too rich for my blood.  Other Android tablets have had less than stellar reviews, but when I saw my beloved Kindle was going to jump into the tablet arena, I hit that pre-order button immediately.  Now that I have it in my hands, I am not disappointed.The basic instructions are on a card the size of a playing card, but there is a more in-depth user guide on the Fire itself.  You plug it in to charge, follow the prompts to enable Wi-fi, click to hook up with your Amazon content, and off you go.  Your existing books, assuming you have owned a Kindle or bought a Kindle book before, are all there.  Your Apps and Cloud music are there, too.  Really, it couldn't be much easier.The display is bright and beautiful. Video is gorgeous.  The speakers sound surprisingly good for a small device.  I'm a little disappointed that one of my favorite apps (All Recipes Pro) isn't available yet, but I'm hopeful that it will be eventually.  Silk is moving faster than my desktop right out of the box, so I'm very happy with the browsing experience.I do wish there were more accessibility features, but I still have my Kindle 2 and will continue to use that for reading.  The Fire is an entertainment device for me, not primarily an e-reader.  As gorgeous as the Fire is, it can't replace E-ink.  Unlike the Kindle 2, the Fire won't read to me when my eyes are bothering me, either. No problem.All in all, the Kindle Fire is a fantastic little toy...er...tool for reading, watching video, listening to music, and the Facebook app works better than the web site on my computer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsYou won't be disappointed with this!,May 12, 2012By&nbsp;MsKitty2U-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I did much research before choosing the Kindle Fire. I was at first drawn to the iPad, of course, because of all the hype. I went to the Apple store and played around with it - it's shiny with lots of bells and whistles. However, I chose the Kindle Fire and I don't regret it.The most obvious upside to this choice is the money saved - $200 for the Kindle Fire vs. $500+ for an iPad.Other benefits:Movies and TV: As an Amazon Prime Member, I'm enjoying free instant streaming movies and tv shows on a daily basis. The quality is excellent; I was blown away by the first video I watched. The streaming is great. I haven't experienced any lags or freezing issues. If you have a NetFlix account, movies stream well from the NetFlix app as well.Decent Battery Life: Battery life is good. You can easily get through a full movie without worrying about losing juice. It also charges fairly quickly.Weight: The weight of the Kindle Fire as compared to the newest (or even older models of iPad) wins hands-down. It's very light-weight and comfortable to use, whether in a sitting up or laying down in bed position. The Fire also appears to be a sturdy-build that you won't have to worry about.Surfing: No issues whatsoever while surfing the web.Ease Of Use: Even a novice will be able to use the Kindle Fire out of the box. If you need extra help, "Kindle Fire, The Missing Manual" can be purchased for under $12.00. I think it's worth it because it gives you great tips for maximizing usage of the Fire.Extras: The pricing for books, movies, and apps is fantastic. You can easily add to your Kindle Fire without breaking the bank. Regarding books, I've built a 250+ library in only a few weeks for FREE. The free book downloads can't be beat! There are also countless books that are $1.99 and less. Movie rentals are less expensive than Pay-Per-View. Email, reading and saving documents, calendar, contacts - it's all here! The speakers are stereo and music/movies sound amazing!If you are looking for a tablet to create movies, photoshop work -- this is probably not for you and the iPad would be better equipped for that. However, if you want a good all-in-one tablet at a decent price for movie watching, reading, organizing, surfing the web, listening to music, go with the Kindle Fire! I'm very happy with my choice!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE MY FIRE!,April 25, 2012By&nbsp;L.M.Fields "Author &amp; Digital Artist"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a Mac girl. This family of ours owns 4 Macs, 2 iPods, and 1 iPad. We love them all. But I needed / wanted something not so expensive without all the bells and whistles for me to enjoy strictly for reading, web, and a little more wherever and whenever. The Kindle Fire met all those needs and then some. It came with several books for free and I got 30 days of Amazon Prime members too! It's been fun and I would recommend the Kindle Fire to everyone! Let me rephrase that, I HAVE recommended the Kindle Fire to everyone and will continue to do so.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPay It Forward With Kindle!,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;cyndi daves-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am an avid reader and so my daughter purchased a Kindle Fire for me for my birthday this year.  I honestly didn't think I would like it since I create such a "relationship" with a book when I'm reading it.  Yes, I see you shaking your head - don't I?  You like the way it feels in your hands when you're reading.  You like the act of turning the pages.  You take great delight in closing the book and putting it down when you're all finished.  Yes, I was the same way!  How on earth was I going to get that same feeling from an e-reader???  Believe it or not, I do.  So much so that I "paid it forward" and purchased one for MY mother for her birthday.I am sure I got my love of books from her.  She has read a hundred times the books I have and, therefore, didn't think that she was going to like it as much.  Yet, when we sat down together at the computer to place the order, she got SO excited knowing it was coming.  The day it arrived she called to tell me of all the books she had already found for FREE!!!  She carries it with her everywhere she goes (as do I) and calls me frequently to tell me of new finds!But why the Kindle Fire and not just any e-reader?  For both of us we wanted to added benefits of color and web access.  I am a real estate agent and wasn't sure about upgrading to a tablet since I'm not much for the onscreen typing due to my long nails.  The Fire has allowed me to gradually learn how to use my fingers to type on screen (yes, for you ladies with fingernails, it can be done).  I can access my email and all the websites I need in order to work where ever there's internet access which, for the most part is EVERY WHERE!  It's not as functional as a tablet but not as expensive either!My husband especially likes the back light and the fact I can dim the light when reading in bed late at night.  I am a late night reader and having to keep a bedside light totally frustrated him (and me) since it kept waking him up.  Now I just dim the light and, unfortunately sometimes, can read as LONG as I want!Overall I have absolutely NO complaints about the Kindle Fire.  Get yourself one and don't forget your Mom (or Dad).  They will love you for it.  Pay It Forward!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAfter three months, a review....,February 12, 2012By&nbsp;Diana(Alabama)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was hesitant to write a reveiw before just wanting to wait and see how I felt after the new wore off.  I love my kindle.  There were some things that was questionable in the begining, the speed of the web browser was slow, but just as they said, after three months, my kindle is faster than my computer is.  We have so many uses for the kindle I will just name a few.-Ereader, I am one that prefers a good old fashioned book, or I used to.  I didnt think I would really ejoy reading on my kindle fire, i did not buy it to read on.  Boy was I wrong.  I am a prime member so I get the use of the amazon library but I have found so many incredible books to read, some free, some for 99 cents and a few higher priced.  I would have never read these books if I did not have the kindle.  Yesterday i took my daughter to the library to check out some chapter books for us to read together (old fashioned books) and laying in bed reading them i realized how much i hate reading a regular book and much prefer to read on the kindle, it is so much easier for my eyes and my daughter's eyes.  I love the built in dictionary, as I have been reading some historical books recently there are a lot of words that are old english or in other languages that I have no idea what they are and instead of just skipping over them like I used to, I know instantly what the word means.-Video Player, I bought the kindle to stream movies and shows while i am on the treadmill.  I have attached a piece of velcro to it and i just strap it on my treadmill and watch a 45 minute show while I exercise.  I have netflix and amazon prime streaming so I have an endless amount of shows to help pass the time exercising, its wonderful!!-Educational factor, my daughter uses my kindle to play her games, and we also use it for math, reading, science.  She would much rather use flashcards on an app that is actually a little bit fun, rather than old traditional flashcards.  She can also do it herself without any one sitting over her.-Apps, I LOVE LOVE LOVE the free app of the day, Along with the free app of the day i have found free apps that take care of about every need that I have.  Yesterday i needed a level to get a picture straight...yep, theres an app for that, for free :)  We have games games games and then a lot of tools to use, exercise, recipies, you name it, theres an app for that and there are many more coming out all the time.  Games, tools, you name it.Overall i dont know how I can go back to not having my kindle.  I use it all day every day, and charge it overnight every night.  Sometimes, yes i do wish it had a longer battery life, but honestly, as much as we use it, I dont think i could ever be satisfied with any battery life.  I get a full days use out of it, its when i forget to charge it overnight that it dies on me.  I don't have any complaints at all.  The web browser did start out very slow, and I was very skeptical but after three months of use, it is very fast to find what i need.  All of the other isuses that I had, they have fixed with updates!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's Not an iPad - It's Different &amp; In Many Ways Better,March 13, 2012By&nbsp;Reno J(San Antonio, TX USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Along with the Kindle Fire, I also have an iPad 2. I like the iPad better than the Fire only for 2 reasons: browsing the web (the screen is bigger - I can see stuff better &amp; don't have to scroll around as much), &amp; there are so many more Apple-compatible aftermarket accessories available (like boomboxes, alarm clocks, device to TV cables, etc). The compatibility of Apple products to aftermarket devices is the only reason I have an iPhone 4 rather than an Android phone. Other than that, give me the Fire. For watching movies, reading books, anything for entertainment, I like the smaller size of the Kindle. With the Fire, I don't have all the restrictions Apple puts on the iPad (like no Flash Player which prevents me from watching my Amazon Prime videos, DRM restrictions on music &amp; video files, &amp; on and on). I hate iTunes that's required with the iPad &amp; iPhone. It takes over &amp; controls everything on my Apple devices &amp; PC. Not so with the Fire, thank goodness. Coordination with the Kindle &amp; Amazon's website is easy, user friendly &amp; decisions about stuff are made by the user, not by Apple. It was so cool when I first bought my Fire that it linked automatically to my Amazon Prime account. Corny, but I truly felt like a "member". Common complaints about the Fire (such as no volume buttons, limited storage, etc.) are well-documented, so I won't go into them. But for only $199, I have no regrets in my purchase. I love this thing. If Amazon comes out with a new &amp; improved Kindle Fire (whether bigger, twice the price, or whatever), I'll purchase one. Forget iPad 3.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's a Great Device.  I'm so glad I bought it.,March 4, 2012By&nbsp;C. Wright "Kindle Crazy"(Aurora, CO USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own the Kindle 3G with Keyboard and my husband has the Kindle Touch.  I struggled with buying the Kindle Fire since it first came out.  I have been reading reviews, weighing the pros and cons, and trying to tell myself to just be happy with what I have and not get it.  I'm an impulse buyer so for me to wait 3 months and finally purchase it... that is a REALLY big deal for me.I give 5 stars for my Kindle Fire.  I love so many things about it.  First of all, I'm already a Android user.  I've had a droid phone for 2 1/2 years now, so I'm already familiar with a lot of the apps and the settings.  So far, I have watched a movie, played with (and used) some apps, read some books, listened to music (my MP3 Amazon music and Pandora), surfed the Web, been to Facebook, used the email feature, viewed my Google Documents, and sent some new documents to my device using the "Send To Kindle PC Installer through Amazon."Things I really like... in no particular order:1.  Seeing the cover of my books2.  The ease of adding, removing, and rearranging items on my Favorites3.  Being able to remove items from my Carousel... but it doesn't remove them from my device4.  How quick books are downloaded5.  The ease of surfing the Web6.  How fast my device works in normal applications7.  The ease of watching a movie8.  The sound of the device with my headphones9.  The size of the keyboard10.  The fact that the screen changes in all 4 directions by just turning it... so I can hold it anyway I want to.  I just move it and tap the device at the top and it switches position quickly11.  The background choices.  (it took me a while to find this... it's under the "Font" section).  I use the black at night, sepia in the am, and white in the light of day... I use all 3 and like them all12.  How easy it is to change the brightness, volume, and turning on and off the wi-fi13.  That I can download my already purchased music and movies to listen and or watch on my device14.  If I run out of space, I have all my books, music and videos stored on Amazon's Cloud to watch from my device (wi-fi) enabled15.  How easy it is to zoom in and out16.  That I haven't had any trouble on the Web.  I've gone anywhere I've wanted to and been able to anything I want to.17.  That I can read Adobe EPUB eBooks borrowed, from my local library, (they have a bigger selection than Kindle books at this point).  I can download them onto my Kindle Fire so I no longer have to read them on my computer only18.  That I can listen to my Pandora while reading a book19.  How easy the bookmark feature is to use.  Most importantly... it's way easier to Delete a bookmark from a book on the KF than any of the other Kindles I've used20.  How easy it use to change pages21.  That some books allow you to click on the Chapter at the top to switch between chapters22.  That there is a tag on the covers of the book to give you a percentage of how much you've read23.  That the device is backlit so I don't have to clip on my book light when I read at night24.  The Glare hasn't really bothered me like some people have complained... I just adjust the tilt of the device and the brightness to suit me.  I'm able to read outside just fine25.  That there is a black border around the edge so I can place my fingers on the edges while holding it on all 4 sides without worry oftouching the pages26.  How easy it is to sync books between devices27.  That I have easy access to my documents28.  That I purchased the 2 year warranty for pretty cheap... so I have the peace of mind that it's covered if anything happens to itI've read a lot of reviews where people complained that they didn't really enjoy using it to read books.  So, I thought I'd buy it and use it for everything else and my Kindle Keyboard for reading.  But, now that I have it, I actually like reading books on it better than my other device... which really surprised me.  I plan to carry my KK with me when I'm out and about, and using my KF while at home.  Although, when I go on vacation, I plan to take both!The only strange thing is that all my other chargers won't charge my Kindle Fire.  My USB will connect to my computer, but it doesn't charge.  The only charger that charges in the one that came in the box.  So, I'll have to take good care of that one, and make sure I take it with me when I'm on vacation.  This is by no means a big deal.Overall, I am super pleased with the device and the price.  It is well worth the money, and I would highly recommend to anyone!  5 Stars all the way around!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFor the price, a great little device,February 25, 2012By&nbsp;S. Schmidt "TotalHavoc"(Pennsylvania, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let me start off this review by making it clear that I currently own an IPAD 2 and this device was purchased for my wife as a birthday present.  The Kindle Fire is not trying to reach the same market that is interested in the IPAD.  It's obvious that they are taking the approach of "What improvements can we make to our current e-reader to allow us to distribute more of our digital services to the consumer and add some additional functionality allowing people to do more with their e-reader when they are on the go so they don't need to take a billion devices with them?" It is easy to setup this device and make purchases.  It has a basic web browser and you can download and install a number of free apps including Netflix (you still have to be a Netflix member), Pandora, etc.  You can also download apps like Angry Birds, Peggle, a Calculator, etc.  There are a number of free books that you can read on your Kindle and if you are an Amazon Prime member there are a number of tv shows and movies that you can watch for free on your Kindle.  Of course you can also rent or buy videos.  It is nice that a lot of the content you purchase through Amazon can be stored to the cloud for free.  Having messed around with this I was quite impressed it.  There is little to no customization but the user interface is simple and effective.  Would I give up my IPAD for it?  No, that is just silly, but my wife loves it and if I couldn't afford an IPAD this is a pretty good poor man's substitute.  I highly recommend this to anyone looking for a tablet at a very affordable price.  If you a real techie, however, you probably will want something with more features.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI Got The Fire,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Marilyn Jones "Dachshund Lover"(Baltimore, MARYLAND, US)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a sixty-one year old Librarian and grandmother who happens to love technology.  But, I am one of those people who did not believe that anyone would ever want to carry around a device that could house thousands of books.  I also believed that part of the reading experience was actually holding, feeling and turning pages of a book. Boy, was I wrong.  First I got the Kindle 3G. I fell in love with it.  When the Kindle fire came out I knew I had to get one.  You see I also had my eye on the IPAD.  No more.  The Kindle Fire is good enough for me. Love It.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Best Alternative to iPad,February 22, 2012By&nbsp;R. Alejandro "REGINACARMELITAS"(Upstate NY   USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have an iPad2 but this one is our 3rd Kindle Fire (hereinafter referred to as KF) from Amazon.com for my wife and kids and they love it! In my opinion the iPad2 has more features (front &amp; rear-facing cameras, etc.) than the KF but after using both systems I can honestly say that the KF is a great Android tablet that does the job, price-wise and size-wise My daughter in college uses it everyday in school and you won't believe what she can do with her KF. I guess the more tech-savvy you are the more you can maximize the use of the KF to it's fullest potential. There are also tons of free apps on Amazon.com and elsewhere. Can't beat that!If you are not sure if the KF is for you, do more research. Go on online forums and product reviews and get as much information as you can before jumping in. Every person has different needs so don't buy something just because your friends have it. In my case, I am completely satisfied with the KF.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Experience after 3 months Ownership,February 15, 2012By&nbsp;Chidi Sr.(KS, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had a few Kindle Fire devices over the past 3 months. I purchased the first one in late November 2011. After playing with it a bit, I was quite intrigued by the approach and concept taken by Amazon. The price being extraordinarily great and the user experience very smooth, I bought a few more.I really didn't want the Kindle Fire for myself - I am a techie. I believe the absence of the full Android market and some Google applications, kept me out. But for those who can live without those Google services, and Swype-like keyboards, this is a steal. You would not miss the cameras or Bluetooth since most smart phones have those and for many, those are non-essential on a tablet.On the Fire you can play games, do online homework on the school web sites, visit flash-based game sites, and watch Netflix, Youtube and Prime video on demand. There are lots of books, games and applications in the Amazon Android and Kindle store. The Kindle Fire experience is a kids dream.If you hook the Fire up to a computer via USB it appears as a convenient hard drive. No software needed. You just drag and drop what you need to take on the road. There isn't a lot of space but there is enough space to store 3 or 4 full length (8+ hours) compressed movies for the road. For your locally stored home videos or music on Fire, you will need an application like "Avia Media Player" to play them.The user interface is smooth, first graders will master the interface in minutes. Some things need getting used to but can be picked up quickly. Nothing is really out of place or non intuitive. It could be a bit more responsive at times but that is just a quibble. The power button is  fine, the USB charging is quick and simple. You will need a wired headset if you want great sound, but who doesn't have one of those these days.I recently lost one of my Fires. The battery wouldn't charge. No problem with the others though. I contacted Amazon and they shipped a replacement via two day shipping immediately. Amazon customer service for Kindle Fire was great - less than 1 minute wait time, easy to use chat sessions and quick call back, plus prepaid shipping (both ways).For an affordable 7 inch tablet with full web compatibility (including flash) that is almost a complete replacement for any kiddos net-book or desktop (for online lessons, games and homework), it is a super deal. If you need a gift for a non-techie friend or family, get them one of these. You will not regret it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Test Platform for Android App Development,February 15, 2012By&nbsp;Ted Hancock(Wilmington, NC)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm definitely not a typical Kindle user. I have never read a book on a "reader" (audiobooks in the car for me) and I have only streamed "HD" video a couple of times. As long as Blu-rays exist, I will not be watching low quality video on a tiny screen.I purchased the Kindle Fire as one of many pieces of test equipment for a healthcare related app I am developing for Android and iOS. The Kindle doesn't have Market access and I am purposefully not "rooting" the device which would invalidate it as a test platform. To my delight I was able to send my signed test app to my Kindle via the built in email app. I have also been able to send several Market apps from my phone to my Kindle, but some refuse to work.So, for this review, keep in mind that I have an iPad 2, Asus Slider, iPhone 3GS, iPhone 4s, iTouch, iView tablet, Cruz Micro tablet, and Droid Incredible to name just a few. The Kindle is a real tablet with a lightening fast dual processor unencumbered by so called "bloatware". Amazon keeps the OS completely up to date and it will likely get Android 4.0 ICS very soon.The screen is bright and clear with excellent sensitivity. The typical Android controls like buttons, checkboxes, etc have a unique but consistent look and feel that make my app, designed for 3" screens, look great. As a result, the Kindle has become my primary test platform.Let's get down to brass tacks here. Amazon is selling the Kindle for a loss. For you that means you're getting a $300 tablet for $200. There is no other tablet on the market that can come close to that "bang for buck" formula...period. A nice bonus was the Amazon Prime trial. I completely ignore all the free videos and other media and use only the shipping benefit. With free two day shipping I now do 90% of my shopping through Amazon. I don't mean 90% of my online shopping...I mean 90% of my TOTAL shopping. Amazon wins. I win. Everyone is happy.You will not regret buying this machine. If you buy an iPad, however, when your kid cracks the screen, they're going to be giving back their allowance for the next 10 years. When looking at small electronic devices, of questionable utility, you shouldn't be thinking about the motorcycle you could have bought for the same price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)













6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsgood device but beware of eye strain,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Ig "Ig"(Brooklyn, NY United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've owned several of the original e-ink Kindles. Upgraded to the Kindle Fire yesterday. I like it but I must say, the eye strain is really more noticeable with a tablet LCD screen vs the original e-ink.I also think it lost a star because for some odd reason .mobi files (Amazon's own format) are not associated with the ebook reader application. So, when you download a .mobi from box.net or some other place, they will not open. All books must be either purchased from amazon or sideloaded via Calibre. Only annoyance thus far. Otherwise, love the device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA Good Tablet,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Govindarajan S-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At the time of this writing there have already been more than 4000 reviews. All that could be said has already been said and I do not think if I can add much to it. However, I will try to present my view.I have been using this tablet for the past 3 weeks and it also includes two long flight journeys. I find the 7" a little lacking, not much but just a little. That said I would happily take a 7" than 10". The screen is wonderful. Pictures, movies, text, etc display wonderfully well. I am a prime subscriber and it was one the motivational factors to buy this tablet. During the flights I finished reading two books. The reading experience was fine and as good as any LCD screen experience. As usual with kindle the font, line spacing and margin options made reading a reasonably good experience. Movie watching was very good indeed and I was impressed with the screen quality, smooth videos and a reasonably good sound output from the speakers.I installed a few applications and side loaded a few popular free ones that I use regularly on the phone. It pulled my corporate email fine and replying to emails was less cumbersome than on the phone (obviously). The browser was fine and as noted in the several review sites its performance is nothing to brag about. I downloaded Opera mobile from Opera website and it made a huge difference in performance. I now use Opera almost exclusively on the Fire.The interface is simple, clean and easy to use. The carousel is a good idea although annoying at many times. The could have just provided some widgets and favorites in the home screen rather than the carousel. The tablet is surely a little heavy for 7 inches. I found my wrist aching after a little while. A Samsung galaxy tab 7 feels quite a bit lighter. Lack of any kind of physical buttons, apart from power, is a little annoying at times. I would have preferred volume buttons at least. The design is simple and boring but I can live with it.As shown by iFixit this thing has bluetooth built in, however, I am not sure if it has a bluetooth antenna. They should have just enabled it. It would help in file transfers and wireless audio streaming to a stereo. If I have to nit pick I would have gladly paid $250 for this if it included 1GB RAM, 16GB storage, bluetooth, and a simple camera (i know this device does not require a camera), and a SD card slot.All said and done I love this tablet and I look forward to using it to the fullest.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGood tablet made great by the priice,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;JLM(Chicago, Illinois)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Given that there are over 4,000 reviews as I write this one I'll use this post just to identify some thing I hope Amazon will address in the next version. First of all, the carousel is just a stupid idea; it should be bagged. The home screen s/b given over to the favorites section so whatever is used regularly can be pinned there and then be easily available without having to scroll down to reveal the second and third rows of the favorites. Between the favorites on the home screen and the easy access to the main categories the carousel serves no useful purpose and takes up way to much screen. Second, give us a second warning between the 15% battery remaining message and automatic device shutdown. Third, syncing could be improved. right now, when the Fire is turned on it tries and fails to sync even as it is still attempting to resurrect the wifi connection, forcing s manual sync after the connection is made. Better pacing is called for. Fourth, when the primary activity of the user is reading, the battery should last longer than 6 hours. I know I'm spoiled by the battery length on the 2nd generation Kindle, but the Fire isn't as fully functional as it should be to have to charge the Fire overnight then again mid-day if the plan is to spend Sunday reading the Sunday paper and a good book on the Fire. And fifth, the Owners Lending Library is a great idea, but it needs to be beefed up with more widely read titles. Right now, there are too few titles I've even heard of, and the ones I've heard of I've probably already read. Most of the available titles wouldn't make my primary or secondary reading lists. So far, being limited to one title a month is not a burden; I'm still looking for a title to read in my second month.Lest anyone think my comments don't reflect my rating, I do like this device and am happy I purchased it. My desire was a portable device on which I could read books, newspapers and magazines, manage my emails, and surf the web. I can do all these things well. The 7 inch screen is large enough for me. My wife has the iPad 2, which I've used a lot. For the way I use a tablet, spending $200 instead of $500 is a no brainer. I didn't expect the first edition Fire to be perfect, and I'm just offering up my suggestions for some of the improvement's to be incorporated into the second version.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsjust missing one thing,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;consume fire-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was a nook color fan but was really excited about the kindle fire. The kindle fire is everything I wanted but there is only one down side to the kindle fire. It is missing an expansion slot for a mini sd memory card. 8 gigs is not enough and it is not possible to be connected to  internet all the time. I am a traveling girl and I am often in places with no access to the internet. Having my audio books and music  on hand is important to me. My music library will max out this device. I am seriously thinking about returning it and just pay extra for the new nook tablet. I like but I would love it if it had a mini sd slot. I hope amazon is rethinking this missed opportunity This could be an awesome deviceHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire exactly as expected,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;jolene-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been using the Kindle Fire since Nov 25th and it is performing as advertised. I have been using it about four or five hours a day (I read a lot) and the battery life is very good when reading. The battery is not as robust when browsing the web but I can leave it pluged in when using it in that manner. This was the perfect solution for me and the cost was affordable. Thank you AmazonHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;D. Dixon "jazz lover"(Houston, Texas United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a true media consumption tablet.  It is designed for that purpose and it does it very well.  I like the interface that amazon has developed for the android os.  I have now had this for a week and I love it.  I'm still getting used to the fact I have a tablet and don't have to do everything that I used to do on the phone on the phone but on the tablet.  However, it is only wi-fi, and I knew that going into it, though I do wish it had the 3g option, like certain versions of the iPad.  Will it be a true iPad killer, only time will tell, but so far the numbers have put it at a good strong second, 20% of the public say they'll buy a Fire, though still 65% say they'll buy an iPad.  The price is the major point, but also that it is from Amazon, a company that we trust to deliver on what they say.  I am looking forward to some company coming out with an attachable keyboard, if it is possible.  I'll comment more when I have had more time to delve into all that the Fire can do.  So far, I love it and, it is not an iPad, but it is definitely a great product that I'm looking forward to seeing where Amazon goes with this.  With such a solid base for products, the Prime membership, the Amazon cloud for music storage, the app store with great support, and of course that wonderful book selection, and excellent screen resolution, how could you go wrong.  I have watched a couple of movies on it and the battery life is great, it only moved 10% or less of the battery for one movie because it only uses wi-fi.  I have a Kindle 2 3g and I love reading on it, and with the Fire I was concerned about the screen being lighted versus the e-ink.  Amazon definitely has done their homework and my eyes are not fatigued as much as I thought they might be.  I do tire a little quicker when reading for extended periods of time with the Fire when compared to the regular Kindle, hours at at time for me.  I do admit that I was concerned with the screen size for watching movies, but it is fine.  My eyes were not tired at all at the end of a 2 hour movie and the sound coming from the headphones was great.  I am glad that Netflix was able to get an app for it as well as many of the apps that I already had on my android phone.  I do recommend this to anyone who would like to have a tablet computer that will fit in one hand and have a great backing of a strong company.  Though, I do wish it had 3g capability, maybe in future versions.  I bet they did not include the 3g for battery life.  I now have only charged it once since I got it and I do use it regularly.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle FIRE First Impressions,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Sandy Daze-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like myKindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi, although am disappointed that Amazon has limited some of the apps available, that would run, and which are available at the Amazon App Store.  For instance, there is no out-of-the-box way to easily print from the KF.  On my HTC Evo phone I use PrinterShare Premium, obtained via the Amazon App Store, BUT not available for the KF. (With PSP I could easily print to my newBrother Printer HL2270DW Wireless Monochrome Printer, again purchased through Amazon.)  Found this in ability extremely frustrating &amp; annoying.  Then, voila !  remembered www.getjar.com and was able to download and install Printershare Premium without a hitch.Wish the Bluetooth had been enabled (e.g. useful forSatechi BT Wireless Bluetooth Portable Speaker System for MP3 Players, iPhone, Android Phones, iPad, or headsets); hopefully there will be a workaround in the not-too-distant-future.  (For that matter, why wasn't the FM also activated?)  Would have liked a micro-SD card slot, these are very common on so many devices it is unfortunate, but no deal-breaker imho, that it was not included on the KF.  GPS would have been nice for navigation apps and for apps like Google sky.Overall, as a first generation device, I am very pleased.A Very Good review/overview is here:http://www.terracode.com/KindleFire/KF_Review_and_Tweaks_P1.htmlTake good care,SandyHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - A Quick and Dirty Review,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;bish(United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've never had any other tablets before so this probably comes from an _untainted user's_ perspective._Accentuate the positive_1. Comfortable holding it in hand. Not too heavy yet a sturdy feel.2. Good quality apps curated by Amazon. If you still want to explore the untamed wilderness of the Android App Store, Amazon allows you ways to do that too.3. One prime app given away free by Amazon every day.4. Syncing across various devices.5. Very smooth touch operation. There were some stutters while loading lists and scrolling at the same time but nothing to loose sleep over. Web loading was decently fast. This is supposed to improve as people start using the device and the cloud portion gets better "trained" over time._Eliminate the Negative_1. On/Off button at the bottom may not be the best location. On the other hand, if you just turn the device 180 degrees most screens will rotate to allow you to place the button on the upper edge.2. Once you buy stuff, the Store page doesn't show that you already have them when you visit their lists.3. Diabolical need to activate the "One-Click buying" feature. Definitely teach your kids about it if you're planning on giving them one of these devices.4. Doesn't play .avi format videos - what's up with that?! Fire only accepts, as far as I can make out, mp4 format videos. I tried converting some of my .avi videos but they all came out looking "long-face" on the fire.5. Screen is too reflective and shiny. This may be good fore watching movies in a dark place but not good for reading books in well lit environment._Needed Features_1. A way to categorize apps, books and magazines, so I may separate my kids' books from my own, for example.2. Physical volume rocker. Somehow a software based rocker is just not useful enough - it takes too long to locate, open and slide.3. The store page should indicate items that you've already bought. When you do searches for items on the store, the resulting lists give no indication on things that you have already bought.4. Camera/Microphone definitely!5. Add more video format playing capability.6. Cellular capability. This along with #4 will make me forget about the iPad completely!At the end of the day, I'm quite happy with my Kindle and do not yet mourn my decision to buy one! :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIncredible little device!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Bluestocking(NJ)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Wow, as usual with tech reviews, the experts had it slightly wrong - the Kindle Fire is a wonderful toy!  I bought this for my daughter for Christmas but just HAD to test it for myself.  She won't mind a slightly used Fire, I hope...  I do have an iPad, which I dearly love, but the Fire has some nice points.  Number 1 - love the size!  It's hefty without being heavy.  I can easily see myself popping it into my purse, which I can't do with the iPad.  The screen is beautifully clear and sharp, which is important to me.  Content is delivered instantly, as I've come to expect from Amazon.  I have not purchased any apps yet and will add to this review when I do.I don't see how anyone could go wrong buying this - it's a beautiful device with Amazon's incredible customer service standing behind it.  The price makes it irresistible.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsDisappointing - skips or duplicates words between pages,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Michele-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been waiting for this for a month now and after a day of use, I am disappointed and wonder if I should return it.  I was excited to try reading a book in a larger font and was shocked to realize that It started skipping words or duplicating words between pages.  It is only text!I ordered a children's book and there were blank pages in between.Browsing is slow and basic links on yahoo didn't work.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGetting just what you paid for, and then more!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Cassandra M. Hammond(San Diego, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all - I love my Kindle Fire! I had a Kindle Keyboard prior to this, but wanted to upgrade when I heard about the upcoming Fire. Here I will go over the features by category.E-Reading:As an e-reader, the Kindle Fire is just as good as it's predecessors. Naturally the big difference is between the e-ink technology and the LCD backlit screen. Having used both, I will admit I prefer the e-ink technology used in the other Kindle models. However, the LCD screen isn't too big of an issue for me. When I want to read at night I simply change the screen to black with white text, and I find that it makes it much easier for me to read without worrying about my eyes hurting too quickly (I was able to do a good two hours before getting tired, and typically that was how long I would read on my Kindle Keyboard while using a booklight). The page turns are just as quick, if not faster. Also, I love getting color covers for my books!Apps:One big draw for me was the tablet-like functions that the Kindle Fire has. immediately I picked up some favorite apps through the Amazon App Store. For me, this was no big deal. I own a Droid phone, and use the Amazon app store regularly because of their free app per day. To test it out I played Plants vs Zombies, and it looked amazing! It was much better than playing on my phone, and I had no issues with flow of the game.Browsing:I bought this understanding that for the price this is not going to be an iPad (which is why I don't understand why Apple fans are QQing, there is a great number of people who are buying the Fire because they cannot afford the iPad). Regardless, I found that the browser was faster than my expectations! For the price I was expecting something that would move at a decent speed, but was surprised to find that it flowed nicely and that I was able to go on Tumblr (a site that gives high latency because of it's many graphics) without experiencing much lag at all.Documents:I love it! Not only is it nicely organized, but all documents uploaded flow just like books when reading them. It is a very good feature, especially for a college student like me!Video &amp; Music:With the free month of Prime that comes with the purchase of the Kindle Fire I chose to test out how nice movies looked. I was very pleased, and found it much better than trying to watch a movie on my iTouch. The audio was good quality, and with the beautiful color display the Kindle Fire is definitely great for media.All in all, I think that this is a wonderful product for the price you pay. As a college student I hate lugging around a laptop, but I also cannot afford an iPad or any of the other higher-end tablets. The Kindle Fire really gives you the essentials, and with that in mind $199 is an amazing price. One warning though for anyone who did not take note of contents, there is no usb cord! With the Kindle Keyboard the charger was a usb cord that plugged into the adapter, but this is not the case with the Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat once I learned how to side load Google Market apps onto it,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Kania(Texas)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love the interface and the access to all my Amazon stuff on the cloud. But there are a ton of Android apps I have on my HTC phone that I also wanted on my Kindle Fire. So I did a quick google search on how to "Side Load apps onto the Kindle Fire" and got them installed in no time at all.For the price, this is perfect. I love the size, I love the interface and since I only use it with WiFi around, the limitations of memory size aren't too bad. But that is why it is not 5 stars. Would love to have more on it for long flights on a plane.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt Fits In My Purse!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;C Knoke(Florida)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I could afford to buy an ipad but never had the desire to have one. I already have a great laptop. What sold me on the Fire is that because of it's size, I can keep  it in my purse and will never be stuck again waiting  at the doctor's office, in a long line, at the airport, without having a book, music, movie and games to pass the time with. I usually try to keep a book with me but unless it's a paperback, it can be too big and bulky. I've been a loyal Amazon customer since the beginning. I remember the first year when they gave free coffee mugs as Christmas gifts!! For me, buying the Fire was a no-brainer and I bought three more to give as Christmas gifts!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIf you want simple and enjoy your amazon content then this is for you....,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Hopeless "Romantic"(San Francisco, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my new kindle fire earlier today and spent a few hours playing with it and learning to navigate it.  Let me make this clear, this is NOT to be compared to an Ipad or other tablets, as the functionality is simply not there.  If you try to compare it with that, you will be slightly disappointed.My husband has an Ipad2 and I like using it.  However, I didn't feel like spending that much money for another one, when I simply don't use it to its maximum capacity.  It wouldn't be worth spending the extra money for what I will be using it for.  I mostly use it to read, browse magazines, now I can watch movies and videos for free (I am an amazon prime subscriber), play games, I can check my emails and do some light web surfing.  It is nice and compact, a bit heavier than the regular kindle, but you can still take anywhere with you in your purse.  Movies and videos showed up clear.  I was able to play a few games and they were amazing.  I was able to watch free episodes of good TV shows.  When I first booted it, all my books purchased for my kindle were there waiting for me.I did find the power button a bit annoying at the bottom, you will accidentally press it when holding it or leaning it against something. Amazon didn't think about design when they were making this.  Overall, it works fantastic for what I need it to do.  If you want something simple, easy to navigate, affordable in which you can enjoy your amazon content, then this is for you.  If you are looking for something equivalent to a laptop or an ipad, then i suggest you probably spend the extra $300+ and purchase something else.  I still have my older kindle, which i will probably continue to use to read, since it is better for my eyes and the battery lasts longer.  I will be using my kindle fire in bed to watch TV, movies, videos and perhaps play a few games without having to turn on the TV and being too disruptive or having your big laptop.  At the price, it was worth it for me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI've had it one day. Brilliant.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Delerak-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I may have to come back to this review later but so far I love my Kindle Fire. It does everything I thought it would. The streaming video thru Amazon cloud is super fast and HD, you simply can't beat the price either. I could buy 2 Fires for the price of 1 iPad and still have money left over.Amazon is going to take over the world.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's great!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Adrian K. Johnson(seattle, Wa United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like it it took about 10 minutes out of the box to get up and rolling. Every thing I expected in a tablet device, the kids love it. @ sub 200 I don't have the fear of breaking a 600 dollar tablet. User friendly a lot of free apps if you look. As amazon's first tablet launch 10 stars, I'm glad I took the chance on it. Happy Happy Joy Joy!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

57 of 76 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsSorely disappointed,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;M. James(Lincoln, NE USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Have packaged up the Kindle Fire that Amazon sent to me, and the cover I'd purchased as well, and am delivering to UPS for return shipment first thing in the a.m. Hours of attempts to get it to go online, and at least as much time spent on the phone with so-called Kindle "support" got me nowhere. They promised to have "an engineer" get back to me within 48 hours - NOT! The phone support people were clueless, though the last guy let on that they'd had a huge number of problems. For a customer who was nothing but satisfied with his three previous Kindles, this was a wake-up call. Amazon may be getting too big for its britches. Anyway, convinced me that I'll go for an iPad knowing I won't be wasting hours of my time trying to get the darn thing to operate like it's supposed to. Weirdest thing of all was turning it on the first time and seeing someone else's name - specifically, an "Emma" - identified as the owner. What was THAT about? Amazon, you blew it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

17 of 21 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsReasons I'm returning my Kindle Fire after using it for 3 days,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;D. C. Yu "SF Entrepreneur"(San Francisco, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered the Kindle Fire the day it was announced, and I had waited two months for this.  I have a Kindle 3 and I love it, and I trusted Amazon to make the Kindle Fire a great experience.  Unfortunately, because of the following reasons, I'm returning it to Amazon:* No physical volume button* Extremely audible hiss from the headphone jack -- I use high quality headphones but the hiss even at very low volume really distracts from the experience* Videos look mediocre to bad -- I looked at many videos I know are HD on both YouTube and Netflix.  On the Fire they look low-res and often pixelated.  Both YouTube and Netflix look WAY better on my iPhone 3GS, and that's simply unacceptable to me.  It's also not because the 3GS has a smaller screen.  I've seen these HD videos displayed beautifully on iPads.  Both the Fire and the 3GS were connected to the same wireless network.* Bad email client -- I've used many Android phones that all have better email clients than the Fire, because they use the client that comes with Android rather than some Amazon-made client.* No calendar client -- I'd like to enter my Gmail credentials and have email, contacts, calendar all work seamlessly.  Shouldn't be too much to ask for.* Non-standard browser - Silk really falls short.  It might appear okay at first, but Amazon is trying to solve a problem that didn't exist.  The native Android browser is standards-compliant and so much better, and Amazon should've just used that.  For example, clicks sometimes have unresponsive behavior.  Also, Silk is not "location aware."  There are some websites, such as Google Maps, that use your current location.  Foursquare also does it, and I'd like to have the option of sharing my location with the site, but the Silk can't do it.  We really don't need another browser and I guarantee you there will be more problems people will discover with Silk.* Appstore is lacking:  Some of the popular apps, such as YouTube and Facebook, simply point to a website.  Android apps for them exist, just not on Amazon.  If you come from iOS or an Android device that has access to the open market, get ready to be EXTREMELY disappointed by the app selection.* Gets "stuck" very often -- lastly, the Fire gets unresponsive quite often and makes the experience very jarring at times.  Ask yourself this, "Am I willing to deal with having to tap the screen 5 times to get something done?"I'm so sad to say that the Kindle doesn't do anything better than my old combination of iPhone 3GS + Kindle 3.  In fact, most things are worse.  I'm willing to try the Fire 2 again, but Amazon really didn't meet my expectations with the Fire, not by a long stretch.  Sigh..... and to think I was so excited about getting this for the last two months.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Friend With Benefits,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Morgan C. Valley(Wisconsin, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Preface ...A good while back I started to consider purchasing a "tablet". Now, with full disclosure in mind, most of my friends know I'm not too keen on Apple, which is a bias I have developed due to my ire for iTunes. I'd guess I'm not the only person in this digital age that can say, "I like my iPod Touch just fine but I loathe iTunes." The thing about Apple that really bugs me is that iTunes is proprietary. If you want to download and manage content, you have to do it through iTunes, period. And, I simply find iTunes a bloated, annoying nightmare. Having been up front about this, I am admitting that the iPad tablet is the standard by which all others aspire to. I get it, and I concede the point. But, I will not own one because I refuse to be tethered to iTunes, not ever again. (Please, hold back on the vitriolic feedback from those who can't imagine someone not supporting the great Apple. It's not a personal attack on you.)Kindling ...So, moving on, I resolved that all other products were fair game. I looked at, researched, Googled, and generally poured over just about every other tablet, including e-readers, until my head nearly exploded. Back and forth, comparing specs, reading reviews ... ugh. Then one day, I just had a moment of impetuousness and ordered a Kindle Fire. Right up until the day before I clicked "Place Order", I still had no definitive idea what to do. I reckon, in a moment of clarity, I realized the answers to a simple question ... "What are you going to use it for most?"The answers in order were 1) reading books and magazines, 2) streaming video, 3) minimal amounts browsing, email and social networking, and, 4) listening to music.Full disclosure in mind, part deux: I'm already an Amazon Prime subscriber, an avid online consumer and a big fan of Amazon. Big. My annual $79 Prime membership easily pays for itself in shipping and convenience and, although the content doesn't match Netflix, Prime does include many thousands of movies and TV shows which can be streamed "for free". I stream a good deal of content under the umbrella of my Prime membership already, and I love it.Early on in my research, someone suggested the Kindle Fire but, after looking at it with a full blown tablet in mind, I dismissed it because it was comparatively slim on internal memory (8GB) and wasn't 3G. (It's Wi-Fi only.) I quickly said "Meh" ... and moved on. But, someone had said in a review that at $199, the Kindle Fire was almost an impulse buy at its low price, and that is certainly true. In fact, an iPad cost substantially more than twice that and so do a lot of other full blown tabs. A tweaked out iPad ... three times as much. You can get a decent lap top for that kind of scratch!My wife has owned a first generation Nook for over a year now and she loves it and reads on it every day. Nice size, and in a nice case, kind of sexy. (Also true for the wife, I might add.) I narrowed it down to wanting a 7" device pretty easily. Although, I really didn't consider the Nook Color because as a Prime member ... well, why would I? Prime has its Kindle benefits, too.Yes, well, so I pulled the trigger on a Fire, and here's my blather on the "points of interest".Addressing My Own Criteria First ...As An e-Reader - Fabulous. At my age, it's wonderful to be able to size the font to my own needs. And, although it's not as "booky" as e-ink (like the display on my wife's Nook), you do have options of black on white, white on black, or my favorite, brown on tan. With the brightness toned back, it's very easy on the eyes during long reads. Also unlike her Nook, you can read in portrait or landscape orientation, and of course, it will self-adjust accordingly. It comes loaded with a comprehensive Oxford Dictionary which offers a really wonderful service; see a word you aren't familiar with and you can long touch the word which will immediately bring up the dictionary entry of it. Now that's something you can't do with paper.Images look rich because the screen is backlit and uses "in plane switching" (IPS) technology, the same technology that my best monitor offers, the one I use for professional photo editing. This means it looks great at almost any angle of view.Magazines look fabulous, too. The Fire offers a PAGE view and a TEXT view. In page, you see the entire original magazine page, and you can pinch to zoom in, but on a 7" screen, it's not really very practical. In text, you get to bypass all the ads, still see the images in the articles, and adjust your font to taste. Hit the "like" button for me. That's a terrific feature.The Fire is fairly heavy in the hand, heavier than the wife's Nook, but I just am not bothered by that. I parked it in a RooCASE Dual View Multi-angle Leather Folio Case Cover ($25) which easily allows you to prop the device up in either orientation. It acts equally well as a stand or for lap support and it looks and feels great in addition to being protective.No buttons to turn pages. You just touch the right or left edge of the screen, or sweep a finger across it in whichever direction you want to go. One friend told me, "Yeah, sorry, I like paper." That's fine, and I get it. Old habits die hard. As for me, the thing I most dislike about books is having to hold the damn book open (e.g. ... a thick paperback) which, as you get older, becomes more tiring on the evermore arthritic hands. Further, real books certainly do look great on a shelf, where they gather dust, and take up space ... a lot of space if you are a real an addict.As A Personal Streaming Video Player - Fabulous.  Wi-Fi required. (Of course, you can store movies on the device, but that's a little silly. Six or so movies would eat up your onboard storage. But, if you do that, you could view them without Wi-Fi.) The aforementioned IPS technology makes for a beautiful visual experience. The player buffers quickly and streams super smoothly with no glitching, at least on my home Wi-Fi network and everywhere else I've used it. The LCD screen is bright enough that I actually like to dial the brightness back substantially (which also extends battery life). One could listen to the little built-in speakers for audio, but in this age of ear buds, I'm not sure why you would unless it was your only choice.  The standard 3.5mm stereo audio output will take any headphone with a compatible male jack, or could just as easily be run to your home stereo amplifier and listened to on the "big system" with little more than a trip to Radio Shack (or Amazon) for the right cable / adapters and an available auxiliary input on your home stereo system.I've watched everything from vintage Rocky And Bullwinkle to Joss Whedon's Dollhouse while sitting comfortably at my desk, in my big leather office chair, audio connected to my head courtesy of Bose headphones, even whilst sipping a wee dram of Irish whiskey ... and it all looks great. Needless to say, it interfaces seamlessly with Amazon Prime Instant Video, but YouTube is just as stable.As A Browser / Email Utility - Great. Wi-Fi required. Amazon Silk, the browser that comes with the Fire is fast and smooth and easy on the eye. I like it very much. As for email, I was able to configure it for my Google Gmail account in about five seconds flat. To be fair, while it's nice to be able to check your email and respond and have all your contacts on board and all that, I really don't much care about it. Sometimes I just don't want to be reached, and while using it as a reader or video player I'd prefer to escape the world and its immediate connectivity. So goes it with Facebook and similar networking, too. Although the app and interface for Facebook on the Fire is quite nice, it isn't a deal maker for me. I already have a 3G phone that does all that. (I pay a minimum fee of $30 a month for 5GB of "data" access on my Droid, and use about a tenth of a gig, which tells you how much I want to be browsing and emailing when I'm not in my office or my home workstation.)As A Music Player - Great. Wi-Fi not required to access files on the device, but is required to use Pandora or similar cloud based services. You can listen to music while reading if you so choose. Again, the built-in speakers are adequate, but don't expect mind-blowing bass response. In fact, except for the lack of substantial volume, (it is, after all, a  "personal space" device) it sounds every bit as good or better than the first CD boombox I ever heard, which was a hell of a step up from a cassette tape boombox. Anyone remember those? Of course, headphones, earbuds, or output to an external stereo system would be a preferable audio experience.More To Consider ...Charging - You can use the device normally while charging with the supplied AC charger, but not while connected to a computer via USB where is it being recognized as a storage device, even though it is charging while connected there. I really appreciate being able to use it while charging; both places where I read most often, my desk and my recliner, are AC outlet friendly. Incidentally, it does NOT ship with a USB 2.0 / micro B connector cable, but if you have a smart phone, you probably already have one.Internal Memory - Yes, 8 gigs (under 7 after the space the OS hogs) is small by today's standards. Amazon is banking on the cloud, and giving away 5GB of cloud storage right out of the gate. Additional space is dirt cheap if you need more. The Fire offers two side by side, on- screen buttons: CLOUD and DEVICE. You can choose content from either when in wireless range. You can easily manage your content, swapping stuff to and fro using your Amazon account (It's the Manage Your Kindle link). But, this is NOT iTunes, baby. You can also manage and back up content by plugging your Fire into your computer via USB and dragging and dropping into and out of folders at will. Take that, iPad. That was a big one for me.Yes, I know ... we've become digital collectors. More is gooder. Our devices have become our digital junk rooms. Some of you have 240 GB of space on your music players and feel compelled to carry 20,000 mp3 files around with you everywhere you go.  Book addicts, I ask you, are you going to have to carry 10,000 books on your device? I mean, after you've totally enjoyed Cold Mountain, do you really need to carry it with you as if at any moment you might need to suddenly reread it on impulse?  In my own case, I lean more toward non-fiction which includes a good deal of "how to" content, some of it reference material. Even at that, I couldn't imagine myself needing to carry thousands of books with me. Realistically, even on a long vacation where Wi-Fi wasn't available, I think 6+GB of storage would provide all the space I would need to read and enjoy some music. All I would have to do would be to prepare for the trip by managing the content I intended to take along.Whispernet - The Kindle Fire uses Whispernet to sync all your compatible devices.[sic] ... "Whispernet is accessible without any monthly fee or wireless subscription, although fees can be incurred for the delivery of periodicals and other content when roaming internationally beyond the customer's home country. Through a service called "Whispersync," customers can synchronize reading progress, bookmarks and other information across Kindle hardware devices and other mobile devices."  -- WikipediaWhat's that mean? Well, even if you don't have a Kindle, Amazon has developed software for a broad variety of platforms including Windows, Mac, iOS, Blackberry, Android and so on. For instance, I had Kindle For PC on my home computer, even before ordering my Fire, for reading a few free books. Whispersync sees to it that when I quit reading on one device I will be able to open and continue reading at the same spot on any other device.  Pretty smooth.Common Complaints - Having read through a great many reviews and message boards about the Kindle Fire before (and moreso after) I purchased one, I saw a some recurring beefs from consumers, both Kindle Owners and non-owners in the Anti-Kindle camp. My thoughts and observations:Clunky Interface ... Some complain that the interface itself is sort of awkward and "clunky". The main carousel stores your recently accessed content using large icons in the chronological order you accessed them. (You sweep through the icons the same way you sweep through your albums on an iPod Touch or iPhone.) Customer feedback has been serious enough about the lack of customization that at the time of this writing, Amazon has already announced that in a few weeks a seamless, wireless upgrade via Whispernet will be uploaded to everyone's Fire.  Most of you, if buying a Fire in the future, will never know the original issue existed, if it was a problem at all. Also, this announcement from Amazon is good news to me, as I know that they will continue to make improvements to the OS and interface and upload upgrades automatically. It will just keep getting' better. (UPDATE: Just hours after uploading my review the aforementioned upgrade was delivered and, praise glory, you now have the option upon long touching an item in the carousel to "remove from carousel". This allows for us to really clean up the carousel and customize it to our liking.)Not Responsive Enough ... This is, in my opinion, quite true. There are moments when you tap and nothing happens, and you must tap again, and again. The device seems "selectively problematic". I find no troubles while reading books, scrolling page to next page. The carousel can be troublesome, sometimes reluctant to lock onto an icon. Double tapping is often ineffective, requiring subsequent taps and faster or slower intervals, or harder pressure to be effective. I have considered the possibility that I just have to get used to the feel of it, but it's been a while now, and I'm still noticing the problem.My most frustrating moments come with "graphic novels". The Fire is touted as offering an amazing experience with comics, and comes with an app for reading them. There are many fine comics available, including free content ... and so, as a fellow who was once a kid who loved comics, I downloaded a half dozen or so free titles. Once I got the feel for navigating ... (double tapping the first frame of a page zooms in and then sweeping left advances you to the next frame, a wonderful concept in theory) the experience began to improve. However, the double tapping at the beginning of each page was simply terrible with regard to sensitivity, just awful. That kind of frustration simply kills one's immersion in the story and swaps it out for higher blood pressure.I'm not sure whether this is an app issue, an OS issue or a hardware issue. All I know is it's probably my one serious complaint about the device. Again, the previously stated, newest upgrade is said to include an improved responsiveness. I sincerely hope that is true.Smallish Keyboard ... I'm inclined to agree; I'd like to see the pop-up, on-screen keyboard have larger keys. It still feels cramped to me, and on a 7" screen, I can't imagine a reason not to utilize the majority of the space.Wi-Fi Only ... Just speaking for myself, I don't need 3G or 4G to read books. I have a Droid phone for all the other stuff. In my case, why spend extra money for that?Too Few Apps ... While it's true that there are not yet a huge number of apps for the Fire, I'm not too concerned about it. I found a free note pad utility and some other small things that seemed useful, and I'm not a gamer at all.  There is a toggle in SETTINGS to allow installation of apps from unknown sources, but I haven't been too eager to fill the device with stuff I probably won't use anyway.No Camera or Microphone ... I have a Droid phone for that. And, at $199, I don't think you can whine too awful much.No USB 2.0/3.0, HDMI, or Other Outputs ... All true. And, at $199, I don't think you can whine too awful much.All That "Amazon Stuff" ... I showed my new Fire to a friend while in the company of a young, computer techie stranger, and I mentioned it was not a full blown tablet. The young fellow rolled his eyes in disgust and made it clear that, in his expert opinion, it was a completely inferior device and waste of money, that it was a joke compared to iPad, and that you are forced into "all that Amazon stuff". Hmmm, how curious. I explained to him that I loved Amazon, was a Prime member who found it a tremendous value, that I didn't expect it to be a fully functional tablet, didn't need 3G, and that it was exactly what I was looking for. Then, I reminded him that he was perfectly OK with being tethered to the proprietary behemoth known as iTunes, so what was the problem? (The answer is ... he suffers from IT'S-NOT-AN-iPAD-SO-IT'S-CRAP syndrome.)Too Little Memory ... I'll have to admit, I'd have liked to see a 16 GB device for a little more, but as I stated early in the review, I came to terms with it. Amazon was adamant about keeping the price under $200, and with that came sacrifices. Fair enough. I'm over it.  One observant Kindle advocate on a message board addressed the memory complaint of another poster as follows: "If you really must have more memory, you can buy two of them and still spend less than an iPad costs." Indeed.Poor Battery Life ... This issue is the subject of much Internet fodder. So, some reality checking is in order. It's a backlit screen, and a small device, which means it contains a relatively small battery. One cannot expect the kind of battery life one gets with an e-ink reader. Remember that with Wi-Fi on, the device is constantly searching for a network, sucking juice. Remember that the brighter the screen, the more battery it eats. The first day, on the first charge, with Wi-Fi continuously on and the screen dialed up, I got just a few hours of charge. (After a few charges, the battery breaks in and improves.) And now, I am getting exactly what Amazon claims, about eight hours, give or take. Guess what I do? Yep, keep the Wi-Fi off if I don't need it and dial the brightness back considerably ... actually, I prefer it dialed back; I think it reduces eye strain. By the way, on a full charge, I can easily watch five to six hours of streaming video, for whatever that's worth.Poor Substitute For An iPad ... Apples and oranges are both fruits, but you can't substitute one for the other. Duh, it's not a full blown tablet. It's an e-reader with extras. It's a hundred and ninety-nine bucks, for cripe's sake.The Down Side ...Did you think I couldn't find at least a few things that bug me?Smudges ... Like my Droid, the screen is glass and it does take fingerprint smudges to the next level. I'm over it. I just pack a little microfiber cloth and when it bugs me, I wipe it clean.PDFs ... I was hopeful with regards to PDF format because I have a few eBooks that are in that format, as well as a good many User Guides / Owners Manuals for everything from high end cameras to electronic appliances. This is where a 10" screen would be a benefit. Pinch zooming and dragging the document around is a pain in the ... oops. Then again, I should have expected such ... it's a 7" screen. My bad.The Price ...It's a hundred and ninety-nine bucks, for cripe's sake!!  Keep that in mind, please.In conclusion ...I think it best to consider the Kindle Fire an e-reader "friend with benefits". I'm not the first to say or admit it will never be an iPad killer. Please refer back to the "apples and oranges" section when addressing that concept. Oh, and did I mention ...  I love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSome of you people are complete idiots.,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;Your Future Ex Husband "Vader Was Framed!"(Southern California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)If you bought this without first doing research then it's not Amazon's fault.  They have plainly noted that this is a Kindle and not a full blown tablet like the iPad 2.  If you think of this as a Kindle that can use apps then it's worth every penny.  I'm so tired of people saying this product is failing because it's not an iPad.  There was a news story on USA Today about this very forum and listed a couple bad reviews.  It's very ignorant of them, and anyone else that has off the wall complaints about this device.  Take your idiot hats off and stop being stupid.  This unit does NOT heat up on a normal basis.  This unit's on/off key is NOT in a spot where you should hold it.  The touch screen is NOT as responsive as the iPads but it's not meant to be.  It's not a tablet, it's a freakin' Ereader.  You can't produce anything from this product, think of it as a Sears Catalog for Amazon and you will be happy with your purchase.  Common sense in the 1 star sector set me off, sorry.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (8)

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI Am Addicted To My New Kindle Fire!,December 3, 2011By&nbsp;katlupe(Oxford, NY United States)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My husband surprised me with my new Kindle Fire two weeks ago! I had no idea, except that I was saving my swagbucks up for one, and the night before I had figured out how long it would take. To at least February, I figured. Now I do not have a mobile phone that has the fancy bells and whistles on it, so I did not have experience with something like this before. I am used to using a computer but that is a whole different concept. We generate our own electric so during the times of low sun we have to be very frugal with our power use. At night, I was using little book lights to read with. That was the main reason I wanted a Kindle Fire, as I saw that it lights up. I had the feeling it would work well for me.I was one of those people who said I liked holding a physical book in my hands. I said I liked having my books to slip in my purse or carry around the house so when I took a break I could read. Well, I do all of those same things with my Kindle! I actually look forward to getting off my computer every night to read! The fact that you can change the brightness of the light has been a big plus for me. I am at an age when my eyesight isn't the best, even with my glasses. So to adjust the font or the brightness of it is so simple. Depending on how my eyes feel that night, I can make the font larger or the light dimmer, whatever I need. Used to be I'd have to stop reading due to the eye strain.......not anymore!When we first got it, my Kindle was connected to my husband's Amazon account because he ordered it. It was very simple to switch to my account. At first I had a little difficulty with the connection as it would not take my password, then all of a sudden, it was connected. So I would say to have patience with that issue as it may just need to be put in a few times for some unknown reason. It was no big deal though.I cannot get over how fast the books download to the kindle! I am used to the slow satellite connection on the computer, so now I feel spoiled. I seem to be able to read books so much faster on it (maybe because I can see!). It is easy to use and gives me so much enjoyment. Plus, I love all those old public domain books I can now read for free. I probably would have never seen any of them.My friend from Facebook (who put the Kindle in my head to begin with) wants one badly, and she asked me what were the three things I liked about my Kindle. And what three things I didn't like about it. I had to really think to find what I did not like. All I could come up with was that I had to charge the battery every  morning. I love everything about it! The price included! It is surprising to me that it has such a low price.Yes, the Kindle Fire has changed my reading habits for the better!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsModel T of tablets,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Albert "DrAlAlDr"(Indianapolis, India)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Original Review:  I am a long time Kindle user who also subscribes to Amazon Prime.  I have an iPhone, but not an iPad.  I tend to be a late early adopter of technology, not in the first wave, but usually in second or sometimes third wave when price comes down, features increase and bugs decrease. But I track the options so I know when to go in and why I want a new gadget.  I also travel a lot for business, including international travel.  I've been waiting for the Fire as an affordable tablet that might supplement my Kindle, but not expecting an iPad or even a Samsung Galaxy Tab.  Which is good, because I feel like what I got is the Model T of tablets.My grandfather and dad use to tell me about the Ford Model T.  It was a basic, functional, affordable car that didn't have a lot of frills. Ford said something like, "It came in all the colors you wanted as long as that was black."  Well, the Kindle Fire fits that (right down to only coming in black).  It doesn't have bluetooth or much memory, both of which I think are problems and almost nixed the transaction for me - if not for the $199 price.I've been on a trip to Berlin and London and took my Kindle Keyboard 3G along so I could get newspapers overseas and I wasn't sure about the Fire's battery or ability to connect to WiFi.  But, I could have managed with just the Kindle Fire, or so it turns out.  The Fire needs charging a lot more often than the Kindle Keyboard, but it does ok on battery life.  I've been able to connect to WiFi in public places in US, Berlin and London, and in one case I used my BOINGO account via web page to log in.  I will say the Silk browser takes some getting use to (I'm not sure where it stores passwords and such, I think it must be on the device as it seems to have the ability to do this and automatically enter info if you return to a login page - including for a WiFi connection).  It definitely is slow at first, but it does seem to be a bit faster with time.  I use it off and on for web browsing, and it is ok for limited times that way.  Definitely easier to read the print than on my iPhone due to bigger screen.The Kindle aspect of the Kindle Fire is ok, though I don't understand why Amazon hasn't implemented folders or a collections feature as they have on the eInk Kindles.  I have HUNDREDS of eBooks and I HATE scrolling through all of them to find something.  Collections would be a big improvement.  Or "tags" so you could easily group/select books by subject (e.g., digital photography books, history books, medical references, etc.).  While I'm complaining about the software, Amazon, please listen to your loyal customers and allow the option of deleting things from the carousel on the opening screen!!As a shopping platform the Kindle Fire works fine.  I'm sure Amazon will make up in sales what it loses on each Fire.  BUT THEY WOULD SELL EVEN MORE IF THEY MADE THE KINDLE FIRE HARDWARE A BIT MORE COMPETITIVE - BLUETOOTH AND 16 OR 32 GBYTES OF MEMORY WOULD BE A GOOD START THERE.  As it is, without bluetooth, you can't easily add a keyboard, so I'm rapidly relegating the Fire to play time or reading.  I can live without another camera...if I need to talk on the phone, I'll use my iPhone (including with Skype).  I do wish the on/off button was on the top of the Fire, half the time I accidentally put it to sleep or turn it off when I set it on its bottom edge.The Amazon App Store is ok, and it tells you when an app won't work on the Fire (if you are ordering using the Fire), but the number of apps available is still very limited.  And some don't make a lot of sense.  No camera and only 8 GB of memory?  Then why have a bunch of photography apps?  Similarly, the office productivity apps are almost worthless given the lack of bluetooth for connecting a keyboard (they are ok for viewing docs though).  I like that there are some pre-installed apps and that Amazon has a free app every day (for all or just Amazon Prime users?).As I said, all in all, this is a Model T.  It is ok for reading, game playing, limited video watching, limited internet surfing.  It isn't an iPad or a Samsung Galaxy Tab, but it is a decent tablet and likely will improve with time.  I'm not sorry I bought it, it fits with 2nd generation technology (or 1st generation of Amazon's application).  I suspect it will actually be a "gateway" tablet for many on their way to a more capable other tablet, much like the Model T was the first car for many families - on the way to America's love with the automobile.Update, Nov. 29:  One thing I forgot with the original review.  The Gorilla Glass screen of the Kindle Fire may be tough and scratch resistant, but it is very reflective and a magnet for finger prints.  I applied one of the screen "protectors" to reduce reflections and decrease finger prints.  The screen is much more pleasant to use then.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat value and reliable Gateway to all your Media,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Kipp Poe Speicher "Kipp Poe Speicher"(Canton, Ohio)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm very impressed with the Kindle FIre, I was so thrilled when i heard about the price of it. Since 2009 I have been a True Kindle fan, it has changed my life of the way I read, and now we have the Kindle Fire that will also change the way I listen to music and watch films, and TV programing.Lets start with the video. Wow Hulu+ looks and works great on this, I have it on my PS3 also and it is really buggy on the PS3 but on the Kindle no problems at all. Great picture and sound and easy to navigate. Netflix seems to run very well also other than every once in a while you hear a slight click in the audio. As for Amazon Streaming video it is where this Machine really shines. With a free month of Prime you get plenty of films and TV shows to watch for Free. With a click of the button within seconds you have the movie in amazing clarity and sound in the palm of your hand. Super Troopers was the first movie i watched and was a lot of fun, nice to be able to stop it at any point and then start it right back up where you left off. A nice feature is having it in your carousel so all you have to do is press on it to resume the playback. Side loading video from you own collection is very easy also just plug in the USB to you computer just drag and drop.Music: What can I say but yes i'm in heaven with Amazon and their cloud service I think it was April when they announced  the whole cloud service for music and then they offered unlimited cloud service and thats all it took. I have an obsession for music and have a failing hard drive with over 200 Gigs of music from my collection. So since May I have been uploading my entire music collection to Amazon Cloud and now with a Wifi connection I have all the music at my finger tips with the Kindle Fire. If i'm going to be on the road I can easily hit a button and zoom the music is downloaded to the Fire.Yes it is a dream come true. The ease of just popping on over to the store while listing to the music is all right there.Apps: Along with Amazon's mention of the cloud service they also gave us an app store with a FREE app of the day that I usually start my day checking out and purchasing since the opening just to have plenty of Apps to go with the then rumored Kindle Tablet. Well the day is here and I have plenty of Apps to play with on the Fire. Games, utilities, art programs. they all run great on the Kindle Fire. I also have a Dell Streak tablet and the apps on it are so so sometimes it works other times it just sits there. The Kindle Fire always boots them up and your on your way.Web: It is nice to sit on the couch or at the kitchen table and surf the web, It seems very quick and easy to me I enjoy it just sometime I forget the ability is there right on the Fire.Books: Well here we go back in 2009 i purchased my first Kindle 2 and instantly became a true addict to reading again. Having Dyslexia reading has always been so hard and it took me forever to read a Dead Tree book but then the Kindle came out with the ability to adjust the type size and the line spacing and it was like being reborn I was able to finally read without using my finger following each and every word. Now with the Fire not only do you have the ability to adjust the txt, We also get to be immersed in full color graphics and photos. Reading on the Fire is also a lot of fun with a tap of the finger you can read the definition of a word with in seconds. If thats not enough you can link it right to Google of Wikipedia and explore more.I just love going to the book shelf section and enjoying all the cover art of the books. Your done with a book you are just a tap away from browsing the Amazon Kindle store. The ease of syncing up across all of you Kindle's is just another amazing way Amazon has changed the way we read and enjoy all other forms of media. Sure there a few flaws but it all can be fixed in a firmware update. I hope they put the Twitter posting capability in the reading app into the Fire OS along with the ability to see popular highlights. But those are a few minor things.I hear from others that the battery life is not up to what the iPad offers? I have no problems with the battery life, consider you can buy two Kindle Fires and still save a $100 over the iPad price and then get 14 hours of battery life. I love my eInk display but the Fire is also another great way to read and have all your media at your finger tips.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsoutstanding support!,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Robin Landry "Robin Landry, Author of &#34;Wh...(Seatac, WA United States)  -See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire on Wednesday, and by Thursday it wasn't working.  At first I couldn't get onto our home Wifi, though the device itself was working.  I called up customer support, within 2 min, I had a live, easily understood, and very knowledgable woman on the other end the line.We walked through downloading the updates, yes there are already updates, and then my Kindle Fire just laid down to die.  I could see a faint lightening of the screen when I turned it on, but nothing else.  It did get warm, and then I could smell and ozone smell(you learn as a mom raising boys, that this is not a good smell) so I unplugged my machine.The young woman on the other end of the line tried everything she knew how to do, even calling in help from someone who knew more.  But nothing worked.  She then emailed me a mailing label for UPS, so I could ship my Kindle back for free.  She apologized for my Kindle not working, and the promised to have one out as quickly as possible.This call ended at 4:30 pm, Pacific Time.  By 9:30 am, Pacific Time, I had a new Kindle Fire in my hands. One that works perfectly, in fact, with all that it does, my Kindle has exceeded my expectations.I have a Droid, and an Apple computer.  When I travel, I have to take my computer because my Droid, which apparently has no one to call for service, won't let me delete my email, so I can't get any new mail after one day, unless I delete it off my computer.  This makes my Droid only good for phone calls and texts.I bought the Kindle Fire so I could get email(which it does beautifully), rent movies to watch on a plane, read the news, and read books.  This will not replace my first generation Kindle which I love to have by my bedside to read at night, it's more to enhance my phone which is almost worthless.What I really love about my Kindle is the Pulse feature which I had no idea existed.  What Pulse does is gives you 15 different sources of info(news, magazines, website) so you can tailor you news to what you want.I love that I can stream my Netflix instant movies, I can look up who's in the movie on IMBD, I have the internet at my fingertips, and it's small enough to fit in most women's purses.At first I was disappointed that it was only Wifi, but after instantly connecting to Starbucks wifi and our at home, I was sold.  I can always download movies and t.v. shows for watching when I'm not connected.Great product, great service, and as usual, Amazon does an outstanding job of making me happy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect combination of price and value,November 29, 2011By&nbsp;H. sahay "gadget junkie"(Edison, NJ United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I will keep it short.This device just works.It is not super fast or super sensitive or an ipad killer or whatever. But for 199 bucks it lets you -1. Read (plenty of free books)2. Listen to music (Sideloaded to the device but mainly via wifi streaming from the cloud)3. Read magazines (some mags work better than the others. My favs, time magazine, esquire and maxim)4. Read my emails5. Stream movies from netflix or amazon instant prime.6. Watch clips recorded by my flip camcorder. (direct copy. No transcoding required)7. Plenty of Apps (not everything but everything that most people would want. Angry birds, Facebook, Youtube, pandora, hulu plus and my fav. - RDP application which lets me control all my home computers from one mobile device)8. WebsurfingIs it super responsive and fast like ipad ? NO !!!But it is responsive and fast enough so you will never feel frustrated or wanna smash it on somebody's head like i do sometimes when i try to use my archos 7 home tablet. It is super easy to carry around the house because of its size which is really great.I am on a N network at home and have never felt the surfing to be slow enough to bother me.If you are sitting at the fence wondering about the negative reviews here just do yourself a favor and buy the damn thing. Especially if you are a prime member because as a prime member you get free video streaming and free once a month book from the lending library. Not to mention one free paid app everyday plus the free 5GB of cloud storage.It would be the best 200 bucks you ever spent.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat device. Perfect price.,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Mridul-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought my Kindle Fire for reading academic papers and light web browsing. It turned out to be a good choice. Better tablets might be available out there but I don't think any of them provides such a solid build, polished interface and snappy performance at this price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product!!,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;Grateful Mom(South Plainfield, NJ USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'd like to say that I am a 12-year old boy and my father has the iPad 2. This is NOT an iPad killer so don't expect this to beat Apple's iPad in specs.IN THE BOX: In the box is the Kindle, a charger, and a getting to know your Kindle sheet. Once you set up your Wi-Fi connection, and time zone, you can start using the Kindle. It comes pre-registered with all your content, so I found all my books from my Kindle app on it. There is a Kindle Fire User's Guide and A Dictionary built into the Kindle.Exterior: On the bottom is the power button, headphone jack, and connection port. There is a soft back covering that feels nice in your hand, and the front is supported with Gorilla Glass.DELETING ITEMS: People have said that you can't delete items and it's in your cloud forever. That's not true. If they went online to their account and clicked Managing Your Kindle, they would see all their content and notice that there are available actions to do with your content, one of them deleting your content forever.HOME SCREEN: You cannot move around your recently viewed items carousel, but you can add them to your favorites section. It also shows tabs: Search, Newsstand, Books, Music, Video, Docs, Apps, and Web.RESPONIVENESS: People have been saying that the responsiveness is iffy and you have to keep tapping. Sometimes it can be too responsive, and sometimes not, but if you can be patient with the Kindle, it will work. If you tap too much, obviously it's not going to work.OPTIONS: When you're in the home screen or anywhere, you can tap on the cog in the top right, and it will show you basic options: Volume, Brightness, Wi-Fi, Sync Unlocked/Locked, which helps you to lock your Kindle in a portrait or landscape position. There is also MORE, where you can check your account, sounds, display, SECURITY, where you can add a passcode to block your Kindle from others, Applications, Date and Time, Kindle Keyboard, and Device.NOTIFICATIONS: If you tap the top left next to your name, it will pop up notifications from your apps and the device. You cannot open notifications unless you have a notification.PRE-INSTALLED APPS: Your Kindle will come with pre-installed apps that you CAN delete if you go to Manage Your Kindle. These apps are Audible, Comics, Contacts, Mail, ESPN Score Center, Facebook, Gallery, Help &amp; Feedback, IMDB, Pandora, Pulse, Quickoffice, Amazon Shopping App, and The Weather Channel.MAGAZINES AND BOOKS: Amazon has a wide selection of Books and Magazines, and you can sample a magazine for 14 days and can get a free sample of a book for as long as you want. When you tap on an item, it will give you some brief information about the book or magazine.APPS: Amazon also has over 14,000 apps, and one of those paid apps is free every day, very convenient.Most of these apps are popular, so it's not just 14,000 pointless apps. There ks obviously Angry Birds Rio, Seasons, and Regular. They also have Angry Birds HD for $4.99. There is also Scrabble, Doodle Jump, and Plants vs. Zombies. So you can see the app store is really nicely put together. On the home for the apps screen, it shows the normally paid free app, and the top 100 free and top 100 paid apps. Again, I like the app store layout.VIDEO: You can rent or buy videos, and some are free for Prime Members. EX. You can rent Harry Potter for $5.99 for 48 hours in HD. You can also see a video summary of whatever movie or TV show you would like to see.MUSIC: There is a nice selection of Music, and Amazon offers daily deals for this music. They give you a 30 second preview of the song you select. The price range for music starts from $0.69 to $1.29, so not bad pricing, especially cheaper than the iPad.BATTERY: The battery is not the best I've seen, but is pretty good unless you plan on being on it all day.READING: The reading experience is nice, with different typefaces available and margin spacing and different sizes and of course text lighting.WEB: The web is nice, with available tabs and bookmark options. It is not as fast as it claims, but is nice. Amazon's own website takes about 6 seconds to load.OVERALL: I definitely recommend this to anyone who wants all the content, an easy UI to handle, and portability. Buy the iPad if you want all the apps, fast web, and a great, easy experience. That's all, I'm going to go enjoy my new Kindle now!!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is an E-Reader on steroids NOT a tablet!,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;AlwaysAmazed-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a fan of the Kindle Fire because I bought it knowing that it was an E-Reader that possessed additional functions that would allow me to enjoy my reading experience in more ways.  It functions beautifully, the colors are vibrant, it connects flawlessly, and it is easy to use.  I love the Family of Kindles because they function as advertised, do what they claim, and are easy to use.  I work within their capabilities and recognize their limitations.  They exceed what I expect and do it at a reasonable price.I am continuously amused by the negative comments by some whose disappointment is better directed to themselves for bashing the product when they were the ones who tried to make it something it is not.  If you want the functions of a Tablet, pay for a Tablet.  Because you do not want to pay for the functions of a Tablet is no reflection on the Kindle Fire but rather a misperception by those who forgot that the Kindle Family are all E-Readers+.As the owner of multiple Kindles, I highly recommend them.  They each have their strengths and weaknesses but I have purchased each of them knowing that and they have never disappointed me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - Not an iPad killer but well worth taking a look,December 6, 2011By&nbsp;Norman White "Social Engineer"(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My son loves using my iPad so much and I can't get any time with it for myself unless he's asleep or not with me when I was trying to use it so we decided to purchase a tablet for him.We weren't looking to spend anything close to what an iPad costs so we started looking at the $100.00 price point.Originally, we had purchased the Nextbook Next2 book reader/tablet at $95.00.The product was presented as primarily a book reader with tablet capabilities.  I have to say that for a book reader, the Next2 is fantastic.  It does exactly what you need it to do.  As a tablet?  It fails miserably.  Very slow, not very user friendly, the screen is either navigated by touch or by stylus but either one will get you an accidental tap on something and you're navigated away from what you want.  The reason we purchased it was as a gift for my 5 year old son for his birthday.  He would rather have had an iPad as he wouldn't leave mine alone.  So we figured for $100.00, if something happened to it, we wouldn't be all that disappointed.  Overall, the device was definitely not what we were looking for.  I returned it within a week after we gave it to him and hhgregg (where I purchased it) refunded it with no issues.We looked at other tablets online and tried to stay around the $100.00 price point but everything we looked at we didn't have a live device to try before we bought and I wasn't about to start buying devices only to return them a few days later.We finally decided that we trusted Amazon and their products and return policy and we already had a Kindle and were satisfied with that, so we bit the bullet and paid the $200.00 for the Fire and placed the order.It was delivered 2nd day for free as we are Amazon Prime members.  I opened the package (a small box) to find a second box inside.This is the actual Kindle Fire product box.  It's small, very well made and packed very nicely so as to protect the device.I opened the box and pulled out the Fire and turned it on with the small on/sleep button (later on the location and sensitivity of the button).  I found the device was already charged to about 75% and was ready for me to put in my Amazon account information.  Now, I would like to make a warning statement here.  If you are ordering the Fire online, make sure you check mark that the device is a gift and it's for someone else other than you (meaning not your Amazon account).  The reason behind this is that there have been reports of a few (sorry I don't have exact numbers) cases where the package was delivered but when the box was opened it was missing.  A few days later, large amounts of music, videos, books, etc were charged to that account.  I'm sure the individuals and Amazon worked out what happened and things turned out ok as I've heard similar accounts of fraud were handle quickly and efficiently.Once the device was setup with my Amazon account information, it started to load my pre-purchased music, books, videos, etc that I had selected.  The time zone and time was correct including the date.  It was very intuitive to use and the overall feel was similar enough to the iPad that my wife, and son were able to use it with minimal instruction.Let me explain right now that this device was not created as an iPad killer nor if you ask me it will be.  The largest thing that it has going for it over the iPad and other tablets/readers is the size, integration and price point.  The interface I feel was designed to feel like a series of book shelves.  When you want to use something from those shelves, you use it and when you're done with it, it goes back on the shelf.The shelf theme is prevalent all through the interface of the Fire.  The `categories' are:-Newsstand-Books-Music-Video-Docs-Apps-WebYou can choose either items that are stored on the `Amazon Cloud' or on the device itself.Also on each category page is the option to go to the Amazon store.The titles within each category can also be sorted.-Newsstand:  By Recent or by title-Books:  By author, recent or title-Music:  By Playlist, artists, albums or songs-Video: By either Movies or TV and either by Recent or name in either of the sub categories-Docs: By recent or title-Apps:  By recent or Title-Web:  Obviously this is the only one that you can't sort however; there is a bookmark feature or a `favorites' feature that you can utilize as you would on your computer.Now, I'd like to tell you about the two things I mentioned earlier.  The power/sleep button and the account issue.First, the button.  The button is located on the bottom middle of the device.  The button is located so if you're holding the device wrong, you'll end up putting the device in sleep mode.  It's more of a nuisance thing, but still, not the most convenient thing.  My personal opinion is that they should have put it on the top of the device near an edge similar to the the location of the button on the iPad.The account information that is loaded on the device is a plus and a minus in that you don't need to enter your Amazon account password whenever you make a purchase of a book, movie, tv show, music or app.  It's charged to your account and becomes ready for download immediately.  Unfortunately I haven't seen a way to disable this, but I'm going to be getting in contact with Amazon support and see what I can find out.The battery of the Fire lasts.  My son has used it for several days both before he goes to school and after he get's home and it's lasted about 4 days of fairly decent use.  The battery charges fairly quickly and the only downside of the device in that respect is that it does get warm while charging.Videos are crisp and clear and the speakers on it are more than adequate in a home setting.  With the earphone jack it's a nice little device to listen to music while you're sitting in a book store or Starbucks or your favorite coffee house.I'd say if you're debating over getting either the Fire or the iPad (or another tablet), stop by a Best Buy or WalMart and take a look at it.  If you're not dead set on having the full functionality of the iPad but at less than half the price, you'd be best off getting the Kindle Fire.  Like I said earlier, it's not an iPad killer and it wasn't really meant to be, it's Amazon's first foray into the the tablet arena.Some things I'd like to see integrated into future versions of the Fire are:-Removable or upgradeable memory-3G (either paid or free)-Shift the power button to the top-Ability to disable saved account password (if it's not available now and I just haven't found it)Other than that, I don't think there's much that I'd add to it.  It's fairly light and well put together.The Amazon App Store is well put together and has many apps that are both free and paid apps.  Many of them are cross platform (on both the Android platform as well as the iOS).The speed of downloads and the speed of streaming does depend on the wi-fi connection that you have, so please keep that in mind.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire vs. Apple iPad 2,December 3, 2011By&nbsp;J. A May "Andy"(Houston)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For our anniversary my wife bought me a Kindle Fire and I bought her an Apple iPad 2.  We have been using them for several weeks and the comparison is interesting.  The Kindle cost $200 and the iPad 2 over $700, so what are the differences?  The Kindle Fire does not have a camera or microphone, so no skype.  It does not have 3G either.  These are not a problem for me, but may be important to some.Set up for the Kindle Fire was very easy.  I connected to our home WiFi on the first try, then connected to my home email on the first try, very easy.  Unfortunately, I was unable to transfer my Outlook contacts to the Kindle.  I contacted support and they said this feature was not available.  Hopefully, they will fix this oversight. The Kindle email program is fine, but I will need my contacts and the ability to synchronize them with my other computers.  The Kindle web browser is very good and very fast, not better than the ipad 2, but just as good.  The Kindle Fire works seamlessly with the Amazon Cloud and Amazon.com, it is easy to buy or borrow books, movies and TV shows.  There are lots of apps and games, but I haven't used them much yet.The ipad 2 setup was difficult and my wife had to take it to an Apple store to get everything working, but once she did get everything set up, it worked fine and she got her contacts synchronized with her iphone and Microsoft Outlook, a major advantage.  It works with Apples icloud OK.  She likes the fact that the ipad 2 is larger, I prefer the smaller size of the Kindle, so this is a matter of personal choice.  Battery life is longer on the Kindle.That is about all we know right now.  Obviously, the Kindle is much cheaper and the Apple's additional functionality may not be worth the $500 difference to everyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDo not know what people are expecting....,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Shannon Johnson "chi town girl"(Knoxville, TN USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I went to look at the one star reviews to see if anyone was having any troubles with their Fire yet, as it is a new product.  I have the issue of the menu kind of "skipping" when I scroll sometimes, but that is about it.  I do agree with a password lock on it, I have since my other Kindle, because it was set up when it was at my door and anyone can order on my credit card.I was surprised to see how many people were giving the Fire a one star review because it does not have a camera, etc. and it is just not as good as an Ipad.  Well....a Kindle is a READER - I believe everything extra on the Fire is a complete bonus.  I do prefer to read books on my original Kindle as it is easier on the eyes, but I have downloaded Angry Birds (addicting game btw), watched movies on Netflix, surfed the web, set up contacts in address book and have just essentially played around on it.  I bought the Belkin case because the recommended Kindle case did get a lot of bad reviews.  And the Belkin case works great.  Obviously, people did not read the specs on the Fire before they bought it if they are returning it after a day because of things that were obviously not included on it.I love my Kindle Fire, and the Kindle family.  I have played around on an Ipad and I actually prefer the 7" screen.  It's just easier to carry around and it's comfortable.  If you want to compare it so closely to how much of an Ipad it isn't - go get an Ipad and stop bringing the ratings down on the Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

11 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA wonderful entertainment device, and even a little more,November 29, 2011By&nbsp;KiddWilliams-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Plenty of reviews give a broader overview of the Kindle Fire. Others (negative ones, especially) focus on what the Fire isn't, or should be (in the writers' opinions), or on Amazon's shipping, or on customer relations. My comments are focused on  the functionality I wanted out of a unit like this, the ability of the Kindle Fire to deliver, and a few tips and tricks I've learned that have improved my user experience.Firstly, my rating would be 4.5 stars if fractions were possible. I really just love the device. Here's why.What I wanted:  I don't have another tablet, or even a smart phone. I still have what's now called a Kindle Keyboard, and love that for reading. For computing, I have a laptop. I had a 3+ year-old iTouch (pre-camera) that I also have enjoyed and used the bejeezus out of. For awhile, I've wanted something like the iTouch but larger, since using it is like looking and poking at a half-deck of cards. I wanted something to play music, watch Netflix, surf, look at my photos, check and send e-mail or Facebook updates, and sometimes review or make small edits to Word and Excel files - not compose heavily (that's what the laptop is for). If it could play Bejewelled and maybe a couple of other very simple games, even better. (I am not a big gamer.) I have wi-fi at home, and there are plenty of places I frequent that have it as well, so needing a 3G data plan wasn't a priority for me, either.Now, I am not knocking the iPad. It seems like a great device, and everyone I know who has one adores it. But for what simple things I wanted done, even the smallest, wi-fi-only iPad seemed pricy. And other Android tablets also seemed either too costly, too confusing, or too buggy, from reviews I read and from hands-on trials.When I heard about the Kindle Fire, I was interested, and read all I could about it. I was already an Amazon Prime member, so the ability to stream free video seemed nice enough (although Amazon's selection pool is still comparatively shallow). When I heard they allowed an app to stream Netflix, I ordered right away. I'm truly not an early adopter of devices, but Amazon and the Kindle have always done things well for me.What the Fire does:  It does everything I want out of a device, and more. Using my laptop, I uploaded just under 5 gigs of my iTunes library to Amazon's free cloud (the online cloud program walks you right through this, and even searches your computer for music). I've read complaints about the speakers on the Fire, but I think they're awfully, awfully good, better than my laptop speakers, even. The speakers are both on one short side of the unit. The stereo separation isn't quite what you'd get from having them on opposite sides, but you can definitely hear the stereo if you play a mono and a stereo file back to back. Anyway, they're certainly more than good enough for me.I transferred loads of photos to the Fire, using the USB connector that I had on hand from the Kindle Keyboard. Transferring files is a cinch, if you're used to using external devices with your computer, such as a flash drive. The Fire doesn't come with a USB connector, and if you don't have files to transfer, you can probably get along without one, but I've found it nice to do. They display sharp and crisp.Watching videos - Amazon's or Netflix's - is a true joy. The picture is just spectacular, the sound very good (see above), the downloading and buffering (at least on the connections I've tried) fast and invisible. Amazon also seems to be adding movies and shows to the free Prime library, so that's nice, too. The Netflix app also works flawlessly for me, although I've read other reviews that say the picture can sometimes lag the sound.Shortly after I got my Fire, an app called Documents to Go was the free app of the day, and I got it. (I should add two things: the Kindle Fire is clearly made to help you buy stuff, and the App store features a free app of the day, which for me has now become a daily ritual to check.) It allows me to read and edit Word, Excel, and Powerpoint files. With this, the Kindle Fire is now everything I wanted and more. Granted, typing on the Kindle's virtual keyboard, even in landscape format, is nothing like using a real keyboard, but you can go into the unit's settings and turn off things like Auto Capitalization and Auto Correction, and that helps. (There's still an auto suggest feature that doesn't seem to be able to be turned off, and it's annoying; a get-around, when you're using a word that it tries to "fix," is to tap the first word on the left of the auto suggest line at the top of the virtual keyboard, which is always the word you typed, and it will accept it. I hope that a future update, or future versions of Fire, will let auto-suggest be turned off fully.) These same writing observations apply to the Kindle's built-in e-mail app, which checks the accounts I most use, and from which I can read, manage, and reply to messages. (If you want to manage e-mail from an Outlook account or Exchange server, I've heard you have to buy a more detailed app, but since I have just Gmail and Hotmail, this hasn't applied to me.)For games and social networking: I found my Bejewelled, and also Solitaire and Spider Solitaire, and I guess I'm pretty set. I'm not a game person, remember. The pre-loaded Facebook app uses the mobile Facebook setting, which gives me everything I need from it.You'll notice I have said nothing about the Kindle Fire's e-reading. I've looked at a few books on the unit, and actually have decided not to use it for that. There's nothing wrong with it that I've found, but I guess I prefer paper or e-ink to pleasure reading on a backlit screen.Other observations or tips:(1) The screen:  As just mentioned, the Fire is backlit, and it's bright. Very bright. In the settings I turned the brightness all the way down, and it's still lit up more than I need. As for the screen: "fingerprint magnet" doesn't begin to describe it. I guess I'll accept having to wipe it off all the time for the scratch-resistance and sturdiness that the gorilla glass offers, though.(2) The Power Button: There are no buttons except for the on-off switch. Many people have complained about the switch being on the "bottom" and so being inadvertently hit. I didn't find this to be much of a problem, at first just turning it upside down, and then getting a cover. With the cover, the button is completely recessed. A cover also helps prop it up when I'm watching movies, and just in general makes it easier to hold - it's too narrow for both hands, as I've seen people hold iPads, and it's just a tad too wide on its own to hold comfortably with one hand for long. Otherwise, the size is perfect, and the Fire very portable.(3) User interface: In the first few days, the touchscreen had widely varying responses - sometimes needing several pushes to register, and other times being too sensitive. I've found that, after two weeks of use, this now has largely cleared up. Perhaps the tablet has subconsciously trained me, or perhaps there have been some hidden software updates. I do know I saw an almost immediate improvement after de-registering and then re-registering the device (a tip I read somewhere). Be aware that if you do this, you'll have to re-download or re-transfer all your personal content, and re-do any customized settings, including saved web sites. All your music and apps, free and purchased, will still be in your "cloud," however, for you to add back.(4) Web browsing: the Kindle Fire plays Flash animations, which my iTouch didn't, so I can finally see everything on a page that's there. Yes, I know Flash is on its way out, but plenty of pages still have it, and I don't like to miss things. I've seen, and experienced, that Silk wasn't as fast as some initial claims, but I tried another fix I read about - going into the browser settings and unchecking the "Accelerate page loading" box - and I can attest that this speeds up the browser to as fast as any other browser I've used, including Chrome on my laptop.(5) Apps:  I read reviewer complaints about the lack of apps for the Fire, compared to other Android devices or the app-happy iPads and iTouches. I have very simple demands, though (more simple than usual, I think), and so have found everything I need. On occasion, some apps have crashed and the system goes back to the home screen. I haven't experienced this enough to grind my teeth, but did want to note it.(6) The Carousel: On the home screen is the famous (infamous?) carousel, which consists of images of the books and apps used, "stacked" in the order of use. Below are "shelves" for icons you choose as your Favorites. You can add Favorites by long-pressing icons and selecting. You can also re-arrange Favorite icons by long-pressing them and finger-dragging them around. I find that I mostly ignore the Carousel, and just scroll down to the Favorites, but I would bet that, with all the complaints about it, the ability to turn the Carousel off becomes a future feature.Summary:  I was looking for a basic entertainment device to meet a few specialized interests, and in the Kindle Fire, I found that and more. Is it a full "tablet"? Beats me. All I know is, it's now my go-to device for almost everything I do electronically or online outside of work, and I am a fantastically satisfied customer. Only a few performance or customization improvements would make it a hearty five stars for me - not bad for a first release version of a device, I think.**EDITED 2/18/12Since writing the above, I've received two through-the-air updates to the Kindle Fire's operating system. I'm happy to report that almost all of the minor issues noted above -- in particular, the touch responsiveness of the screen, and the characteristics of the home screen Carousel -- have been fixed or improved. I've upgraded by rating from 4 to 5 stars, because this is just a fantastic device, and just keeps getting better.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)





8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo worth more than the $199, and most Amazon services work outside of the US,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Angellyc-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My mom just came back from her North American trip with a Kindle Fire. Before buying it, she was worried it wouldn't work here in the Philippines. After 2 months of waiting and reading ALL of the positive and negative reviews on the web, I told her to go for it. She didn't need any of those expensive tablets. All she wanted was something light and portable to bring with her when travelling. Just enough to check her Facebook and email accounts, surf the web, and maybe play some games and read a few magazines on. After having used it since last week, I can truthfully write that this is exactly what the Kindle Fire was built to do! I have to say, after setting the Fire up for her, I was really wanting one of my own.The Silk browser is super fast. Not buggy at all, like what the other reviewers have noted. Reading blogs and articles on it has been really easy, and the display is fantastic! I've used an iPad, iTouch, and an iPhone before and the display is close enough that you wouldn't really expect a display so good on such a cheap tablet. I also got a few magazines for her to read (Architectural Digest, Everyday Living, Bon A Petite) and after 3 hours of reading the magazines and part of a novel in a room with a fluorescent light, I had no eye strain to complain about. My mom also tried reading the novel for a few hours and was really pleased with how easy it was to read from. She usually complains of eye strain after reading from her laptop, but she was very happy after reading from the Kindle Fire.After reading a lot of complaints from different people about how a lot of Amazon's services not working outside of the US, I decided to try and see what exactly will and won't work from here in the Philippines.Let me first clarify that I did use a US credit card with a US billing address to make my purchases over a local IP address. To summarize the results of my experiment, cloud services for MP3's work, purchasing and downloading MP3's from outside the US work, cloud services for books and news stand works, purchases of books and from news stand works, streaming of videos DO NOT WORK outside of the US (but we already knew this before buying the Kindle Fire), purchasing and downloading of apps outside of the US ALSO WORKS. So for all those who are wondering, please read and re-read this paragraph again. If any of these are deal-breakers for you in terms of purchasing the Fire, then think hard. For us, these services were just bonuses since a lot of the things we wanted weren't tied to these services.Regarding the apps available, I've already downloaded about 30 apps from Amazon and also from outside Amazon. Just by doing a little research on how to do it, I was able to load plenty of apps from outside the Amazon app market without any rooting. If you really don't want to use any of your mental faculties about loading apps, then spend the extra few hundred dollars and buy a more expensive tablet.About the device itself, the dual-core chip is super fast and the touch display has a quick response time. The 7-inch display is great for us since it's just like holding a book. If my mom and I wanted a bigger display, we would be using our netbooks. The body is solid and it doesn't feel badly made. And for all those complaining about the power button being easy to accidentally pressed, just turn the display upside-down and problem solved. Personally, I never had any problems with the power button, and neither did my mom.With how great the Kindle Fire is, my mom is planning to buy another one when she goes back to the US in a few months. This time, it'll be for me to use since I keep on borrowing her Kindle Fire. I can't wait!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFor $200, quit your bitchin'!,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;Notapeguy-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)1) It is not an iPad.2) As such, it doesnt cost $600-700.3) Your content lives in the Amazon Cloud.4) The screen is beautiful.5) It will fit in a suitcoat inside breast pocket.6) It doesnt have a hardware volume control. A tap on the screen brings up the slider bar.7) Amazon fixed the carosel issue in a matter of hours.8) There is tons of content.9) You upload your music CDs to iTunes, then upload those files to the Amazon Cloud. Voila, music on both platforms in a snap! You can't do that with an Apple product.10) It costs $200. That is the price for a decent sushi dinner for 2. Or 4 tanks of gas in your Suburu. Or 3 lift tickets to Stowe. Or 3 pairs of Birkenstocks.11) See number 1, 2, and 10 above.12) Quit your bitching.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsa must have!!,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Alyssa-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am absolutely in love with my fire. I'm a 17 year old girl and i'm not much of an apple person (they're too expensive for a product that is the same as any other) so i am biased, but once i got my fire, all my friends changed the ipad from their Christmas wishlist to the fire. Some compare it to the ipad because it cant do as much, yet it does exactly what i need it to flawlessly- read, browse the Internet (facebook/pinterest), listen to music, play games, and watch videos- and i can do all of this while holding my fire in one hand. Yes, the ipad can do more.... but very few people actually use these extra utilities. Compared to the ipad, the fire isn't awkward and bulky. It fits perfectly in my purse and backpack. I love to take it to the gym because i can listen to music and read at the same time, and its small enough to sit on the holder on the elliptical or treadmill. I would recommend this to anybody of any age, especially for its price and usability. And don't forget that the amazon market is cheaper than apples, which its always nice to save money (: remember, the fire is.not like a normal tablet in the computer form, but if you have a laptop already and want this for recreational use on the go (or at at home... ive actually used my fire more.than my laptop for web browsing lately!) Then you will love this.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire is amazing!,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;BookWorm-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am 15 and I got this for Christmas; I have barely put it down since! Everyone says they don't like it because it doesn't have a camera or a microphone or whatever. They need to realize that this was NOT meant to be a tablet. It was meant to be an E-reader but is considered a tablet because of its added features. Which the only difference between this and other kindles is that the web is better, you can have apps, it is color touch screen, and it has flash player and Android Gingerbread. I know there are a lot of technical differences but I am just stating the obvious.Now this device is not going to kill the iPad generation, I will admit. I hate it when people try and compare this device to the iPad. The differences between the two are obvious!I have had no problems with my device at all. The web browser is pretty fast to me and I think its sad when people say "It takes about 5 or so seconds to load a page which is kind of slow." It doesn't for me, but even if it does for them that is no reason to think lesser of this device because you have to wait a few seconds!The small thing that bothers me about this device is the AppStore. The app market has a lot of the main/top apps that everyone loves (Angry Birds, Doodle Jump, etc.) but I do love the app store for Apple products and such. They have millions of fun apps on there, but since the Fire runs on Android it has an Android app market. But I am not here to compare app markets because this is mainly an e-reader.The last problem that isn't really even a problem at all is the volume button. There are no volume controls on the sides of this Kindle, you have to tap the bar at the top of the screen and turn it down that way. Sometimes it might be a hassle if you're in the middle of a game or something, but you get used to it and it doesn't bother you as much anymore. :)Other than those two little teeny tiny flaws, I love it. Reading on it is great and you can customize your reading experience which is also great! I love it and I highly recommend it to all people looking to purchase it! :)(Thank you to all those who actually read my review! I appreciate it!)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI weighed the Pros and Cons and ......  5 STAR PRODUCT!!,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Einjerhar-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off I am NOT a big tech-geek, app-junkie, or person that has to have my life operate on one gadget; henceforth, I did not purchase a tablet. This is an e-reader, JUST WHAT I WANTED, and thus far it has been a fantastic purchase. The Kindle Fire arrived on my doorstep charged at 75% capacity (the manual claims it to be charged around 50% - another perk!) and I was able to get a solid six hours reading time from it before the battery gave up and shut down. NOT too shabby!The web is a bit slow, but not to the extent that I'm going to raise a fuss about a few seconds of wait time. I'm not in that big of a hurry to have download time dictate my life.One complaint I read on more than one review was the power button placed at the botom of the Kindle Fire. Simple fix people, ROTATE the Kindle Fire so the power button is at the TOP and ..... problem (if it was one) solved.Overall the Kindle Fire is great "bang-for-the-buck" and I HIGHLY RECOMMEND this product. Now, to read the LA Times and the USA Today - BOTH in the palm of my hands.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it, Love it, Love it!,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;Jo Holman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle for myself for Christmas!  I couldn't wait until the 25th to open it, so I cheated and opened it today.  It is easy to set up and use!  I had no problems with it whatsoever, and I am not the most techie person on the planet.  I will enjoy it for a long time!  Thanks Amazon for making it affordable, fun, and easy to use.Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing tablet!,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;maestag-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This little tablet is quite spectacular.Here's a quick review:Device:While the device doesn't offer too many options for personalizing, I've found that the interface is pleasing, convenient, and easy to use. I would like the device itself to have volume control, rather than having to adjust it on the screen. It seems to be the perfect size for me. It's smaller than the iPad at 7 in. and 14.6 oz. The screen seems pretty tough and is clear at any angle. The battery will last all day. There is no option for additional storage other than the cloud on top of its built in 8gb (about 6.5gb available for use). I like the home bar that allows you to go home, go back, view the menu, or perform a search within the content libraries or the web. The carousel is fun to use in order to view your most recent activity. The only button is the power button.Newsstand:There are many magazine and newspaper subscriptions available. The store has an easy to use interface. The only problem is that magazines can take up quite a bit of memory for a device that just has 8gb available. This can be remedied from Amazon's cloud (which comes with 5gb for free). You can view your magazine in page view or text view.Books:Like the Newsstand, the book store is easy to use. Books download in seconds. There are a bunch of free books to download (a lot of classics) and even more if you're an Amazon Prime member (you get one month for free). You don't have to worry about space, as these books take up a negligible amount of memory on the device (plus you can always use the cloud). When you're reading your book, you can change the font style, line spacing, margins, color mode (The black background and white text is good for night reading-the light tan background and brown text is easy on the eyes-and the white background and black text is what you'd find on any LCD e reader). You can also change the font style to your preference. The built in dictionary makes it easy to look up definitions while you're reading. The search feature is also nice for looking up phrases or passages within the book. The kindle remembers where you're at when you leave the book, though you can also add bookmarks within the book. I suppose that the only disadvantage would be the LCD screen, as it can mess with your eyes after reading on it for too long. However, it is nice for reading in the dark. You can adjust the screen brightness.Music:I was pleasantly surprised with the music aspect of the kindle fire. For a tablet, it has pretty decent little speakers (you can also use headphones). You don't have to worry about not being able to use iTunes on the device. Amazon's mp3 uploader allows you to upload all of your music (from iTunes as well) (mp3 and m4a) to the kindle's music library. Your music will be downloaded in the cloud (5gb available for free, if you want more than that you can upgrade to 20gb (or more-up to 1000) and unlimited music storage for a dollar for every gb-per year). You can then download your uploaded music to the device (say if you know you won't have internet access) to your device (keep in mind, the device itself only has 8gb of memory). The interface is pleasant and user friendly. You can organize your music library by artist, album, or song. You can create playlists. Multitasking is easy, as you can play your music while reading, surfing the web, or playing with your apps. I would prefer that the device had volume control on the device itself rather than having to use the screen to do so, but it's really not that much of a hassle. Like the Newsstand and Books, you have access to amazon's Music store as well.Video:If you want, you can store your own digital copies of movies onto the device. Though, I think the primary use for video is access to Amazon's video store, which has a wide selection of movies and TV shows. You can rent new releases for $2.99. If you are an Amazon Prime member, thousands of free videos are available for instant streaming. You get one month of Amazon Prime membership for free.Docs:This was another feature that I was surprised with. This feature allows you to email yourself documents (DOC, DOCX, PDF, HTML, TXT, RTF, JPEG, GIF, PNG, BMP, PRC, and MOBI) to be stored onto your device.Apps:There are thousands of apps available for download. There are plenty of free apps, and (I found this quite nice) one free app of the day! The market isn't quite as large as that of apple, but there are plenty of apps to keep you entertained. Much of the top apps like Angry Birds, Netflix, Pulse, SimCity, Quickoffice, Pandora, and Evernote are available. The kindle fire comes with a few useful apps already downloaded onto the device (like Quickoffice, Pandora, IMDb, Contacts, Gallery, and Email). The email app is pretty neat. You can check each of your email accounts in one unified inbox (or separately if you prefer). I also like the Comics app. There are plenty of comics available for free and even more for purchase. The kindle fire makes viewing comics (as well as graphic novels) a wonderful experience. There are two ways to organize your apps, by recent and by title. I would prefer a bit more flexibility with organizing the apps. You can copy your favorite apps onto the homepage as well. Any app that you download will be saved on the cloud even if you delete it from your device.Web:Amazon Silk is quick and easy. It supports bookmarks, history, and searches. Your most visited pages appear as thumbnails on new tabs.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat little machine.,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;Larry Thiel Jr. "book reader"(iowa)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire for a week now and I think I've had a chance to put it through all of it's paces.I didn't love it right out of the box the way I did my old Kindle.But after a week of figuring it out I'm starting to like it a lot.It's a great e-reader.  Better than the original kindle.  I thought I loved the e-ink display but the Kindle Fire is beautiful to look at, and easy to ready.  It's nice that it's backlit and you don't have to have a light on to read.  As an e-reader, I wish the battery life was longer, but it is what it is.The video's from Amazon prime are awesome.  I'm a long time Amazon Prime member and the videos have always been a cool feature.  Well worth the money.Apps are really what make the Kindle Fire go.  I suppose it all depends on your individual tastes, but I've found 20 or so really terrific apps that make it a very useful machine for me, and I'm finding more everyday.  The Amazon shopping app is awesome.The PDF document feature is really cool, and you can easily read the Daily Racing Form on the Kindle Fire.I subscribe to the Chicago Tribune, and it's a wonder to read on the Fire.  The pictures are amazing.The web browser is iffy, iffy, iffy, at best.  Some websites seem to be made for it, and some are a disaster.  I wish EspN would do an app for Espn3 because watching it through the web browser seems to be tricky at best.I'm glad I bought it and I can tell I'm going to get a lot of use out of it.The music feature is good.  I put about 200 songs on it, and it's nice to listen to.  The speakers are not great shakes.  Good if you're in a quiet place like your bedroom, but you'll need ear buds if not.I want to take a second and mention all of the negative reviews I've seen.I really don't think any of these people took the time to research the product before they bought it because their complaints don't make sense.  Go to Target and hold it in your hands before you buy it.  Read the description of the product on this website.  They tell you very clearly what this machine is.Many of the people making complaints look very foolish.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsmixed feelings and review...,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Farah Khatoon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was initially impressed with the user interface. The problem is that the tablet is a bit "buggy".  2 minutes ago we tried to get Netflix going and login keeps timing out after a couple of seconds.  That said the book reading experience is good to great.  Now for the deal breaker--(for me)--android app market is tremendous. AND totally limited on this device. I can't get any of the wonderful kids educational apps that I bought this device for--for my 5 year old to learn a second language and to perfect her handwriting etc. So there it is. Amazon made an amazing device affordable and then limited it to uselessness--for me!Seriously contemplating returing it now.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAn Affordable Toy,December 2, 2011By&nbsp;William A. Adams(Tucson, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire is a fun toy for a low-risk price so I tried it. I like it, but I don't need it. For reading books, the regular Kindle is far superior, due to the E-ink display which is just like reading on paper. I have two of those. Kindle Fire is attractive for accessing the internet when I am away from my desk. I use my home Wi-fi so I can browse email while watching TV on the couch, can look up the cable program guide while I watch, consult IMDB and other movie reviews, look up words, translate foreign phrases, check facts, make quick notes to myself, read the NY Times book review, etc. I can get recipes in the kitchen, share photos in the dining room, listen to .mp3 songs in bed. It's a toy. You can't make phone calls on it, you can't do any serious work with it, and you don't really need it.Could I use my 5 lb HP laptop to do everything the K-fire does?  Yes, but the laptop is heavy, large, awkward to hold, gets too hot and takes 15 minutes (it seems) to start. So I use the Kindle because it's convenient and I'm lazy. Kindle Fire has some nice apps, like Audible (audio books) and Pandora (radio). They're also available on my PC, but the Kindle is far more practical when traveling, car or plane, or moving around the house. (It is no longer practical to use a PC on a plane because the seating space is so tight. If the guy in front of you reclines, you are out of luck.)The K-Fire Silk Browser is perfectly acceptable. The amazon cloud storage is basically unlimited, so that eliminates a standard problem with portable devices (as long as you are connected to the cloud). Another plus is that it is not Apple, which means your music is .mp3 and belongs to you, not them. Likewise, the software is Android, which means Apple does not control your content. Wifi-only connection means no bloodsucking contract for monthly data fees. Battery life is quite acceptable, depending on what you're doing, the better part of a day of use, but see note below.The down side: Huge negative: I put it away without turning off the Wi-Fi and the battery completely discharged and could not be revived. Have to send it in for a replacement unit and reload all my apps. A hassle but not a show-stopper, though I recommend purchasing the 2 year extended warranty. Other points: The touch screen is not as sensitive as I would like. Taps often don't work at first and there is no feedback, so I feel like a woodpecker. With all controls on-screen, the device essentially cannot be controlled without looking. That means it is virtually unusable while driving and not very useful for listening in bed. Even in landscape mode, the screen is slightly too small to make the on-screen keyboard usable for a touch typist, so the device is not practical as a note-taker, a big disappointment for me. Since it is Wi-Fi only, you can't use it while you are on the go to research products, restaurants, directions, etc. There is no GPS app (and it wouldn't do any good anyway, since you would  need a traveling Wifi connection). Some web sites are "non-PC-standard" when accessed by the Silk browser. Google, for example shows no Maps or Videos on its menus and you have to poke around quite deeply to find and access those features. I had some trouble installing Gmail but eventually managed it by ignoring the Kindle Email app and going directly through Google via the browser. Reading newspapers and magazines is a bit of a strain since the type is so small. You can zoom in, but then you have no context of where you are on the page. It can be done, but it's not great. Google News is usable. NYTimes just barely. I haven't figured out how to install NYTimes' "Times Reader" on the K-fire. Once I figure that out, I should be fine. When you use the Kindle to download a movie, it streams live over the wifi connection as you watch, which is not as reliable, fast, or convenient as a straight download to storage. I download Amazon movies to my PC or Tivo then play them from disk, which is far more flexible and smooth than trying to use the Kindle Fire. Wi-fi is a plus for being economical, but a negative if you want to be truly portable, and that means social networking is limited to when you are at a hotspot. There simply are not as many useful apps for Android as there are for Apple, but that should change over time. However, there are extremely few useful business or productivity apps for the K-Fire, so it is no threat to the laptop in that regard. K-Fire is not a work tool. You can't even really use it to take meeting notes, and if you did, it is not clear what you would do then. Email the notes to your desk PC? One trivial but extremely annoying K-Fire trait is that you cannot uninstall or delete the apps that come preloaded with the device. Most of them are useless to me and simply clutter up the interface.  There are some apps that do "app-removing" but none of them I have tried can remove the pre-installed bloatware.Conclusion: I like the Kindle Fire and my wife and I use it at home anytime we are away from desk and PC on the couch, on the patio, in the kitchen, or at the airport. We use regular E-ink Kindles for reading while traveling. I have zero interest in online games so that eliminates a large category of tablet functionality for me. I would have to say that 90% of the apps available are of little or no value to me. I can use the browser to get all the news, weather and sports I need. So the Kindle Fire is basically a fun toy at an affordable price and for that, it is well worth it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsKindle "So slow" Fire,December 1, 2011By&nbsp;F. Greenlee-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was one of those people who preordered the Kindle Fire and waited approximately two months for its arrival. Although someone off the street was able to have it in hand before me but I digress. I knew the limitations of the device and accepted it. I believe it still filled my needs. Now Amazon has made a few bucks off me since, with Prime and all of my Christmas shopping. My main complaint is the damn thing (browser) is SO SLOW. I think they made my silk browser out of burlap. I hit a page and wait, wait, and wait some more. Am I the only one having this problem. I have ATT Uverse wireless at home and tether to my phone ( I love root) when I'm on the go. Is anyone else having the slow browser problem? Also, only having the one physical button is a pain especially when adjusting the volume. The device really doesn't get loud enough for me. Without the use of external speakers or a headset listening is a little rough. I want to love the Kindle Fire. Currently I like it and just have to deal with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsteam KINDLE ON FIRE!,December 1, 2011By&nbsp;Lynette-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)i've had mine for about 2 weeks and i'm loving it!before buying, i debated with myself about purchasing an iPAD but couldn't justify paying that kind of money for bells and whistles that didn't seem to offer useful innovation in how i actually needed to use it.MY PURPOSE:  i wanted to be able to edit Word and Excel documents, keep notes, view PDFs, store samples of my graphics work and photos, access the internet, manage my schedule, and tote reading materials. all on a display large enough to keep me from bumping heads with another person that might be sharing a view of the screen.  i WAS NOT looking for a mini device to serve as a substitute for my laptop.  (when i actually need to work, i prefer to do so in my workspace with a full-sized mouse and keyboard. (i don't like working on small screens.) and if i do decide to work on-the-go, my laptop isn't so gigantic that i wouldn't be willing to slide it in a backpack and go.)1) the internet experience on the kFIRE is good. on average, it provides fairly nice speed on page loads. it's not the fastest thing out there, but you won't be tempted to pull out all of my hair while waiting... besides, i don't plan to do scientific research on it or run an online tax-filing business... just some shopping, news reading, and other on-the-fly look-ups.2) i'm not a fan of the glossy display--on ANY device--but the images are really beautiful and brilliant. (...VERY nice for showing samples of my graphics work.)3) while i don't plan to round up the girls and gather around the FIRE on movie night, the video play is amazing. it is, however, great to have on road trips, especially for the younguns... or when i want to check something out on YOUTUBE on-the-fly.  (WANDERING THOUGHT:  "gather around the FIRE".  ...i think that could be part of a marketing campaign. :o)4) it's nice to be able to download music, but to be honest, it'll probably be a rare occasion that i actually do it. but maybe i'll change my mind once someone develops an armband that i can tuck my kFIRE into for when i'm at the gym.  ;o)  ...but seriously, i do appreciate the ability to do so, AMAZON.5) i was a little disappointed that i didn't have access to a couple of the free apps that i have on my ANDROID phone, but an incognito version of them were available for a small fee.  and because my experience (and the price) with the kFIRE has been so great, i had no qualms about paying. (DING!)6) as some other reviewers mentioned, there are times when you have to tap a hotspot more than once to get a response. but that's not a deal-breaker. even if i had test-driven the kFIRE beforehand, this wouldn't have discouraged me from purchasing it.IN CONCLUSION: before you buy, know what you need in such a device.  and when you decide what that is, the KINDLE FIRE will meet you there. ;o)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat reading tool. My daughter loves it.,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;F. Aghomo "Fidelo"(Kirkland Washington)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought this for my daughter 9th birthday, she absolutely loves it. She has read about three books in two weeks. It is the first thing she reaches for whenever she comes home from school. So far so good I am happy I bought it for her.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT!!!!! PERIOD!!!,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Lisa Blake-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my first review of any product! I usually don't take the time but appreciate so much that others do. I am making the effort on this one because I was so on the fence about this purchase! I bought two of these for my older kiddos (11, and 16) for Christmas and I have been sneaking in to my closet to use one of them every night since they arrived! The internet is super fast, the kindle fire reads like an actual book, it is just simply an amazing little device! I wanted ipads (as did the kiddos) but we couldn't afford them. Felt like we were settling, but no more! Obviously for different reasons an ipad might be superior, but we already have mac laptops and for what we want it for the kindle fire over delivers!!! Do not hesitate to buy this!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFire it Up!,November 29, 2011By&nbsp;Tbird78(Houston, TX)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off, as most people will admit, the FIRE is not intended to be a direct competitor for the iPad2. The FIRE is definitely a strong and viable alternative to the iPad.I bought the FIRE 1) because I'm a tech geek who usually has to have the "new" thing, and 2) because my mom has been harping about having an iPad. I can't see paying $500 for her to read books and play games. The FIRE, at it's astounding $199 price tag, would be perfect for her.I've had the FIRE since its release and have not had any technical difficulties with it yet.PROS:* perfect size (fits in back pocket)* clear display (Netflix and Amazon movies look great)* easy navigation between apps, books, web, etc.* non-slip rubberized backing* good sound thru top speakers* super easy setupCONS:* touch screen is not always receptive* no volume adjustment buttons* last thing searched, played, watched, read, etc always on top. (There's no way to remove or delete the history.)* (personal) Android operating system (I'm an IOS girl)Sometimes when I was reading a book my finger or hand would touch the screen inadvertantly and change the page. This was a little bit annoying but only happened a few times.I'm really enjoying the FIRE. I may end up keeping it and buying another for my mom.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove the Kindle Fire!!!,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;The Jakes "amazon shopper"(chicago)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered and cancelled my pre-order of Kindle Fire a few times, before  it came out.  I decided that I would be happier with the IPad2, I bought it and then returned it, at 499.00 I just couldnt justify the cost right now.. what i was using the ipad for was to check Facebook, check email and my kids played games like Angry Birds and Plants Vs Zombies, I like Words with friends.  The Kindle Fire is less than half the price and it does all of the things I was using the IPad for, I can also upload my ITUNES music to Amazon Cloud with no problem, purchasing music on Amazon is easy too, I get a copy in my ITUNES acct and also in Amazon cloud player.  My kids and I are in love with this thing, I have had it for 2 days and honestly today is the first day I have it all to myself (kids are in school)  I am thinking about getting a few more of these as XMAS presents, with it also being an e-reader.. you cant go wrong!!Cons- it is a little heavy, and internet can some times be a little slow.. However at this price there should be no complaints!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPeople complaining have short memories,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Bernard L. Mathews "Palsgraff"(Houston)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I remember when the original Kindle was over $200, and all you could do was read books. Now there are multiple e-ink devices, at reasonable prices that can do the same and more. However, if you are a night reader, with a spouse, or significant other, then you have experienced trying to get a proper reading light, keeping it charged, and hoping it did not fall off. And oh, by the way...you were going to spend $10-20 for it. The fire solves the problem for the night reader, by adjusting the brightness it is perfect for the wee hours when sleep eludes. Probably a bargain just for that and the brilliant color. But...it does all of those other neat things, too. It seems that comparing a reading device with access to all of the Amazon content to an IPAD or other tablet device is missing the point entirely. If that is what you want - buy that and don't mess with the Fire. I understand the poor reviews from folks who have technical problems or WiFi connection problems out of the box. I can say I have had none, and I have even enjoyed uploading and playing with Cloud content. So, relax and enjoy, or go buy what you really want.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent device good price. I just love it.,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;sonny-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Amazon do the great job. I have this fire for a week.This a wonderful item.Everybody should give Amazon some credit because that kindle fire nice price a lot of functions. you got to understand you only pay $199 for it. Do not try to expect for everything. I love so much about prime membership unlimited instant video and two days free shipping.  the internet is very fast. nothing complain about it. I going to give credit to Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I wanted,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;vrod-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire does everything I want it do and everything it is supposed to do as advertised.  I don't qualify my comments with "for the price."  I use it for movies, e-mailing, weather, calendar, and a host of other available apps.  It is the ideal size as I wear cargo pants frequently and it fits directly into a cargo-pant pocket.  The touchscreen works very well, the colors are excellent, the respnses rapid, and the battery last as long as Amazon says it does on and off the web.My wife has an iPadii and I got a better deal "for the price" than she did.I like it a lot.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat!,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;Cathy2882-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been playing around with the Fire for about a day now. There aren't enough apps, but I expected that because I checked into the appstore before I purchased it. Everything else seems to be great so far. The battery lasts for awhile. Between multiple family members playing games and/or watching videos today, it lasted at least 7 hours without needing a charge. I definitely recommend the Fire to someone who is looking for a basic tablet. It isn't comparable to an ipad but for $200, who cares. It's definitely worth the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars4 *and a Half* Stars- Truly a Great Buy,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;Rob L.-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First, let me start off by saying this: this tablet is made for media consumption and entertainment, NOT creation (such as words documents, PowerPoints, etc.). Also, you will not be able to find a better tablet for $200, or even $300. This is an excellent tablet for the price. It actually costs Amazon $201.70 to produce, and yet they sell it to their customers for $199. I rate the Kindle Fire 4 1/2 stars out of 5. The missing half star comes from the choppiness of the OS that is running on the Fire. I will begin my review by stating the flaws of the KIndle Fire.THE OPERATING SYSTEMThis is one of the only flaws that I see in the Fire. The OS looks nice, has excellent features, and s easy to navigate and understand. However, the responsiveness of it is not great. Sometimes, you'll push a button or do a gesture and nothing will happen, and you'll have to do the same thing again to get it to do what you want. Also, when you tilt that screen sideways, the OS does not do a smooth flip like iOS does, instead it just "pops" up and loads-- it looks pretty cheesy. My final complaint: on the home screen of your  Kindle Fire, it shows all of the recent history. This is fine for some people, but others may want some privacy. So far, I have not figured out a way to delete certain things of the history display, nor turn it off.Those are the only flaws I see in the Kindle Fire's OS, and much of that is correctable by a software update, which will be likely to come. And personally, the responsiveness and sometimes the choppiness does not bother me very much, as the Fire has a small amount of RAM for a tablet and the unit ONLY COSTS $200.OTHER SMALL FLAWSThe Power Button- The power button is located in an awkward spot on the Kindle. It is easy to accidentally hit and put your device into sleep mode, or turn it completely off. I believe that once you get familiar with holding the Kindle, it will not be an issue. But this seems to be a common irritation for newbies with this device, including myself. I do know that if you get a case for your Kindle Fire, this flaw is eliminated because the exterior of the case rises past the bottom of the Fire, which would make accidentally hitting the power button difficult.The Silk Web Browser- Amazon hyped us all up for this extremely fast web browser. Well, it isn't fast at all in comparison to other devices when used with the stock settings. The stock settings include plugins, accelerated page loading, and optimization for desktop view. A plugin that is used in this Web Browser is Adobe Flash, which undoubtedly slows your device down. Adobe Flash is meant for either much more powerful tablets or an actual computer, not a phone or mini-tablet. Flash also consumes your battery life like crazy. Do te following to make your Silk Web Browser ACTUALLY very fast: open up the Browser, hit the menu button at the bottom of the screen, hit the Settings button, and then find the following options:Enable plug-ins: offAccelerate page loading: UncheckedDesktop or mobile view: MobileBam. You now have a fast Web Browser.COMMON PROBLEMS I HAVE SEEN COMPLAINTS ABOUTNot being Able to Delete the Stock Applications That Come with the Device- Many people are upset that they cannot delete the stock apps that are on the Fire. To do this, simply click on the app, install it, and then click on it again and select "Remove from Device". You will no longer have that app on your device.Slow Browser- I already explained that up above. It is the user's fault if they decide to load Web pages optimized for real computers with 20" monitors on their Kindle that only has a 7" screen and limited hardware.Power Button- Just be careful when holding your Kindle or get a case (the case, as said above, would make hitting the power button on accident almost impossible).Now, time to go into the good things of this device!PLEASING-TO-LOOK-AT OSWhen I played with the demo Fire at Target, I loved the way the OS looked and functioned, minus the sometimes-annoying lagg. It is incredibly easy to navigate and learn, it is easy to use 95% of the time, and it looks incredible.FREE CLOUD STORAGEThis device does only have 8 GB, and 6 GB are available to the user (2 GB is taken by the OS). This, mixed with the Cloud's 5 GBs of free storage is plenty for me. This is, in fact, a Kindle, and if you are buying this because you want to store your top 10 favorite movies on it, then go buy a mobile DVD player. Kindles are meant for entertainment, but at the same time they are not meant to fill up with movies. They are meant to fill up with books, (and in the Fire's case) music, magazines, apps, and the occasional movie. The 6 GB storage on the Fire is plenty if you are looking to store a couple hundred songs, a ton of books, 50 apps, and a couple magazines and a movie-- which is exactly what I want. Plus, you can store movies in the Cloud before you go on a trip, and you can download them whenever you have wifi.THE PRICEThe price is outstanding. $199 for a tablet of this quality is unheard of. It definitely is not an iPad killer, simply because the iPad costs 3x as much as the Fire does.OVERALLThis tablet is great for you if you are interested in books, music, magazines, movies, web browsing, and email, and the occasional game. With Amazon Prime, you have access to thousands of movies, TV shows, and books, and you get free 2-Day shipping. Also, if you have a Netflix and/or Hulu account, then this is the ultimate movie-streaming device. The apps that are included in the app store are not enormous in number, but there are good apps, and a decent amount of them. The Amazon music player is excellent and easy to use. Finally, the Cloud storage gives you plenty of free room-- you can even upgrade to 20 GB of Cloud storage for only $20 a year.Once software updates are released to fix the lagg and choppiness of the OS, I will change my rating to 5 stars. I hope you all have a happy Thanksgiving, and enjoy your Kindle fire! Just learn how to use it and change your Web Browser to the suggested settings above! :-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIncredible product for the price.,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;LTB1701(ORLANDO, FL United States)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Well worth the money. Setup was easy. Great for watching movies and tv shows while riding a stationary bike to burn off the Thanksgiving calories. Not an e-reader for outdoors, but  neither are other tablets. Synced to all books and videos purchased previously from Amazon without problem. Magazines and comics look great, but small text can be a challenge to read without zooming in. Very impressed so far.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle fire on fire!!!,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;amos graham black.v(Memphis TN USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle fire is in a word, Amazing! It does everything Amazon claims. I find it to be very easy to use /User friendly. From basic things like adjusting the screen brightness or adding wi-fi connections to adjusting font size, screen color, font style and borders for books are all just a screen tap away. The web browser is impressively fast (those reviewing it as okay or slow need to fix there wi-fi connection) and accommodates all my web browsing needs. You can store multiple wi-fi connection points and it will automatically connect soon as you are in range. My neighbors and I both have wi-fi networks and I can go from my house to theirs with out loosing connection.I was highly impressed with the video playback and streaming quality.The video playback is brilliant and smooth. The screen size is more than adequate to watch a full movie and enjoy it in vibrant rich color. You can take advantage of streaming tons of movies and shows from amazon prime (i like using amazon prime personally even though I have netflix) or download and stream from netflix or hulu.Book reading is enjoyable with several custom features to cater to your personal reading preferences. Reading e-comics on it are another enjoyable experience with the ability to just flip through page by page or read it with animated frame by frame scrolling. The kindle with its *case still only weighs as much as a small book. (My *case purchased by roocase doubles as a multi angled stand for easy reading and general use).I don't understand why people are complaining about where the power button is, I don't see the problem.One: even if you do bump it, that only turns the screen off. It doesn't turn the kindle off completely.Two: the screen has 360 degree turn  radius so if you think it should be on the top, turn it upside down and the screen flips over. Problem solved!!!Three: if it was placed where others suggest, someone else would complain that it should be on the bottom. They had to place it some where so they did. Get over it!!!The main page has fast access to all its program functions. I like the custom favorite list at the bottom (which resembles a book shelf) which allows you to arrange all your favorite apps websites and even songs and videos downloaded or streamed in any order you wish for easy access to the things you like the most. I like that it isn't bulky or cumbersome to carry around. It is slim, light weight, able to be carried in a coat or hoodie pocket. And it puts off very little heat.I will conclude with this. The kindle fire is an excellent product that lives up to its claims and at a price that is a steal for even the most thrifty of shoppers. Thank you for a great product!!!PS: this review was written and posted from my kindle fire! (Recently renamed fire ninja ipad assassin)  :-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA awesome Kindle,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;socaqueenb-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle  fire  2 days ago and love it...I  also have Apple products ..SO I AM NOT COMPARING this with a APPLE... it is all i need to read books, go on facebook and web ....dont need a camera have one on my phone and ipods...download music it works great...thanks for coming out with  a product that isnt  so pricy...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Tab,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Pabon, Al-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a big Apple fan, but the Kindle Fire is an excellent device, cant say anything bad about it, I was impressed with the features that provides, excellent screen, love watching movies on it. Its very easy to used and the price is excellent. was going to buy an Ipad but I decided to wait and I am glad that I waited, Amazon nailed it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExactly what I expected. Just what I wanted.,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Mary Halsig "skyhawk0172"(Wichita KS)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I anxiously awaited the arrival of my Kindle Fire for several weeks. I almost never order the first model of anything because I want someone else to get the kinks out of it first. I opened the box. It was charged enough for me to start using it right away and it was already registered to my account. Its quick intuitive interface allowed me to sign onto my home network and my cloud drive was instantly available. I am an Amazon girl and a Prime member, which makes the Fire even better. Shopping is a breeze, although I have supplemented my shopping on the Fire with my laptop. I find that it's easier to edit my cart on my laptop than on the Fire. Streaming is as fast as my Acer netbook so I can take advantage of all the free Prime content out there. The sound isn't quite as good, but haven't done earbuds yet, just speakers. Reading is wonderful. I personally like reading a backlit screen, but I have my first Kindle if I ever need e-ink instead. Of course backlit means less battery life - a tradeoff I am willing to make.The touchscreen is very responsive, but it did take me a few minutes to figure out all the right places on the screen. Of course, I didn't read the user's guide so I see it as a very user-friendly interface indeed when a few minutes of experimentation takes you wherever you need navigate on a brand new device. I wanted the Fire mostly because of magazines and children's books. The screen is small, but I don't mind going to text mode to read the articles. I just love magazines and I wanted to be able to experience the "feel" of the layout. I can do that on the Fire and most of the illustrations zoom nicely so I can look at those too. You can read the magazine without going to text mode, but I just find it easier and more satisfying to switch back and forth as I progress through the articles. The Android OS makes everything work so efficiently - facebook, Google, Yahoo, web searches. While not as efficient as my laptop, it is much better than my phone, which does a pretty good job for a phone. So...I am having crazy, wicked fun with this device. Good decision.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for what it is designed to do,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Holly Kincaid "Book addict"(Indiana, USA)  -See all my reviews(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There are some fabulous reviews out here that tell about what the product does/doesn't do.  Also, Amazon has done a marvelous job in the product description of letting people know what they are buying.  If you haven't spent time with the product description and the comparison chart, you REALLY need to do that before just buy blindly.Here is my summary take on the device (both I and my husband have been using it for the past three days):  If you are a tablet fan and expect it to operate just like an iPad, you will be disappointed.  It's a less expensive device and it's not as powerful/slick/full featured.  If you are an e-reader fan, you will be pleased with the added functionality of being able to play music, colorful games, read magazines, watch videos.  I am primarily an e-reader person who has added the Fire and am tickled pink.  I still will be using my Kindle Keyboard 3G as my primary reader since I love the e-ink technology and the lighter weight for extended reading times.  The Fire adds a lot of features and I think of it as a tablet-light or tablet junior.While not perfect (screen sometimes doesn't respond to touch) and there are no collections and books are still on the carousel afer you have removed them from the device, etc, etc., etc. --- this is still a great option for $199 and I feel totally pleased with my purchase.  I didn't expect everything that an iPad can do (and didn't pay $600) and feel like I got a very good deal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsITS GRRRRREEAT!!!!,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;DBrogie-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I have owned the new Kindle Fire for a few days and I have played and downloaded on it.  It does exactly what I want it to do and for the price you can't go wrong. I have a brand new MacBook Pro so I felt that any other tablet in the $300 range or above is not best or worth it for me.  Its a BRAND NEW PRODUCT people!!! PLEASE PEOPLE STOP WITH THE IPAD COMPARISONS!!!!  IT WAS NOT MEANT TO COMPETE WITH THAT TYPE OF PRODUCT!!!!I have run into a few things that the developers need to fix and update but that's ok.  You can't expect a team of developers to know everything that users may or may not like. I am sure that the more technical support phone calls Amazon receives for a problem they will fix the issue eventually.  The set up was very easy and actually I didn't even need to read the directions.  Why do you need directions when it leads you through everything to set it up?  The screen is pretty clear and visible.  All it takes is a bit of common sense.I do like the vibrant colors and the ease of use. I downloaded a magazine on it to see how long it took to download and what it looked like.  It took approximately 20 minutes to download an issue of Glamour Magazine.  It was fun to interact with the magazine. The book borrowing is great with the Amazon Prime account.  I found that fairly easy to do. The screen is clear and if you can't see the words you have the option of enlarging them. If you don't know what a word means a tap of the finger on the word gives you a full definition and you have the option of making side notes too. The videos come up nice and quick and are not distorted by any means. I find no issues with typing on the screen as I have read others are having.  The one thing I am having a bit of difficulty with is the screen keeps moving from diagonal to horizontal when I am lying down trying to read.  I may have to fix that in the settings.  The sound is loud enough through the speakers and when I plugged in my set of headphones to it it was very loud. The battery seems to be lasting quite a while on the unit.  I haven't had it go out on me yet. I don't care for that kind of plug for charging the battery on the device.  I broke that kind of charger on my cell phone. The pins broke off. I am trying to be extra careful when charging the unit.I think over time there will be more advancement for this device once it is out on the market longer.  I love the new Amazon Kindle and I think if you are considering one for $200 just buy it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent for Its Intended Purpose,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;J. Cheshire-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'll begin by saying that the Kindle Fire is not an iPad, and Amazon didn't intend it to be. Instead, it's a device aimed squarely at consuming Amazon content. If you enjoy Amazon's MP3 Store, Amazon Instant Video, the Kindle Store, and the benefits of Amazon Cloud Drive, you will love the Kindle Fire.MUSIC:I pay $20 per year for 20GB of storage on my Amazon Cloud Drive. That plan also provides me with unlimited storage for my music files, whether purchased from Amazon or not. I love being able to stream my music from any Web browser, but I don't always have a computer with me.The Kindle Fire's Music library directly integrates with my music that's on my Amazon Cloud Drive. As long as I have an Internet connection, I can stream any of my music, and unlike doing it from a Web browser, the experience is first class. If I want to carry some of my music with me, I can download it to the Kindle Fire and listen when I'm not online. (The Kindle Fire has about 6.5GB of user-available memory.)VIDEO:I discovered Amazon Instant Video about a year ago. It's a great service with high-quality video, much of which is in HD and with 5.1 surround. Using the Kindle Fire, I have instant access to videos in my library, but I can also easily rent or purchase videos right from the device. As a Prime member, I can watch thousands of titles at no additional charge. (Prime selection isn't that great, but new titles are being added frequently.)Because the Kindle Fire's display ratio is widescreen, 16:9 video fills the display. In a side-by-side comparison with the iPad's larger display, actual size of video being played on the Kindle Fire is almost identical. In other words, the 7" screen on the Kindle Fire isn't a handicap when watching video.Incidentally, Netflix, Hulu Plus, and your own videos can also be watched on the Kindle Fire.MAGAZINES, NEWSPAPERS, BOOKS, and MOREReading on the Kindle Fire is as expected on an LCD device; it's not quite as comfortable as reading E Ink. However, because the Kindle Fire's display is about the size of a paperback page, it's much easier to read on it than a large LCD screen.Magazines and newspapers are great on the Kindle Fire, and not only because they are in color. The navigation of periodicals is great, and the new Page View feature incorporated into many magazines maintains the appearance of the print copy.The Kindle Fire also offers a wide array of children's books that look great and offer unique features. Graphic novels and comic books are also available, but many of the DC comics aren't available for a few more days.APPSAmazon's Android app store contains a wide array of applications, all of which will work well on the Kindle Fire. Amazon offers a paid app free every day, and these apps are not bogus apps. They are quality apps with good reviews.All of the core apps that most people want are available for the Kindle Fire.WEB BROWSINGYes, you can browse the Web on the Kindle Fire. Do you really want to? For basic browsing, it's fine, but the screen is a bit small for it to be a great experience. In my opinion, apps are key with a tablet like the Kindle Fire. For example, instead of browsing Wikipedia, use an app designed for a smaller screen. Instead of browsing IMDB, use the built-in app on the Kindle Fire. Instead of browsing Amazon.com, use the built-in app for shopping at Amazon. These apps have a user-interface that is designed for a small screen, and the experience using them is first-rate.EMAILThe Kindle Fire comes with an email application that works well. It's not my first choice for email, but it'll do in a pinch.BOTTOM LINE:There are plenty of comparisons right now between the Nook Tablet and the Kindle Fire. Both are great devices, but the Kindle Fire's strength lies in the Amazon back end. In my book, no one can match Amazon's offerings in books, video, periodicals, and infrastructure. It's likely that Amazon will continue to improve upon these services in the future. The future for the competition (including B&N;) isn't quite so assured. Combine that with the $50 you save by going with the Kindle Fire, and the choice seems clear to me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire: Why are people complaining?,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Stephanie Krasinski(Pittsburgh, PA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As someone who does not enjoy Apple products, period, perhaps I am a bit biased. Please consider that a disclaimer as you read this review.I have always said that the only way I would get a tablet is if Amazon made their own version. When I first read about the Kindle Fire, I was super excited. . .but then I realized I probably couldn't afford it. Yet I continued to torture myself by reading about it and essentially stalking it on Amazon.com. Eventually I ran into a deal that the Amazon.com Store Card was running: if you bought something $149+ and paid it off in full within 6 months of purchase, it would be interest free. That was all I needed and I instantly pre-ordered.First thing I want to address: I have read numerous review complaining about the Kindle Fire's weight and how it feels "clunky." This perplexes me. As much as I can understand the convenience of a lightweight object, why on Earth would you want to own something that felt as if you could break it? Perhaps it's because of my clumsy nature, but I much prefer something to feel sturdy and as though it can withstand use. The weight of the Kindle Fire is by no means going to cause pain on anyone or even make a difference in your purse/bag weight.Second thing: people discussed the speed, or lack thereof, of the browser. I'd have to say that might be related to their various WiFi connections, because I barely noticed any loading time. I ran Facebook, Amazon.com, a few games - all faster than, say, the connection on my work computer. I downloaded and purchased things within instants (again, faster than web pages load on my work computer).Third thing: people complained about not having direct e-mail integration; i.e.: a GMail app. I had absolutely no problems setting up my GMail and loading my contacts. Because I have an Android phone on which I have my Gmail account connected, even my phone contacts loaded.After reading the various reviews, I was the tiniest bit hesitant (should have known to trust Amazon) to start playing with it because I did not want to be disappointed. Within 20 minutes, though, I was in heaven and goofily grinning from ear-to-ear. This device is phenomenal, especially when you consider the price.  The one thing I will agree with from various reviews is this: if you want an iPad, shell out the $400+ for an iPad. But really, the Kindle Fire is the way to go. Thumbs up, Amazon - and thank you. :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGoogle Apps!!!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Haines-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Amazon was nice enough to give us source code quickly.  That being said you can side load most of the essential google apps right onto the device without rooting.  Just google side loading apps on the kindle for instructions.  I have gmail, G+, Google Music, Google Maps, and You Tube all running with no issue!Real review?  Can be a little slow at times but not often.  Very simple easy to use. Would recommend this for anyone who does not need 3g, camera or GPS and lets be honest? who uses those on a tablet anyway .5 stars!!!!  Great Product for the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Fire Kindle does what it does...and that is fine by me!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;S. Jack-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have read many reviews on the Kindle Fire tablet and bottom line, these are opinions, nothing more.  So I will add mine.I pre-ordered the Fire, because I have ordered every Kindle so why not this one.  I own several tablets, some 10 inch, another 7 inch from other manufacturers and when I ordered them, I had something specific in mind.  I ordered the Kindle Fire the same way.I think this little gem of technology is fantastic.  It does what it SAYS it will do.  Other folks have said it was an Ipad killer.  Its not, IPad does what IPad do.  And because of ALL of the advertising of this Fire, no one can mistake what it does have or doesn't have.  No sd card, no camera, no bluetooth, 8gb storage.  As someone else said, if you thought that yours would come with these features and no one else had them, you must did not read/hear all of the advertising.  Amazon is selling this for you to use/buy their content...period!  As as a Amazon customer.....I like that I can use my Prime membership to watch free media.  The screen is crisp, no stuttering, mouths move with the words. :-)  Truth be told, I was looking for a reason to cut down on my cable bill.  With the ability to use Netfix, Hulu Plus and my Prime membership, I now have my reason.  I watched an episode today of an old series that I had forgotten about.  This is a good feature that Amazon has, old TV shows that came out long ago but would like to revisit.  I do think that I will get an anti-glare screen protector just to cut down on the reflection, the screen is so good.  I downloaded my Tune In Radio app and now I have any kind of music that I want.  Sure I need the internet but hotspots are common now.  And I can still side-load my own music if I want to.I have my books and magazines that I can access from the cloud, which makes me a very happy camper.  Since I am not a app hoarder, I pick and chose which ones I want but the ones that I do have, I can download them to the Fire.  And like everyone else, I do have my Angry Birds game, which I might add plays very well.Accessing the web is good, I have not put all of my favorites just yet but the ones that I have accessed came up good and quick.  And once I figured out where the email app was, I installed my gmail and was good to go.I do have a couple of dislikes such as the placement of the speakers,should be on the side.  And I do not like that all of the content that you have touched is still on the front when you turn the tablet on.  Amazon do need to change that, maybe a software update very soon??The size is just right, a little weighty but not uncomfortable.So Amazon, forget the naysayers, you did good!!*Edit to Review - Nov 23rdI have held my KF for about a week and I still love this devise. If I could give it more stars, I would. I just discovered the joys of Hulu Plus and I know I will be spending many evenings looking at that content.  I do have another suggestion for Amazon concerning the books....add page numbers.  Very disconcerting not to know what page I am on.Again, Amazon thanks for a great device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

13 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDON'T DISPAIR! THERE ARE PARENTAL CONTROLS! &lt;3 it!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;ACTS238 :)-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My brief review follows, but first I want to reach out to the parents of young children who have been reluctant to get this device or who have complained and decided to send back the Kindle Fire.Please DON'T do that!Like me, most parents said... "Oh this is awesome! Now my child can read books in full color, enjoying the pictures as well as developing a love for reading! On trips we can take tons of books in one tiny package instead of taking an entire bulky, heavy backpack of miscellaneous reading materials.We yanked out those credit cards, punched the numbers into Amazon's website, and sat waiting in anticipation for this dream device to arrive at our front door.Alas, the day came and our package arrived! WIth glee, we ripped open our boxes, set up our devices, and began to explore! Suddenly, panic struck us!  It's just so easy to download and purchase books and apps!And...Oh forbid! What if our child was to click in an app and decided to make an in-app purchase for $49.99 for GEMS while playing Farm Story (an adroid app, that can be played on the kindle)!Most of us screamed "Oh that is it! I am sending this back today!"Hopefully, your own personal love for the device kept you from sending it back, but you have yet to lay it in the hand of your child!Don't despair. I got curious and decided to try something! No, I didn't attempt to purchase a $49.99 batch of GEMS for the Farm Story game, but I did opt to see what happened if I purchased the smallest thing I could purchase in the game! It wasn't my desire to get GEMS but my desire to satisfy my curiosity! I thought like a child! If a child thinks he is playing a game, he may assume that buying GEMS is part of that game! It's a game! In his eyes, it isn't real money! Of course I have an older one, who if I gave permission to, would probably buy GEMS. If I wanted to waste money, I probably would buy GEMS, too! The game is pretty addicting :)! But back to the point...I clicked to buy GEMS in hopes of finding out there was something that would pop up and prevent my child from easily ordering something while in an app.Lo and behold -- THERE IS!!When you click for the very first time within an app to make an in-app purchase, there is a screen that pops up. At the bottom in the fine print is blue text - "Add Parental Controls".  Click on that!There are two check boxes- Enable Parental Controls &amp; Use PIN. Make sure to check both boxes. When you check Enable Parental Controls, the device will prompt you to use your Amazon password.  When you check Use PIN, the device will prompt you to set a 4 digit pin and then verify that pin. After submitting the required information a screen will pop up and say "Your PIN setup is complete. The PIN will now be needed to complete in-app item purchases on this device. Click OK and you are done.Now, of course, this does not help parents in the stores (on app purchases and book purchases). Monitoring is key!Yeah, yeah.. I know!! WE ARE BUSY PARENTS! IT'S NOT POSSIBLE TO MONITOR OUR CHILDREN 24/7! Accidents will happen!The good news is that most books and apps our children click on are not real expensive and when accidents happen, we can just contact Amazon and get it taken off our bill provided we do so in a timely manner. I figure this won't happen as often as we think it may.  If it does tend to happen quite often, then well... It's most likely not an accident. Children can be mischievous even at a young age. Even those we think are perfect little angels! Children are natural curious!Just, do your best to explain it to them. Teach them to recognize a $! That may help a little! Tell them games are just games but money is $ and $ is real!For little ones, put them where you want them to be. Not many two year olds are going to spend time navigating to the app store or to the bookstore.Check your Amazon account often. Have it send a notification to your phone when purchases are made. As soon as something pops up that you didn't purchase, contact Amazon.  I figure enough of this, and Amazon will soon add a 4 digit code for app and book purchases, too. It's one tiny change they could make and one update for us to do on our Kindle Fire devices once they make the change to the software.As for the device itself, I've had it since Tuesday, November 15th,  and have barely put it down. When I haven't had it in my hand, my children have had it in their hands.No, it's not an iPad so I won't compare it to one, but it's close enough to satisfy my children for a fraction of the cost! That's a plus when you have more than one child and your income is limited!For my three, who love reading (ages 15, 11, &amp; 7), it puts a library right in our hands, the resolution is great, the pictures are exciting and colorful, the quality is superb, the apps provide lots of entertainment both educational and entertaining,the charge is fast, the battery lasts a long time, it's a durable little device(though I do have it in a case),  &amp; best of all... it goes anywhere we go and we go, go, go!If I could, I would take away half a star because the Kindle Fire doesn't yet have the feature of a pass code on book store and app store purchases, but since that is really my only complaint and the system won't let me rate it that way, I give it a full 5 stars!I love the device and recommend one for your family!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starscan't put it down!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Rosemary Raymer(Spring Hill, TN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First let me say that we have an iPad, an HP tablet and a Cruz.  We were searching for just the right gift for our grandchildren's Christmas this year.  I have had my Fire in my hands for about 4 hours now and other than the weight and screen size, see no discernible difference between this and my iPad I have had for several months.  We'll take 5 more, please!  The kids will love this!Amazon, you seriously owe me $29.98.  PASSWORD PROTECT PURCHASES!  You said 2 weeks - it is time to get it done!  I gave away 5 Kindle Fires for Christmas for my 3 -6 year old grandchildren.  I now have Cars 2 and Smurfs movies.  This should not be happening - what were you thinking not putting security on purchases?????Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon integrated device,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Pat(Maryland)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle fire is a real winner for me but it is not for everybody.In order for you to get the most out of this device you need to spend $99 a year,$79 for Amazon Prime to watch all the videos and $20 for the Cloud storage with unlimited music storage.I have uploaded 5000 songs onto my cloud over the last couple of months and have used my andorid phone to listen to them.It was great to see all apps I ordered over the few months where right there to be downloaded.The absence of a camera,mic and 3G capability dosen't matter that much to me so not having them on the Fire and it costing $100s' less than other tablets is a good trade-off.It is a bit heavy to read books on and the headphone jack on the bottom limits the ability to rest the Fire on a surface while listening to Pandora,Amazon Cloud ,Slacker or whatever radio app you use.I actually like the fact that the only button is the on-off button.The UI to find the home screen is easy to find once you have done it a few time.I have noticed that you have to use different tap lengths to get the device to do want you want.While reading a quick swipe or tap turns the pages while to get a flash video to play it took a little longer press.The Amazon Prime videos downloading about as fast as they do with my Roku and the picture is great.The device itself is very sleek and a right size to carry around during the day.Overall with a few additions such as 3G ,an HDMI output and a bigger memory or SD slot this would be great.Perhaps that will be in the next Fire if this one is successful.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 9 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsim in LOVE!!!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Raven Bryant-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just received my kindle in the mail and I am so in LOVE!!! its so beautiful and I'm glad I made this purchase its perfect for me and its everything I thought it would be. = )Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

21 of 27 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire is a great first effort,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Mount Phuji-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When I first heard the Kindle Fire was selling for $199, I had to pick my jaws up from the floor. That's incredibly cheap for a tablet, but does that mean the quality is just as cheap? I'll go through the details of this device in various categories so you can decide for yourself if the Fire will satisfy your requirements, then I'll end with my opinion.Before beginning, I should inform you that comparisons to the iPad will be made since I've used it the most out of all the other tablets. If you're looking for a work tablet, the iPad is the one, but if you need help deciding on a consumption device, then read on.HARDWARE:Let's get this out of the way first. This way you'll know if it's missing any dealbreaker. Don't expect much for a $199 device in terms of hardware.* Does not have GPS, bluetooth, infrared connection, HDMI, SD slot, and camera. So if any of these are must haves, you need read no further.* But it does have an accelerometer so you can rotate it for landscape mode* As of this writing, there is no way to connect an external keyboard since there is no bluetooth, and micro usb keyboards currently aren't available. However, the on screen keyboard is excellent. You won't be typing up documents at full speed with this, but for a consumption device, you can't ask for a better on screen keyboard.* The huge 4400 mAh battery is advertised to last 8 hours for reading and 7.5 for video. I would say it's pretty accurate as long as you turn off wifi. For general usage such as playing some games, browsing, watching videos, listening to music and reading books, it will last around 6 hours. This is a device you will have to charge everyday if used regularly.* Comes with a short USB charger. Problematic if you would like to use the Fire while charging, but an extension cord will quickly solve this problem.* Does not come with a micro usb cord. If you plan on transferring files from your PC, remember to purchase one.* No physical volume buttons.SET UP:Set up is quick and easy. The first thing the Fire does is connect to your Wifi which it has no problem detecting. It connects to the servers immediately. After registering the Fire, your device updates and you're walked through a tutorial to familiarize you with the device.FEEL:What's up with reviewing how the device feels? Well I "feel" that how the device feels in your hands greatly affects your enjoyment. It's part of the experience.* Love how the Fire feels in the hand. Very comfortable to hold compared to the iPad since it's smaller, but not as comfortable as the e-ink Kindles because it's thicker. The rubber-like material in the back plays an important role in providing a nice soft grip. The Fire doesn't feel warm, maybe the rubber material has something to do with it so that's good.* Although it feels very good in your hands, you will feel the huge 4400 mAh battery weighing the Fire down during prolonged use and your hands will get tired eventually. Just rest it against something or switch hands if that happens. The Fire weighs 14.6 ounces.* You'll need to mind the power button because you'll inadvertently power the device off a few times. This is due to the button being poorly placed at the bottom, but a quick solution is to simply rotate the Fire so that the button resides on the top. Other kindles also have the power at the bottom, but those are sliders and not buttons. Amazon probably wanted to keep the design consistent in this regard.* The scratch resistant gorilla glass provides peace of mind, but it's not invincible so you'll still want to be careful with the screen. Fingerprints will happen as with any device these days so you may want to invest in a screen protector if you feel it's necessary.* Good solid quality feel overall.READING:* Again, the Fire feels really good in the hand, but not as good as e-ink Kindles because of the blockier build. It won't "disappear in your hands" like other Kindles built specifically for reading because it's heavier and you'll feel it after a while. And again, simply switch hands or rest it down. If reading text based books is the main reason you're looking at this, I suggest getting the Kindle Touch. The Touch has all the serious features such as text-to-speech, X-ray, and most importantly e-ink.* However, the Fire is awesome for light reading and better than the Touch for magazines, comics, and children's books because it has...color! Colorful children's books likeMy Choiceis gorgeous to look at. Neices and nephews loved it.* Reading magazines is hit and miss. Some magazines look really good while others with small texts will require you to zoom. The Fire provides a text view mode to read the text better, but what's the point if you can't read the magazine in all its glory. It really depends on the magazine.* I'm a comic book reader so this is an important feature for me. The 7" screen is decent at displaying the full page, but you really want to zoom in here. You can activate the panel view to zoom in slightly by double tapping on a panel, but I prefer the panel view of the comixology app.Comixologyis great on phones and it works wonderfully on the Fire.* Don't expect to enjoy reading them in the sun because LCD's are not very capable for reading outdoors. For that, nothing beats e-ink.* Unlike Touch, there are no real page numbers which can cause some confusion. The Fire uses the old format of "Location 123 of 1234".* Page turning feels a little buggy in rare occasions. Sometimes swiping doesn't seem to register or is delayed. Fortunately, this doesn't always happen.* At first, it's easy to accidentally touch the side of the screen and cause unintentional page turns, but you eventually get used to it and should have no problem adjusting the way you hold it.* You can't organize your books with the Fire. As of this writing, not even on the software Calibre. Their collections plug-in worked before, but not anymore at the time of this writing.* Obtaining books is fast and easy and transfers in seconds.VIDEO:* Videos are a breeze to purchase and play and it looks great. No lag except for when it's buffering which doesn't last long.* Make sure to take advantage of free Amazon Prime membership for a month which will allow you to stream movies for free. These movies are not downloadable so you'll need access to wifi when you want to watch them.*The 15.36:9 screen (almost 16:9) is great for watching movies in widescreen.* FYI, You can't play wmv files.DISPLAY:* The screen is beautiful. It's clear, bright, and sharp. You're looking at a high quality screen here.* There is some minor glare indoor under certain lighting conditions. Reflection is there, but it's nothing you're not used to with other devices. No biggie.* Again, it's not great for viewing outdoors due to backlit LCD screen.* There will be fingerprints and smudges since you'll be touching the screen a lot. The dirtier and sweatier your fingers are, the more prints and smudges there will be. Good thing it's easy to wipe off. Consider getting a screen protector if bothers you.AUDIO:* Audio is good. Not too loud, not too weak, not tinny. However, if you turn the volume all the way up, you'll hear some distortion. I'm not an audiophile so I can't describe it's imperfections. It just sounds good for anything you throw at it.* Sound comes from the top mounted speakers on left and right side, or headphones with the port at the bottom. Speakers are top mounted only in portrait mode. If you turn the Fire sideways in landscape mode, the speakers will be on the side. Still sounds good though.* Purchasing mp3s is an easy process and streaming it is perfect.* No physical volume control buttons feels awkward and will take some getting used to.STORAGE:* Amazon says the Fire comes with 8gb which is true, but you really only get about 6gb of usable storage. The other 2gb is probably used up by the operating system. This means you're looking at about 60 apps, 1000 songs, 1000 photos, or 6000 books. Don't expect to store many movies or you'll use up the storage fast. A movie is around 1gb. Magazines are a quarter of that weighing in at around 250mb.* No SD slot. Cuts cost I guess.* You can transfer file through a micro USB cable which is not included.* Amazon Cloud gives you an additional 5gb of cloud storage if the 8gb isn't enough for you. You can store 5gb of anything on the "cloud", which means you store and access stuff on Amazon's server.* All mp3 purchased through Amazon is stored on the cloud and will not count towards the free 5gb.* You can increase your cloud drive at $1 per 1gb per year or you can pay $20 a year to upgrade to 20gb. At 20gb you can store unlimited songs. If you have a lot of songs, this may be worth looking into.WEB BROWSING:* The very much touted silk browser is one of the main features for the Kindle Fire. Instead of loading a website from the website's server to your device, Amazon has already collected the data in their servers so that once you type in the URL in the browser, Amazon serves it to you. This supposedly makes browsing much faster. Does it work? Sometimes, but it will be better later.Some websites will load faster than others because they are already stored in Amazon's servers. The more people browse the internet, the more data Amazon will have, and more sites will load faster.Having used this technology with the Opera mobile browser for phones, I can attest to the fact that it works very well. Sites can sometimes load almost instantaneously. It's very cool to see how fast it can be and I fully expect Amazon's servers to be able to provide the same speed as Opera's.* If browsing is the main reason you're getting the Fire, keep in mind that there is no 3g so you'll need wifi to access the internet.EMAIL:* Setting up Gmail account was easy and there were no problems syncing contacts, and sending and receiving mail.* You can's set up MS exchange, but there are apps to make it happen.APPS/GAMES:* Apps run smoothly and touchscreen is very responsive in Apps.* Not as many apps as iPad of course, but many quality essential apps are available.* If you already own some apps from another Android device, it will not be on the Fire unless they were downloaded from Amazon's app store.* Cannot access other stores such as Google Marketplace.* No GPS in the Fire means you can't use apps that require GPS. That means no Google maps :(* Some apps that I feel are essential are missing, but there are free apps available to fill the void. These are alarm clock, calendar, and calculator.* Remember to take advantage of the Free app a day. Very cool.* No volume control buttons mean you'll have to access volume control from within the app.USER INTERFACE:* If you've used an iPad, you'll notice some jerkiness from the UI (user interface), but it's definitely usable and not annoying at all. In fact you may not even notice it unless you're intentionally aware.* Turning pages is smooth and works well. Again, it's not as smooth as the $500 iPad, but it's as smooth as any other device.* Once you swipe the yellow tab to unlock your Fire, you'll see your recent files and apps displayed in a carousel format. Swiping through them is pretty smooth and responsive and the carousel works well here. Sometimes the Fire doesn't seem to register your tap when you select an item so you may have to try again. It could be because I selected the item before the carousel stopped moving.* You cannot delete the carousel's recently used items individually or clear all. Keep that in mind when you let other people use it.* Below the carousel are your favorites. You can add and remove items to customize your favorites.* Keyboard works well and isn't frustrating to use. It's just as good as the iPad's.* Nice looking custom Android UI.SHOPPING:* Very easy to buy Amazon products whether it's digital or not. The Kindle Fire was made for this. Being too easy to buy stuff can be a positive thing unless you have kids, teenagers, or other people you wish to share your fire with. In the wrong hands, you'll be buying without knowing about it.* This is made worse with 1-Click buying. Just one click on the button and your purchase is made. This can be very convenient, but very dangerous in the wrong hands. You can disable 1-Click for purchasing non-digital items, but not for digital items such as movies, music, and books.* There is no way to prevent purchases when someone is using the Fire. The only thing you can do is lock the device. Parental control is desperately needed here.PROS:* Amazingly low price for a tablet.* Very capable as a multimedia device for the price and size.* Amazon Prime content such as Free Movies, Books, and Apps.* Free 5gb of Cloud Storage.* Silk Browser (assuming that it will work as well as Opera mobile browser).* Color alternative to black &amp; white e-ink readers.* Widescreen for movies.* Feels good in the hand.* Beautiful screen.* Easy Amazon shopping.CONS:* No volume control buttons.* No page numbers for reading.* UI feels unpolished.* No SD slot. (Probably necessary to keep cost down and keep your focus on Amazon's store.)* Easy to accidentally hit the power button. (Rotate Fire so button is on top if this annoys you.)* Currently no way to prevent purchases.* Easy Amazon shopping.IS IT WORTH IT?For $199? Heck yeah it is as long as you understand what you're getting. Don't expect an iPad with which you can do your work and create stuff, but look at it as a media consumption device for movies, music, apps, games, reading, and browsing. If you already have Amazon Prime, then the Fire will add value to your membership with free movies and books. If you don't have Prime, it will add value to your Fire and you'll get to try it free for a month and then it's $79 a year. The 2 day shipping will completely spoil you and you will not want to shop without it again.IS IT WORTH IT WITHOUT AMAZON PRIME?If you don't plan on using Prime, I would still consider the tablet to be worth the $199 price tag, but it really depends on what you want the device for. If all you really want is an e-reader, then I would suggest looking at theKindle Touch, Wi-Fi, 6" E Ink Display. You can still purchase Amazon content such as movies, music, apps, and books without Prime so Prime is not necessary to make use of the Fire. The Silk browser will add tremendous value once it gets kicking in full gear.SUMMARY:The Kindle Fire is basically an Amazon portal and shopping cart with the ability to surf the web and a little more. The 7" screen is a good size although there will be times when you'll miss the bigger screen of the iPad especially while reading magazines, but for everything else it's just right. The Fire can hold its own and you may eventually prefer it over the iPad as your main portable entertainment and media consumption device thanks to its size and access to Amazon Prime.It's a wonderful little tablet and you can tell it's a first gen product, but it feels like a first gen product that's very well made whlch would only get better with updates. Hardware feels good even with the poorly placed power button and lack of volume buttons, but software feels rough around the edges and can certainly use some polish. Minor UI issues mentioned above and privacy concerns such as parental control and purchase prevention comes to mind, but I expect Amazon to address these issues in future updates.Until then, the Kindle Fire is a personal device with plenty of potential to over deliver with future updates, but delivers enough to justify the $200 price tag. I give the Fire five stars and have no problem recommending it. Your mileage may vary depending on what your requirements are. Hope I've been helpful.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

13 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle vs iPad,December 31, 2011By&nbsp;A. Anderson "Adam Bomb"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This review is written by Adam's wife, not Adam.  Item was ordered under Adam's account.I got the Kindle Fire last week.  I've had an iPad for about a year and a half now and was curious about how it would stack up since I love my iPad.  I was pleasantly surprised, aka blown away, by the Fire.1. Price - You really can't beat the price considering what you are getting.  You're saving a minimum of $300 over the iPad.  For people who don't want to spend $500+ it's a great alternative.  My iPad cost $600 + tax.2. App Pricing - One of the first things I noticed was that the apps in the Amazon market tended to be less expensive than in the Apple App Store.  Wasn't the case for all apps but I did notice that the prices tended to be cheaper. (not that the apps in the Apple app store are expensive by any means)3. Size - I can squeeze my iPad into some of my purses, however the size of the Fire makes it extremely portable.  It fits in just about all of my purses with no problem.  It's nice to be able to hold it comfortably in one hand for reading.  Doesn't hurt that it is lighter.  I didn't have any complaints about the iPad but the Fire definitely makes a difference.4. Display - The display on the Fire seems to be more vibrant.  Very saturated colors.  However you can't get the brightness quite as dim as on the iPad.  I like turning the brightness all the way down to read ebooks and use the sepia background.  The iPad tends to be a bit easier on the eyes.  That being said, I'm still using the Fire because it's easier to hold comfortably in one hand.  Even though the Fire is smaller, it has almost the same resolution as the iPad.5. Responsiveness - The Kindle is really responsive to touch.  I saw some people complain about it not being sensitive and having issues with long fingernails.  My fingernails are very long and I've not had any problems with it registering my touch or being unresponsive.  You don't have to use the tip of your finger.  The yolk of your finger works just fine.6. Amazon Video - The Amazon videos are amazingly fast to load.  I didn't even notice the buffering, it was that fast.  I also installed Netflix and those videos also loaded fairly quickly.7. Interface - The interface is very simple and intuitive.  I haven't had any problem finding anything.  The carousel I'm not too horribly fond of but that's really a matter of preference.8. Cloud/Storage - I love that everything you purchase is also put on the Cloud.  Since there is less storage space on the device this is a real bonus.  You can delete any app you've purchased off of your device and it remains in the Cloud.  Anytime you want to put it back on your device you just touch the Cloud tab, touch the app and select download.  Very simple.  Easy way of keeping things organized on your device as well.  Downside is that obviously you have less storage space on your device itself than on an iPad.9. Keyboard - I tend to do a lot of my writing in Spanish.  However, when I set up the device I chose English.  I don't see a way of doing spanish keyboard other than holding down the keys for additional options.  No spellcheck in Spanish.  I don't know if it would have made a difference if I'd chosen to set up in Spanish.  I didn't find an option of changing the language.  I might download a Swype keyboard (available in Beta) so that I have the option of typing easily in Spanish.  My iPad has language options.10. Games/Apps - There are definitely more apps available to the iPad at this time.  There are some games on my iPad that I can't get on the Fire. Even though there are more games available on the iPad there is still a huge selection on Amazon.  I don't think the amount of apps available at this time would sway me either way because I know the market for the Fire apps will continue to grow and there is already tons to choose from.  I do most of my game play from my iPad, and now Fire, vs my DS or PSP.  I'm a casual game player whereas the types of games my husband plays will always do better on a handheld system with dedicated controllers like the DS and PSP.11. Productivity Apps - Both devices have productivity apps.  Would I want to do word processing or excel type spreadsheets on either?  No.  Might be a bit less painful on the iPad but still would not be ideal.  I'd recommend only viewing on either device vs creating/editing.12.  Printing - While the iPad has air print, if you have a printer that you can email to, you should still be able to print from the Fire.13. Hardware - The gorilla glass on the Fire is amazing.  There are videos you can google online to see tests being done.  I'm not bothering with a screen protector as it doesn't seem to be needed.  The Fire has stereo vs the mono speaker of the iPad.  The only external button on the Fire is the power button, found on the bottom.  While this might seem to be odd placement, you can turn it upside down if you want the button to be on top.  Worked fine for me.  I prefer how the brightness settings can be accessed on the screen of the Fire.  To change brightness on the iPad you have to get out of your app, go to Settings and click through to General Settings then adjust brightness.  Much simpler on the Fire.In conclusion, if I had to make a choice today on which device to purchase, despite loving my iPad, the Fire would be the clear winner.  I can't get past the price difference, speed, navigation, size, etc.  For the price of one iPad you could get 2-3 Fires.  We are now considering getting a second Fire for my husband.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

13 of 16 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhat started as friendship turned to Love :-),December 1, 2011By&nbsp;Judith A. Murphy-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So, two weeks after receiving my Fire I have finally come to my verdict.I bought the first Kindle E Reader three years ago......I took it out of the box and I was addicted.  It was love at first sight.  Since then I do read some books in print form, but it is not my preference.Now I have the "FIRE" and at first it did not compare well with my first Kindle.  I missed the "whispernet" I was not happy with the glare from the sun, it seemed to have a steep learning curve, and I was pissed that it did not come with a USB plug or a protective Jacket.However, I immediately bought "11-22-63" and I really liked seeing the "Book Cover"  (these things matter).  Then I started going on the internet and found that I could watch my friends "Facebook videos" on my Fire.  Then I played some games (Angry Birds is for the birds) and I was really impressed with the quality of the Graphics.  And lastly I found that I could read in bed without a light...something that is pleasing to me and my husband.  Also I can switch very seemlessly from my Kindle to my Fire........the Kindle will "sync" to the furthest page read on my Fire....(this is just magic to me)  The whole idea was to keep one at home and one in my car.  I am now never without my favorite book, and I never need to put this little Kindle in my bag.  I am a free woman !People are grousing about the price of E-books and yaddah yaddah yaddah.....I love the convenience of having all my books stored on one (ok two) little tablets.  If I want a "jacket" down the road I will buy one.  I love my Fire. Everyone is talking about the price.....yeah....that's good too.There are still things I need to learn about my Fire, but I am in no rush.It was not love at first sight, but it is love.PS - I love all the free books: Jane Austen, Sinclair Lewis, Charles Dickens,Bronte Sisters, etc.Cool Yule !Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

13 of 16 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsreally tried to like it, but decided to return it,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;Ferdinand Arcinue(Long Beach, CA United States)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire last weekend and spent a week trying to like it.  For $200, I knew it came with limitations.  I don't need cameras, but was a little bummed about the lack of GPS since it would be portable and nice to use for navigation.  I also knew it didn't come with infrared, but was willing to give up having a fancy remote control and apps like Peel for watching TV.  And, I knew it didn't have bluetooth, but was going to look into wifi based wireless speaker systems for music around the house.  But, the Fire seemed adequate and the Amazon Prime membership also seemed reasonable since my wife and I order from Amazon all the time and were considering a Hulu or Netflix membership.  My plan was to get a Fire, and if I decided I wanted the other bells and whistles, then I would still keep the Fire and also get a more expensive tablet down the road.  My main needs were email, web browsing, and maybe some game apps.  The Fire was cheap and seemed adequate.So here are my beefs:1) I'm a gadget guy, and a happy google nexus s owner.  I'm also a google guy (my wife's an apple person).  I knew Amazon had overlayed its own skin onto an android platform, but I didn't realize how different the interface would be.  I'm used to my android, and my wife's iphone.  Their interfaces are pretty simple to use and intuitive.  So, this Amazon interface with the bookshelf and all that was un-intuitive for me.  While it is similar, it's just not as simple and clean looking.  I wanted to add widgets and other easy to see info on the front page, which it can't do.  More importantly, most of the apps that I have on my android are not available for the Fire.  Eventually, they may be.  But, with android 4.0 (ice cream sandwich) coming out, I worry about the compatibility of the Fire running a heavily modified version of 2.0.  I worry that it will become obsolete quickly, and that most apps won't be available for the Fire.2) I was primarily going to use it for email and web browsing.  The built in email interface wasn't sufficient for gmail, and there is no gmail app.  And, it was causing weird duplicates when I would check my gmail through my phone or desktop computer.  I tried to just use gmail through the web browser, but the mobile version is not as comprehensive as the app version.  There also wasn't a way for me to use google calendar or docs with the kindle.  I could go through the browser, but again the mobile versions are not as good as the app versions.  For example, on the calendar, I couldn't set alarms or reminders.  I can do these through the android apps.  I know there may be some conflict/competition between google and amazon behind this.  So, it's not necessarily Amazon's fault.  But, for me, I need to access gmail, calendar, and docs, and the Fire doesn't seem to do it.On a positive note, the silk browser seems pretty good for what it's suppose to do.  No complaints with the browser.  Although, I have to admit, even being a google guy.  The browsers on the iphone and ipad are better than the browsers on the android and the Fire.  Less hiccups in general.  Sometimes you press links or try to zoom in, and nothing happens.  This doesn't seem to happen on my wife's iphone.3) Secondarily, I was planning to watch videos through an amazon prime membership.  My mistake, but I thought the membership included all the tv shows and movies in the amazon library.  Turns out, the free ones are basically just the old shows.  So, you can watch old episodes of Ally McBeal and Deep Space Nine for free.  If you want to watch current shows, it's still $1.99 an episode, on top of the monthly membership fee.  Same with newer movies.  Which basically means the membership mainly buys you free shipping when shopping at amazon.  A Hulu membership is slightly more expensive, but at least you don't have to pay per episode to watch something current.4) I downloaded Field Runners and a few other apps, and they kept freezing or crashing on me.  After uninstalling them, reinstalling them, and then having them crash again half an hour later, I got too frustrated.This was the final straw for me.  I was going to keep the Fire and forego the Prime membership for Hulu.  And, I was willing to forego the built-in email system and just use the mobile gmail site through the browser.  But, the freezing and crashing weren't really fixable.  I asked my wife if she wanted it, since it would be an upgrade to her kindle reader, but she just shrugged and said she was happy with her iphone for facebook, email, and light browsing.  So, I decided to return it.  For $200, it's still a good little device.  But, again, I'm a bit of a gadget guy, so I am willing to pay the extra money for some more features.  For $200, I was willing to keep it, but with the lack of compatibility with google mail, calendar, and docs; the disappointing Prime membership; and again the freezing and crashing; there wasn't any good reason to keep it.  I will look into the 7" android tabs coming out.  The good thing about the Fire is that it will probably drive down the price of these other tablets.  I'm going to wait until after xmas and see what happens to the tablet market.  My wife can get an ipad, but she doesn't seem to be interested since she also has a laptop.I do want to stress that the Fire seems like a good tablet.  It's mainly about fit for me.  It doesn't fit my needs and it isn't compatible with the other services (mainly google services) that I use on a daily basis.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire convert,April 14, 2012By&nbsp;DeelSeeker(The Great Pacific Northwest)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought my Kindle Fire after owning a Vizio Vtab for a few months. They're similar tablets, but different, IMHO. The Vtab has a larger screen, and accepts micro SD cards (where I've inserted the largest card it'll accept - 32 GB). It has a camera, which I've had no reason to use. It does take adequate pictures, but who really needs the ability to take pictures with their tablet?Along with the larger screen, memory card, camera, and other features of the Vtab, comes additional weight. The Vtab specs state the "gross" weight is 2.5 LBS, vs Fire's 14.6 OUNCES, which does end up being significant over time. I'm recovering from a stroke, resulting in left-side weakness (for the time being), and I really do notice the extra size and weight of the Vtab. For me, it was tiring to try and hold the larger, heavier Vtab with one hand, even for a short while, whereas my Kindle Fire, with the narrower screen and lighter weight, fits quite nicely in one hand - even my weaker hand. My Fire fits in my bag more easily, even with its case.I disagree with those who criticize the lack of an external memory card slot. My understanding of Amazon's lack of any external memory slot is because the intent is to draw files and apps from the Cloud, rather than storing them on a memory card or internal memory. Frankly, I now prefer having no memory card slot. My Vtab has a micro SD card slot. With the Vtab, I was constantly juggling/moving apps and files between the SD card and the internal memory, because I was receiving "memory card is full" alerts far too often for my liking. 32 GB fills up surprisingly fast, and I'm not interested in spending my time deciding what files/apps should stay or go, and whether to put them on the SD card or the internal memory. I like the simplicity of no external memory with my Fire, and so far, haven't missed it.I used to carry both the Vtab and the Fire with me when I'm out and about, thinking I might want, or need, both. But after just a few weeks of owning the Fire, I'm finding myself taking just the Fire. So far, I haven't found myself wishing I'd taken the Vtab instead.I think the Kindle Fire was/is a great purchase for me. I like my Vtab, but I also like my Kindle Fire. I tried both, and like both. I find the Kindle Fire easy to use, more compact and lighter weight, with a nice, crisp display. My Fire does everything I want a tablet to do.Check out the specs, and decide if this is right for you. I don't think you'll be disappointed.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome Product!,May 16, 2012By&nbsp;Irish-Mike-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This has been a great purchase.  Some of these one star reviews have been completely absurd...I'll never understad why people compare the Kindle Fire to the ipad.  Measured on its own standards alone...it's a tremendous product.  I own both an ipad and a fire and I can honestly say this has been the better purchase so far.  No....It's not a tablet it's an E-Reader with some added fuctionality and that's why I love it.  Stop comparing this to the ipad...please....those who are and giving the fire a 1 star review on that basis are simply wrong.  I have had no freezing issues....no charger issues...no WIFI issues....if the customer pays attention while inserting the charger it will not break.I don't usually write reviews and of course not everyone will love the Kindle Fire.  Everyone is entitled to his/her own opinion, but I was irked by some of the biased and unfair reviews that i had to give my two centsHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing device and INCREDIBLE customer service,May 7, 2012By&nbsp;Jennifer K. McGuire(SHERIDAN, OR, US)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire, and I use it everyday, my kids use it everyday too. The charging port stopped working properly, so I called customer service, barely had to explain what was wrong and the customer service agent went ahead and authorized a replacement. A few days later as I was waiting for my new Kindle to arrive, my son dropped the old one and shattered the screen. I was afraid it would mess up the exchange so I called customer service to explain what happened and she assured me that it would have no affect on my getting a replacement Kindle and that I would not be charged for what was an obviously dropped Kindle. It is the absolute best customer service experience I have ever had in my life, hands down. It shows me that Amazon truly is committed to their customers and their devices' integrity. Will forever be an Amazon customer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsUp and running in 2 minutes!,April 25, 2012By&nbsp;Glenn Fulghum "Sauron36"(PA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got the Kindle Fire today, had it talking to my WPA2 Wi-Fi in about a minute, had a book downloaded a minute later.  This thing is intuitive and easy to navigate!I have no idea what some folks in the forums were talking about with regards to it being hard to use, or there being no instructions.Just take a couple of minutes and check out the online videos while you're waiting for the device to arrive, and you're good to go!Awesome.  Just Awesome.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBiggest bang for your buck,April 17, 2012By&nbsp;Mr. Thomas J. Cimicata(Dumont, New Jersey United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Got the Kindle Fire less than a week ago as an early birthday gift from my wife and I've been enjoying it immensely since first opening the box. Before I even unnboxed it my wife unregistered it (it came with her Amazon account info). It was already charged (about 65%), started right up, connected with wifi no problem and registered it with my Amazon account all in about 2-3 minutes. All the Amazon apps I have on my phone were also right there in my Kindle cloud and ready to be installed immediately. This is my first Kindle (my wife has a Kindle e-reader).A few tips for those just receiving their KF: There is no signature required on delivery so try to make sure you are home when it is delivered because it comes in a box that says "Kindle Fire" right on the box with no additional exterior wrapping, so if you live in an area where you worry about your mail/deliveries being pilfered, beware. The second tip is that I noticed that the KF would not update its system files to 6.3 until it was fully charged and only then would it download the update, so if you are wondering why your KF does not automatically update itself like it is supposed to, try charging it fully first.The display is amazingly good and the colors and resolution are terrific in my opinion. The only adjustment I've made to it is to turn down the brightness at night to be easier on the eyes. Another really great feature is the ability to change fonts and font sizes on the fly so sometimes I read without my glasses, something only those who wear glasses to read might appreciate.Apps I have on my tiny 3.1 inch phone look completely different, much more detailed and in vibrant colors. Games like Angry Birds also play much more smoothly and quickly without any glitches.Although I am a pretty fair hacker (I have my Stone Age Motorola Backflip rooted and running Cyanogenmod 7), I did not and probably will not root the KF or install an alternate OS or launcher. I really like the carousel and the KF Android modified system is good enough for my needs. I even have remote access to my computer and can play any files on it through my kindle using a free app named Team Viewer available at the Amazon app store.For those who just absolutely, positively have to have Google Play (Andriod Market) apps on the KF but don't want to root the KF for whatever reason (it voids the warranty is one good reason), that was pretty easy as well and most, though not all, run just fine on the KF (excluding widgets). To accomplish that easily and quickly I just installed a free Google Play app on my phone named File Expert, used it to backup the apps I wanted from my phone as .apk files (just a few clicks necessary), then copied the apk files from my phone to a folder on my desktop computer. Just a suggestion, but I also suggest installing Dropbox on your android phone as well before doing this. Also, install one of the free file explorers on your KF (I used ES File Explorer, available on Amazon app store for free) so you can find the files once you transfer them to the KF.Then I connected my KF to my computer (using the micro USB from my phone)and copied and pasted the apk files from my computer desktop folder to a folder called Android Apps I made on my KF with ES File Explorer. After pasting simply go to that folder on your KF in ES File Explorer and click on the apk files and presto, they are installed. Now I have my Giants, Yankees and NFL apps that I can't live without on my KF and am a happy camper.Note that this only has to be done once because after you install Dropbox on your KF in the future all you have to do to get your apk files there is to upload the apk to Dropbox to make it available on your KF. Alternately, you can also (though I haven't tried this) email the apk files to your kindle and just click on them to install them.So far I have found the Amazon experience with Prime to be excellent and will probably subscribe to Prime when my free 30 trial is up. The book deals to Prime members, borrowing rights and videos available seem to be worth it. I would be interesting in hearing from others, however, as to whether Netflix (for movies and videos) or Hulu are better deals.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsthe best e-reader on the market,April 16, 2012By&nbsp;Maximo92f-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)If you are reviewing this as an e-reader you have to give the Kindle Fire 5 stars. If you are comparing it to an iPad or Galaxy tablet your looking at it completely wrong. This is an e-reader with lots of extras, such as a nice web browser, app device, and a first rate Amazon, Netflix, and Hulu ,etc streaming device. The Kindle Fire is fast, smooth,and overall very responsive. The virtual controls prevent accidental tapping of controls while reading, watching video, listening to music etc. The size makes it easy to use one handed though it is much weightier than the original Kindles. The back lit screen makes reading in all light conditions easy though it does have a glossy screen so reading outdoors is a little more difficult than an original Kindle, one place the original still rules the roost. I do wish the power button was on top instead of the bottom but that seems to be my only complaint so far.With Netflix, Hulu, Amazon Prime, and Rahpsody passes the Kindle Fire delivers tons of entertainment when connected to wifi  and tons of book reading and games offline. If you are a mass storage junkie this device will come up a little short for you as there is between 5 and 6 Gb of User internal storage with micro sd support. I am able to connect to wifi most of the time so this isn't a problem for me but your milage may vary.Overall the finest of all e-readers and minus, camera, bluetooth, gps, and mass storage it compares with higher end Android tablets.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsInstant Vulcan Mind Meld: I love it!,April 16, 2012By&nbsp;Diane Kistner(Georgia)  -See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We were early adopters of the Kindle 1, then I picked up an early Kindle 2 (keyboard) with the free Whispernet internet connection. I found myself reading lengthier items on the Kindles than I do on the web, but the main value of the Kindle 2 for me was that it allowed me to get word out to family by email when a fallen tree prevented me from reaching a mutual destination. (We've dumped our expensive cell phones.) I mainly kept recipes on the Kindle 2 so I wouldn't have to print out recipes from online to cook in the kitchen.But my Fire! This was love at first sight. Some have said it's harder to read on the Fire, but I find the opposite to be true. Maybe it's because I spend so much of my time on my computer that my eyes have adjusted to a backlit screen, or maybe it's because I can reach for it in the dark if I wake up in the wee hours, but I find myself spending as much time with my Fire as I do with my computer. The computer is where I do work that requires me to type and also for finding interesting content to read. (I use the "Kindle It" extension in my Chrome browser to send articles to my Fire. This extension gives me the content in a form that is very readable on the Fire.)I appreciate Amazon's effort through the Android App Store to let us test-drive apps before we download them and also that they indicate if an app is compatible with the Kindle Fire. I have gotten some amazing apps free, and even the paid ones tend to be inexpensive. (There is danger in this, though: When I first got my Fire, I was like a kid in a candy store with all those apps! I think MedScape, Syncplicity, gReader, and Spotlight Six's TimeClock are the most useful I have acquired, although I do keep my brain sharp with Scrabble and Quell. And Pandora, of course.)You'll need a capacitive stylus to effectively use the Fire. I had to pay double at the local Staples for what I should have bought when I ordered my Fire. Also, you'll probably want some kind of protective case for it. (I'm using the leather case that came with my Kindle 1, and it works well enough plus it has room in the spine to hold my stylus.)All this said, don't forget that the Kindle Fire is a device to open up the world of digital goodies that Amazon lays at our feet. My month of free Amazon Prime has expired, but I saw enough of it to know I want to sign up ASAP. I watched a few movies on my Fire, curled up in bed with headphones, and I found the experience to be cozy and pleasurable. Of course, everything can be synced with your HDTV as well, and there are apps for Netflix, HuluPlus, and Roku so you can control your media experience from your Fire.There is no webcam, so if you're big into Google+ hangouts you'll need to use a different device. Also, there is no camera. I don't care to have either of these on a tablet, and I wouldn't want to have to pay a lot extra for them either. The only thing missing from my Fire that I'd like to have is 4G wireless. If Amazon comes out with a Kindle Fire with this capability and marries up with Google for a smoother G+ experience (including phoning), I think they will leave the competition in the dust.It's not too big, not too small, just right...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI should have done this a long time ago...,April 15, 2012By&nbsp;Laszlo Nagy(Foothill Ranch, CA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am still amazed at the looks, performance, and the capabilities of the Kindle Fire.  The unit arrived fully charged and the set up took only a few minutes.  At first I was a bit concerned about how the books from my other Kindle would transfer but after the quick set up was complete, all my stuff was neatly displayed on the bookshelf.  The browser is lightning-fast, the display is clear and crisp with very minimal glare.  I have read several reviews about the lack of Apps or the difficulty of finding them in the Apps Marketplace.  I did not have the slightest problem finding what I wanted.  I downloaded Netflix and a few others in seconds.  Now everything is up and running as I want it.  Lastly, the battery life is incredible.  I charged it 3 days ago and it is still nearly full.  A wonderful product, I'm very satisfied with it.  Thanks Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNorman'sKndle fire Review,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Norman e Higgs-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle fire is well thoughtout. It has all the advantages of my first Kindle and has added a lighted screen which I feel was needed. The color adds to the improvement as well as the other software additions. It is close to the Ipad in things I do and much less expenseve (I have an Ipad).  I have recomended it to people I know.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFun gadget,February 7, 2012By&nbsp;Laura G(Audubon, IA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't have a smart phone but I wanted something where I could use wi-fi and apps without the hefty data plan of cell phone companies.  The Kindle Fire meets what I wanted perfectly.  It is easy to use and super handy.  It is perfect for people that read/use for a short amount of time (like max. 1-2 hours).  The only minor thing is that sometimes the touch screen isn't as responsive, but that could also just be me getting used to it.  Best Christmas present ever!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo much better than I expected,February 1, 2012By&nbsp;Hollie Eaddy-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have researched the Kindle Fire and the Nook Tablet since talk of the fire releasing. I have wanted a Kindle for a while and saw the fire coming out and thought Ohh I'm going to hold out for that I have to say I became hesitant reading some of the negative reviews on here. I don't know if the updates have fixed most of the issues people tend to give this wonderful little tablet only 1 star for however I find it runs smooth, pages load super fast and I have no issues with response from the touch.  The power button is located on the bottom however I can flip it to the top and the screen moves as well. You can flip it to any angle and your screen will flip with you so I have not had an issue of accidentally turning it off. There is a security feature so you can password it (assuming it must of been in an update) It also allowed me to upload over 300 mp3s to the cloud player on my computer which means it takes up no space on my kindle what so ever but I can access it and play the mp3s. I have no issue using netflix or any of the apps on it. For $199 I'm one happy lady! My daughter is now begging for one. Is it an ipad killer? No however for $199 you can read all the media you want, have all the apps you want (they do allow 3rd party apps as well), watch movies, cruise the net, play games on facebook and listen to your mp3s. The weight and feel of it is great! I don't have a bad glare on mine at all and can read it better than my computer or android phone. For me this is the ideal mini tablet. The set up was so easy I'm sure my 11 year old daughter could do it! It automatically connected to my wifi within seconds literally.  I was also excited that the plug was the same as my HTC Evo Design so no need to purchase a micro usb to hook it to my comp. I can open all my word and pdf docs on it as well! I had no issues getting to my email or opening dos like some had mentioned. Not sure why some have issues with the Fire but I love mine. I would highly recommend this to anyone who is looking for an awesome reader with all the added benefits of apps, net surfing, music and movies!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBEST COLOR READER,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;JP "highway195"(New Jersey)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Read multiple reviews of Kindle Fire vs. Nook Tablet.  Could not make up my mind.  Each device had pluses and minuses.  Then I researched app availability and prices.  Yikes!  The Nook has very limited app selection.  ESPN scorecenter, USA Today, US Newspapers, and Weather.com are among many that are not available on the Nook.  These are apps that are available and free on every android and apple device.  (The Nook will sell you a full subscription to USA Today for 11.99 a month.)  The few games that Nook has available for a price are free on Ipad and the Fire.Now, the Fire is not a full android tablet with the Android market, but there are more than enough apps available for my purposes.  It's a terrific reader.  Many classic books are free on the Fire.  I purchased 2 books from Amazon. They downloaded in a few seconds each.  The Kindle reading app does not have the fancy 'curled page' page turning visual effect that the Nook does,  but it functions fine. You can tap screen or swipe to turn a page.Videos and Silk browser are smooth.  Screen is beautiful!  Angry Birds(free) looks spectacular.  Downloaded aTilt 3D Labyrinth (free) to test accelerometer and it works perfectly.  I'm not seeing any of the issues other reviewers has complained about, but I am running latest update 6.2.2.It comes with a free month of Amazon Prime that includes free streaming of older movies and TV shows.  That's not something I have time for, but I tried it and watched parts of H.G. Wells Time Machine and a Star Trek Enterprise episode.  Video looked great and sound with earbuds was excellent.  I can see how a movie and TV buff would enjoy this option.  I loaded a home movie (mp4) via the PC and it also played great (you need to but a micro B to USB cable to hook to computer to download your personal content).  For $199 this is a steal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent device, just as it is.,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;C. B. Smith(Hawaii)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I consider myself a "techie" having used/built/upgraded/repaired many computers since the eighties (my first computer was an Apple II, my first build was a Windows 95 box), and I've had two different touch screen devices in the past (a Toshiba Pocket PC, and an HTC-built Window Mobile 5.x smartphone).  Although this is my first tablet of any kind, and I can't compare it with any similar product, I do feel competent enough to review something that is basically a small personal computer (albeit a somewhat limited one).Based on its own merits I am really impressed.  I've had it about two weeks, long enough to get a feel for its different functions and to upgrade the firmware twice (I'm on version 6.2.2).  The quality of the build is excellent and the size it just right for me: easy to carry around, couch surf, read books, watch Netflix and Prime movies, etc.  Yesterday I installed the KindletoPC app which makes transferring documents from my desktop or netbook much easier.  I decided on the Fire because of the low price (for a tablet device) and its Netflix support; Prime is just icing on the cake although I don't know if I'll renew at the end of the month.  I'm impressed with Amazon's support, continuous upgrades, and improvements, and I like the Amazon "ecosystem"; it doesn't bother me that many of the Android apps don't work with the Fire, there are more in the store than I will ever need or want.What I'm doing with it:Streaming movies;Listening to music (music handling is superb, and the speakers are surprisingly robust --- you'll need headphones for best quality though);Reading PCMag;Reading eBooks from my local area library;Watching mp4 movies (tip: they're easy to load in Windows Explorer via micro-USB cable but hard to find, you have to use the Gallery app that comes pre-installed on the Fire);Gmail and Hotmail;Surfing the web (the Silk browser works great on some sites, not so great on others, but the zoom function helps);Playing games like Angry Birds and Bejeweled.What I avoid doing with it:Any sort of typing, I'm not good using thumbs and a virtual keyboard;Content creation like spreadsheets, presentations, etc;Messing with the basics.  This is one device I'm not going to modify (e.g., "root").  I think it's fine just the way it is, even if it lacks features you'll find in other Android-based devices.  My reasoning is that I have a desktop for the heavy lifting and a netbook for portable content creation and presentation;High-end gaming (it isn't possible).The Kindle Fire fills a nice niche on its own, as is, with one exception.  I purchased an inexpensive "pleather" case to protect it, with an added benefit that the case makes it harder to accidentally hit the power button.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Fire,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Charles Kemp(Palmer, Texas USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)What can I say I love the Kindle fire. To be honest I can not compare it with any other Tablet. I also have the Kindle 3 which I also love.The Fire does everything that I wanted it to do for me. I can surf the web read books and check my email.And I love the price.Thank you Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing buy,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;djg0791-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This product is amazing! It is everything i need in a tablet; its small (fits in my jacket pocket), amazing visual quality, great touch screen and runs apps and surfs the web seamlessly.  AMAZINGHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - A reader's review,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Rae "mom of 2 boys"(MN USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been using the Kindle Fire now for a couple months and I love it!  It was so easy to set up right out of the box.  It found my wifi connection instantly and was ready to go.I read A LOT. I have enjoyed the backlight for reading instead of trying to find a book light. The one small issue is even on the dimmest setting, the backlight is still a touch too bright.  It takes a moment for my eyes to adjust in a dark bedroom, but I don't get eyestrain or anything.  I like that you can adjust the color of the background, size of text, etc.The selection of books is great, and you can transfer your own books from your computer that you may have downloaded elsewhere by using a convertor.The daily free apps are great and my kids enjoy all the games they can play.Check out an app called "Splashtop" - which allows you to control your desktop computer from your Kindle.  This has been great for watching movies. I just pop the DVD in my desktop computer then watch it from my Kindle.At first the power button was annoying - too easy to hit.  But I bought a sleeve to protect my kindle and it make the power button less easy to hit on accident - so that problem was solved.If you already have an ipod or ipad for apps and are just looking for a reader, I'd say the other Kindle choices are better, but if you're looking for all-around entertainment, then the Kindle Fire is a great choice.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Fire!!,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;K C-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It took me a week to get into my Kindle.  I think I was expecting something else, but can't really explain what that means.  All I know is that now I am used to it, it follows me every where I go.  I love Pulse, and using it as an e-reader.  It took some getting used to as an e-reader since I was used to my Sony PRS300.  With the fire, it's kind of like reading on your phone...bright.  But once you get used to it, its fine.  Adjust the brightness if need be.  It can be a tad tempermental.  You may have to push twice for some things. Is this a big deal? No.Love this.  Glad I got it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsEach has it's place.,January 15, 2012By&nbsp;Fred(Bloomfield, CT)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am admittedly a gadget freak. I own an Ipad 1, an Ipad 2, every iphone, each kindle that has been produced and even an Android Tablet (The Toshiba Thrive) just so I could gain experience in an Android system. What I've learned is that each has it's place. The Ipad is a pretty good device for certain things but I personally believe that those things are pretty limited. Great for magazines, browsing the web and reading PDF files. Even though I have about 7 screens worth of apps, I rarely use most of the others. Idon't want to knock the device too much since it is a trailblazer and is forcing everyone to think differently about computers (including thankfully Microsoft). The Ipad is a good consumption device but I rarely use it for anything that requires input. (I'm a physician and an IT guy)Which brings me to the Kindle Fire. I use most of these touch screen devices for reading. Books, the web, magazines, etc. And the Fire is simply a great reading device. The form factor for me is much better than the others. I like something small that fits in my hand like a book. I can still browse the web with it. And there are plenty of apps that help for other things like email and calendars. Magazines are still hit or miss. There are clearly things that could be better on the device but when you consider that this is a first generation piece of hardware and software, it's pretty remarkable. Remember the first generation iphone? I look forward to what Amazon will do with more software upgrades (and hardware for that matter)And the price is simply incredible. So for those of us who have invested in the Amazon world of reading and music, this is a no-brainer.  I look forward to improvements in magazine reading although some of them are already remarkably good. If Amazon continues to keep their eye on the ball, and I think that they will, they will continue to grab more of the marketplace. They have already shown that "tablets", as they currently exist, are good for only certain things and the rest is hype.  More power to them.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsALL FIRED UP!,January 15, 2012By&nbsp;Tarot Teacher-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had been anticipating the KF ever since reading about it in the late summer.  I pre-ordered and my KF arrived even more quickly than I expected.  It also arrived leaning on my front door with the words Kindle Fire prominently displayed for any passerby to see and walk away with.  More on this later.When I got it in the house and unpacked - very clever internal packaging, by the way - I was quite pleased to see it already had a small charge and all I had to do was turn it on, follow the directions and I was all set.  Could not have been easier.Then trouble struck.  After only two weeks the Fire would only burn horizontally.  After turning on vertically, everything immediately went to horizontal.  At a minimum this was disconcerting for reading books.  The Amazon folks could not have been more accommodating.  When I called and described the issue (after first emailing and being asked to call) the rep immediately said they would ship me out a new KF and when it arrived to ship back the defective one.  Now to recap the KF on the porch.  In the short time between the arrival of my first KF and my second one, Amazon had listened to the complaints about the exterior packaging and my new KF arrived discretely packaged so that unless you looked pretty carefully, you wouldn't know what was inside.  Good!And this illustrates Amazon's entire attitude, as far as I'm concerned.  If there is a problem, don't deny, just fix it.  My new KF arrived with all the apps and books I had already purchased on the "broken" KF waiting for me in the cloud.  All I had to do was download.  Love that cloud.  Love my KF for that matter.One final word about Amazon Prime with which it comes loaded for a month.  I really liked the idea of Prime and had debated about switching from Netflix.  However, at this time, I feel that the selection (or rather lack thereof) precludes me from handing over the bucks.  It's a neat idea but I'm going to wait a while to see how the selection improves.To conclude, I guess you could say I'm a Kindle Fire Fan Girl...I really love it.  Remember, it's not a laptop and isn't suited for some things but for the price, for what it does, and for the support you get from Amazon, it really is topnotch.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPleasantly surprised,January 13, 2012By&nbsp;Jordan(New York, USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely love my Kindle Fire. Our local Borders went out of business a few months ago and it was sadly the only bookstore in town. This prompted my decision to invest in an e-reader. I did quite a bit of research on which Kindle would best fit my needs and was leaning towards the Kindle Touch. I read a lot of reviews on the Kindle Fire- most of which pointed at "glitches" and how much it paled in comparison to an iPad. I did not put much stock in these reviews but ultimately decided that I did not want to risk investing in a Kindle Fire. Perhaps I would go with the next gen model that came out but for now a Kindle Touch would suit my needs. Black Friday came and I was excited to find out that Staples was doing a sale for the Kindle Touch. Having not slept yet, I arrived at Staples around 5am and waited for the store to open at 6am. The store finally opens and I rush to the Kindle line determined to buy a Kindle Touch. The woman ahead of me advances to the desk and begins purchasing a Kindle Touch. The Staples Employee smiles and states "You are lucky, this is the last one". My heart sinks. I am however still determined to purchase a Kindle. I have only moments now to decide between the normal Kindle or the Kindle Fire. The lady ahead of me receives her Kindle Touch and gathers her things to leave. Kindle.. Kindle Fire.. Kindle.. Kindle Fire, I don't know which to choose."How may I help you this morning?". I blurt out "Um, Kindle Fire please".I could not be happier with that split-second decision. The Kindle Fire is everything I hoped for and more. When I initially decided not to purchase the Kindle Fire, one of the primary reasons was I did not feel I would use it enough to warrant the cost. I could not have been more wrong. Since Black Friday, I have used my Kindle Fire almost every day, for multiple hours. I have never read so much! It's just so convenient. Video looks fantastic on the Fire- whether its Netflix or movies/series from Amazon. MP3's sound great and there are a lot of fun apps you can download, a lot of which are free. Amazon's app store also does a free app of the day. I find myself grabbing my Kindle first thing in the morning, excited to see what the free app of the day is. What of the glitches I read in my pre-purchase research? I have not come across any.The Kindle Fire is an exceptional product and I recommend it to everyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA tablet for those who don't want to spend and arm and leg for the iPad.,January 12, 2012By&nbsp;elementjrose-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle fire for Christmas and must say I have yet to have any negative comments. I have found many women who like it because it fits in a conventional size purse. I like it because how easy it is to use it for looking at powerpoint slides or adobe pdfs for classes. I also like it cause it is the first tablet I have come across that is able to watch video posted on sites like watching missed episodes of shows on abc.com. My fourth generation iPod touch could not do that. I also would say that the sound quality from the speakers is comparable to that of a conventional laptop, which surprises me given their size.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it for reading; not the platform for games / apps,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;Frank Villasenor-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bottom Line: It's not an iPad -- for me, it's better. Why? I mostly read on these devices and the smaller screen and form factor is better suited. I wish the unit was lighter but it has not affected my use of the unit. If you're intention for one of these is reading (books, web page articles, magazines, etc) this is the unit for you. If your intention is more games and/or utility apps, you might look at an iPad. The app selection isn't there and I suspect it never will be (given Apple's 'control' of this field)----My review in more detail:I've been a Kindle user for a while now. I've had a Kindle 2nd generation and have seen no need to update it. My wife got me a Kindle Fire for x-mas, however and it takes the Kindle platform to a whole new level. I spend most of my time with the Kindle Fire reading books (which I expect) but I also shop Amazon on it, read forums on the Internet and various other articles. It's a good platform to read on -- better than the iPad b/c of the form factor. I do wish the unit was lighter but it's not been a problem overall. I don't think it's heavier than any other such tablet device.An interesting thing about the Kindle fire is that it is an Android tablet. (I did not know this) Yes, Amazon has modified the OS and I think improved it. What does this mean to you? If you have an Android based phone in which you've bought apps, you might want to use your paid apps on the Kindle Fire. I'm not sure it's possible as it appears to me that the android marketplace will not work with the Kindle Fire. I am still trying to figure this out. The Kindle Fire &amp; Amazon encourages you to use the Amazon app store which I do imagine makes it easier for those less technical folks (I'm more technical than most)The amazon app store does have a good selection and I've been able to find everything that I want or need via the store with one notable exception -- I could not get the Google+ app and have ended up using browser - not a real loss there. Also, I understand (through searches on the Internet) that the Android Market place has a broader selection. Amazon, however, may be working to address this.Now, the web browser -- amazing. I do feel the browser works well. I've been able to read forums that normally I cannot on the iPad or iPhone. Web pages come up fast enough and most important (from what I've seen) function as they should. I've had some issue with the iPad in this respect [but the websites are usually smaller, industry specific organization]I think it's an awesome grab at the price they are asking for... Hopefully this review was helpful.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire,January 9, 2012By&nbsp;Vanity VonSyn-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I think that I have given myself enough time to play with the Fire before writing a review. I got a Kindle Fire for Christmas and I really like it. It by no means replaces the actual printed book. I am now reading my second e-book, the first was Charles Dickens "A Christmas Carol" and I do have to say that I do sort of miss the printed book. But printed books are what I am used to. I've never had an e-reader before now, so I'm still getting used to it. I really do like it though. It's terribly convenient. I can get really comfortable while reading in bed at night because I can prop it up on my blankets and not have to worry about it closing on me or the pages flipping on their own and me losing my place. I also don't have to reposition it or myself every time I turn a page, so I can see myself getting a bit spoiled to it, if I haven't already.I've read reviews where some people have complained about the weight of the Fire and honestly I don't see what all the complaints are about. I have hardcover books in my house that weigh either more or are about the same as the Fire. If you don't have any problems being able to carry around a thick hardcover book, then you won't have any trouble carrying around the Fire. Last week, my mother was reading a book called "Cemetery Dance" and out of curiosity, I picked it up in one hand and held the Fire in the other and I compared their weight. They were the same. So, I really don't see what all the complaints are about concerning the weight of the Kindle Fire. My high school Biology book weighed more than the Fire does. If you can carry a regular printed book with you, then you can carry the Fire. There is absolutely no difference.I don't like using the Fire for looking up anything in reference books. I was trying to look a word up in the dictionary on it earlier tonight and just from flipping through the pages page by page, apparently I kept hitting links to other words that are at the bottom of some of the pages. It kept putting me farther and farther away from the word that I had originally been trying to find. So I finally just gave up and decided that I would just use a printed dictionary to look the word up in. I can honestly find it a whole lot faster that way. That being said, the Dictionary desperately needs to have a "Search" feature to make it easier to look up specific words. I do like that the Fire allows you to be able to look up the meanings of words while you're reading. That is insanely helpful. A lot of times, I will come across words that I have never even heard of much less know the meanings of and it really helps to be able to look them up without interrupting your reading by having to go and drag out a big, heavy dictionary.I don't do much reading while outside because usually if I'm outside, I'm around other people and I find the noise to be too distracting. So most of my reading is done indoors. I have found that when outside with the Fire, the backlighting is usually not good for being able to see what you're looking at but with the Fire, you can change the background color of your pages (white is best when outside) and it helps to turn the screen brightness up a bit as well. I can do this and have no trouble being able to read while in the car during the day or while sitting inside of well-lighted buildings. Indoors, I tend to keep the screen brightness on its lowest possible setting, otherwise the brightness hurts my eyes to look at it.The wifi seems to be a bit glitchy. I don't know if it has had anything to do with the fact that it's been really cloudy today because of the rain last night but for some reason, it connected to my home internet for about three seconds earlier today and that was it. It immediately disconnected and I have been unable to get it to reconnect. Yet, none of the laptops that are in the house have had any trouble staying connected to the net today. Also, I thought that the wireless internet would work the same as it does with the laptops. But I have noticed that when I'm upstairs and the wifi is turned on, the internet connection comes and goes...often. It's like every couple of minutes its disconnecting. If I'm downstairs, it does better if I'm in the kitchen (I'm guessing this is because the kitchen is closer to the desktop which is the main computer where the network is and everything else it set up). When I'm in the living room, it's ok but it tends to come and go just not as often as it does upstairs. So I've been keeping it turned off unless I need to use it. A few days ago, I was attempting to check my e-mail and it worked great for a while, but at some point it just refused to load up any web page. It would take several minutes before giving me a white error page that said something along the lines of "Page Cannot Be Displayed" and no matter how many times I refreshed it or reloaded it in a different tab or closed it out all together and tried again it kept giving me the same thing. I even tried turning the Fire off completely and starting over. Eventually, I actually had to go to my laptop to finish what I had been doing. I don't know what the issue was but it finally stopped doing it though it took a few hours. The glitchy wireless internet is why I've given the Fire four stars rather than five. Otherwise, I would have easily given it five stars.The touch screen is really neat but it's definitely going to take some getting used to because I've never had a touch screen anything before. It's really easy when using the onscreen keyboard to repeatedly hit the wrong keys. It probably doesn't help that my finger nails tend to get in the way and pencil erasers don't seem to work on the touch screen either, so I'm pretty much stuck with using my fingers. I've had extra keys appear a few times and have no idea what I did to make them appear so I don't know how to make them do it again. I'm sure that I will figure it out eventually.You can highlight, copy and paste text which is really useful, especially when you can't remember your passwords and you have to copy and paste them. The copy and paste function is one that I am just starting to figure out. At first, I didn't even know that the Fire would let you and I was a bit disappointed. But since I've now learned that you can copy and paste text I've been pleasantly surprised. Good luck figuring that one out though without a mouse or a CTRL key.So far, I have been able to go to all of my usual web pages that I go to on my laptop. Google images works well. All of my e-mail (though I haven't checked my yahoo mail on it yet, yahoo's web messenger works well on the Fire) loads up and works well. Youtube works well. Overall, I have no complaints about the web browsing from the Fire. I just wish that the wireless internet on it would stay connected and stop coming and going. That's a little frustrating to have to deal with at times. Oh, you cannot play the games on MSN from the Fire. It says that the web browser is out of date. I read where someone asked the question as to whether you can play Farmville from the Fire. Yes, you can. But it's not the same as it is on a computer. You get the express version on the Fire. You don't actually go to your farm and you can't do anything other than harvest your crops and replant more. Several people have complained that the web browser is slow. It's not. If you want to know what "slow" is, get dial-up internet. That mess is painfully slow. Once you've had that for a while, you learn to appreciate faster internet connections. The web browser on the Fire is not slow at all. It's just as fast as my laptop is (I have DSL at my house). Someone else also said in a review that the sound through the speakers of the Fire is, in their words, "tinny". This is also not true. The sound is just fine to me. In fact, the sound from the Fire is actually better than the sound from my laptop. Listening to youtube on my laptop took some getting used to because the sound was just...not good. I can at least stand it now, so it's not so bad any more.I wasn't planning on using the Fire to watch movies or videos because I have a laptop and a portable DVD player for that. I also wasn't planning on using it to listen to a bunch of music because I have two MP3 players for that and they tend to go everywhere that I go. However, I have been considering putting some instrumental music on my Fire for reading purposes. It would help to drown out distracting background noise when my MP3 player needs recharging (yes, player rather than players because I only have, well nature sounds is what it is, on one of them). By the way, with the Fire only having, what is it, 8Gs? of space on it, if you start downloading movies, those 8Gs will get used up pretty quickly. Most movies are at least 500MB-700MB and I've seen some that are over 1G in file size. If you're going to watch movies on it, I would suggest streaming or deleting the movie after you've seen it. It really wouldn't hurt for the Fire to have more available space on it.Some people have complained that the battery life isn't long enough. It wouldn't hurt for the battery life to be as long as the other Kindles, but I honestly can't sit and read or play games for eight consecutive hours. So, eight hours is actually pretty good as far as I'm concerned. It'll last on trips where you have to spend at least six hours in the car and during long doctor's office visits. I've been doing most of my reading at night lately, so I've been having to recharge the Kindle at night before going to bed because by then the battery will be really low (I use it off and on throughout the day). And it's worked out nicely. It's finished charging by the time that I wake up in the morning and I am free to carry it around all over the place, which is what I do.One thing that has been consistent in every review that I have read for the Fire is that the power button is in a bad place. This is true. When I got my Fire for Christmas, I also got a leather case for it. The case really does help with the bad position of the power button. I have yet to accidentally turn the Fire off while reading or playing around with an app or whatever. The edge of the case keeps the power button from accidentally getting pushed while the Kindle is resting against your stomach or a pillow or whatever. So, I strongly suggest getting a case to put it in. It seems to have several benefits.Sadly, most of what I have read about the Fire has been complaints from people who seem to want to compare it to the iPad. It is NOT an inexpensive version of the iPad. If you want an iPad, then you need to shell out the $500+ to $800+ to get one rather than buying a Kindle Fire so that you can keep it for a week, send it back and complain about how you're disappointed because you didn't get what you wanted. The Kindle Fire is an e-reader with tablet capabilities. But it is NOT an iPad. I was researching the Fire before Christmas and it really annoyed me that 99% of what I had read about it was people complaining because it wasn't an iPad. I didn't want to know anything about the iPad; if I had have, I would have looked it up. What I wanted to know about was the Kindle Fire. I didn't really care to read peoples' whining over the iPad. I do read the reviews that people give things and when you're supposed to be giving a review for a specific item, it really helps everyone else out if you review that item rather than picking it apart with complaints about something else. So, please, if you all you're going to do is whine because you wanted an iPad, go whine about it somewhere else. I, for one, am very pleased with the Kindle Fire and I won't be returning it. I'd like to keep it. It does what it was advertised to be able to do and because of this, I am content. I do wish that you could bookmark PDF files though and I do miss my page numbers. But other than that and the seemingly glitchy wireless internet, I'm perfectly content with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove My Kindle Fire!,January 8, 2012By&nbsp;jb@amazon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my fire and highly recommend it to anyone who wants to watch videos (netflix, hulu, amazon), read ebooks (purchased or from the local library), surf the net and play games.  I work in the tech field and I LOVE apple entertainment products (I own many apple products and at work I work with several).  I am very thrilled with my fire (I LOVE IT TOO!) because it works great as an entertainment product (and more affordable than my apple products).I also think the fire is a great product because of Amazons clout and support.  Any tech product I buy needs to be useable for years and updateable during those years.  The amazon market (still growing) is and will be getting better all the time.  Why?  Sheer number of devices sold by Amazon equals a large potential population of people who will buy software equals software programmers wanting to be a part of that market.Also in IT the biggest frustration is having an older device and not being able to update it or not being able to use new software or technology because the manufacturer does not update their devices (software) or provide backwards support.  I am not saying that Amazon will continue to provide support (that remains to be seen), but the size, longevity, profitability and attitude of pro consumer of a company are determining factors and compared to other companies I would bet that Amazon will not disappoint.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Must Have Gadget,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;Charlotte Erickson "Happy Retiree"(Laguna Woods, CA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I preordered two Kindle Fires, one for me and one for my daughter.  I thought this would be good for her because she doesn't have an iPad.  This is one of the best purchases I have ever made.  I am a gadget person and I love my Kindle Fire.  I use My Fire more than my iPad 2. It fits right in my purse. One of my favorite uses is listening to audio books. The Fire has the ability to browse the web, in addition to all the apps that are available; my favorites are Words With Friends and Facebook.  99% of the apps I have downloaded from Amazon have been free.  Buy it, you'll like it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAffordable Tablet for the Average 'Joe',January 3, 2012By&nbsp;Timothy L. Wagner "DaddyWags"(Chicago, IL USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)You've probably seen a lot of reviews by 'experts', including PC World, CNET, etc.  Here's the perspective of a 50 something family man who works on a laptop and loves his old Kindle.I decided on the Fire for a Christmas present from the family as I really did not need much, and being a gadget guy, I was intrigued by the low price point and the integration of an app-based device with a Kindle system. Being a Prime Member, I also liked the thought of having movies for free, and the availability of the Kindle Lenders Library.So, how is it?-If you have an existing Kindle, you know the out of the box pleasure of having things all set up. The Fire is the same way. Your account, your existing library, etc. is all THERE! So, from the first minute you're able to get back to the latest book you're reading.-Apps: I worried, after using an IPod Touch, that the app availability would be limited, especially since you do not have direct access to the Android store. It's true that you can't get to that store, but the number of apps currently for the Fire via Amazon's Android store is impressive. No, they didn't have my current favorite (Bookworm), but they did have a clone. All the best apps are there though, from Netflix to Angry Birds. In fact, let's face it, no one has the time to look at 10,000 apps, so having 5,000 to look through is still a ton. Plus, Amazon is adding them all the time. There's also a free app of the day, that is actually the paid versions of some pretty good apps.-Movies/Video: With both Netflix and Prime Movies available, the movie titles are great. Watching on the Fire is actually a nice experience. You'll need headphones, but the sound is crisp and the screen is lovely. My wife has recently been watching in bed and I may have to be purchasing a second Fire soon.-Web: Web access is fine. Is it slower then Chrome? Firefox? Yes, a little. But the difference is not that big a deal. You can get on all your favorite websites, set favorites, etc.-Books: Reading a book with a backlit screen is different then reading one on the Pearl-Ink non-lit screens of the standard Kindle. You can now read without an external light, and that's sweet. The bad news? Battery life is around 8 hours, so you'll have to plug in for recharging more. Access to the Kindle store (and our local Library) was the same on the Fire as the old Kindle, but enhanced by the color screen.-Magazines/Newspapers: Wow. Just...wow. I occasionally read news off my laptop, but being an old fashioned guy, I still like the morning paper. I may stop now. The 7" touch color screen makes reading the paper with a cup of coffee easy. One finger can move from page to page, story to story. I can hold it in one hand, it's light, and I don't have to worry about getting up and down with a laptop on my legs. Magazines are beautiful on the Fire.  You can zoom in if you need it (adjust text size and font just like the old Kindle), but I forgot how much I missed color until I started using the Fire as an e-reader. Even the dust jackets of my books stand out.  The Fire comes with an app called 'Pulse'. Take time to check it out. It's an aggregator, i.e., it takes news and pics from information sources you pick out and puts it in a flick book like environment that makes browsing for stories a joy.Cons-7" is smaller then the 10" IPad, but you know what? Who cares. I can carry this thing in my Parka pocket. I can pull it out on the train and read. It has no 3G, so is Wi-Fi dependent for accessing the web. It won't replace a smart phone, but let's be honest, do you web surf that much on your phone with your own data plan charging you all the time? Wi-Fi is everywhere, so it's not that big a drawback to me.  Storage: A lot of made about storage, and it's smaller then the IPad or Nook. However, it's still likely more then you'll ever use.Pros-Everything. This is the tablet for the 'rest of us'. Cheap, well made, pretty, and flexible. It's a gamechanger.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat gift,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;Meesh-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered this as a Christmas gift for my boyfriend. He LOVES it. He plays games on it, reads, surfs the web. It was the perfect gift.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starskindlefire charger,December 31, 2011By&nbsp;deedee-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindlefire for my grandaughter for Christmas the second time she tried to charge the Kindlefire the charger refused to work. I think my Grandaughter will enjoy the Kindlefire as soon as she can get a new charger.  I don't know if anyone else is having problems with their chargers but maybe there is a flaw in the chargers.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire, the Ultimate Middleman.,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;SMM "Leogirl817"(Southern New England)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased this as a Christmas gift for myself &amp; I must say It is one of the best gifts I have ever purchased. It's the ultimate 'middleman' for my laptop and HTC smartphone.  Great for traveling, no need to bring my laptop (hooray!!) &amp; my smartphone can do but so much.  I can read my books/magazines, check email &amp; facebook and play games and boy it is FAST!!!!! Better than the IPAD which is too expensive and has so many features that I do not need.  Great job, AMAZON keep up the good work and yes I will be in line to purchase the Kindle Fire II :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;Jan Jones "Jonsey girl"(Kingfisher, OK)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle fire is an awesome product!  My husband has been reading books every night sincehe has gotten it.  I would highly recommend it to everyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsawesome,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;DGoodrich-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)xmas present for my wife and she loves.the OS is quick and responsive and the functions and settings are easy to understand, you don't need to be a whiz to set up your deviceHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsForget email,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Allen F.  &amp; Virginia S.  Capel(Worton, Maryland USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like it for reading, music (you can play tunes while you read )videos and audio books.  Most apps work well, except email.  I have spent over three hours on the phone with Amazon tech reps and still it will not send email to anyone except to my computers. It receives email from my computers fine, but have had zero luck with any of my contacts. My sons wife has a Fire and has the same problems with email.  I thought I could leave my laptop at home on my travels,  guess not. I give it four stars because most of the other functions perform pretty good.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)

Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsI want to love this, but...,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Greg H-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've owned two e-ink KIndles so far and love them. I want to love the Fire. It's a great value. What's keeping me from giving it 5 stars?MAJOR and FIXABLE:1. No Google apps or Android Market.  I can't use Gmail, Maps, Reader, Currents, Google+, Music ... seriously?  Amazon, you need to let us install these without rooting and side-loading. I understand the vision you have for Fire, and I will participate in the Amazon cloud content world like you want to me. But also, I want to use best-of-breed Android apps, and Google's.  Whether you let Android Market run on Fire (preferably), or, get Google to put their apps on the Amazon app store -- either way would be fine. But you really need to do one of these, soon, please.2. Touch response. It's not awful, but it's just "meh". An update that fine tunes this would be nice.MINOR and FIXABLE:3. The power button on the bottom.  This is going to confuse a lot of people, when they rest it on their stomach or chest ... and turn it off.  Eventually you realize you can rotate it 180 degrees. But the screen unlock is hardwired for button-on-bottom. Could you change that?SUMMARY:If you can fix 1 and 2, I'd bump this to 4 stars, maybe even 5.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love mine,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Harp-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm writing this review as a protest to the negative press that the Fire has recently received.  If you want an iPad, you should probably buy an iPad.  I, however, wanted an affordable tablet device and the Fire delivers that.Pros:--I haven't experienced much lag or crashes to speak of.  I can't actually remember the last time I experienced either.--Great integration with the Amazon cloud.  I had purchased Amazon cloud storage for my mp3 collection; when I unboxed my Fire and went to "Music" I had every song I own at my fingertips.--Great integration with the Amazon Music Store.  Purchasing music on my Kindle has replaced iTunes in my life (full disclosure, I didn't love iTunes to start with)--Great integration with the Kindle Store - Having shopped using my K3, the Fire experience is much easier to peruse offerings with.--Prime streaming video works beautifully.  As a stereotypically demanding consumer I'd love more offerings for Prime Streaming, but what is offered met my needs well enough that I canceled Netflix.--Comixology app is a very intuitive way to interact with comics.  I haven't read any graphic novels or comics in years, but I sampled a few of the free offerings in this service and the panel zoom feature was amazing.  I do wish the purchases in the Comics app were tied to my Amazon account (instead of a 3rd party account).--The Silk browser has actually handled everything I've thrown at it so far, better than my iPhone.  I haven't encountered any issues at all with it, and it seems responsive to me.Cons:--I wish Amazon comics/graphic novel integrated with (or had features of) the Comixology app.  I purchased The Watchmen from the Kindle store and some of the text was difficult to read without the ability to zoom into panels.--I would like hard buttons for volume controls.--I wish the Amazon App store was more inclusive of the Android Marketplace.  There are several apps that I would like that exist on the iPhone App Store and teh Android Marketplace but not in the Amazon store.Conclusion: I received my Fire on launch day and I'm still happy with it.  I use it as a mobile web browser/email reader more than an ebook reader.  Especially when considering the price, I am happier with my Fire than I would have been with an iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsDoes exactly what it's advertised to do, very well.,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;M. Ratcheson(Chicago, IL USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I think people who are disappointed in this device, didn't pay attention to the product description.  When I purchased it, and yes, I own it, unlike some people who feel free to review it poorly without actually using it, I understood it would not be an iPad 2, which costs much, much more.  I knew it wouldn't provide me with free 3G, or even the opportunity to subscribe to a 3G plan.  I knew it's onboard storage was limited, so understood I'd need to manage what I kept downloaded to my Fire.I'm delighted.  For the price, it meets my relatively limited needs perfectly.  I've experienced none of the issues I read about in the press.  And as far as usability, I really wish the trade press would stop citing the person who released a study (his name is Neilson I think, though not *the Neilson, which does much more respectable surveys) which is based on a sample of four.  Yes, four people.I'm a sample of one, and 100% of this sample has had no difficulty using this delightful device.  I'm happy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsContent Consumption Never Looked This Good,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Rachel DuBose-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I picked up the Kindle Fire on release day, and made sure to put it through its paces before writing a review.UNBOXINGThe Fire comes in a much larger box than seems truly necessary for it. It is standard Amazon frustration-free packaging; just pull a tabbie on the end and it pops open with zero problems. Inside the box you'll find the Fire itself, an AC adapter, and a little cardboard cut-out that explains extremely basic setup.PHYSICAL IMPRESSIONSThe Fire is heavier than I expected, but fits in the hand well. It's relatively thick compared to, say, an iPhone or iPad, but I barely notice it even though I've used many other devices. The Fire does lack both physical volume buttons and a home button, but I've not yet been annoyed by their absence after almost a month of constant use.SETUPSetup takes approximately 10 minutes at the most. Find a Wifi network, enter your credentials for your Amazon account, and you're ready to go. All digital purchases will be listed, ready to be downloaded for offline enjoyment at any time, and your one-month trial of Amazon Prime will start immediately.INTERFACEThe interface is one heck of a lot easier to use than some of the others out there. Amazon has reduced the number of steps it takes to get to whatever it is you want to get back to, whether that be Fruit Ninja, the last season of Pushing Daisies, or flicking through your current read. All of the latest items are at the front of the carousel, prominently placed on the home page of the Kindle, and you can bookmark any of them underneath the carousel for easy access.The Cloud access for any media is also easily set up. There are two views for any sub-category of content (listed across the top of the device -- Books, Video, Docs, etc): Device and Cloud. Items under the Device sub-category have been downloaded to the device for offline enjoyment. Items in the Cloud sub-category are stores on Amazon's servers to be downloaded when you have a wifi connection and want to enjoy them.The Silk browser was widely touted by Amazon, but I have not had much opportunity to use it, as my usage patterns have been mostly in the direction of video and books. Other reviewers can give a much more comprehensive review, but I have found through my occasional usage that it tends to be more speedy than the iPad was, though not enough to be truly noticable.READING EXPERIENCEThe reading experience on the Fire is much better than I expected it to be. Reading on other backlit devices has been frustrating -- the devices were either too small (iPhone) or too big (iPad) for it to be comfortable. The 7" screen of the Fire fits a good middle point, at just large enough to be comparable to a hardcover book. The backlighting is a downside, but not everyone finds it difficult on the eyes. For me, if I keep reading sessions under two hours, I have zero problems.VIDEONetflix looks fantastic on the device, and Amazon Prime gives a fantastic expansion of Netflix's offerings. If you're into older TV shows or things like that, Amazon Prime tends to have more seasons than Netflix. I've found it worth the payment, but do use the month trial to see how it works for you.APPSApps range from fantastic to a little buggy. Frequently they go on sale, and one each day is offered for free that is usually pay-only. Games that require a lot of graphics usage generally run fine, but occasionally run into hiccups. Apps like Read It Later that allow you to pull content from the internet and such have not seemed to give me any problems, nor has Netflix. Facebook is built in, but I have chosen not to use it, because...well, do I really need another Facebook box?OVERVIEWAll in all, I wound up keeping the Fire as my sole tablet solution. If it fits your usage patterns -- which is to say, mostly consuming content -- then it's a fantastic little device that's going to run you less money than most competitors. If you're looking for something more advanced, pass over the Fire and look at the other options on the market.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love the Fire,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Mercedes(Colorado, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had a few Kindles now this being my latest.  I purchased the Kindle Touch and then the Fire.  I didn't buy the Fire for anything other than really being able to read in the dark without an extrnal light and it's ability to read comics.  I am impressed with how it surfs the web, as I've used that feature about 2 times.  I love the Fire for what I bought it for, the night reading is excellent because it's backlit.  It syncs really fast, much faster than the Touch.  I couldn't be happier with my Fire.  To cover all my bases, I have the Kindle Touch for daytime reading, Fire for nightime and graphic novels, and getting a Nook Tablet for all the other graphic novels I can't get on the Fire.My only complaint about the Fire, I have some trouble holding it, it's slick and if you get too close on the edges you either bring up the menu or turn the page when you don't want too.  To fix this I've ordered a new case for it so I have something else to hold onto and won't be touching things I shouldn't by accident.  And it's a little heavy, but compared to the Kindle Touch everything is heavy.  Once I have a case for it that I can hold to read, this problem will be fixed.Timbuk2 Kindle Fire PROFESSOR JACKET, Black/Gunmetal/RedHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt may not be perfect, but I love it!,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Shawn K. "Shawn"(Vernon Hills, IL)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It's a solid device and one heck of a breath of fresh air.To start off, this device is aiming for a niche market.  It's Amazon's way of competing with the iPad.No, this isn't an iPad killer, but it wasn't designed to be an iPad killer.  Let me put it this way, the iPad has been been designed for productivity and multimedia.  This device is designed just for multimedia, with most of the focus on reading.Compared to the iPad, this has a similar store structure but much more streamlined.  With Amazon Prime (you get a month trial instantly, $79.99/yr) you get so many options for "free".  That's under $7/mo, you get thousands of books, shows, and movies right on the device.  I've never been a fan of subscriptions, but if you like reading it's pretty awesome.  The free movies/shows may not compete with Netflix by a long shot, but I've got to admit I was blown away by the selection.  It's really easy to find free content for subscribers and it feels like shopping for books/shows/movies without the cost, it's all bundled into your subscription.Even more amazing, I had gotten a game for free as a promotion on my phone.  That game remained in my account and I could install it right on my Kindle Fire.  That was a nice, unexpected, treat.This is also a device I'd feel safe giving my to Mom or Grandparents.  It's just easy to use, I've toyed around with the nook tablet and it just doesn't have that same ease of use.  The Kindle Fire reminds me of a book, the way it should be, and that makes it so much more pleasant to use.  This is Android but it doesn't feel like Android, it doesn't feel like a whole new "PC" experience, it feels like the next generation of a book.  I'm not saying it's perfect, but this is something I feel I can set in front of my grandmother and she'd be able to start reading a book without asking me "what do I do?".Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle on Fire,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Hills of Brown County-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for a couple of weeks.  Thus far my experience has been very positive.  I deducted one star mainly because my fat arthritis fingers are not great at tapping or scrolling. I occasionally hit the wrong spot and have to backtrack.  So to me the screen is very touchy.  But I can live with it (just need more practice) lol.  For me the battery life is great but then I seldom watch movies or videos.  I take it with me where ever I go and have no problems logging on to wifi at McD's, Panera's, Starbucks, etc.  Reasonably fast and great for checking my email and Facebook updates, exploring the web plus reading my books.  The other reason for my one star downgrade is due to the fact that some of the programs that work on my droid will not install on the Fire.  Hopefully, amazon will change this in the future.  Otherwise I have totally enjoyed the Fire experience. Definitely been a solid four star experience.  By the way, did I mention that I am a 71 year old "geezer" who still enjoys checking out new technology.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat eReader that does some other things too,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Rookie No More "Rookie No More"(WI)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For the price and features of a color touch screen reader, what more could you ask for?  Response rate for loading books and reading is excellent.The other things too?  While not a big app selection (yet) the apps I would want for this eReader are fine.Surfing the net is similar to surfing the net on my Android smart phone (as I expected) and works well.  I've also watched a few movies on Netflix without any problems.This isn't a tablet.  It's an eReader that can do some other stuff--and it does that other stuff pretty good!Spouse said, "I thought I would like it, but I love it."As an Amazon Prime member, there are also some nice pluses.Very happy with our Fire.  Liked it so much, we bought a second one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars:/  Happy Sad,November 26, 2011By&nbsp;Readfan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have a Kindle Keyboard and became an instant fan. Had no desire to replace that since I love it so much. Decided to purchase the Fire for the additional features and it is a great item!However I had a great diappointment today that I am hoping they create a patch for;epub downloads.I actually considered taking my Fire back and getting a Nook tablet, but when I looked into it online,I quickly saw I would be making a BIG mistake!I love my Fire!!  But please make epub patch!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA wonderful addition to the kindle family,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Javier A. Plumey(Coral Springs, FL United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was very hesitant to buy the Kindle Fire. I was a happy nook Color owner and still own an Apple iPad. I didn't need a high end tablet, since I already had one. What I wanted was a high quality LCD reading device that made it easy to get to content, primarily books but not limited to them. The nook Color worked just fine but I am very much tied to the Amazon store. My wife has a kindle (2nd generation) and we've purchased hundreds of books from Amazon. Getting these books onto my nook Color involved rooting, modding, and otherwise customizing the nook Color.It was a major pain in the rear.Enter the Kindle Fire.So far, I have immensely enjoyed the Kindle Fire. I turned on the device, registered, and was prompted to download an update (no pc required). After updating, I saw that several of my recently purchased books were already sitting in the carousel. That's exactly what I was looking for. No rooting, modding, and hacking my way to my Kindle books. It's not a perfect device but it works very well for what I do with it: read books, surf the web occasionally, and play just a few games.Hardware:The device is very well built and feels solid. I feel like there could be a slightly wider bevel around the screen but it's not uncomfortable to hold. The screen is fantastic, but even at its lowest brightness it is still a little too bright for blackout bed reading. To get around that I installed an app called Screen Filter which lowers the brightness of text just a little bit more. The speakers are not that great but the headphone jack produces very good sound. I've played a few CPU-intensive games and they all seem to work great--much better than on the nook Color, which is expected given the Kindle Fire's hardware. Some reviews have complained that there are no hardware buttons on the device. I can see their point, but I don't change the volume on the device often enough to need a dedicated button. I would like to see a home button that also acts as a launcher to an app switcher. Right now, switching between reading a book, the browser, or an app takes too many taps.Software:There are a few rough edges that Amazon needs to smoothe out but, overall, the software on the Kindle Fire is very good for a first release. In fact, Amazon have already put out two updates since I bought the Kindle Fire.  The reading app is missing some key features, such as page numbers and the sharing features, but I'm sure they'll come soon enough. Page turns are smooth except when not connected to a wireless network. For some reason, and this may just be my impression, the animation stutters a bit when I'm not connected. I've already used the built-in feedback app on the Kindle Fire to report this.My biggest complaint about the Kindle Fire software, is the carousel. Amazon meant well but it's not executed very well. There's no way to filter out content or even to manually hide items from the carousel. It was meant to be a quick way to access recent content, and in a sense that's true, but it also shows all of the cloud content purchased on your account. So if you share an account with your spouse, you will see all of your spouse's purchases in the carousel. I think a software update that allows you to control what the content displays will go a long way to making it more useful.So, overall, I am very happy with my purchase. I would recommend the Kindle Fire to anyone who wants an LCD reading device that can also handle music, video, the web, and simple apps. The Kindle Fire will not take the place of my iPad which, with its larger screen and more powerful operating system, will handle the bulk of my non-PC computing needs.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsawesome,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Joseph E. Glazer "MSG G"(Afghanistan)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)i used a friends kindle while overseas an older one and the fire blows it away bought it for my son = sorry no rambling tecnical review just a guy using itHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAMAZING TABLET,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Megan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received this tablet the day after it came out as a gift. It's amazing. Reading is so easy, you can change the font size and read with the tablet horizontally or vertically, and the screen reacts as you turn it every which way. The color is extremely vibrant and the touch is very responsive. Loading the Netflix app and tv shows is effortless. Setting up wireless is just as easy. Searching for books through the amazon store directly from the fire is fast and easy, especially with one click. Downloading books just takes seconds and the cloud feature is so nice for extra music and books. I've found myself charging my fire every day, but not because the battery is quick to die, mostly because I cannot put it down. The Kindle Fire is high quality, and it shows. It's a really nice product, I'm really happy with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWife's Birthday Gift,December 1, 2011By&nbsp;gtincol-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got this yesterday for my wife's birthday gift.  Beats buying jewelry and so far she loves it!  It brings Amazon and Netflix movies, Amazon books, email (fairly easy to set up a different email service), Internet, games, music, etc. to a small computer.  It was also easy to set up on my wireless network.  She mainly wanted it to show movies and play music to our Grandsons when they visit.  I think it will work out well.  At least right now, we're both happy with the Fire!  Would recommend!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI would give it 5 stars except for one big thing,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Shane Montgomery(Casa Grande, AZ United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought 7 of these for my grandchildren and love them so far.  I've let a couple of the grandkids play with them early (before Christmas) to see how they like them and all is good, except for one big thing:  no ability to restrict purchases of movies, books, etc.  I registered them to my kindle account so I could download the same apps and kids books to each one but it didn't take them long to figure out how to push a button and buy a movie without realizing they were spending my money.  Amazon was very good about it, but it's really an easy software fix, which I hope Amazon has in the works.  It shouldn't be a big deal to require a password or pin to make purchases - problems solved.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsJust what I needed,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Angela Cundiff "Geek Chick"(Sacramento, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let me start by giving some context on why I've found this device to be so useful. I have a chronic condition that makes holding books painful, so the last few years I haven't really been able to read as much as I would like. In high school I would weekly bring home a tall stack of books. When I found the kindle app for my iphone I was super excited. It worked but I missed the larger page size. So I got a 2nd generation kindle. I loved the size but had 2 drawbacks. One, I missed having a touchscreen as sadly my phone had me spoiler. Two, as much as I loved the e-ink, I needed to be able yo read without a light. Enter the Fire. I had been seriously considering an ipad but mentally I couldn't justify the price for what I was going to use it for. And that was a key point for me. The Fire was able to do all that I needed it to do anlod more with a price that I felt was reasonable considering its features. Now I'm able to again enjoy an activity that I dearly loveplus be able to do additional things. I have a horrible memory so it's helpful to be reading but then pop over to a web page to look something up, order something, or check on pending items. Being able to stream or download videos is really nice. I haven't played any games or used any apps other than Pandora.Now I will also say that I know the Fire isn't perfect. The touchscreen can be a little off as to where I was trying to select. The autocorrect can be weirder than the iphone on some of its suggestions and I really didn't think that was possible. No external volume control is frustrating. It weighs more than you would think for the size but it's just a matter of propping it up rather than just holding it.Overall it lives up to all my expectations. I don't feel that it's trying to go feature to feature with the ipad. Amazon has been upfront as to what features the Fire has and I feel that it does those things really well. For me it was a matter of deciding what was I really going to use it for, how often, and was the price justified based on the answers to the previous two questions. For me the Fire has all the features I was looking for and had a price that was reasonable for those features.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt's Good... Very Good ... but there are a few things to note before you buy...,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Jeremiah Neff-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)All of the good stuff about this has been said. The fire lives up to its expectations.There are a few things I've noticed.- It will fit in a jacket pocket. Or a trouser pocket. Try doing that with that tablet that starts with an 'I' and rhymes with 'sad' :)- You NEED to have a credit card on file with Amazon, even if you're just getting free stuff. Even if you just use gift cards, you still need a CC on file.- YouTube works. Flash works. Google Music works.- It's very, very easy to purchase books / music / apps. Sometimes TOO easy. Tap one button and it automatically downloads and charges your credit card on file. This can be a problem if you download the wrong item, or too many items by mistake. This can probably be worked around by using a prepaid debit card for the file, and gift cards for purchases.- You can buy (or get) from the Amazon website, or right on the Fire. Purchases from the website go straight to the cloud. Purchases on the Fire are automatically downloaded.- If you get everything directly from Amazon the Fire works wonderfully. You'll never need to plug the Fire into a computer at all. You can remote manage it from any browser, and it will update your Fire even if it's 200 miles away :)- You CAN sideload music, books, and apps. There's no cable included so you need to get a MICRO USB cable to connect to a computer. It's smaller than the Mini-USB that's been around for a few years.- Sideloading eBooks: Watch the file format of the ebook. Mobi files give the best results, with text flow, resizing, and remembering your place. TXT and XLS files will open in another program on the Fire (like Office). This program will NOT remember your place on TXT files, so this can be an issue if you're reading a novel-length file.When downloading a file from the Silk browser, the Fire won't be able to read it until you move it out of the 'downloads' folder. This is probably the only time you'd need to connect the Fire to a computer. Place it in "Documents" and it will show up in the 'Docs' tab.There are programs out there that will convert file formats for you (and email them automatically to your cloud storage). Once you get the right format, your reading experience will be much, much nicer.As time goes on there will be more apps released through Amazon. Perhaps sideloading or rooting will not be necessary.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for me,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Cynthia B. Alldredge(Snohomish, WA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't have an iPad or a smart phone so the Kindle Fire is wonderful for me. I love everything about it.I will probably still read on my old Kindle most of the time but I will use this in bed since my husband hates having a lamp on when I am reading. It is nice to see the full color book covers though and the children's books are much nicer in color.I love Amazon Prime and will buy it when the free month provided with my Kindle Fire is over. Netflix works nicely too. I am having fun with the Apps and I like the web browser too.This is perfect for me and my needs, all it lacks is 3G.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat V1 Product,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;Anthony K. Kunjbehari "AK"(Queens, NY)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is a very impressive version 1 product. I was looking for a replacement for my iPad 1, as it had grown unused due to bulkiness. My use cases are watching videos, reading, light web surfing, and email. This device does all of these things very well and I am particularly impressed with the screen and the overall size. It feels solidly built and it is nice to know that I have the Amazon food chain to back it up.There are some minor quibbles and I am hoping they can be addressed via a software update. The first is that the device isn't overly loud. When I crank it to max volume, it is audible, but it just isn't that loud. I just don't get the volume scale. Secondly, the homescreen forces you to see recently viewed items. I would like the option of hiding some of these items. My options are either making them a favorite or deleting them from the device.All in all, it is a solid little media tablet and I would highly recommend it. I do own an iPhone 4S, a Macbook Air, and an Apple TV, and this will complement my other devices well. It fills a niche that none of the others do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsgreat buy,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;nelmgr-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the kindle fire and it was everything i hoped for. Its like a mini ipad with cool features. Super fast navigation and highly sensitive with the flick of your fingertip. Came in before it was suppose to and i am enjoying it. Merry christmas to me!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsnot what I really expected,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;K. Nakasato "dolphin"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Device is very very solidly built, feels like steel.Bit heavy for its size, you will feel it if you lay on back and hold it for viewing with left hand.There are thousands of apps, but some are not listed and not sure if it will run fine manually transfer from a computer.Basically only 5gb of storage.No usb cable so you have to use your own.  If you connect to a computer it becomes usb 5gb device with 6MB/s write speed.Usb power connector does not fits snug perfect like it should, it leaves 1/16" gap.Speakers are stereo for vertical.  It is mono for horizontal so silly since videos are tiny vertically.It is pretty loud and clear and compare well against even some laptops.Silk is slower than desktop, but then I use 6 core cpu.Screens are pretty smooth.Your real name display on top of screen and no option to remove it.Power switch, sound, micro usb is on bottom, it should been on top.  Good thing is that most apps allow you to flip it upside down and still work fine.No gps and bluetooth.Browser can get stuck and once it does that it will get stuck often until unit in deep turn off and restart.  Maybe I should get task killer, but I never had to for smartphone with android 2.2 and above.Over all, great value for casual user who already have amazon stuff.  I already have dell streak 5 so value to me is 3 star, but I left 4 star for overall good price and others that don't have 5" tablet already.Update:I guess there is option to change user name.... It was a good intention and nice personal touch, except it sort of back fired for me.With case on, power switch bottom is on bottom is no longer issue but it does not allow usb/audio connector while standing vertically.Other thing is, there is NO user home page as far as I can tell on short period I had it.  So I can't use fancy widget with data display.No hardware standard function key (google made a mistake moving toward removing them) but one of application require multiple back key....  This means that you have to click menu key on bottom, press back key when it appears, press menu key again, back key.... So kind of hassle if you need to press back key multiple times.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Fast needs Magazine content,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Tommy Grundy(Santa Clarita, CA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just bought a Kindle Fire for my wife's early Christmas present.  The problem is that since getting the Fire I've put away my iPad2 and started using the Fire.  This has caused some consternation on the part of the wife who keeps claiming it's hers.. Ha!The interface is very fast and easy to use once you get used to the interface, with Amazon Prime the Fire soars with great apps and content from my previous purchases on Amazon.  I intended to go back to the iPad2 but the Fire is just a more comfortable size for reading.  The backlit screen has not caused my eyes to weary as I had expected.The apps are not as polished as IOS devices but for an android tablet Amazon has done a stellar job of developing a very nice interface.  I loose a few features vs the iPad when I do a presentations, in that my iPad2 does for better than the Fire, but my Laptop does even better still.Great device and when combined with Amazon Prime it's an awesome experience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for multimedia.,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;C. Walker(Lake Powell Ut)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I wanted a tablet that has access to videos, music, and apps. The kindle fire has all of that and more. If you want something for entertainment then the $200.00 Fire is the way to go. A lot of fun!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExactly what I expected, quite nice!!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Mark F. Kitson-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I did not expect a super tablet, I did not expect a total replacement for all computers in my house. What I expected was a solid convenient, easy to use, fun, good e-reader, web browser, music player, video device, and that is what I got. It isn't perfect, but it certainly is worth what I paid for it. It's wifi functionality is BETTER than a friend's IPAD (I can pick up signals that he cannot). I find the display very easy on the eyes, photos look very good, the video that I've watched (limited so far), is very acceptable). I am looking forward to more/better apps and improvements in updates that I'm sure Amazon will be providing. That will make a very good device all the better!Thanks Amazon, you didn't let me down!UPDATE:I've read a number of the negative reviews and just can't understand many of them. I've been using my Fire for a few weeks now and the more I use it the better I like it. The number of available apps is remarkable, if there are apps they don't have (like Google maps) that you want it is very easy to "side load" them from your PC, it just takes a few minutes of searching on the internet for the app and some simple instructions.The keyboard took some getting used to, now it's very easy to use and VERY accurate. As is the touch screen in general. When I first got it I had some issues, I don't know if it learned, or I did, I can't complain at all now...I LOVE the reader, it's isn't the Kindle ink, but it's very easy to read, and as adjustable as I need it to be. There is also another app available of you want to dim the screen more during night reading (Google is your friend).One very minor complaint. I agree the power button could be in a better place. A few times it's asked me if I want to shut down, I say no, and carry on...I do not find holding it to be a problem at all. Security is not an issue either, it DOES have a lock and password available.With the available apps, and the ease of use, I carry it with me at work and use it extensively. Very very handy!I make my living working with computer systems and technology. I find this to be a fine product at an extraordinary price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starseverything I wanted...and then some.,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Ben-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very happy with this product. I waited till all the reviews from the major tech blogs came out before making a decision. even though there was some bashing, none of the blogs can deny that this is a good price for the features you get. perfect size for me. I have spent some time with ipads and find them a little bigger than what I personally like. Money well spent!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)

Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove it,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Anne Mccullian(PA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)as soon as I turned it on I was in love . I wish it had 3G but that's the only downside the options for fonts and margins are great for the books the magazines are great with the color . And the music sounds so good I  am a kindle fanHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsImpressed, does everything I expected for a great price!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Reviews on Amazon(US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very happy with my purchase -I was in the market for a e-reader with some extra bells and whistles and this fit the bill perfectly.I owned a Kindle, my husband owns an ipad - I did not want nor need an iPad; and understood when purchasing this that it was not a cheaper version of the ipad but an e-reader with additional capabilities, I also understood that it did not have 3G; fine as I have wireless at home and can always find a hot spot when I need one. I owned the original Kindle, loved it, as I love to read but really liked the idea of owning an e-reader that would also allow me to surf the net; watch movies and use apps . I write all this as I have seen a lot of reviews with people complaining and not that the Kindle does not do what it is supposed to do (faulty devices aside) but that it is not the next iPad which it never set out to be...and of course a $500 device is not going to be comparable with a $200 device!I found these very easy to set up and no faults - I actually purchased three as I want my kids to develop a love of reading so I offloaded their DS etc on ebay and bought this. Now I will say that after setting up all three to my Amazon account, I did not find this route to work well for me - fine for my own device but this also gave my kids access to all my books and movies ( if I want access to movies such as the Hangover, I do not want my kids accessing those) so we set up the kids devices under a spare Amazon account we have and can add all the kids books  / movies to that one account, to be accessible on both their devices!Set up was quick - within minutes, and we quickly set about loading a few books, a movie and a few apps. It was an easy process!! The graphics are simply excellent, movies look like, well, movies, like a mini DVD player. Magazines showed up crisp and clear with bright color and are quickly responsive to the touch screen!  Web browsing is fast, pages load quickly and as soon as we switched it on, it picked up our wireless, so adding the passcode was all we needed to do! The kids enjoyed playing their music on this device and from the other room I could hear (rather annoyingly) Katy Perry loud and clear!!I personally really like the fact that this is backlit - the Kindle was great with the book like pages, but quite frankly, as a night reader, I was never a big fan of the little pop up light from the lighted cover, and though the backlight means that this will not be easily used in bright sunlight this is not an issue for me as I was never comofortable with the idea of sitting outdoors with my Kindle device anyway - that is what disposable magazines are for!For me, this met all my expectations - when I travel I want an e-reader that will hold all my books, any movies or music I want while giving me web browsing capabilies so it fill the bill for a great price - I am very impressed, now all I need is a decent cover!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Dennis Lindfors(New Orleans, LA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Received my Kindle Fire yesterday. I've downloaded a few books, connected to Netflix and streamed content from Amazon. All worked very well. I like that the tablet fits in my hand. Screen size is perfect. Silk is very fast and smooth while web browsing. I also, like the way the browser anticipated my search items, listing them above the keyboard. I had been deciding on the Kindle Fire vs the iPad. While the iPad is a good device, it doesn't offer much to someone who already has a smartphone with built in front and rear facing cameras, facetime and 3g service. Why duplicate those items in a tablet at a cost of $300 more.I would like to see the android and amazon kindle fire stores merge for more variety in applications.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMay not be an "iPad killer", but it can certainly hold its own!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Brandon Hann(Placentia, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've owned the Kindle Fire for about 15 hours now and I've gotten a pretty good grasp on how everything works so far. I'll start first by saying we should all stop using the phrase "iPad killer" to describe (or potentially describe) any new tablet device that comes on the market. I say this because just like with the iPhone, Apple will always retain a specific share of the market. They have a different eco-system that connects all their devices, so it's hard to compare new devices and software.With that said, it should be noted that if you're using the phrase "iPad killer" to strictly define actual specs of the hardware, then the Amazon Kindle Fire is certainly not an iPad killer. However, that's ok! In my opinion, it never was intended to be a direct alternative to the iPad. After what I've seen so far, the Kindle Fire is simply an e-reader with some extra bells and whistles--and for only $199, that works perfectly.So, let's get to it.DESIGNThe Kindle fire is tiny. On Monday, I received theKindle Fire MicroShell Folio Cover by Marware, Blackthat I purchased and it was the first time I got to feel what I was going to be holding the next day. I find that its smaller form factor (when compared to the iPad) is much more convenient. As a male, I don't have the luxury of carrying around a purse or a handbag to be able to throw a hefty tablet into, so being able to carry the Fire around like a tiny book was key. The weight of the Fire is 14.6oz which feels a bit heavier than an average bottle of water. The combination of size and weight makes the Fire much more manageable with one hand than the iPad is.The overall look of the Fire creates a very streamlined device that only has one button--no volume rockers, no switches and no home button. The Fire has only a power button located on the bottom of the device. This might be an annoyance to those who are used to adjusting volume and locking screen rotation on an iPad. Personally, I only miss having a physical home button. While the software does provide a home button on every screen, it disappears after a while and any unknowing users who may have happened upon your device would be hardpressed to figure out how to get back to the desktop. A simple tap anywhere near the center will bring up the home button and/or any available options for the item you have opened, but still...SPEEDI'm new to Android and although I had an Android phone for a short while, I'm not too familiar with how fast this OS should run. However, the Kindle Fire does boast a OMPA 4430 dual-core ARM A9 processor that clocks in at 1GHz. This, coupled with the Android-based operating system, creates a very fast user experience when navigating through your device's content and opening apps and books. You'll notice a slowdown when loading graphics intensive items such as a game or a full-color magazine, but nothing to complain about too much.When reading books, the Fire is very responsive and has hardly any lag when turning pages, performing text searches and recalling bookmarked locations. As a trial, I signed up for the Kindle Fire-only Maxim magazine subscription to see how well a full-color digital magazine appeared and I was pleasantly surprised. But, because the magazine is a direct copy, page for page of digitally scanned images, it runs a bit on the slow side. However, we're not talking about full seconds here...it's just noticeably slower than reading through a standard Kindle e-book.APPSOne very important note to consider before buying the Fire is that it only has access to apps within the Amazon-Android app store! This is different than the regular Android app store. The differences have yet to be fully explored yet, but I noticed it when trying to find the Chase Bank mobile app. I know they make an Android version, but so far, it is nowhere to be found on the Kindle Fire. I can't say for sure why some apps wouldn't be available, but I thought I'd point out that fact anyway just so you understand that you may not have access to all of the Android apps you've come to love.The few apps I have installed so far (Angry Birds Rio, eBay Mobile, Netflix and Pandora) all perform very well. They all load very fast and don't have any lag when running. One complaint I have about the apps is that there are a few default apps like Comics, ESPN and IMDB that come on the Fire (but aren't necessarily installed) in which I can't get rid of. Any app that you personally download and install can be removed by tapping and holding the icon and then tapping on 'Remove from device', but these other default apps are stuck with you.INTERNETThe Amazon Silk browser seriously beats Safari on iPad. Tabbed browsing and the ability to return exactly where you left off (not always the case on iPad) makes this browsing experience compelling to say the least. It was also refreshing to finally open a Flash webpage on a mobile device without being devoid of content! I haven't played around too much with the Internet yet, but Amazon claims that over time, the browser will have cached enough data into the Amazon Cloud that it will be able to load pages faster based on previous web history and trends.In other words, if you're going to more shopping sites other than blog sites, those pages will load much faster. Also, the ability to bookmark a webpage and have it stored exactly like it appears online is a huge bonus for people who might want to continue reading a page after they've exited a wi-fi area.COMPLAINTSI've already discovered a few minor things that have irked me a bit. I'm sure in time, some of these will get fixed with software updates, but for now, here's what I don't like about the Kindle Fire.No physical home button - Apple got this one right for sure. I love a streamlined look, but it's always nice to have an actual button that will always bring you back to the start.No military time - This is merely a preference, but you're not able to show the current time in military format, which is commonly used around the world.Can't change home screen image - When the screen is locked, the background image randomly changes each time, but you're not able to change it.No app notifications - iOS devices put little notifications on app icons that have updates such as a little number counting how many emails are in your inbox. The Fire doesn't have these.No app folders - All you have is a favorites list that allows to you place your most used apps on the home screen, but you can organize them any other way.CONCLUSIONI could probably go on all day with the ups and downs of this device, but I'll end it here and summarize with this: the Kindle Fire is a wonderful device for anyone looking to purchase an e-reader that has a lot of extra features. For me, I sold my iPad because I wasn't using it as much as I thought I would. In my case, it became a super expensive e-reader so the Kindle Fire was the perfect replacement for me. At only $199.99, you can't go wrong. Is it an iPad killer? Certainly not, but it is a worthy competitor and it will likely steal all of the consumers that are on the fence about getting an iPad or not.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Tablet for the Price,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;J. Mauney "Bellanoite"(Orlando,FL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have both a Nookcolor and now the Kindle Fire. I read ALOT and some books are available for Nook and not Kindle and vice versa! Both are equal in that arena. Although in the ebook world I like the Nook better for the storage capabilities!But I'm a Prime member and the pulling force behind getting one was the Kindle Borrow library! Plus the fact that I can get all the TV shows &amp; movies streamed for free that I get with my prime membership. So whether I'm at work on a lunch break, waiting somewhere or whatever ... I can watch TV shows or movies at my leisure!I'm not a big fan of NetFlix nor HuluPlus. So right there Nook tablet lost the battle on top of being $50 more.The web search is truly amazing and it's got a lot of power for this little tablet. Websearch was faster on this then on my iPhone.Okay the downside is this ... even though I like that Amazon stores everything on the cloud bought from them ... I do wish they would have included a storage capability whether microsdhc or some sort of memory. I have many ebooks collected over the years that I would have liked to side load onto additional memory.As for iPad ... still too pricey for my budget but this works perfectly fine that I don't feel like I'm missing out.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA Must have for anyone looking for a good tablet without breaking the bank,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Estelle C.-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my tablet yesterday, 11/15/2011 and have spent some time playing around with it in order to get a decent feel for it. Overall I am very happy with this purchase. The screen is very crisp and plays movies very well. I spent some time as well playing with the web browser and it runs pretty well on Wi-Fi so no issues there. I would recommend this device for anyone who wants a tablet this year but do not want to pay over $200 for one.The only reason I did not give this device 5 out of 5 stars is because as I'm sure others might have mentioned the main page keeps track of everything that you do. That means more than just showing your extensive book collection. It also shows any apps that you use, any movies that you play and any web page that you look at. So let's say you were going to look up a Christmas present for someone and then let that same person hold onto your Kindle Fire, they will see right there on the device the exact page you were just looking at. It's not a big deal if you're the only one using your Kindle Fire but I'm sure no one wants everyone seeing everything they do. This and only this is the reason I've given the device 4 out of 5 stars.The volume on the device is good. I haven't tried it without headphones but I will later on today just to see how the sound quality is.Switching through all of your books is very quick so you have to be careful to slow down at some point if you want a chance to pick the exact book you're looking for but it's not a deal breaker or anything.There are a few apps available that you can shop through and pick for your Fire. Also, downloading movies is simple enough. All in all it is a well put together item.I would recommend this device to anyone and everyone I couldHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 5 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsgreat device for the intended purpose,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;kendall-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am typing this review on my kindle fire.  It is a great device design with the purpose of reading, not creating....  if you keep that in mind you will love this device.  I use it for books, email and web only.  For that purpose it is a great device.  If.you are expecting an ipad you will be sad as it wasn't designed to be an ipad.In short it is the best bang for the buck device out there for anyone on the go.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBeyond My Expectations,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;HAPPY CUSTOMER-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Kindle on 11/18, I was anxious because I saw many 1 stars reviews... But now I decide to write review to clear something up. This product deserves 5 stars or at least 4 stars.For $199, you get much more than you spent. But be realistic, it's not an IPAD.1. People complaining about the one click shopping thing. But for me, it's not a problem and it's very convenient. I believe you can turn it off if you don't like it. And you can always choose to put items into shopping cart before you checkout.2. Power button- not an issue either, I didn't accidentally touch it and don't think I will.3. Weight- Little heavier than I thought. But acceptable. For longer battery life, it's worthwhile.4. Reading- I don't spend a lot time reading. So it's perfect for me. Colorful and crisp screen.5. Videos Movies TV Episodes- Plenty of them are free and charged $2.99 for recent ones.6. Sound- Nice, better than IPAD.7. Very Portable and tough. I don't think it necessary to buy covers etc.8. Web surfing is fast and touchscreen is very responsive.IPAD for work and video chatting, KINDLE FIRE FOR THE REST.Nothing to complain at this price. But if amazon can add home button on next gen of fire that will be fantastic for ipad/iphone users like me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBetter than the Nook,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Nessa-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So, I really wanted an iPad, but there is no way I could afford one. The only reason I wanted one in the first place was so I could purchase my textbooks for college in e format and not have to lug them around with me to every class, or to store them forever on a shelf. Textbooks have little to no resale value to its beneficial to keep them from taking up space in my small apartment. After doing a ridiculous amount of research, I learned that the Fire is the only e-reader that allows you to read textbooks. The Nook does not. Now, the Nook tablet might but probably only in PDF format, and then the reading features would not all be available. With the Kindle Fire, most textbooks are available in Kindle form allowing you to highlight (awesome for college students) as as well as look up the words you don't understand. But like I said, these features are not available if the book is in PDF format. Also, there is no camera...but I don't plan on taking pictures with my kindle so for me its a money saving loss. The kindle uses Android technology and has little to no lag at all. The only time I have ever noticed it slow down is when I'm listening to music and trying to run more than a handful of apps at the same time. Netfix streams like a dream. No, the quality is not HD, but then again I have a laptop or TV if I want blu-ray quality. Another money saving loss.I have my 10 favorite CDs, the entire 90 issue Walking Dead collection, 3 textbooks, 4 novels, and about 10 apps. I still have more than 4.5 GB left of space on the device itself. I don't see me running out of space anytime soon. Next term will be much more convenient and fun. I recommend the Kindle Fire for College students especially. If you are one of those students who hates using used books, this is the best way to go to save money, shipping time, and space on the shelf. With all the extra features included, you have things to entertain yourself between classes, or killing time at a bus stop.I give it 5 stars for making my life so much easier when it comes to homework and studying.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy first week with the kindle fire,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;Bernard Baker-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok a little background first. When I first heard about the kindle fire I was pretty excited about it's possibilities, but I held off on preordering because I'm kind of a techie guy and I wanted to get my hands on the device and see if it fits right for me. I was also on the fence for a whole year as far as needing a tablet in my life at all. I was impressed with the ipad, acer iconia, and, toshiba thrive but I wasn't willing to pay $300 to $500 for something I was only going to use to check my email, browse the web, and some light gaming. My fear was that it would be collecting dust eventually.So, after my pros and cons, I'm going to put up something that I didn't see that often in a review or description: a normal day of usage with this device. I'm hoping it will help someone in their decision.PROS:Size and weight - I questioned the size and form factor at first because I was focused on getting an 8 to 10 inch tablet. But once I had it in my hands it felt surprisingly comfortable to hold and even more important, it fit into my pocket without anyone noticing it there. I loved that.Content organization - It's extremely easy to get to where I want to go. Navigation of the device made it easy to show off to my friends interested in knowing more about it and when I needed to do something, I didn't have to take a lot of time remembering where it was. It was always right in front of me.Email - I liked the convinience of checking all my emails at once in my email client. That's one of my main uses for opening my laptop at home nowadays. Now, I barely opened it this week. More on that later.Amazon Prime - Streaming videos and watching videos was a BIG deciding factor for me. Before I purchased the fire I bought season 1 of Avatar the Last Air Bender on amazon and stored it in the cloud. The moment I registered my device (bought it in best buy), it was available to me. I loved storing my songs in the cloud and the ease of access to that content really made me fall in love with this device. And also, 6.5 gigs of space was plenty for me. I downloaded an album, 4 episodes of avatar, and a 2 hour movie, and still had roughly 4 gigs left. Management is the key because they won't stay on there.Android Workarounds - This is a huge pro for me too. Although amazon has locked down the content, because it's android, there's always a workaround. The ability to sideload apps either by email or usb has made me fall in love with this device AGAIN. I have games Cordy and even the great Shadowgun running on my fire, and I didn't even root it yet. This really opens up the possibilities for what I will do with my fire in the future.CONS:Weight - At times it does feel a little heavy, esspecially when reading. I'd hold it in one hand and have to switch sometimes. And that weight can get to you at times when it's in your pocket.Touch sensitivity - When going through the recent items, I sometimes have to go to it multiple times in order to select it. And when I get there the touch doesn't always register the first time. That gets annoying.Glare - When it's in direct sunlight, it's pretty tough to see the screen.Power button - Many people has said this in other reviews and I agree, the placement of the power button makes it cut off sometimes accidentally. You should be mindful of that.App selection - There are some apps I wish amazon had in their app store that are in google's app store. If I can side load it, it should be available. Also, updates to apps don't come at the same frequency as google. That's bothereome.BOTH PRO AND CON:Ease of shopping - I'm sure that was the main goal with this device and they've done a great job with that. I've spent so much money at amazon since I've got this device, from apps to music to videos. So, I have to be VERY careful when it comes to that. It's an impulse shopper's worst nightmare. Lol!!!So, as you can see, after a week of usage, the pros outweigh the cons, thus why I gave it 5 stars. It you're looking for content consumption, this is the device for you. I really wanted to know if I could live my life without opening my personal laptop. And since I've uploaded a lot of my music and content to the cloud, I barely use it now. And for my lifestyle, THAT is what I wanted and needed in a tablet. Missing accomplished. :)So here is my typical day of usage with the kindle fire. I hope this gives a good picture of seeing if it fits in your life:I wake up and after my workout, I check the weather channel app on my fire to see what to wear. As I'm ironing I either listen to music or watch a video on it. Once I'm done, and I'm eating breakfast, I'm reading the news in the pulse reader app, checking my email, and then downloading whatever stuff I need from the cloud for that day. Most likely an episode of avatar to watch while I'm sitting in traffic.I get in my car and listen to some music tracks I stored on my device. I get to work, and since I have computers there, I don't use it much outside of playing a game when I have to go to the bathroom for a while, which my coworkers won't know, since it fits into my pocket so conviently. Then, on my lunch break, while I'm eating, I'm reading a book or reading a comic book I downloaded for the comixology app.After finishing out the work day, sure enough I run into traffic. So, as I sit, I watch an episode of avatar on my fire. I get home I plop on my couch, turn on netflix on my ps3, and watch something. As I'm doing that, on my fire I'm checking my email, checking my facebook, and looking up more info on my fire or other things (yeah I do all that while netflix is on...lol). Then I take a quick look at the weather for tommorow as I head to bed. Before I go to sleep, I get in a quick round of shadowgun. Then, I go to sleep. The end. :)Lastly..this entire review was written on my kindle fire...;) Yeah, the typing is cool too...lol!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWOW,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;Sparky-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I didn't feel the need for an I-pad. Almost to big for my use. Im glad I didn't purchase it. I love the Pad (Kindle Fire)Everyone @ thanksgiving dinner loved it. It got passed around more than the turkey! Perfect for the everyday user. This devicedoes what you need it to do and gets it done well. Great job Amazon! LOVE IT!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWOW!  Great tablet!!  Very fast browsing, overall excellent!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Kris Marrs "Marrsfiremedic111"(Allen Park, MI)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my first Kindle, and first Tablet.  First off for those people comparing it to iPad, or even other Android tablets....lets get serious.  It is NOT and never was intended to be a "iPad killer". It is an affordable tablet that does more than your average kindle.  I have to say that I LOVE IT!!  Some people have complained that it is not fast for them going on line or streaming movies and shows.  Well for me it is LIGHTNING fast.  I was very impressed.  Movies stream with in 5 seconds of me selecting them.  No buffering, no lag.  The web is wicked fast as well.  I must have a good wifi connection where I am.  Vivid colors on the screen, a very responsive touch screen with pinch to zoom, and the ability to go to flash sites and view flash content.  Can't do that on your $500 iPad.  This is a GREAT kindle.  There are pros and cons and personal opinions to everything, but I must say this is AWESOME!  Some cons are that it is a bit heavier than I expected, and no ability to convert to the "e-ink" when reading a book, but that is ok.  A small trade off for some of the other nice features and smooth functionality and browsing.  I highly recommend it!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSweet Little Tablet!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Nina "nal001"(Colorado)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre-ordered the Fire but wasn't sure I really wanted it.  I considered cancelling the order and getting a more expensive tablet.  But, I'm frugal by nature and just couldn't justify spending hundreds more when the Fire has all the functionality I need in a tablet.  I'm SO glad I didn't cancel the Fire.  It's WAY better than I expected.For one thing it's fast.  Really fast!  From the specs, I didn't expect that.  I've downloaded a bunch of apps, and the fire runs them well.  Plants vs. Zombies (special Fire edition) looks great &amp; plays well on the Fire.Of course, the Fire streams video from Amazon.  And, with a free app, it'll stream video from Netflix too.  I don't envision spending a lot of time watching movies on the Fire's 7" screen.  But, it's nice to have the option.Magazines look very good on the Fire.  The ones I've purchased thus far (Smithsonian &amp; Bon Appetit) look just like the print version - ads and all.  The magazine page is displayed in full, and you can easily zoom in on articles.I have a Kindle 3, so the Fire won't be my primary reading device.  But, the Fire's screen is better than I expected for reading books. The text is very crisp &amp; the screen is easy on the eyes.  And, because the Fire is backlit, you don't need a light for reading in the dark.  Of course, that backlighting also means that the Fire is not a good choice for reading in bright sunlight.As an Audible member, I love the Audible app on the Fire.  I can use it to grab any audio book in my Audible library.I haven't spent much time using the Fire's web browser.  It's fast and displays the web sites I've visited just fine.  But, I find clicking on links a little frustrating with the Fire's 7" screen.  I wish that it was possible to make sections of the screen larger by dragging it.  The Fire's web browser will do just fine when I need to get online away from home, which is all I need it for.There are a couple of things about the Fire I don't love.  I'd like to have some control of the carousel which displays an image of the apps used and all the books in my Amazon digital library.  And, I wish there was an external volume button.Even though the Fire has gorilla glass, I bought an inexpensive cover splash SIGNATURE Folio Leather Case Cover Fits Amazon Kindle FIRE Tablet with Stand (Black).  The cover serves two purposes - it'll hold the Fire upright for watching videos &amp; it will protect the Fire when I toss it in my purse.  I also purchased splash GLIDER Stylus for iPad 1, iPad 2, iPhone 4 4S, Samsung Galaxy Tab, Samsung Galaxy S II 2, Motorola Xoom, HTC Thunderbolt, EVO 3D, Atrix, Inspire, Droid 2, Fits the Amazon Kindle Fire, All Touchscreen devices (BLACK).  I only bought the Stylus for use with the Fire's virtual keyboard.  But, I find myself using constantly - even when playing games.I think the Fire is terrific!  It certainly exceeds my expectations for a $199 tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsPromising, but not very responsive to touch input, and interface is sluggish,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;metamatt(San Francisco, CA USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My first impressions after playing with the Kindle Fire for an hour or so:- it's basically a color, video-happy, app-happy Kindle.- fine for reading Kindle books, but if that's what you want to do, the e-ink Kindles are cheaper, lighter, less distracting, and have much better battery life.- video playback from Amazon's store or Netflix works great- app selection is small, but I'll bet a lot of games show up soon/over time- overall touch interaction is ok but clunky, doesn't quite feel right compared to iOS, scrolling is choppy, some touches aren't recognized, some light touches send it scrolling for miles- web browser feels decidedly not as fast as this year's Apple devices (iPad 2, iPhone 4S). So much for Silk?Overall, if you compare it head to head against an iPad 2, of course the iPad comes out ahead, but it also costs 2.5x more, and is bigger and heavier. But iOS still sets the standard for natural touch interaction, and iOS also has a much wider app selection. Plus there's more hardware packed into an iPad: camera and GPS, and options for adding external keyboards, so some people even find they can use it as a laptop replacement... anyway, I don't see the Kindle Fire having comparable versatility.If you want to focus on reading, video and games, and you like the 7" size (which is just right in many ways), the Kindle Fire is pretty compelling, especially given the price.I sure hope Amazon will rapidly improve the touch interaction via software updates, though.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWell done Amazon,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Chuck-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had no expectations when I bought my Kindle Fire.  I had read all the one star and two star readings on this site and felt sorry for people that expected an Ipad for a Fire sale price (pun intended).  I have a Kindle 3, Ipod Touch, an Android smartphone, a netbook, and a laptop or two.  I have looked with envy at the Ipads but couldn't justify spending the $500+ for one.  I went down and played with a Fire at Staples and thought I would give it a try.  Two days later I am still playing with it and have hopefully put Amazon in the black on mine with a few purchases in the Kindle store.  I haven't spent countless hours on the phone with Amazon support and have found the unit to be entertaining and useful.  I was able to transfer some of my MP3s to it, watching streaming movies from Netflix, played all the latest games, checked my email, read a couple of chapters from my latest book, and browsed the web.  It works, it has a beautiful screen, I can hear it, and it was $200.  I trust Amazon will work hard to iron out the bugs with updates.  Well done Amazon.  It's a shame some people can't recognize it for what it is and just enjoy it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

15 of 19 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThe Perspective of a Long Time iPad User,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;M. Mccullough(Austin, TX)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First a few things about me that are relevant to this review.I've owned the iPad since it first came out but I'm not an Apple Fanboy, I also own an Android HTC myTouch 4g which I love. I'm an Amazon Prime subscriber and I uploaded my music to the Amazon cloud several months ago and use it daily to listen to my music(usually via web browser on my work PC and during runs on my phone). I watch Amazon Prime streaming videos occasionally on my Roku and I'm always reading some Kindle book using the Kindle app on either the iPad or my phone. I'm also cheap, and I consider my iPad to be a luxury item that is a nice to have rather than a need to have.So after reading my bio, you probably think I'm the perfect person for this device because I use a lot of Amazon services. I felt this way too so it was a no brainer purchase for me since my wife and I do battle for iPad usage from time to time.Web Browsing(Fire=C iPad=B) - My biggest complaint about the iPad 2 is the web browsing experience. I often find myself going upstairs to use my PC rather than deal with slow load times of the iPad. I was very excited about Silk but have been disappointed thus far. For some websites like wikipedia it seems to be extremely fast, but for more obscure websites it crawls. That being said, there is no noticeable difference between iPad and the Fire in terms of speed, but I rate the iPad higher because of its screen size. The extra couple of inches makes a big positive difference for your overall web browsing experience.Kindle(Fire=A iPad=C) - While I felt the screen size was too small for web browsing, I find the smaller size better for reading since it's a little easier on the eyes. Holding the tablet itself is better for reading as well. While the Kindle app is crippled on the iPad since you can't buy books inside the app, you can still get them onto the iPad pretty easily so I don't consider that a major advantage of the Fire.Amazon Cloud Music(Fire=A iPad=D) - You can listen to Amazon Cloud Music on the iPad via Safari Mobile browser but that is not ideal. With the Fire the integration is what you'd expect. That being said, listening to music on the iPad or Fire is not something I do or plan to do very often, if at all. I use my phone for that.Videos(Fire=B iPad=B-) - I'm not comparing the Amazon service like I did with music because you can't get Amazon Prime videos to stream on the iPad. However, you can stream Netflix and Hulu on either device. With the iPad you have access to iTunes, though I think you have to download videos to the iPad rather than stream, which is why I give the Fire the slight edge here. Note that my lack of knowledge on this is because it's another thing I rarely do on a tablet.Apps(Fire=C iPad=B) - I'm a little disappointed by the Fire making you use their appstore, because compared to Google's Android Marketplace it is lacking in a lot of useful apps. For example, I can't find a decent Google Reader client on the Amazon App Store yet, and this is one of the main things I use the iPad for. I realize that there is a way to hack the device and side load apps, but this isn't something most people can do.Hardware(Fire=C iPad=B+) - For the most part I'm fine with the Fire but like many others I'm frustrated with the lack of a hardware volume control. It makes my desire to listen to music and watch videos dwindle to nothing. I'm sure Amazon will not make this mistake again. Otherwise I like the device, it looks good and I especially like the rubberized backing. I also like that the Fire uses a non-proprietary charging device by charging with microUSB. One less charger to pack while traveling. The iPad's charger is clunky and the connector is extremely awkward, probably its worst feature.OS(Fire=C iPad=B) - Both OS's are very simple and easy to navigate and use. Unfortunately I have to give the iPad the upper hand here because of the bugginess of the Fire. It has a lag issue where often you can't tell if you physically missed the button press or if the Fire just didn't get the button press because of lag. You'll often find yourself pressing a link or button 3 or 4 times before it actually goes where you want it to go. Another problem I have with Fire is the lack of Swype. If you ask me, the iPad is not an input device. The keyboard makes me feel like I'm on a 1920's typewriter. I consider Swype to be one of the huge advantages that Android has over IOS and Amazon failed to support it for the Fire. I hope they will consider getting this in the appstore. Outside of these issues though, I find the OS to be simple and easy to use, even simpler than iOS and that's a good thing.Battery(Fire=A iPad=A) - With either device I've never worried about the battery life. I usually charge both devices overnight every other day or so. The fact that it's never something I think about is why I give both an 'A' even though the iPad has a longer advertised battery life.Overall(Fire=B iPad=A-) - All things considered I like the Fire a lot but it still has some growing up to do. The lack of a volume button is mind boggling and Silk has been a letdown. My other complaints regarding bugginess will probably be fixed in future software updates and the appstore will undoubtedly become more robust in the near future. If you are mostly a Kindle reader and price is a big consideration for you, I don't hesitate to recommend the Fire. That being said, if money is no object and you have $499, go with the iPad.***UPDATE(12/23/2011)***Since this review Amazon has released two firmware updates just as I suspected they would. I have to say, many things have been improved thanks to these updates. The responsiveness has been drastically improved and Silk seems to be much better as well, at this point I would say it is faster than iPad 2. For people receiving this as a Christmas gift I'm sure they will not face the disappointments that we early adopters have.Another thing that I did was 'sideload' some essential apps(google reader). This was a very simple process, you do not have to root the device nor do you even need to connect the Kindle to your home computer. Just google for the .apk file and away you go. There are a few repositories of apks that make this process very very simple.As of now, the only glaring dislike is the lack of a volume button which unfortunately cannot be remedied.My overall score for these device changes as follows. Fire A- and iPad 2 A-. Considering the price these are equal devices. If the Fire were to cost $499 I would expect it to be a much more capable device than the iPad 2 is because there is that much value in the current $199 price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat concept, but read this if you're buying for your children,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;L. Albert-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have three children under 11 years old, and I bought 3 Fires for Christmas presents.  Unfortunately, I will be returning.  All Kindles under the same account have access to all books, etc....  that means that all of my books will be on my children's Kindles, and all of my children's books will be on my Kindle.  I can bypass this by creating another account and registering there Kindles on the separate account.  This would be a quick fix if I did not have Amazon Prime.  However, part of the reason I bought the Fires is for the kids to be able to watch movies (through Prime).  So, under the new account, I would have to buy a second Prime membership EVERY YEAR.  I've always loved Amazon; I easily spend more money at Amazon than any other store, and I have never had a complaint about policy, etc...., but this is ridiculous.  I've called customer service twice, and while they tried to be helpful, there is nothing they can do according to their policy.  Too bad...back to the drawing board for me.UPDATE:  thanks to Jeff, who responded to my review, my problem has been solved.  No one at Amazon told me I could link accounts with Prime, but I suppose the product is so new, it may take some time to get everyone up to speed. I've revised my rating to 5 stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsI really want to like it .... but,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Daisy-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got my Kindle Fire today.  Pre-ordered it on the first day, so was really excited when the package arrived this morning.  Zip...unbox...wow, beautiful.  Sleek, glossy black, nice feel in the hand.  The slightly tacky rubbery back is a nice touch; no chance of accidentally dropping it.  Screen is a bit small, but fits really nice into my backpack and jacket pocket... for the sheer portability, I can live with a slightly small screen.Powered it up, display came on, was bright, crisp.  Can't wait to watch my first Prime Video on Demand movie.  Then the disappointment.  I tried to connect it to my home WiFi network.  It recognized my home network rightaway, enter password, connect, no problem.  It wants to download latest software, OK Yes, no problem.  5 min later, Crash, Reboot.  Tried it again.  Don't know why, but it didn't remember my settings, so I had to enter network name and password again manually.  Slightly annoying, but hey I already waited a month for this, I can be patient.  Connected fine 2nd time around, go up to dashboard, select video, Amazon library shows up fine, select a movie...loading... loading .... loading... gosh that's a long time to load.  I have Netflix already, it doesn't take nearly this long to load a movie.  I'm also an Amazon prime customer, and ditto for the occasional Amazon movie I watch on my PC, usually loads within a few seconds even on wireless.  OK, so 5 min later the movie finally starts... then 5 min later, crash again, movie stops and WiFi disconnects.To make a long story short, I spent total of 3 hours today trying to get this thing to work.  Tried to connect to the network at work, tried the network at Starbucks, tried the network at my cousin's place.  Zero luck anywhere.  My iPhone connects fine everywhere, my PC of course connects fine everywhere, my friend's iPad connects fine in all the same places (Netflix runs great), and even my old Kindle 3 connects fine everywhere.  .... zero luck with my Kindle Fire.I'm going to give it one more try tomorrow, then it's going back in the box and return to Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire--Exceeded My Expectations,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Novap66-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just received my Kindle Fire and was online is less than five minutes. The device registered my account automatically and had me surfing the internet, books, etc. in no time. The browser if fast and easy to navigate. After reading some negative reviews, I wondered if I may have made a mistake buying the Fire. After having it my hands for five minutes, I was pleased that I bought it. I plan on getting a second one for my kids. It feels durable and well made. Time will tell if this was a good purchase but straight out of the box, I am happy to have one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAt $199 you are practically stealing this,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;James Burns(SoCal)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is not a souped up e-reader, its a high quality Android tablet.  What Amazon did was brilliant, shaving off the fluff features that most tablet consumers don't care about to offer this at an amazing price point.  I've only had it for four hours, but I can't put it down and its exceeded my expectations, by far.  You cannot go wrong with this device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsbeautiful, functional device. excellent value,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Carla Kaiser "Carla Kaiser"(Atlanta, GA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My Kindle Fire arrived today, and initial impressions are very positive. It is a gorgeous device. All of my Kindle content was there waiting for me as soon as I opened it up, as well as my music that I've purchased from Amazon. The Kindle Fire came with a courtesy charge, so I was able to start using it as soon as I took it out of the box.I also have an iPad, and use an iPhone. Learning the Android interface is somewhat of a challenge, but it's not that much different. Mainly the keyboard input is what I've noticed the most, along with the App store being totally different from what I'm accustomed to. The touchscreen is slightly less responsive or sensitive than the screen on my Apple devices, but it is not something most people would notice.Speaking of Apple products, Apple will not allow users to watch Amazon Prime Instant Videos on iPads. This irritates me to no end, and is one of the main reasons I bought the Kindle Fire (even though I didn't "need" it).fyi for users of old Kindles who upgrade: the highlight and share function is not as easy to use on the Kindle Fire, if you like to highlight passages and tweet them.  When I am doing serious heavy duty reading, I will stick with my old Kindle, because I highlight passages like it's my job, and I don't like the way the highlighter works in Kindle Fire. I'm sure I'll get used to it after a while, but it's really awkward for now.I do think this device is worth every penny of the $200 I paid for it.PS: The pulse app that shows up front and center when you open the Kindle Fire, is very similar to Flipboard on the iPad. Pulse integrates with Evernote, too, so if you come across some interesting content you can tag it and find it later on your desktop or laptop.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsiPad 2 owner impressed with the Fire,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;James G. Henderson "jimghenderson"(IA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a little confused about all the reviews saying he browsing is slow and navigation is laggy.  I am posting this on our iPad 2 while my wife is reading on the Fire.  Browsing is comparable.  I do not notice any slower web page browsing on the fire.  I timed the cnn home page on each device after the browser cache was cleared and he iPad 2 loads in 5.2 seconds and the fire loads it in 5.8 seconds.  However while there is still some minor rendering being done on the iPad page, on the Fire the page renders all at once, rather instantly.  The  Pinch to zoom is smooth on both devices.  There were a couple of aps on my droid that I wanted on the kindle (Dropbox, etc.) so I sideloaded them which took less than 5 minutes... The kindle fire is way less locked than I expected!  Magazines are smooth and books are smooth.  I have no idea what people are talking about, unless they are leaving 10 or so aps running... That's why anyone experienced with android uses Advanced Task Killer periodically.I use a 4g mifi for the iPad and the Fire.  Why pay for 3g/4g on every device?I would like an SD slot on the Fire.  But I would like one on my iPad as well.Well done Amazon.  I give you an A- on your first Tablet effort,  Add an SD slot and you get an A.  Produce a letter-sized tablet 8.5 x 11 " and you get an A+ and I will sell my iPad./ purchased the Fire from Best Buy today about 10 hours ago.  I own a Windows PC, an iMac, an origional Droid, an iPad 2, an iPod touch, a Kindle e-ink reader, and now a Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

10 of 12 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Tablet!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Invertalon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my first tablet... I was not willing to spend over $500 for the iPad for what I use them for and when Amazon announced the Fire, I pre-ordered the same day.I received my unit today. Very simple packaging, frustration free as stated. Inside you have the tablet itself and the charger. All you need!Turning it on for the first time prompted an update... It took a few minutes to perform and I was on my way. I setup my email, got a few apps, surfed the web, etc... Performance is really, really good. All the bad reviews I read prior to using it went out the window, very quickly. The interface is very easy to learn and is clean in appearance and performs well.Internet speed is really good. I notice an improvement over my iPhone with websites, and MUCH improved on sites like youtube. The IPS display is really nice, bright and clear. I have no problem reading websites without "zooming". Text is clear and websites look wonderful. Overall, very good experience.I can't wait to get load it up with a few shows, movies and games to play on it. It really is a perfect size. The iPad I find a bit too big (more like a laptop IMO), then an easy to carry tablet.I really like apple products... But Amazon really did well with this offering. On price, size and performance. It won't be as good as the iPad in all areas, but remember, it is also less then half the price.Very happy with purchase... I would highly recommend it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsDisappointed.  Sticking with my original Kindle,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;MMA "MMA"(United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Burn me at the stake, but I found the Kindle Fire to be a huge disappointment.I wasn't looking for an ipad type of device.  I just wanted an enhanced Kindle.  I had thought that the full color display would be a fantastic addition to an already great product. I was really looking forward to stopping my print subscriptions to magazines and switching to Kindle subscriptions instead.However, I was disappointed.  First of all, I purchased two magazine subscriptions straight from the Kindle Fire, but was not able to access them.  I called amazon.com customer service and they couldn't figure out what was wrong either.  (Customer service reps at amazon are always great.  They were courteous and tried their best.)  This was a big problem for me since it was the main reason I wanted the Kindle Fire.Additionally, the Kindle magazine subscriptions are abbreviated versions of the print magazine.  Several articles and features are missing on the Kindle editions.  The real kicker?  The Kindle subscription price is often times higher than the print price.  This is understandable when the Kindle editions are ad free.  However, the same holds true for those that do include advertisements.  Defies logic.I also didn't care for the reading experience on the new Kindle Fire.  The original Kindles are great because they're easy on the eyes and 'feel' like reading from paper.  With the Kindle Fire, it's just like reading from a computer screen.I tried really hard to like my Kindle Fire despite the fact it didn't deliver on the one feature I really wanted.  After playing around with it, it just wasn't for me.  I have all the apps I need on my phone and don't need them on a relatively bulky Kindle.  The Netflix feature is a good idea, but not much use for me.  We can access Netflix on our Roku or one of my son's gaming systems.  The only time I would use this feature would be when I'm out, waiting in the carpool lane, at the doctor's office, etc.  However, due to the fact that the Kindle only runs over wifi, that would be impossible.Long story short, I returned the Kindle Fire and don't miss it at all.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

25 of 33 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsOne week in and it won't boot up,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;K. Anderson "andersox"(Aliso Viejo, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For the first week, I loved my Kindle.  I downloaded music, apps, movies.  I input my calendar and to do list.  Today, one week later, it doesn't boot up.  I plug in the battery charger and NOTHING.  Big, giant bummer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (6)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFire vs iPad,April 19, 2012By&nbsp;Daniel J Sullivan(Chicago, IL USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Here are the main differences I've found between the iPad and the Fire after owning the fire for a few months.Tablet things the Kindle is missing (to make it only $199):Smaller screen (but it fits in a pocket more easily, at least a jacket pocket)Only WiFiNo GPSNo CameraLess storage (only really matters if you are going to hold a lot of movies, or try to use it as a music player, which I doubt anyone will do since a phone or iPod is way better for that). It will force you to manage your movies if you are taking it on trips and stuff like that.Multi-Touch screen only supports 2 touches. This only matters if you are going to play action games (imagine going left [1] while running [2] and trying to tap a jump button [3]) that require 3 or more touches.There are way fewer apps for the KindleHaving said all that, the Kindle is 40% the price of the iPad. If you want to use it to read books around the house and occasionally surf the web for articles or to check the weather or something, this is awesome. It also resides in the Amazon ecosystem so purchasing books is super easy. If you'd like to also bring it along to watch a movie on a plane or something like that, it is good too, but you'd have to setup the movies you want to see before doing it because it won't hold nearly as many movies as the iPad.If you need cell access, want to get a lot of apps, play lots and lots of games that are more action type games rather than card games and such, or don't care about the price as much and don't mind buying books on amazon.com then reading them with the iPad reader app, then the iPad is probably for you.We have been very pleased with the Kindle. For most web use that is more complex where the Kindle doesn't do the trick, I'd rather just stand up and go to the kitchen to use a laptop and have a keyboard/mouse than slightly upgrade to an iPad and still struggle. My wife and I are going to also buy a traditional Kindle, so we'll both be able to read at the same time, and have the benefit of the super-long battery life and "in the sun" readability of the eInk for trips to the beach and all that. The two devices will still be $200 less than a single iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWOW!!!!!,April 17, 2012By&nbsp;Tommy J(Surprise, AZ United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire is a technological SHOCK! I never dreamed to ever see such a thing. When I was a kid (pre WWII) my uncle and I built a crystal radio from a crystal we found in a mine dump. Boy's Life magazine had the instructions. He went off to war (he did come back) and that radio was my prize possession. We had no other news source during the War years in the Ozarks. I eventually became an electronic engineer due to that radio. Even so I never dreamed of such a thing as the Fire...What can I say that hasn't been said already.  The cloud is awesome. What a great concept! I used the cloud music uploader to upload my favorite music (Devotchka) to the cloud. Neat..I have a Kindle 3. All my books were available from the cloud for the Fire.. WOW, again.... The Fire is a gateway to a vast computer built by Amazon...So I guess I will retire the Kindle 3. The fire is much easier to read books with the back lit screen.. Netflix and Amazon prime movies are beyond counting... I love movies ever since I saw my first one in 1946..It was fun figuring out how the Fire operates. It is very intuitive. I always read the instructions after the fact, more fun that way.The Fire was delivered within 24 hours (how do they do that?).The Fire case is slick, hard, and heavy to hold. A cover is very necessary. Many on Amazon. I chose the Poetic TM (cheap 9.95). It works fine and makes the Fire much easier to hold.Oh one little item: when you connect to an outside network (like in a restruant) and you enter the password. You notice that the enter key on keyboard is missing. Just slide the password up and you will see a save button.The touch screen takes a little getting use to with my big fingers especially the keyboard. I do like the way the keyboard handles the caps and numbers. Otherwise the Fire is a BIG WINNER!Humm, I am rethinking the Kindle 3 I have. It is easier to read in bed than the Fire. The Fire is a bit heavy and hard to hold. With the cloud I can move books between the two. Plus, when I fall asleep and drop the Kindle, don't have to worry about damage as with the Fire.IF AMAZON DOESN'T HAVE IT, THEN I DON'T NEED IT.Wouldn't it be neat to order a car from Amazon (Hint, Hint).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFire is good. Review from CNET was unfair.,February 5, 2012By&nbsp;Ken J. Walker "BrandonBooks"(Panama City, FL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just read an review on The Kindle Fire that was really unfair. If they would applied a modicum of effort and quit trying to make it into something it is not, they would have seen how great the Kindle Fire really is.This was in response to their 'complaints'.1) There is a brightness control in the system settings. With a little effort you would have found it. Its so bright you can use the Fire in broad daylight.2) Calendar? There's a calendar app. Only takes a second to find it.3) Amazon monopoly? Notta. There's a workaround. Do a google search for what you want, email it to yourself, upload to device from email. About two minutes worth of effort.4) Not enough storage? Did you even read the owners manual that was included? As a Kindle Fire owner, you have free and unlimited access to the cloud. No need to store anything. Plenty of room to store what you use on a regular basis.5. Only available to US residents? Again, didn't do your research did you. It is available to everyone. Example: UK residents can purchase these and any apps they might not have immediate access too can be uploaded via a workaround.6) The Fire is lightning fast as long as you don't bog it down with a bunch of unnecessary crap. Utilize the free cloud access. This also helps with the stuff you are hoarding on your laptop. Upload it via the Fire to the Cloud and delete it from your laptop. Come to think of it, this is probably the first time in a few weeks I've used my laptop...7)There is a keyboard with a micro usb for about $50, well worth it. Another reason I haven't used my laptop lately.Don't think of the Kindle Fire as a notepad or an IPad that is lacking, as it is not either or those nor is it trying to be.The Kindle Fire is an E-Reader with a whole lot of bells and whistles. As E-Readers go, its top of the line, at a great price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsHonest Review for Kindle Fire,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;J. Mitchell-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First a bit of background: I am a 26 year old college student. I am definitely "tech savvy" but not part of the popular crowd when it comes to choosing devices. I have always been reluctant with this whole touch based interface that phones and computers are using today. I have never owned a smartphone of any kind, nor have I ever owned a tablet. I have used a friends Droid and I have actually picked up an iPad before so I am not completely ignorant to these new popular devices. I own a LG cosmos and its just fine for me. I have a bitchin desktop at home for everything else.Since mid November I was addicted to watching movies and reading reviews about the fire. I was promised one for christmas and I was really excited to see how it would stand against all the hype and all the bad reviews. I never expected it to be just like an iPad. I expected the Fire to be a glorified e-reader that was capable of handling other types of media. I don't understand why everyone would want to compare it to an iPad because I always thought that an iPad was a complete waste of money. I mean, come on, if you really want to spend that kind of money for a device why not get a damn laptop? That just seems more functional and practical to me.After about two weeks with the Fire I can say that it has honestly surpassed my expectations. For the money this thing can do A LOT. For all the people complaining that it is not a productivity device: I would take a second look at the appstore. I am a mechanical drafting and machining student and this thing has apps like autodesk sketchbook and autocad ws that are perfect for storing and editing drawings. You can easily manage and view online documents with the default office app, and there's even "cloud briefcase" apps like evernote, sugarsync, and others. So, I have no idea what people are complaining about in that area. As a college student this works for me. And I have over 100 pdfs of manuals and textbooks at my fingertips all out of my own private collection!!!!As for the slow balky interface and web browser? I do not mind waiting literally 2 seconds for a page to load. The touch screen seems just as responsive as any other device I've used with the same interface (ipad, droid). Sometimes the screen can respond to my finger being really close and I accidently select something I didn't want to but I got used to that very quick. I have thick fingers and I have never had a problem. If you seriously want to complain about that then get yourself a stylus, son. And dolphin browser is available with golauncher described in the next paragraph.For those who do not like the standard background and UI, you can allow 3rd party apps and install golauncher. (right now my home screen resembles ice cream sandwich) And you can do that WITHOUT ROOTING!!!!!!! And with that you can create widgets and have up to 9 screens and 3 task bars. The golauncher apk file is free from their website and you can even download golauncher widgets too! I have a shortcut placed right above the home button which allows me to switch back to the old interface and access my books and documents and amazon video. So there's the answer to that complaint.For those who do not like that there is no external volume controls....: COME ON! is it really that hard to move your finger over a couple inches, tap the bar and slide the volume to the desired level? you are able to control the volume when watching video right on the screen as well. So to those who are whining about that: Stop you lazy bastards...As for the complaint about 1 click purchasing and the lack of parental controls? You parents do realize that you are PARENTS, right? Teach your kid about money and dont give a $200 dollar device to a kid who doesn't understand that it comes with some responsibility. And I believe that you can edit your 1-click purchase options on your amazon account preferences. Just turn it off or get your kid his own bank account connected to their fire. It's like when parents complain about their kids seeing something on TV that is inappropriate: watch your kid, dude. Don't blame others for your own bad parenting.For the complaint that it has no camera or mic? Do you really need that? Maybe those hipsters that like to skype at the local starbucks do, but I sure think its unnecessary. I have a camera on my phone, anyways. And the fact that there's no 3G network? "Oh no! I can't constantly check my facebook status!" Yeah that doesn't matter to me.And finally to address the complaint of the power button: I HAVE NEVER ACCIDENTLY TURNED THE FIRE OFF. You do know that to turn it off you need to hold down that button. Pressing it will simply put it into standby mode and pressing it again will bring it back to exactly what you were doing. So that is settled.Bottom Line: (Good, Bad, and yes Ugly)-Good: Great HD video, productive apps, beautiful screen, good size and weight, Games run awesome (namely plants vs zombies and worms), music and net radio apps work GREAT, great for reading books/pdfs/docs/txt, changable interface (for those that are smart enough), and the best part: its only $200!!!!-Bad: Doesn't have every app I wanted (spotify, google skymap and others), Battery life is kind of sucky (I charge it on average once a day), the backing seems like it gets marred and scratched easily so get yourself a case (marware lightweight is good), and lastly you cant do EVERYTHING on it like emulators and better games without rooting it and voiding the warranty. But just give amazon some time to build the appstore and everything will be there I am sure.-Ugly: I have one question for the designer of this tablet. If the best way to view videos on the fire is in landscape, then why did you choose to put both speakers at the top of the device? Seems really strange to me that they are not on one of the longer sides of the fire. Its better to watch videos with headphones because of this. And the speakers are not really that loud so they work better with computer speakers or plugged into a system of sorts.So that's my review...Seems like most of the complaints are inane or easily fixed so all-in-all this is a great buy!For those who think the iPad is better? You are probably right, but its like comparing a lexus to a lamborghini. They are both nice but one is more practical for everyday use. Do yourself a favor and save your money and get yourself a Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Best Thing Since Sliced Bread!,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;oktravelchick(Oklahoma)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Since I purchased and received my Kindle Fire (around Thanksgiving 2011), I have barely put it down! I debated on purchasing this or a basic iPad 2, but could not seem to justify the more than double the price difference for the iPad. I am glad I chose the Kindle.The color screen is amazing, and it is small enough to slip in my purse and take everywhere. The only con I have (and this is not enough to care about, for me) is the weight of it. Though looking relatively small, I think it weighs more than it should - but again, this is not enough of a deterant to me to keep me from owning it and recommending it to others.Also, the amount of free things - from books to games, is incredible! I find myself looking for new books daily, as they change that rapidly. Things you get free one day, will cost the next, and vice versa. A very nice treat for those that love to shop for the fun of it! You can also get a featured daily app for free - many of which I have got (usually games), and a few I have passed on, but I always check. Plus, checking out a top book for free from Amazon (one per month) is a great added bonus! I also recommend getting a Prime membership because you have access to all kinds of tv shows and movies for free.I have tried various free games (ones that are free because of paid ads that come up every once-in-awhile), and a few I have been so addicted to that I purchased the paid version. Gem Miner, Angry Birds, etc. I have also tried several books that I loved and would have probably never found the author if not for the free starters, and subsequently purchased the 'paid' books by the authors.I did find that for myself, however, it is easier for me to navigate the Fire using a stylus with a soft rubber-type end on it (about the size of your fingertip). I have thought a few times about getting a screen protector because of all the finger &amp; stylus marks that I notice when it is shut off on 'black screen', but a small screen-cleaning cloth I already had works perfectly and takes just a second to wipe it off to look like new. I did buy a soft silcone-type holder that was made for the Fire, and I never take it off.All in all, I think everything (except weight), price included, is a WIN-WIN for everyone!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCritics too Critical,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;LILLYPAD-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I cancelled my pre-order in November because of the negative comments regarding the Fire. I was going to re-order once some of the bugs were worked out. Much to my surprise, my husband purchased a Fire for me for Christmas. All I can say is that this little machine is awesome. I had enjoyed each and every one of its features and it is right up there with the IPAD that I purchased for my husband for Christmas!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA great tablet for the money,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;richie hsiu(Chino Hills, CA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I did some research on the Kindle Fire for a few months and even hesitated to purchase it on the initial introduction back in Novermber. Subsquent to all the great reviews l've read, I finally made up my mind to buy it.The Amazon kindle Fire is a great product for the money. The touch screen is responding fast and GUI interface is simple to use and I am really impressed with the qulity of this small tablet. Don't get me wrong, this small tablet is not an iPad and no one should even compare this tablet to an iPad, it's really comparing a Porches to a Toyota. It's not a full functional tablet that you can customize all settings but its stripped down Aneroid Gingerbread 2.3 is more than efficient to provide the depentability just like a Toyota. It's nimble and easy to maneuver to the page for music, video or browse the web. The 7" screen size is a easy hold for a great ebook.  On top of everything else is its price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsREVIEW UPDATE,December 26, 2011By&nbsp;Sandra "Kindling"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't have a Kindle Fire, but that hasn't stopped others from giving it a low rating.  I do have one on order with my Christmas cash.  I've been reading reviews for over a month and held out until the Christmas gifts had been unwrapped.  I find a very similar theme.  Either someone is angry that UPS lost or failed to deliver on time, or the order went missing at Amazon (they only had to ship a zillion of them) or someone expected a $600 tablet for $200.  My favorite was the one where the lady couldn't use it because she doesn't have WiFi and didn't know it was required.  Boom.  Low rating for the product.  Then there are those that have jumped into the flood of calls Amazon is receiving today. I wouldn't have a customer service job today if it paid $50 an hour.  The Kindle Fire has close to 4000 5 star ratings.  And those are the ones I will pay attention to.  If my Fire arrives with problems, I'll return it for another one.  Then and only then will I rate the product.So now, I have the Fire.  Here's what the Kindle Fire is not.  It's not a laptop, or notebook, or netbook.  It's a tablet.  If you want anything else, then move on.Here's what I've learned.  WiFi performance is directly related to battery strength.  A full charge gets you full power.  After 4 hrs of playing, response was slowing.  I loved it when I registered it (I ordered it unregistered for security), everything in my archives was in the Cloud and available.  I loved reading outside with a glass of wine and a smoke.  I have a Kindle keyboard with the Kandle light.  It's adequate.  The Fire is awesome for reading in the dark. FYI, if you're reading, make sure WiFi is off to save your battery.The issue with the bad placement of the power button is solved by flipping the Fire upside down.  Power button on top, zero problem.My husband turns on our PC every morning to check The Weather Channel.  Not any more!  There's an app for that!I've used it for about 5 hrs and so far, zero problems.  The touch is VERY sensitive, so caution is required when typing.The Kindle Fire does what I wanted and expected.  I'm still playing with it and learning, but so far, wonderful.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDo your reasearch!,December 26, 2011By&nbsp;R. Baker-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received the Kindle Fire for Christmas from my wife. The screen is sharp and really looks outstanding. The Kindle Fire does exactly what the web page on Amazon says it does. I do not understand all of these people complaining about how Amazon is misleading people into buying the Kindle Fire! It is a Kindle not an Ipad, if you are expecting it to do 90% of what the Ipad can do you're going to be disappointed but that's the consumers fault for having unrealistic expectations. It is a premium Kindle not a bare bones Ipad. I love it as it does everything a basic Kindle does plus it has this awesome screen and the ability to play video and apps. Before you spend 200 dollars and then complain about a solid product that helps to make the tablet market more competitive , do your research.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest. Gift. Ever.,December 25, 2011By&nbsp;W. J. Hernandez "Z0MBS"(Los Angeles)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My review is simple. I wanted to get something for my girlfriend for her basic web browsing and game playing needs. She can now "veg out" on the couch or in bed and watch movies at her leisure. She can take her Kindle Fire to work and chill out at lunch and watch a movie with this solid, small, but not too tiny tablet.She likes to read, watch netflix, and catch up on the latest online gossip.This is the perfect gift.What sold me on it is a friend who said "Look, it does 80% of what the ipad does at half the price."Unless you're going to totally geek out and really be "in tune" with your tablet, you really can't go wrong with the Kindle Fire. My girlfriend is happy, so I'm happy.Thanks Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA great device,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;jlc1082 "jlc1082"(WESTPORT MA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have never owned an IPAD but I have seen my mothers a couple times. It is much smaller than the IPAD. But this device does exactly what I wanted it to and more. I just wanted something for the apps and games for my daughter. She said all she wanted for christmas was an IPAD and didn't care if it was the only thing she got. Well, I was not about to spend that much money especially on an 8 year old. So I got this for the family. It does the apps for the kids, gets me on facebook (and other sites) when my laptop is being hogged and holds many books for my boyfriend (who has now decided he prefers paperback lol his loss, our gain) We have watched some free tv shows and movies from the amazon site on it too. Battery also holds a good charge. My only complaint is sometimes it doesn't pick up the touch of my finger on the first try or hitting the leters can often prove to be a challenge without hitting the wrong one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT!!! Perfect compliment to my 2ng Gen Kindle,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;JP in AZ(AZ, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First let me start with this revelation for those of you out there whining about it not being an iPad. It's NOT an iPAD, it is not meant to be an iPad (at least in it's initial release) it is a superior entertainment device for watching video, reading, music, and utilizing the great services and products of Amazon. For these things, this device rocks!!!! If you want a camera, use your phone, if you want to run super intensive high storage programs, buy a laptop. Geez people....Now to the Fire itself. I have to say I was a bit nervous reading some of the earlier reviews but most negative comments were unfounded.  I received mine just as the new 6.2 software release came out.  I had only a minor issue getting connected to my home wi-fi. Simply restarting the Fire worked for me, turned it back on and it connected perfectly. Have not lost the connection at all as others have mentioned. I have no issues with the touch screen, however, I did notice some difficulty after I upgraded to the new 6.2 release, funny if that was supposed to fix it. I actually found it much more responsive with 6.1 it was initially delivered with. But let me say this about the finicky touch screen, every touch screen device I own (and I have quite a few) suffer from not reacting to touch all the time, everytime, never a hitch. It is no worse than any other touch screen I use in my life, but I believe better than most. (BTW I have long nails too and still find it better than most) It is a beautiful screen, vibrant colors and found it easy to navigate after a little "discovery" time. Not sure why people complain about the power button. I simply know where it is and I never have a problem with accidentally powering down. Would another area of the tablet be better, maybe but certainly not a show stopper. I was not really considering this device for email, (I use a small local POP provider at home so rarely recognized) however once I felt comfortable navigating around the Fire, I decided to try to set it up. Easy steps to do it. I did have a problem where I received an error after going through all the steps and hitting finish..it said it could not connect or server connection failed. Wait for it..............a few minutes later I got a little beep and sure enough, all my new email messages from that evening were on my Fire. COOL! Email works perfectly! The whole carousel complaint thing. You can delete the history! so what's the big deal?I bought the leather dual rooCase and it fits perfectly and keeps it well protected. I am SO happy with my Fire. The free 30 day Prime was a bonus and I did a bit more shopping to take advantage of free shipping on some items I was needing for Christmas anyway.So why only 4 stars you say, and not 5? I would like the ability to add storage via a flash drive or SD card, there was an app I was interested in, one of those sleep sound apps, and it said I needed an SD card to run it. Again, just a slight annoyance, but not a show stopper for my overall needs. Most important to me is I would like the ability to read on my Fire via lovely original eInk as it is SO much easier on my eyes. I am not sure this is even possible though due to the different technologies. Being able to change between the three background/font color combos is at least available and does help a lot. Easy fix for me tho, when reading at night after my eyes have had a long tiring day, I use my 2nd Gen Kindle to read and the sync makes it easy to go from one to the other as I need to. Lastly I would think they could have offered a 3G option as they do in the Kindle. Bottom line, I paid $199 and for that price I am perfectly happy and quite delighted with the new Fire. Amazon Rocks!! I will be keeping my eyes out for improved versions in the future, maybe Amazon will offer a trade in program for us devoted Kindle users!!! Think about it Amazon!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFrom an actual owner,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;L. Harris "LHarris"(Lincoln, NE, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I finally gave in and got my Fire, and I have to say it's easily as good as the positive reviews claim, with only a few of the flaws from the nay-sayers.Pros:-It runs Android. This ties in a bit with the cons (more later), but since under the heavily modified surface, Android is still there and can be modified to your own liking. It takes a little bit of know-how, but can easily be modified by anyone who cares to try. This gets into all kinds of additional options of customization that I won't go into here.-It's FAST. I haven't had any problems with freezing, unresponsive touches, or sluggish loading. The first few days I used the built in Silk browser, which performed quite well, but I have since switched to Dolphin HD due to interface and personal preferences. The Fire itself seems to have great battery life, but I still charge it nightly, as I do out of habit with all of my gadgets.-The size seems perfect. It's easy to hold in one hand and navigate, and is convenient to slip into a messenger bag without taking up much space. I did get a case for my FireTimbuk2 Kindle Fire CUSH SLEEVE, Gunmetal/Limeaidand I'm not worried at all about damaging it. I also like the rubberized back, which gives a little more texture to hold onto and prevents it from slipping if propped up on a table. Plus, it's one less surface to get smudged up by fingerprints!-Wifi manager is clean, fast, and simple to use. I might recommend an app, Wifi Analyzer, which pairs well with the built in connection wizard.-The display is sharp! It can be quite bright, but allows a wide range of adjustment for various situations. I find that the 7" display is plenty for typical usage. If you need more, then you're probably not using the Fire for the intended purposes. Browsing most websites, checking email, reading magazines and books all work quite well on this display size (IMHO).-The speakers sound respectable, considering the size of the device. They're hardly audiophile quality, but they put out a decent level without distorting.Cons:-More of a quirk...but when you're watching a movie on the Fire, having speakers on only one side is unbalanced. It would have been nice to separate them so the audio is balanced on both sides (when not using headphones).-Built in "carousel" interface is cludgy. I don't care much for it personally, especially when loading other apps that don't display well on the shelf. However, if you use GO Launcher as an alternative, this is a non-issue!-No hard volume buttons. I'll adjust, and it's not that big of a deal, but it would be nice to adjust the volume on the fly when listening to music.-It's a little on the heavy side. It's lighter than the iPad, and smaller obviously, but since it can easily be held with one hand, it's possible that it may get a little heavy during extended use.-Amazon's lockdown on the Android market and apps is annoying. There are ways around it, but I'm not interested in rooting an otherwise great device. With a little bit of research and minimal work, it's easy enough to side-load some extra apps, but it would REALLY be nice if Amazon could get a deal worked out with Google. The Fire runs Android and supports a lot of apps, but it's frankly absurd that more aren't even allowed.Overall, the Fire is definitely what I expected. Regardless of how good a gadget is when I buy it, I always love to fiddle with it and customize as much as possible. With the Fire, it takes only half of a brain cell more than usual, but I'm quite happy with how it works. The size, features, power, and convenience are all great, and with the low price tag, I have absolutely no regrets and will definitely be recommending it to anyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGood value for money,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;BG "BG"-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I already have an Ipad 2 but my kids use that most of the times from books to games. My wife uses it for skype. So I get really little time to use it so I decided I wanted another tablet but not so expensive as an Ipad. Before I went in to the buying mentality I decided I am not getting an Ipad equivalent as I know You get what you pay for. Kindle fire received a lot of attention and decided to give it a try mainly because it was only $199.The screen looks excellent. There seems to be some quirks on the touch screen especially when you try to touch on the apps. But I wish amazon soon would release that update they ve promised that would fix all of those issues. I turned off one click buying option right when I registered so didnt have much of a security problem. It clocked out the next day and asked me to re login to buy anything from the amazon store.The speakers on these things are the highlight. Even Ipad doesnt have good speakers or music reproduction.Apps. I downloaded splashtop HD which runs flawlessly to control your mac or windows laptop/desktop. Netflix works flawlessly and so does facebook. ES file browser app not only shows and works with all your network shares but it can download anything from an FTP server as well. 49% of app developers said they are interested in developing apps for Kindle Fire before Nov 14. Imagine that percentage now after KF is now ranked only next to Ipad in the units sold.Havent had a problem with browsing. Most websites are pretty good especially those that have flash. There is a lot of complaint out there saying that the silk browser is not as quick as they claim. But it becomes faster ONLY after it learns your usage pattern.Other android tablets (Although KF is a heavily modified android). I considered Acer Iconia, Asus transformer and Toshiba thrive. All of them have microphone, camera, bluetooth and GPS. Camera and microphone becomes relevant for me only when using Skype or Gtalk. Both have horrible apps on android that negates the use of the camera on them. Skype on Ipad 2 on the other hand looks and feels awesome. So without VOIP not working so great on those tablets that have a camera and microphone, KF was the obvious choice for me. Also most importantly KF is $50-200 lower than those.Bottom line: For the price you pay you feel as if you've stiffed amazon royally (My brain knows its not true but my user experience says otherwise).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMore pros than cons!!,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;L. Lynn Miller "Gamer Mom"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Pros:1.) Beautiful color and graphics, you almost forget that you aren't looking at a larger screen!2.) Library! You can "check out" one book a month. If you, for some reason, haven't finished that book in a month then you can keep it until you do. Just keep in mind that until that book is "returned", you can't check out a new one.3.) Books,Books, and more Books! I have purchased some excellent books for as little as $2.99 per book! When reading your book, you have options. Such as highlighting a passage you like, writing a note, finding out what a word means, electronically bookmarking your page. They have such a huge variety of books that I believe anyone could find many books that they would be interested in!4.) GAMES! I have to admit I am hooked on the games. You get a new free game every day! They have tons of games that are free and then the rest vary in price but, most are quite cheap. Then you can get updates for your games free of charge. They have a lot of great games on here.5.) The web is also a surprise. It is actually not that slow! I even was able to download a anti-virus protector for free.6.) Music and Video both are excellent!7.) They have a document page but I have only had my Kindle for 3 weeks. There is so much to explore that I have not had a chance to explore that.Cons:1.) KEYBOARD: I am not going to lie..this drives me INSANE. It is a touch keyboard and it constantly thinks you are typing the letter or number next to it. I have tried to use stylus' for it and it won't respond. I still gave this review 5 stars because everything else is THAT good!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent value for the $$$,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Happy dad "Happy dad"(Gaithersburg, MD United States)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've read many of the posted reviews and wanted to give my own thoughts. To qualify, I also own 2 iPads and a Kindle 2.I've found the Kindle Fire to be an Excellent tablet overall, and better then most others on the market. Is it an iPad? No. does it cost less than half of the Wi-Fi iPad? Yes. Does it do 90% of what the average user does with their iPad? Yes.Pros- Smaller than iPad. Obviously a user preference but since I already have an iPad, nice to have something that's a bit smaller and easier to carry with me.- Well built - I was surprised at the build on this device as I was expecting something more...plastic, like the previous Kindles. It has a nice weight to it and feels very solid- Screen - very nice, good resolution- Touch-screen - I have not experience some of the negatives others have reported. I find the touch screen to be very responsive and works well. I also do like the lay-out of the screens...no offence to my iPad, but actually kind of a boring interface compared to the Kindle. User preference again.- Amazon prime - streaming of free content is great. Rent/buy movies &amp; TV (download or stream)- Book reader - no big difference overall to Kindle app on other devices or iBooks for a reading experience. Maybe just a user prerence on devide size when you're, say, reading in bed.- Droid based app store. Al the major apps are here. Have my netflix, hulu, etc. alrfeady loaded. While not as many apps as iTunes, that's more a Droid issue but all the major ones are hereCons- No 3G. But remember, this is a $200 device as compared to $500-600 wi-fi iPad. I would guess that eventually they will release a 3G / 4G version, but keep in mind you would also need a data plan.- A little less "work" friendly perhaps. I use my iPad at work with various apps from Word to GoToMeetings. Again, this is not as much as power-packed device as the iPad. But again, not meant to be.So, to conclude...I love my iPad...and really like this one as well. I can see myself using this more for reading and when I want to travel or carry along a smaller device that the iPad. Well done Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI wasn't looking for an iPad....so I am completely satisfied!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Thomas C. Nagy "Music Teacher"(Ebensburg, PA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When Amazon announced the release of the Kindle Fire, I signed up that very day.  I have had my Fire for a month now, and I can truthfully say that I am 100% satisfied.  I have a MacBook Pro, so I didn't need or want an iPad.  I love to read, listen to music, watch movies, check my email, surf the net, shop, check up on Facebook.  This device does that without a hitch.  I knew what I was looking for, found it ordered it, and use it everyday.  You can't give this device 1 star if you were expecting it to be an iPad.  It isn't advertised as such, and doesn't perform as such!  For my money, this device delivers completely what it promises.  Thanks Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat device for me,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Sitty-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I feel compelled to write my own review based on some of the negative reviews I've read. Basically, if you want an iPad, please go buy the iPad and don't even consider the Fire. You must have an extra $300 to burn for such a high-powered piece of equipment, so please go buy it. For me, the Kindle Fire is perfect. I want to read, check. I want to surf the web, check. I want to check my email, check. I want access to videos and my music, check. I want to be able to download some apps, check.Yes, the OS is sometimes wonky...so frustrating to waste an extra 2 milliseconds to tap it again, huh? It is software, it will be fixed. Nope, there's no physical volume buttons. Not ideal, but again, there can be software adjustments made to accommodate. The power button is on the bottom and everyone is accidentally powering the device down...not me. Haven't hit it one time inadvertently.I seem to remember issues with the original iPad when it came out and when Apple changed the function of the side switch. How about that, Apple listened and fixed it. I am sure Amazon will too! Great device for those of us who don't necessarily NEED an iPad!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm Here To Defend.,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;genomecop-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)OK. After reading all the negative reviews I feel it's my duty to post my experiences with the device.First off.  My tech experience. I build my own computers. I hack my cell phones, Apple and Android. I networked my apartment. I feel I can confidently say I'm extremely tech savvy.  I am an Ipad owner.I LOVE my Kindle Fire.  I love it so much I have stopped carrying around my Ipad.It fits in my coat pocket, which is great because if I want to watch a movie at the gym while doing cardio its easy to take with me.At work, it sits on my desk displaying all my tech news through an RSS reader. It also lets me send and receive my emails.  When I have an idea for an article I'm writing, I use my Note program.Video content plays and looks amazing. At home where I have a super fast connection this is almost instant.All the apps that I use on a "daily" basis on the Ipad are found on the Amazon App Store.I have NEVER accidentally turned the power off while holding the device, though I can understand how this would happen.For me the FIRE is not slow at all. My browser loads quickly and scrolls smoothly. Of course your Wifi connection also determines how fast your pages load. It will also tether to your cell phone for use when WiFi isn't available.Yes the not being able to edit the home screen is a problem, but in no way affects the workings of the device.  Also there are sometimes problems with the screen being unresponsive, but I can say this happens on my Ipad also.I say if your in the market for an affordable tablet you cant go wrong with the FIRE. Just go buy it. You'll be happy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsAffordable with obvious flaws,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Amit Kumar-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Best Part: Very affordable, great for consuming amazon content (like videos, books, etc)Flaws: Touch is not very responsive, poor web browser and the worst part is you can't install any other browser, power button is at a very bad location, none of the google apps is available (like youtube app)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for Me,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Librarian(USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Me:  Have owned a 3G Kindle 2 for over two years; Owned a WiFi Kindle Keyboard SO but sold it and bought a 3G Kindle Keyboard SO for my spouse.  I have Amazon Prime and an Audible subscription, plus a mail subscription to Netflix.  I do NOT own a smart phone.  I read a lot, especially newspapers and books.  I tend to research something pretty thoroughly before making a purchase.Now my take on the Kindle Fire:This device is perfect for me.  As a Prime Member I can access a lot of shows and movies that I like, such as BBC TV shows.  The Fire also gives me access to tons of news sites whenever I'm at the coffee shop, library, or community center. It lets me read my email; I've even worked on a couple documents I had up on Google, albeit rather slowly. I've never had a problem connecting to the WiFi hotspots at various locations around town.  I'm able to read a book in the car at night while traveling with my spouse.  I use the Kindle 2 or 3 during daylight &amp; sync it to the Fire or just note my position and pick up from there on the Fire.I love that the screen is bright and, usually, I can adjust the reading content to a size that works for me.I'm not so psyched about the carousel.  I can take it or leave it.The responsiveness of the touchscreen sometimes seems too sensitive; other times not sensitive enough.  You have to use a very light touch most of the time but sometimes you have touch the screen several times to get a response.I've been happy with the Android apps I've gotten from Amazon.  They work well and I don't worry about malware.  I tried one third-party app suggested by other Fire owners but had to reboot the device as it seemed to mess up the WiFi connection.  I wish Amazon had a larger selection of utility apps but I'm sure that will come.  I'm particularly happy with the ReadItLater app--it's very useful for gathering content to read offline when you can't connect to WiFi.  The app store seems very heavy on games.The Fire is perfect for me as I don't own a smart phone and was not expecting it to be a smaller version of the IPad.  I understood what I was getting for the price and am very happy.  I think consumers who know themselves pretty well will be satisfied if they decide to purchase the Fire.  Based on reading some of the postings at the Kindle forum, though, some buyers didn't do much homework before purchasing.Consumer, know thyself!(I normally try to be more organized and focused in my reviews but I think the other reviews have already covered most of the technical aspects.  This is just my off-the-cuff reaction to the Fire after almost a month of use.)Update 12-29-11:I have to say I'm using my Fire much, much more that I thought I would when I bought it.  As an Audible member, I love that I can easily find and listen to my NYT subscription without booting up my laptop.  I use the Sleepy Time Lite app every night to drift into dreamland.  I watch Prime videos (usually BBC TV episodes) or listen to an audiobook at lunch or while getting ready for bed.  I use the news apps to keep up with news all over the US &amp; world, especially the cities where I have relatives.  I also keep a few albums in the MP3 player &amp; play them while working in the kitchen or at the library.  I'm astounded at how much I've come to rely on my Fire in such a short time.I also should point out the a New York Times article today mentioned that apps from Amazon &amp; Apple are thoroughly tested for malware, which isn't true at other app stores.  Thank you Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product, Great flexibility, Beautiful media device with room to grow,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;K. Smith "&#34;SK&#34;"(Indianapolis, IN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This product is a winner! I have had it for 2wks now so I can make more informed comments. The size is good, the interface (UI) works for me, the features work well (once you've gotten familiar with them, though touch screen delays do occur). Sideloading allows me to augment apps content with free content from the Android Market App store (e.g. web browser, media player, screen light filter for better reading, media server app, etc.). Very flexible.  Thanks Amazon.  Absolutely love the ability to download books, magazines, comics, kids books, audible books, etc. from amazon book store, the public library and audible.com.  So flexibe!  Also very flexible movie watching with Amazon Prime, Netflix and Hulu. The books and mags are automatically stored in the cloud and on your device so you can take with you to read anywhere(no WIFI needed)!  They take up little to no space on the device and are beautiful in color.  With limited space on the device, however, I can only load so many movies and music.  So I put mine on a server (using Drop box or Plex).  This allows me to stream music and movies to the Kindle (as long as I'm connected to WIFI) without using any of the remaining allocated 6GB of space on the Kindle device. This works in the home using your PC as a server.  I think Drop box works anywhere you go(its server storage is expensive however at $100 per year; first 2GB are free). The free 2GB anywhere server streaming is an acceptable stop-gap for me.  It was bogus of Amazon to suggest you could store and stream music, movies and pics directly from the Amazon Cloud. You can't stream movies or pics! Bad advertising cost you 1 point rating Amazon. You should fix this or allow for more storage on the device.  Not allowing cloud video streaming has no bearing on how many books or videos I purchase from Amazon.  I'll still purchase new items from Amazon...its just more convenient to do so with amazons pricing and direct delivery of content. And I don't just use the cloud to just store stuff and forget it (not willing to pay for this)...I want to access it via streaming (I'm willing to pay for this).  I want an efficient option to upload/stream my personal photos, home movies, videos or music to the device...it makes it more personal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy first e-reader,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;krayscue-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My early Christmas present, love it!  I'm having so much fun "playing" with my new toy.  I love the ease of use and the Prime membership is worth every penny.  I'm 60 years old and I'm so happy with my KINDLE FIRE!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's perfect for me,December 6, 2011By&nbsp;L. Helton-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had the Fire for about 2 weeks without any problems. I ordered it from Amazon and it came before it was estimated to come. It does say Kindle fire on the package, but mine said it on either side and the font wasn't that big, but it does say it, and I wish it didn't.My Fire came pre-registered, so all of my books and info were already loaded. All of my books transferred over. I know some reviews said that some of their books wouldn't transfer, but I had no problem with that. I didn't have to do an update on it, which I know some reviewers said they had to.I have an M-edge case from my previous Kindle keyboard and it fits my Fire perfectly, so I'm keeping it and saving some money. Because there is a little bit of case that comes off the bottom of the Fire, the power button isn't easily pushed. In fact, I haven't accidentally turned it off once due to it being in the case.I agree with the other reviews that I do not really care for the carousel. I tested my internet speed by googling the word "dog" and the google page came up on the carousel. That was not something I would need to reference back to at a later time. But when I got back on my Fire later, that icon was gone. I didn't delete it, since apparently there is no way to, so for some reason it fell off, which I was thankful for. Even though the carousel has some issues that need to be resolved, I usually don't refer to it. I click on the tabs at the top to access my material (books, apps, web, etc.).I have not had a problem with using the internet in regards to speed. I've used my Fire to browse the internet in my apartment and in two other homes with a wi-fi connection. I'm not sure how it will respond on a network with several users, but with the small networks I have used, I've had absolutely no problems.I've also had no problems with the touch screen. Some people said it wouldn't respond, but mine has never done that.Another complaint has been that there is no external volume control. You have to control the volume on the touch screen in the top right hand corner. It would be nice to have external volume, but you can access the volume control at all times on the touch screen. So this also hasn't been a problem for me.I love my kindle and it is a great value for the price. I live on one income and didn't want to pay the price for an iPad, so this was a perfect device for me. They do need to add more apps, but for a website that doesn't have an app (CNN, Google), I'm able to simply go to the website and access all the info I need. I've also never had a problem with zooming on a website or going from Portrait to Landscape mode. I know others have had problems, but I haven't; but I've gone to highly popular websites on it (Pinterest, Google, CNN, etc.)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot a computer, not a ipad, But the best of both worlds to me.,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Mark Goodwin "Mark E. Goodwin"(Wolcott, Ct United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been watching this product since it inception. The first thing and I am sure for me and others is the price. The part is the good part. I immediately after receiving it ordered a case. This thing is screaming protection. I see the photos of young children and my immediate response is not in my world. This item is a fingerprint magnet. I realize that there are screen protectors out there but have an iPod touch with the protector on it, and it is much less responsive. I notice the same for this product. I use the led screen wipes and that does the trick. I ordered the  AmazonBasics Stylus for Touchscreen Devices Including Kindle Fire, Apple iPad 2, Motorola Xoom, Samsung Galaxy Tab, BlackBerry PlayBook]] ans I plan to use it on this product.The web integration is flawless. You can make bookmarks and sites you visit show up in opening screen at boot. Boot time is about 8 to 10 seconds including using the password. According to amazon you can add Your own music and video to it but keep in mind you are dealing with 8 gigs. When playing video from say CBS, the video is small as my iPod touch. If you blow up the video it becomes distorted. If you use the netflix app it is stunning. Full screen, no problem loading, very nice. I am a prime member so I have access to lots of video. Good site navigation, what a surprise, amazon is the home page.I look forward to getting the stylus and the case without the case this item will not leave my home. All my books are here and it takes 3 to 4 seconds to download one. There is no point to download all. I wish it has the 3g for the books alone but for the price of the unit I am not complaining. it arrived registered. So It was good to go. I can shop visit websites as long as a WiFi connection is present. Overall I am very pleased. When the sync cable arrives, the way transfer of video is explained, it is as simple as dragging the data to a removable drive. We shall see. I am very excited and will give an update over time. I think there is alot of bang for the buck.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAs a Kindle reader,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Jeff-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my Fire this week.  I have a Kindle Keyboard that I read 5-6 WW II books per month.  Naturally I love history.  It was almost worthless trying to view the maps as they only enlarged a small amount and most display poorly because of lack of contrast and backlighting.  The Fire is so much better so I don't have to ignore the maps or use a PC or laptop with the reader to study the maps.  So, I love it as a reader.  My first tablet so I'm learning the touch screen, etc.  I don't care about 3G, camera, GPS, etc.  Picks wiireless easily in parking lots and driving down I-35.  Screen ls a little too small and downloaads are a little slow.  Speakers could be a little louder.  For $199 it is a delightful little tablet to learn on.  I'm a retired Unix and Windows system and network admlnlstrator so this is my first venture into tiny and tablet.  Love it if I can keep it out of my 6 year old grandson's hands.  First 48 hours I got about 4 and he got 44.  He went home last night so it is all mine today!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAfter several weeks of ownership - Likes and Hates,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Simon Sez-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So ... I've had the Kindle Fire for a few weeks now. Let me tell you about my experience. The elements that work are incredible. By comparison, what doesn't work well, is beyond annoying.First, the KindleFire is not an iPad. It was not intended to be. What the Fire does incredibly well is provide reading material and viewing material in an intuitive, easy to access, portable format. I waited to buy an ereader until there was a color screen associated with Amazon's breadth of library. I wanted to be able to see color illustrations and photographs as I read. The Fire provides this extremely well.Newspapers vary by provider. The electronic version of the NY Times has all the words, but is very dry. I miss the breadth of photos and all the colorful ads. The mobile version of the NY Times is actually a much richer experience. In contrast, the Salt Lake Trib offers many photos, but still no fun ads. Magazine format also seems to vary by provider. Some are awkward and do not expand sufficiently. While these are not Fire issues per se, they diminsh the KindleFire experience.Listening to music while reading is a relaxing experience. Bluetooth access for external speakers would have been nice.Viewing Videos is lovely. There seems to be some video memory issue that cause the screen to lockup when you do extended browsing on an app like Netflix. Again, Bluetooth would have been nice for ease of access to external speakers when viewing a movie. A PRIME subscription provides a grand viewing library for no additional cost.Email, including Exchange interface with an app, is easy to quickly access. Email presentation is colorful and sending email is equally easy.Now for annoying.I almost wish there wasn't a browser. The browser is clumsy and awkward. WEB page content frequently misaligns. Links are unresponsive. Completing an on-line form, or purchase, is irritating enough to cause me to shut down the Fire and use my desktop computer. It's the browser component that causes my 4/5 rating. Without the archaic browser interface (if you are old enough, think of Prodigy or AOL on its worst day), my rating would have been 5+Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe fire is the bomb,December 1, 2011By&nbsp;Nancy "nance12020"(new york)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own an IPad and  a iPod  but when the fire came out I wanted one, because of its size and the prime benefits. At first I was lost and did not know how to use the Kindle fire so I wondered if I would enjoy it or not, well let me tell you once I got to know my way around the kindle fire and knew how to get around I became addicted. The Fire is easy to hold and has magnificent color, I love my IPad but I watch Buffy the vampire Slayer on the fire with headphones on and get absorbed in the video. It never snags or messes up during a movie and the seven inch screen is great for viewing and easy to hold. I use my Kindle fire alot I use my IPad but it is heavy to hold for to long so I use each of them for different things. The larger screen on the iPad is great for some things and the seven inch great for others. If you can not bring yourself to spend  five six hundred on a tablet the Kindle Fire will  do many of the things you wanted the iPad for. I am glad I have both and do not like to compare them because they are two totally different items but for the dollar you can not beat the  Fire and I have used and trusted amazon for years and years I  trust amazon and love the benefits Prime offers, the shipping and handling is great in itself but than add on Buffy's  entire collection for free viewing and I am sold. The keyboard is good , but I prefer a larger keyboard very minor complaints all in all. The kindle fire rocks!!!!! NancyHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Fire!!,December 1, 2011By&nbsp;bookworm5775(Wisconsin)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Fire for a week now, and I don't understand the reasons for all the complaining about it. The picture is clear and crisp. The sound is better than expected. It's easy to use, and even though I prefer my 3rd Gen model for reading books, this is an excellent device for e-magazines. My trial issue of Prevention is easy to read, and I will consider other subscriptions in the future. I've also watched some videos, and am satisfied with the quality. It makes treadmill time fly by! I think many of the negative reviews deal with issues other than the product itself, and that's a shame. I'd like to see the tally of reviews dealing ONLY with the quality and functionality of the product! I'm very happy with my purchase, and would recommend this to (almost) anyone, except the hyper-critical curmudgeons who wouldn't like it unless it was free, and kids who don't appreciate and respect electronic devices (although I think kids books would look great on it!).Thanks, Amazon. You done good!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat, easy to use tablet,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;Luna-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Regular john or jane that could care less about the exact specs of a tablet? want a tablet to watch video, read books, play games, and surf the web?This is the tablet you want. I currently own the kindle fire and another high end, and by high end, i mean expensive tablet and let me tell you; time after time im holding the kindle fire.i recommend this tablet for the regular guy or gal that doesnt need an "ipad killer" or a tablet to replace a laptop.for the price you cant beat it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Bang-for-your-buck!,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;KreeH-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire for my wife as a gift, but I have ended up playing with it over the past few days. I am reasonably technical and this is the typical high-tech gift transfer process in our house.My first impressions of the Fire are very, very good - especially for two hundred dollars! The seven inch tablet size seems perfect for me. It offers a much larger viewing area over my Samsung Charge cell phone, yet it can fit in a large vest pocket. The high resolution screen is bright and it's much larger viewing area  allows native viewing of non-mobile webpages without excessive zooming. The screen keyboard is a perfect size allowing error free thumb typing and the response time for selecting applications, web browsing(the new silk browser is very fast!), reading is very snappy. Build quality seems good. It has a solid feel in your hands. The backside is some kind of rubbery plastic, non-slip material. I bought a protective case, but it hasn't been delivered yet.A side benefit is I can easily share Amazon apps between the Fire and our Android cell phones.Feature wise, I don't mind it not having a camera, GPS, or sd slot, but it would of been nice if Amazon had included a blue tooth capability. It would of greatly expanded the Fires ability to utilize external accessories, such as larger speakers, bedside docks, ... I believe having a large number of docking accessories is one of the primary advantages Apple has for the iPod/iPad products.Bottom line: the Kindle Fire is a great product at a great price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire.,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;Morgana C(Spokane, WA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been using my Kindle Fire for a little over a week now.  I am very happy with it.  I have downloaded and used many apps including the generous free app a day from Amazon. I have to say that this is my first tablet.  I know that there are not as many bells and whistles on the Kindle Fire as on the I-Pad. However, for what I want in a computer tablet, the Kindle Fire is perfect.  I use it as a reader.  I use the various news apps. I check on my emails and facebook.  If I am bored, I can watch one of the movies I downloaded from Amazon.  All in all, I am very pleased and happy with my purchase.  I have recommended the Kindle Fire to my friends and recommend it here.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEnjoying it - A little better than expected - Great value/quality,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;Kyle Clay-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had it since November 14th.OMIT this first section as it is not reviewing product, please move to review in second paragraph, only responding to one star grading.BEGGING ONE STAR OBSERVATIONS.First ~ Let me start with a short response to these one star reviews.I gave 5 stars but feel it is about 4.2, however gave five due to the one stars I have read and personally believe it alters the scoring not reflective device. The one star is unrealistic but you are free to put as many or little as you want. The problem is, it doesn't help potential buyers when it is too unrealistic and this goes for grading too high as well.A rebuttal to a few I have read.******"There is no virtual home button" -- I am not sure why they are not seeing it, on every page I have navigated to, there is a ^ sign at the bottom. You click this and up comes a menu and at the left is a little house, it is the home button. Now, there is no manual home button, I think they are comparing to Ipad.******"There is only 6.5 gigs" --- Yes, there is which is more than what the specs said as I read every detail of this item prior to purchasing. "8GB internal (approximately 6GB available for user content)"  And this is why Amazon is touting their cloud. You just don't need the space with the cloud. I have 34 gigs of music that i uploaded too and listening to just fine. I have downloaded my playlists and two movies for on the go just for kicks and I have 2 gigs left. About what I expected.*******" Power button in bad place...I can somewhat go along with this one but it is only when reading portrait view and when doing this you can turn the other way around and it puts the power button on top of device. So not really an issue.*******"Too heavy"........(it is heavier than I thought but the weight is in specs)......14.6 ounces (413 grams).********"Not a good reader, doesn't compare to Kindle ink." Agreed, however, this is a backlit tablet, I think this is to be understood prior to buying which does not help in my reading reviews.********"It is developed for people to buy from Amazon" Yes it is, they are right, they were upfront and transparent on this all along and all reviews stated this prior to release so this isn't helpful in reviewing the product when we all know this ahead of time.********"No instructions"....Yes there is, look in Docs on the fire. There is a document, Kindle Fire Users Guide, complete and excellent.********"Screen not sensitive enough" THis is adjustable in settings. This is a user preference on what is too or not too sensitive.********"this is not an Ipad killer, it is no Ipad." Agreed, but it isn't supposed to be an ipad, It is a 3rd of the cost, let really gonna tap into Ipad market, taps into those who can't afford ipad or doesn't want a tablet that big.I agree with some negative points and will put them in my review. And think that some of these things were cool to post in the review, just don't see how a one star correlates with the things stated that was already known prior to buying and the one star is not representative of a product when the user doesn't keep it more than a few hours and says theres no virtual home button.There is much more but it was ridiculous for me to even address this in my review, I must stop now.ENDBEGIN REVIEW  BEGIN REVIEW  BEGIN REVIEW  BEGIN REVIEWNEGATIVES:*****Sometimes the back button is not responsive. It takes touching it a few times. This pissed me off a little*****It is jerking when too much going on, seems to happen when I was downloading something.*****I was playing a song while surfing net and song jerked a little on occasion. (I suspect the processor.)*****Kindle Fire comes already registered. NOT A GOOD IDEA! I know they meant well, but, please don't do that. UPS just drops stuff on my porch, I never lost anything but if people new these came registered, the dishonest could look  .......for FIREs on front porch, steel them, turn them on and order there self something. Again, Amazon, don't do that.*****I think the power button should have been placed on the side, as in when viewing portrait view and recessed a little. I haven't accidentally turned it off but I see the potential.*****Earbud jack may be better on side as wellPOSITIVES:*****Quality of physical aspects of product are better than expected, feels tight, well built and I like the texture of back and sides.*****Navigation is excellent. Short learning curve as in about a day of playing with it.*****Value! Yes, outstanding value for what you are getting*****Size is perfect. I love it for reading my books and emails. I have surfed the web successfully the main sites automatically go to their mobile version. I can see ok but if you can't see close up, $5 magnifying glasses at a one power maybe 1.5 power helps a LOT.*****Smooth most of the time.*****I like the carousel of items and down below it is favorite apps. This is a good layout. You press and hold an app in apps page, a window comes up and you press add to favorites.*****I like the email here, I have my three accounts and check often.*****I use apps for my news like huffington post, so I have about quit going to the main sites, they are ok on this item though, not bad.*****Video is top notch. Not spectacular, but again, top notch.*****Cloud.....ok, I have moved to the cloud as an experiment, I am finding I like it. I can stop with my anal retentive backups and stop worrying about backups, Let amazon do it. Playing through the cloud has been good, ok, acceptable, at times a little more time between a song selection than I wanted but still, acceptable to be in the cloud. I downloaded all my playlists on my device for extreme speed to next song and downloaded two movies I had bought just as an experiment and I had 2 gigs left. The experiment is going well. I like the cloud and the value of smaller storage.******Device is geared toward Amazon shopping. For the most part, yes, it is a media consumption device and for that is the best I have had. I like that aspect of it.******Handling...can hold in one hand.......I really like this.******Wifi outstanding, hasn't failed or lagged on mine. I do have at&t; uverse though.SUMMARYGreat value for $199. It was hard for me to put down.I am certain some software updates will fine tune the device, however it is top notch shape as is. Great for cloud use and never back up or store your "stuff" again. Quality of product exceeds what I expected. For those who just have to compare it with an ipad? Try not to, its not an Ipad. I have an Ipad. Love it too. But the FIRE is a media consumption device and sized better than Ipad for that purpose, now that is an opinion which will differ from person to person. I rated 5 star but should be 4, I am certain others have overrated as to offset the underrated which averaged to be what I would have graded. It is personal after reading the 1 star reviews, most have merit but the 1 star doesn't seem to correlate with the complaints and some complaints are not correct unless they have a malfunction which is possible.Anywaysssssssss...anyhowwwwww.......a good buy.PeaceHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;D. Rojas(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Got my Kindle fire two days ago, pulled it out of the box turned it onit found my Netgear router i entered my password and it ran an update that tookabout 20 minutes then it rebooted and then,i ran the email program that's was already installed, typed my Microsoft live email account, user name and password and it worked.Watched some videos on it full screen very smooth with clear sound.installed a few games like Angry Birds played back like a small game system.As for the web browser works great in landscape mode you get the full web pageof course you have to scroll up and down with you finger, but works great and smooth.i like that if you double tap the web page it zooms in double tap again it zooms out.Adobe flash works great as well no problems running anything.adobe pdf ebooks looks and runs like it's running on a computer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo Fantastic Experience Who needs the Pads,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Gerald Baker "ctpapasmurf"(Burlington Twp, NJ USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I been reviewing different e-pads vs tablets.I was very close to buying a tablet to be used when I travel, but this Kindle Fire changed that. When I saw this at Staples and talked with the representative about the features and the wifi connection and his view that it now makes it harder to recommend a tablet since this devise came out, I can not agree with him more. At first I was reluctant to open the box because I was still leaning toward the tablets, but when I made the decision to open and see that this Fire does, I was amazed. The colors were vibrant, the ease to find books to read and load onto the reader,I was even watching a TV show that I streamed down on the devise. I will admit that a couple of times there were hesitant movements in the screen when watching the show, but that was only minor. I down loaded a newspaper to read and that too handled easily.  Connecting to my wifi network was fast. The only problem I had so far was not with the devise but with the website for the CLOUD which would not recognize the characters that I typed to start the subscription. I sent and email and hopefully it will be resolved shortly. Also I signed up for Prime as the value and the content I saw were well worth the yearly price. So, so far, so good. I will send an update later after giving the devise a breakin period.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsJust what I needed and what i was looking for...,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Minister DeJuan E Bishop(USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Before purchasing the Fire, I read a number of customer comments, reviews, and seen a number of videos on the net as well: and I'm glad I did.  With this 3 to 4 days worth of research, I was armed with what to and not to expect from the Fire.  Needless to say, the Kindle Fire is perfect for my needs.  Would it be nice to have a few other features, I suppose so.  However if I know I'm buying a Mini-Cooper then I can't expect the riding comfort and features of a Bentley...  It appears the expectation was at a Bentley level for some when Amazon explained right out the gate, it's a Mini-Cooper.If there is anything I would like to see changed is the ebook/epub format.  It's not available on the Kindle and that's a little strange.  Being it's a very popular format for books.  Not to mention how much smaller the file size is compared to other formats that are available.  Yet, this is not a show stopper for me: after placing about 70 or so mp3's, around 10 books, and installed another 7 app's from the store, things are just fine for my use.  I don't need another camera/video recorder, I don't need another gps device, I don't need to have the internet at on this device at every moment of the day.  Between the 3 major places I go, work, home, church: I have all the wireless internet access one can desire.Finally anyone comparing this device to another please do your research and see what it can do for you.  Mainly if the Fire fits your needs: for the price and the features, Amazon has hit a home run...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe more I use it, the more I like it!,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;AllyBa-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm very impressed with the Fire.  I find the web browsing to be nearly as fast as my ipad and expect it to get faster over time as the Silk browser accumulates more data.  The app selection is sufficient for my needs, the size is great for one-handed reading, and the video quality is very good.  I mostly rent and delete movies so the device storage is also not an issue.  The true test is that I often find myself reaching for the Fire over the ipad to look at something online or read a book.  The smaller size is just easier to handle.  Especially given the price difference, that's impressive!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing Gadget!!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Jessica Leigh(Clarksville, TN)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At first I was hesitant about ordering the Fire, since I prefer the E-Ink devices--I read for long periods of time. I didn't know if the back-lit screen was going to bother me. However, I'm surprised that the back-light doesn't even cross my mind while I'm reading, and it makes it super-easy to read while camping after dark! :) Plus, I no longer have to keep the light on while my husband sleeps next to me.The screen size is perfect. Not too big, not too small. I'm able to carry it with me wherever I go without feeling like I'm carrying around a brick. The battery life leaves something to be desired, but that doesn't bother me too much. I just charge it every night while sleeping and I have more than enough battery to last the day without heavy use.The ability to read magazines (and sample many for free!!) is great, and the Android operating system is a dream to navigate! The display is vibrant and clear, and the touch screen is super-sensitive... Just as good as Apple!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt Works with Hulu,Netflix,HBO go,MAX go, Crackle.and more...,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Michael L Ivey(LAKE CITY, FL, US)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got this for one reason, My vast amazon prime movie collection and to stream Tv from the store. So far it runs everything I have thrown at it. Not just runs it, but runs it better than my ipad2 and xoom . I'm still checking out the other features. With a little tweaking all the google apps work including the android market. The browser is a little buggy writing this. Games work very well. Not a ipad replacement but the ipad can't do what this little tab can do. Check out the privacy issues before buying!!! Anyone can buy from your amazon account, so you cant let the kids play with it. I'm sure they will fix that soon.VERY HAPPY, I finally have all my movies and Tv shows in my pocket.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Ashley Bryant(Mesa, AZ)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading about 300 reviews, I went ahead and decided to make the purchase, although I kept my expectations to a minimum. After thoroughly reading the product description and becoming as familiar with the fire as possible so I can be aware of the things it was capable of doing, I decided it would be a good fit for me.This is my first tablet so I'm unfamiliar with them in general and I also don't have the web on my phone and don't have apps available so I'm pretty new to the tablet/app world. I've had my kindle for a few days and I have played with every feature it has to offer. If you are thinking about buying one, and are one of those delusional people who think this is going to replace an ipad or other devices, get your head out of your butt and fully read the product description.That being said, I really love my kindle fire. I was able to easily connect to my wifi, the update went off without a hitch and I was pleasantly surprised at the display. It is very lovely! Rich in color and detail. It had all of my books already loaded onto it, and just like everyone has said so far, everything that you've read, games you play etc is front and center for everyone to see. This isn't a huge problem, unless you have some... interesting items in your library. There are also subcategories at the top you can click on that will bring up only books, only apps, only music, etc. I found the touch to be sensitive enough that you don't have to press too hard on the screen, but not too sensitive. The web browser loaded pretty quickly, Netflix videos and hulu tv shows weren't interrupted by loading pages, and when scrolling down the page I didn't find it "catching" or anything like that. As long as the page is fully loaded scrolling has been pretty smooth. I didn't find typing on the keypad to be too difficult, but I do have slender fingers. Men might have a problem with this, but it just takes some time to get used to. I have found the storage to be sufficient, and I really like using the cloud. With the help of Amazon uploader, I was able to upload my entire itunes library to my cloud and I've downloaded a select few albums to my actual device. Playing games like angry birds, fruit ninja and others are pleasant. The graphics are great, the color is vibrant and there aren't any issues with it lagging.Things I don't like about the fire: the charging cord is short, just about the length as my cell phone's charging cord. If you are the kind of person who gets a headache from too much computer time, this device will bring on a headache.  Although you can turn the brightness of the screen down, it's not the same as e-ink but I've found that holding it at a particluar angle cuts down on the eye strain. The only other negative thing for me, is the fact that viewing magazines on the kindle is frustrating. It's difficult to read and magazines have so many size notes that it's frustrating to take the time to read them with the kindle. So I'll stick to my regular subscription, but this is a very minor inconvenience.All in all, I'm very happy with my purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle Fire,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Karen Rosa "Karen"(Canada)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At this price I never thought I would be able to own a great unit like this.  It is a great reader and a great for surfing the internet.  It is fast and reliable and the battery life is great. Apps are working great.  I am wondering why people are complaining, but then maybe they are used to desk tops?  Or laptops? No complaints what so ever.... take any complaints with a huge lump of salt.  Some people just like to complain about anything in hopes of an audience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFinally, a digital ecosystem the rest of us can afford,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Kid A(Seattle, WA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'll start this review with getting the negative stuff out of the way.Alas, much of the criticism circulating on the web for the Kindle Fire is valid:-The OS of the Kindle Fire is not pitch perfect in sync with the touch controls 100% of the time.  The navigation buttons will fail to register the first time until the device figures out what you are doing.  And the device will produce some lag when when scrolling through menus slowly.  That being said, these are minor annoyances and the overall device still looks and feels like a premium device regardless.  I just hope the final polish on the OS experience is fixed with an OS or firmware update down the road.-The silk web browser is not what it is advertised to be.  Amazon promised very fast browsing through the silk web browser and that was an aspect of the device that I very much looked forward to, but I found it very disappointing.  I've played around with iPhones and iPads and I imagine many people have laid their hands on a demo tablet at some point and used the web browser of those devices.  The Kindle Fire experience just doesn't add up to what the Apple counterparts are capable of doing in terms of web browsing.  And I'll be the first to say that I'm really not impressed with Apple's browsing experience on the iPad and iPhone either.  I think the bottom line is that if a web site isn't designed to run on your device and it's heavy flash and interactive web site, it will fail to produce a good experience on any device except a powerful laptop or computer.  Overall, everyone in the device market fails at producing a good browsing experience on a tablet - unfortunately, Amazon fails a bit more with a browser that constantly lags, takes forever to load, and does not have the power to zoom quickly in and out of web pages and navigate through heavy flash interactive sites.  Hopefully, the Amazon Web Services team can dream up and develop some great technology to blast through web sites with ease, but until then, I'm not holding my breath on what is advertised by Amazon in this area.-The Kindle Fire is a little too heavy for my taste.  You'd never expect it by looking at the small device, but holy cats is this thing heavy.  And that's really just the issue in general: if you have used an e-ink kindle, you want this kindle to be equally as light as other Kindles and there's just this huge difference of expectation when you first hold the device.  When you are engrossed in content, in becomes less of an issue.  After hours of use, however, I find myself wanting to take a break from holding it and I wish it wasn't an impediment to longer sessions with the device.-The backlit screen isn't ideal for reading.  I still use my e-ink kindle for heavy reading and still think it's easier on the eyes and a more solid reading experience.  But with the Kindle Fire, I can listen to music and read at the same time if I'm reading more casual material and I like having that feature.-No HDMI output so that I can watch all of my Amazon video content on my tv.Negatives out of the way, let's move on the good stuff:-The Kindle Fire screen and OS design is beautiful.  The screen never scratches and is super easy to clean up finger marks with a soft cloth. Content like movies, apps, comic books, magazines, etc. look gorgeous on this device.  And the OS is amazingly simple and intuitive to use.  The only drawback is the volume control and battery life gauge become annoying pain points because these controls are always nested in another menu in the device.  In terms of the OS, Amazon should make it easier for users to get access to these two control points.  As a user, I am always adjusting the volume and I like to check how much battery life is left so I can decide whether I need to recharge the device or not.  The little battery icon in the upper right hand corner is just not descriptive enough to let me know when I'm really running low.-Integration with Amazon digital products is incredible.  This is by and large the most impressive feat of this device: the ability to bring all of my Amazon digital content in one place for consumption.  When you get your Kindle Fire, all of the content you've bought from Amazon (music, apps, videos, books, etc.) is stored to the Amazon cloud for easy access and consumption.  You can download any of your purchases from Amazon's cloud to your device at any time and the process is as simple as clicking an icon.  The biggest area of improvement for Amazon here is the ability to store videos from your Prime Amazon Instant Video collection.  The drawback here is that if you want to download any movies or tv shows to your device so that you can watch them on the go, you have to buy the products from the Amazon Instant Video store, which is difficult value proposition from Amazon when I can just get all that content from Hulu or Netflix.  If Amazon wants to remain competitive, they need to offer downloads to all of their instant streaming content and add more of the selection to that Prime service.  I'd be willing to pay more on my Prime subscription if Amazon had all the content that Hulu and Netflix had and I could download it to my Kindle Fire.  The second that happens, it's goodbye Hulu and goodbye Netflix.Other than the video store, the media base of the device runs beautifully. I can read books while listening to my favorite music. Apps execute and look amazing on the device.  Magazines, comic books, and children's books are great, and I expect the functionality in this area to grow and evolve so much more with the launch of this device.I could understand why reviewers might not capitalize Amazon digital integration on this device if they are not Amazon customers and if they don't want to be tied down to one device for their purchases of digital content, but let's not kid ourselves: this device is designed for Amazon customers to consume Amazon retail products from Amazon built stores.  If you love Amazon, you will love this device.  If you are heavily invested in another product from other competitors, you might be disappointed with the device because you probably have never thought of Amazon as a place to shop for digital goods.  This device will change that, but it is also an impossible sell for fanboys of other devices and companies.  I am biased to be an Amazon customer because their digital ecosystem is way more affordable than Apple.  If you're not tied down to a budget with a family, and you can afford Apple products, then you are wasting your time reading this review because you already know this device doesn't fit your needs.  Even if it did, you're probably spending time measuring the nanoseconds it takes to load and run Ninja Fruit on the iPad vs Kindle Fire to try and justify the investment you've made with Apple.  Whatever floats your boat.  I happen to have a lot of Amazon digital content and the Kindle Fire brings it all together into one device and makes it amazingly convenient to consume.  That's my primary use for the Kindle Fire and I love it for that reason alone.-The storefront for each media store is a wonderful experience.  Everything that you'd expect out of the Amazon shopping experience is built into this device and whether you are shopping for apps, books, or videos, the process of finding great content is amazingly simple and easy.  Even the payments and checkout process for buying goods gets out of the way of the device experience so that you can avoid annoyingly long click sessions to ultimately buy what you want with one click (the Kindle Fire is enabled by default with 1-Click purchase settings, but if you don't like that, you can change it).-Applications designed for the Kindle Fire or Android run flawlessly.  This is an area where I hope to see more development, and it's only a matter of time before a drove of developers cash in their Android SDK skills and put them to good use on the Kindle Fire.  The Kindle Fire brings the micro-application market to the mainstream with the Kindle Fire's price point, and when something is designed for Android or the Kindle Fire it works very well.  The Amazon application really is the first case in point, which virtually brings the entire Amazon storefront (digital and physical goods) to the Kindle Fire in a browse experience that works really well for tablets, and in my opinion easily beats the browse experience that I would get by trying to shop Amazon website through any tablet based browser.  Now, I just want to see more high caliber content in Amazon's app store.And that's about my two cents on the Kindle Fire.  If you're looking for a tablet experience that's a fantastic value for a great price, then look no further.  The Kindle Fire is a giant leap forward for digital media consumption and customer convenience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFinally!,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;S. Lee(Maine, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Wow!  I was sure that a "poor" ol' woman like me would never be able to afford to upgrade from my inheritated 1st generation Kindle. This low price eReader has made that a possibility.  Although still new to me, as a computer illiterate android user, I am finding the Fire pretty easy to get around in.  Whispersync and Cloud are still a mystery to me, but the Fire makes it pretty obvious what I need to do next.  During the waiting period from order to release, I researched available products.  While certainly not an iPad, it is better than every other option I looked at.  Affordable, light weight, easy to use, and options galore...I'm very pleased.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent buy for what it was designed for,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Amira-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for the past 3 days now and I absolutely love it. For the price, it's great for what it was designed for.Reading books, streaming videos from Amazon Prime and also listening to music while I read my books. I read books while working out. It keeps me focused on my workouts (cardio) and makes the time go by faster. I have always either bought my own books or end up borrowing books from the local library. I've been contemplating on getting myself a Kindle since I've always loved the feeling of paper in my hand and moving from one page to another.I am glad I made my switch to the Kindle Fire. Buying books is easy and fast and I don't have to wait for it to be delivered to my house. I don't need to park my car to pick up my books from the library and it's convenient for me.Upon receiving my Kindle, I was surprised by the weight. The size is perfect, it is a bit heavier than I expected but it's not a bad thing. The packaging was perfect and I didn't get the Kindle Fire plastered on the box like other reviewers have mentioned. Mine was a simple Amazon packaging in a nice Kindle box.Connection to WiFi was easy. It does not support ad-hoc or peer-to-peer internet connection as I was unable to connect it to my smartphone tethering - again, not a big deal. I have wireless connection at home and am able to get wifi connection at work. I download my books to my device and it's available to read without any wifi connection - perfect for the gym.I don't see any downside to it. I can't compare it to the iPad since I don't have one neither does the iPad interest me. I have a specific usage in mind and I wanted an e-reader - the Kindle Fire is indeed an e-reader on steroids. For the price, nothing beats it. I'm sure Amazon will produce more products that will far exceed the Kindle Fire but for the what they have produced so far, it's excellent.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo easy to use,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jack Merritt-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all I was very impressed with the packaging, although it opened easily, it was secure.  I received my kindle preloaded with some apps and my Amazon account ( I did have to put my password in before getting the first app which was good for security reasons) I was watching Netflixs within minutes of opening the box.  The picture was bright and clear.  I then "borrowed" a book from the library being an Amazon Prime member, this was also a painless process.  The download were extemely quick and effort free.  It is clear that Amazon put forth a great effort to make this device user friendly.  I usually hate to set these devices up but this time it was enjoyable.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon hit a home run with the Kindle Fire!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Pasquale A. Castaldo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was in the market for a tablet and was leaning toward the Samsung Galaxy 10in until I saw the Kindle Fire. Where do I begin. I am a heavy user of an Android smart phone and wanted something bigger to read books, watch movies, play games and surf the web.I also use a laptop but wanted to find something to bridge the size gap between my 2 devices. Well America...listen up...the Kindle Fire is it! The 7 in screen is a perfect size for everything I want to do. I have been an Amazon customer for many years and was already sold on the whole cloud thing but the addition of Prime and the integration with the Kindle Fire is sweet. I have my entire iTunes library in the cloud now and have downloaded loads of books and movies and just love my Kindle Fire. The set up was so quick. When I power it on and see see my name listed and understand that all of my cloud content from years of Android smart phone use was there waiting for me I must say I felt very valued as a customer. Amazon really gets it when it comes to service. Several times a week I get emails from Amazon telling me about the latest Kindle book special on sale or the $1.99 movie deal of the day. When was the last time Apple did that for you? Here's the bottom line. The Kindle Fire is not an iPad killer but you know what? It doesn't need to be. The Amazon eco-system is very strong and the availability of content will keep me very happy for a long time to come. Thank you Amazon you nailed it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire is that good!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Ronnie-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have just purchased the Kindle Fire today at my local Best Buy.  Honestly I couldn't wait to get my hands on one!  I had been shopping around for a tablet for a while now and really didn't want to shell out $500 for the iPad 2.  Then came along the snippets of information on this great device that Amazon is going to release, kept reading reviews, checked out the specs.  The Kindle Fire is just what I was looking for.  Straight out of the box you get a sense of simplicity, you open it and it just says "hello" to you, go ahead and turn me on and enjoy =) It can't get get any better than that.  Videos look great, appstore is awesome, the screen functions very smoothly. The sound is great too!  The unit feels great in the hand, very well built and non-cheap feeling. If you are in the market for a tablet that gives you access to entertainment, social media, internet, email, and just flat out works? do not look any further, get the Kindle Fire, you will be glad you did.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat for price but needs refinement,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;ivo0008-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought this tablet to understand if it would fit my need.  The kindle fire is for the most part everything that is advertised with a few caveats.  I like the design but would like to have had a volume control button since going through the menu to change the volume is more steps than necessary.  The screen is crisp and looks on par with video for the category and netflix and prime videos look good.  However, it sometimes takes too long to register a tap or to zoom in and out.  My overall impression was the the whole experience was a bit sluggish from starting up apps or moving from one step to the next.  The browser is not as fast as advertised though I understand that there needs to be more users to figure out what sites are visited most often to be optimized.  Still, heavy data sites take too long to load.  Flash video is a fine addition but that too takes long to buffer and the quality is not very good with too much jaggedness.  My overall opinion is that the interface needs refinement.  It lacks fluidity going from one screen to another.  I bought this tablet with the hope of utilizing it to read pdf files and mostly media consumption but the limitations from the screen size to the amount of memory, even with the cloud just don't fit my lifestyle.  And one thing that just might be annoying to me is the fact that the tablet is slippery and I have a tough time holding onto it with one hand.  This just might be me but try handling it before purchasing.  Overall, I would consider waiting for some updates before jumping in but I still think it might be worth dropping another hundred dollars or so to get a more powerful and open experience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLight that Fire - I am SO pleasantly surprised !,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;DaBuzz1(Utah)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As an Ipad owner, I really didn't think I would be holding yet another tablet in my hands. But then I got ahold of a Kindle Fire and am hooked.  My Ipad is very functional, but it always feels like I am carrying around a mini notebook.  This Fire is sooo much more compact and convenient, that I pull it out of my coat pocket like it was a second wallet. Kudos - a great product !Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSomething something fire pun,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;R. Dickstein-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It's very simple. If you want an ipad and you can afford it. Go with the ipad. You are not going to be satisfied with the Fire. If you think the Fire can replace your obsession for an ipad, you're forever going to look at the Kindle Fire like the Honda Civic you bought when you had a shot to get a BMW. However, if you don't want to spend $500 on a basic ipad and rather spend around $200, the Fire is definitely a device you should look into.I look at this not as a pro and con post, because my cons are not necessarily cons to you. I look at this as a matter of WANTS and NEEDS. I will list the features that the Kindle Fire does and does not have, things it does well and things it does poorly. At the end, if you have a giant list of "needs" in the section where the Fire is missing, then definitely look at other options for tablets. However, if most of the things the Fire are missing are "wants" or "don't needs" for you, then this tablet might be the right answer.Exterior - First thing you notice about the Fire is it's sleek all black design. The tablet is not too heavy or too thick for you to keep in one hand. Unlike the ipad, it doesn't get too hot after a long period of usage. No camera, no mic, so you won't be able to skype using the device.Display - Currently the Fire only offers a 7 inch display. It is anti reflective and it feels durable. I have no issues with a 7 inch screen but some people might prefer a larger screen to watch videos on.Storage/Cloud - You get a quick sense that Amazon is pushing their cloud drive with the way they set up the Fire storage. Only 8 GBs of storage (probably around 7 GBs with the OS) and no SD card slot for expansion. Their Cloud system is very integrated with the device. Everything you upload to their cloud system pops up on the Fire instantly. The issue with that is you will need a wi-fi connection when you want to access your contents. This situation might make it difficult to use if you travel a lot and won't have many easily accessible wi-fi spots.Interface - This was an area of concern for me. I wouldn't say I am an Apple "fanboy", but I am definitely a big fan of their tablet and iphone interface. The Fire's interface was good, but not great. The apps, music, videos, web were all easy to access, and it's response time is pretty quick compared to some of the other tablet at it's price point like the HP touchpad.Apps - The other concern was the lack of apps for the kindle store. And it seems like Fire definitely is losing the battle here. Half the apps I would have liked on my tablet like mint, bank of America, integrated Facebook and twitter, and yelp are all currently missing from the Fire. To get to facebook or twitter, the best option currently is to access it through the browser.E-Reader - Like the ipad, I can't read on the Fire due to it's backlight. Hurts my eyes way too much if I stare at it for a long period of time. I'm glad I kept my Kindle 3 around. If the backlight doesn't bother you too much, then this is a pretty good e-reader. The page turns respond to your touch well, and you can skip chapters and sections pretty quickly. Amazon also gives you the option of borrowing 1 book per month, which is pretty cool for people who want to try some books for free.MP3/Video - Another aspect that I was worried about. But it plays music and video very well. If you have Amazon Prime (which I highly recommend), you can stream TV shows and Movies very easily with the Fire. The videos are in good quality, the sound from the speakers are loud and clear. The only issue I had was that there wasn't an easy way to turn up or down the volume while watching a video.Amazon is actually taking a $10 loss with every Kindle Fire sold. This is because they are banking of the Fire users to spend some extra money on the extra Amazon features like cloud and amazon prime to fully utilize the Fire and help Amazon turn an overall profit on the Fire.Sure, the Fire is definitely going to lack the "cool" factor that the ipad brings. With the ipad, you can be that "cool" guy at the airport or the "cool" guy walking around with the ipad. But if you just want a tablet to check e-mails and surf the web with, and don't really want to spend $500 or more on an ipad, the Kindle Fire is definitely the right tablet for you.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent product, awesome when price factored in,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Robinson(Oxford, MI United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am writing as a veteran iPad user who will never give that up.  There was no issue of comparison in my mind because 1) Amazon has never called the Fire a tablet!  (Be clear on that, people!  This seems to be escaping WAY too many reviewers.)  2) I am not looking to replace the iPad (I use it for much more than just watching media and playing games; it is my mini-office), so weighing them against each other is useless.  I mention only because I want it understood that as a user of the $800 version of Apple's product, I have high standards and expectations.  I know what is possible from a handheld device such as this.  And forgetting the low price point for a moment, the Kindle Fire rocks all by itself.a) The screen has amazing resolution, and the movie and videos I have watched so far were highly satisfactory.  Memory seems sufficient also, so no pauses or skips in streaming.  Viewing experience is very good, or as good as it can be on a 7" screen.b) The Silk browser operates extremely well, and if its performance improves through repeated usage as suggested, I can only imagine better things ahead.c) Sound quality through headphones is outstanding, with no less clarity than my iPod.d) Email app is very easy to navigate, and far nicer than many cellphones.e) Unit as a whole is extremely intuitive for anyone who has handled a tablet or similar device. The menu bar is right there when one wants it and tucks nicely away as if it knows automatically when it is not wanted.f) App store is adequate for me.  Not having had an Android phone (I am a Blackberry fan), I have not been spoiled with all the Android world can offer. So any limitations from Amazon's app store would not bother me much, and from what I have read, may not bother anyone with the technical knowledge to load their apps in themselves.  I understand much customization is possible with this device.  Even if not, one can certainly guess that the app offerings will continue to expand.WHY I WILL NOT BE KEEPING IT FOR MY OWN USE BUT HOPE HUBBY WILL WANT ITEssentially, what I was looking for was an eReader with some bells and whistles.  I like my Nook, but am disenchanted with B&N;'s pricing structure and Nook product marketing.  I also enjoy listening to music when I read (especially matching the age of the music to the historical setting of the book where possible - I am strange that way LOL!), and I thought it would be fun in between chapters to check my e-mail or Facebook with the device already in my hand.  While the Fire is not marketed as an e-reader, one could reasonably think that, bearing the Kindle name, it would still offer this as a primary and well-developed feature.  Forget reading in direct sunlight, I can't even read clearly in my office with distant fluorescent lighting.  Of course, it would be COMPLETELY unrealistic to suppose that a gorgeous, sturdy, full-color screen would also facilitate a stellar, glare-free reading experience, and I was prepared for that in advance. I just wanted to see for myself exactly where my point of compromise would be, and now I know.  My Kindle Touch 3G has already been ordered.  (Bless Amazon and their six-month no-interest financing policy, to say nothing of their return policy!)Now it IS time to discuss price.  Not a tablet per se - perhaps a large screen smartphone on steroids - however you want to classify it, the Fire is an absolute gem at $200.  Had Amazon not taken the business gamble of selling these devices at a loss, it would still be tempting at $350-400. For the non-Apple addict, or for iPad users who may not feel they get their money's worth from their tablet, purchasing this is a no-brainer. After all, you don't have to have a Cadillac to get around in style and comfort, and this is a terrific product for any media consumer.  I think my smartphone-less, tablet-less hubby will love it. ;-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love it!!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Lee A Lopez-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I couldn't wait to receive my Kindle Fire. I compared so many tablets and I do have a Kindle 2nd generation and I am not disappointed in my choice to order this for my husband and myself. I am not sure why people had issues connecting to Wi-Fi, out of the box and in less than 2 minutes it was hooked up to my home network. I love the colors and that my books are already on there.I didn't want some apps so I READ the USER GUIDE and discovered how to erase them. I wouldn't recommend this for children as a reading device, for one it is too expensive and yes no parental blocks. But just to let them play a game or keep busy while on a long trip or waiting at the doctor's office, no issue.I love the games and the web, I do have Amazon Prime as I order alot from this web site, and have yet to watch a video on the Fire but my husband and kids have and enjoyed it immensely. I do enjoy the ease of using it however, we will be purchasing some stylus's for web browsing as it is difficult to click on some things. As for the one click ordering, I have always deleted my cc info from my account so no accidental purchases when surfing the site.All in all, it is sooo awesome and I am so happy with this device. I would highly recommend it and the only con I can see is the need to order a stylus. Otherwise, definitely 5 stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCompact tablet geared towards the Amazonians,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Nguyen Hoang Nguyen-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This tablet is well built and has a solid construction.  The rubber back makes it easy to grip and gives it that protection while lying on its back.  The gorilla glass provides further protection in the front so you can drop it in your bag without feeling scared of a scratched screen. I like the width of the tablet which makes it easy to hold with one hand.  This tablet is restricted to certain task but it does what it is built for really well.  It does 90% of the things that I would use a tablet for, without the high cost or large form factor.  I just got it for a day so I will update this as I encounter problems or more commentsHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFire is better than I anticipated,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;ILoveGadgets "Gadgets always fit"(Florence, SC)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I, like a lot of others, received mine today.  There was an issue upon trying to register because it didn't have this specific device linked to my account in advance.  Once that was straight, I started testing.  It pulled an update nearly immediately.  I tested watching an Amazon prime video - a documentary that I had seen before and it performed flawlessly.  I tested playing one of my MP3 songs from the Cloud and it performed flawlessly.  The audio for both was quite good for a tablet.  I did some browsing and found 1 site that didn't want to scroll until I zoomed in a bit and then it worked great.  I tested the email app and I like it - nice and clean interface.  The HTML-format version of an email I opened rendered flawlessly.  This is actually performing better than I thought it would!  I tested some of my apps and they also performed flawlessly.  I love all kinds of gadgets and have more than I would care to share and this one will be one I don't regret because it wasn't as expensive as my other grown-up toys and I believe will provide a lot of fun and entertainment.  I haven't tested a magazine yet but I will along with a newspaper or two and see how that goes.  I also have the Nook Tablet (I said I love gadgets).  They called me today to pick it up early.  I sold some other gadgets, including my Nook Color, to spring for that since it wasn't in my plans.  The two tablets are a different experience based on my short time with the Fire.  My excuse is I would rather have 2 (or more) e-readers than a home stuffed with books.I have zero expectations of perfection for any 1st gen gadget and zero expectations for perfection from anything that humans make.  What I do have is the ability to appreciate how far we have come from the days when a tiny program was run from a cassette tape attached to a monitor.So far, this bad boy works great and does everything I had expected and actually more!!(Remember that when testing streaming video or music, your wifi performance is very important to the outcome.  I have a repeater to ensure perfect coverage and strength everywhere.)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for non-apple fanboys!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;bocapil(San Francisco, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I find hilarious all of the one star reviews from people claiming that the fire does not hold a candle to the iPad. Are you silly fanboys afraid of a little competition? By bashing the kindle fire without perhaps even handle one you are only showing how scared you are. The firewas never intended to compete with the iPad in the first place as its specs cannot match those of the iPad but at least when it comes to content consumption (books, video, music) it is a serious threat to the entire apple ecosystem. Throw in the fact that it will be rooted/hacked in no time by the android developer community and you have a great little tablet.And for the record, I own an iPad 2 as well as an iPhone 4S, Samsung Galaxy Tab 7 plus and Nexus S so I now the pros and cons of both OS'esHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

7 of 8 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm in love!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;RachelSophie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Update:Now that I have been using the device for about a month I can say that I truly love it. It is easy and fun to use and I find that I love browsing the web and watching movies. The wifi works really well for me in places with a good connection (obviously it does not work well when the wifi is bad, just like a laptop).I think the keyboard is the best touchscreen keyboard I have ever used. I have an iPhone and I think this is laid out much better. I love that's the autocorrect gives many suggestions and there is the ability to store words. Also, it is great that you can hold down any of the top keys and get numbers without having to always switch to the symbols page.The device feels sturdy and I love the texture of the back. Overall it feels like a really well made product.As others have said, at times the screen can be a bit unresponsive. I don't find this to happen when typing only when trying to exit out of a youtube video. It is a valid complaint but overall it does not bug me much if I have to click something twice.I am going on a long plane ride next week and I cant wait ti fill to fill with movie for the trip.Overall I am a very proud Fire owner and truly recommend it for anyone looking for a small Internet and entertainment device.----My partner surprised me with a Fire today knowing how badly I wanted one and it has been a joy. It is just as intuitive as expected and feels very solid. I was impressed by the speed of the browser and the ability to watch embedded video. Overall I am really impressed and would definitely recommend it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing for what its supposed to do. Most negative reviews idiotic,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;Theshipster-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Look, here's the bottom line. If you actually took the time to read up on this device, watch explanations of it, or research at all you would know what it is designed for and what it excels at. The problem is, many of the people giving negative reviews of the Kindle Fire DIDN'T do that. Or it's also the case that their problems with it are foolish or idiotic.Let me spell out for you what this device is for:1. If you want to watch netflix on the go, this device is amazing.2. If you want to play some games or let your kids play games, this device is amazing.3. If you want to listen to music around the house or in coffee shops (wifi hotspots), this device is amazing.4. If you want to rent movies/buy movies from amazon instant, this device is amazing.5. If you want a portable tablet, this device is amazing.6. If you want to quickly check email, facebook, or twitter. This device is amazing.7. If you want to watch things like youtube videos, this device is amazing.8. If you want to have an e-reader you can hold in one hand with good quality, this device is amazing.Things it's not designed for:1. Heavy internet use.2. Android marketplace.3. Customization4. Storing lots of music and movies "On the device" (uses cloud storage)5. Media creation (no mic, cameras, etc)You MUST understand these things before buying it. The negative reviews usually fall under 3 categories of people: 1. The technologically illiterate who didn't research before buying. 2. The android/android market fan boys who are angry for no reason. Or 3. The Apple fan boys comparing it to their Ipad's.Let me tell you, this device is amazign for what it is supposed to do. I love it. I play some games, watch a movie or tv show, check my facebook, watch youtube videos, read a book, and I'm happy. This is what it is made for. It doesn't replace a laptop, it's an extra media device. It doesn't kill an Ipad either, because it's not supposed to. It's $199, and for that price it's basically a no brainer if you have netflix and a no brainer period if you don't already have a tablet. $199 is like nothing. Just buy it already.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPrerelease buyer -six weeks later,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;K. Andrew(Roswell, NM United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off, I'm writing this on the fire.Secondly, I have an iPad too. And a blackberry playbook, and a kindle keyboard. (Well, had. I gave it to my mother in law.) And just today I was shown a nextbook. (Don't get that btw.)Pros: It is a great single person device. It learns what you like and makes recommendations like the amazon website itself. It come w/prime for a month, making it like netflix. It is super responsive--those who say different befuddle me. What are they doing differently from me? Its an ANDROID--HELLO! While some apps offend me with mediocrity (try the weather channel app on the fire, then the iPad; where's the eagle feather on angry birds, or birdday) this gives you freedom to make this device your own.I use the web on the fire almost exclusively. I only pick up my laptop when I have to--the last website I had to do that do was autozone.com. I couldn't pick my car without finishing on a blank green screen.Battery is awesome. It blows a laptop away, and runs a close race with other tablets. Gave to a pack of kids to play angry birds and 6 hours later they gave up, not the fire.Cons: I had some stern conversations with my daughter about buying something, and I still help her get to the prime movies. They really need to fix that.I wish it did epubs. Amazon likely wont allow that. My religious literature is epub and wont be on the amazon store, so my iPad does that well. It lands in ibooks and allows highlighting, notes, etc.I wish it was Multi person friendly. The latest update is a large step toward that but I really need a pin or password on buying stuff.So in closing I gave it 5 stars because the nextbook and (b)lackberry playbooks, well, suck. The iPad is 10 inches and doesn't fit in my pocket, so it gets left more than taken. I'm a 7 inch guy, no pun intended.I do miss my keyboard kindle. No glare on it. Nothing but a reader either.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsExpectations matter,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;dd9000(Berkeley, Ca USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Background:I've never owned a tablet or e-reader.  Apple products have always been a no-go for me because at least 90% of the web sites I visit use Flash.  And I've never seen the point in spending $400-$800 for a tablet with limited functionality when I could buy a laptop (admittedly low-end, clunky, unsexy) with more functionality and expandability for the same amount of money.Why the Fire?Price, price, price, price and price.  When I looked at the price of the Fire, and the one month free Prime, and compared that to the potential advantages of a tablet for me, well, it was pretty much a no-brainer.iPAD OwnersFirst, I envy you the disposable income that lets you buy multiple tablets.Second, if the KF doesn't compare to the iPad, I can only ask if you read the description or purchaser comments before buying.  It's smaller and at least half the price.  What did you expect?Third, one word: Flash.  At least 90% of the web sites I visit regularly use Flash, often for such mundane tasks as site navigation or text display.  I happen to hate Flash for a number of reasons, but a tablet that doesn't support Flash would be essentially useless for me.  OTOH, the KF or Silk don't seem to support Microsoft's Silverlight.Expectations MatterIt should go without saying that expectations matter.  If you want a camera, this isn't for you.  3G would be nice - my U-verse DSL/Wi-Fi is not exactly a speed demon -  but I'm not willing to pay yet another monthly fee for a modest increase in speed  or accessibility.Microphone: why?So what did I think a tablet might offer that would make it an attractive alternative, at the right price, to a low-end laptop?1) The ability to quickly look something up on the web.  I turn off computers when they are not in use and even my near-top-of-the-line desktop takes 5 minutes to go from a cold-start to the Windows 7 desktop (via login and loading of startup apps).  So when I'm reading a magazine or book (the real kind) and suddenly want to check something on the web, well, it's a hassle.  And why turn it on if I'm going to turn it off in 5 minutes?2) The ability to engage in recreational computer activities from a comfortable location (sofa, lounger, bed).  Specifically, I have become interested in a number of free education web sites. But I spend enough time working at my desktop computer not to want to spend any more time there than necessary.  But if I could access these sites from a comfy chair? Well, that would be appealing. And it would be nice to be able to play games (yes, Angry Birds), access internet radio stations or otherwise waste time comfortably.PRELIMINARIESCriticisms - Caveat Emptor:Before buying, I read reviews (esp. the negative ones), on Amazon and elsewhere, and checked the forums. Some of the criticisms appear accurate, some are user-specific, and some are inaccurate.  I have done my best to verify that my criticisms are based on fact not ignorance or inexperience, but, please, if something I say is a deal-breaker, research it on your own before taking my word for it.PackagingSome users complained that the pre-registered (linked to your Amazon account) KFs came in boxes with Kindle Fire prominently displayed (an invitation to theft).  I ordered the KF and the USB cable together.  Both came in plain boxes inside a larger plain box.  (I recently had two different vendors ship a DVR in the manufacturer's box - talk about theft potential.)If however, you are concerned, you can order the KF as a gift and register it when you get it.  NOTE: I'm not sure if it is possible to use an unregistered KF, but at the very least, if you don't register it, you are bound to lose some functionality.Essential Accessories:Get a cover!  The KF arrives naked as a baby, in a very flimsy, tightly fitting plastic envelope.  Even if you are not sure you will keep the KF, get a cover, even a real cheap one, at the same time.USB cable - if you don't already have a USB cable (USB 2.0 A male to Micro B) and do own a computer, you might want to order one if you have, for example, music or e-books you want to transfer.USABILITYThis is not for your computer-phobic Uncle Harry whose cell phone does nothing but make phone calls.  The documentation, online and on the KF, is minimal.  Amazon appears to assume that people know how to pinch, swipe, tap, double tap.  The built-in documentaion only describes the icons, doesn't display them.I think the videos on Amazon's support page (http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html/ref=hp_k6_updatesi?nodeId=200769050) should run automatically the first time one turns on the Kindle.  They are, perhaps not surprisingly, more useful than the written documentation.Power ButtonThere have been a lot of complaints about the power button being on the bottom where it can be easily and  accidentally pressed.  True, but all you have to do is turn the KF 180 degrees with the power button at the top.  It works just fine for almost everything (only the opening swipe and a few web pages won't turn around) - and I don't know why Amazon didn't make that the default.Note: If you just press the power button, it goes into a "semi-sleep" state so that pressing it again will bring you to the swipe arrow at once.  If, however, you hold down the power button and tell it to shut down, it will take about 30 seconds to start back up.  I'm not sure what the consequences for battery power are for the "semi-sleep" option.Touch Screen GremlinI'm convinced there is a gremlin in the touch screen.When I'm reading a book, the merest hint of a whisper of a touch will turn a page backwards or forwards.On the web, when I want a double tap to work, it does some times and doesn't other times.  On the other hand, when I just want to scroll down a page and not click on anything, something I pass will get activated and off I go to a screen I didn't want.  Pages display in desktop mode and then because of something I don't even know I've down get switched to mobile mode.  When I want to increase or decrease the size of a page, I may have to double tap or pinch multiple times.  When I don't want the page display size or type to change, it does.  Obviously, I'm touching or doing something to cause these unwanted actions to occur, but the problem is that I haven't figured out how to control the use of the touch screen so that it does only what I want when I want it.NavigationI'm obviously spoiled by years of multi-window displays and the W7 task bar.  On the KF, it seems that the most frequent things I do are press the back arrow or the Home icon.  To get from one app or book or function to another,  you must get the Home icon, touch it, select the option you want on the home screen, then do something with that option. It has become really annoying.Wireless ConnectivityThe strength of the Wi-Fi signal in our home varies significantly on the KF from second to second.  It appears that any change in position or even where one is holding the KF can affect the strength of the Wi-Fi signal. It's steady only when the KF is near to the router.  It's difficult to say if the problem is with the KF, or if we need to buy access points in order to get the best possible signals for the KF throughout our home.BOOKSI'm not a fan of e-books for all the well-known reasons we "real book" lovers give.  So I will comment only on a couple of usability issues.Books downloaded from sites such as Project Gutenberg show up in the Docs section rather than the Books section.  That's OK.  What is annoying is that they show up on the carousel with just a big blue icon and no title.  (For testing, I set up Kindle on my PC.  The same big blue icon appears but, importantly, with title.)I find the KF too heavy to hold comfortably while reading.  Now, if I want to read a hardback that's bigger and heavier than the KF, I might consider the KF as an alternative, but since most of my books are paperbacks, that's not likely to be a frequent occurrence.I generally read while flopped on a sofa or in bed.  It is not uncommon for a book to land on the floor with little negative consequences other than, perhaps, a crimped cover.  While reading with the KF, it would be only a small exaggeration to say that not a minute passed without my worrying that I would accidentally drop the KF with consequences all too awful to contemplate.  In bed, I build pillow "guards"  to prevent its falling on the floor.Minute shifts in position cause the KF to switch quickly from portrait to landscape mode.  (While on the Web, it takes real effort to create the orientation shift.)  However, there is a setting in the options at the top that lets you lock the KF's orientation. And, as I mentioned above re the Touch Screen, it is at times altogether too sensitive with pages turning as if by magic and other times unresponsive to any kind of touch.No page numbers.  That's right. Not supported.  Maybe e-readers get used to the location numbers and % completed, but I find it disconcerting.  There is also no indicator for how/where to tap to move forward or back. In fact, you can tap or swipe almost anywhere, but a bottom of page indicator would be a nice addition.  And I don't understand why the KF can't give one the sense of a 3-dimensional object - as even Zinio's awful reader or The New Yorker's similarly awkward reader can do.In addition, others have reported that certain functions available on the Kindle Touch, such as X-Ray and the ability to buy foreign-language dictionaries, are not available on the KF.  This strikes me as more than a little bizarre, as if Amazon had decided that the ability to read books on the KF was a secondary or tertiary reason for buying it.Library CheckoutWorks fine but you must have Wi-Fi.  You can download directly to the KF or to a computer and then transfer the books to the KF via USB.  It's a multi-step process: library to book selection to Overdrive to Amazon but not too onerous. Its usefulness will depend on the e-book catalog of the library you have access to and the popularity of e-books.  My library has around 500 books in various genres and about 2/5 were available for a lending period of 21 days.  There were as many as five holds on the most popular books.OFFICE TOOLSThe KF comes with Quickoffice, but I was surprised to discover that when I clicked on Quickword, I was presented with a screen with two options: Internal Storage and Recent Documents.  The app installed on the KF can read existing docs (that you transfer, presumably, one way or another) but not create new ones.  For that, you must upgrade.I simply can't imagine using the KF keyboard to do anything more extensive than tweet 140 characters, so I didn't spend any time here.Email - you can set up multiple email accounts.  Gmail is a snap.  To set up an AT&T; account, I had to check my Thunderbird to get all the system settings right. I've not spent much time yet with the email since I rely on Thunderbird to manage multiple email accounts.SILKBackendAlmost all the attention paid to Silk has been on its backend, its split processing. Technically and theoretically, the model makes sense.  The KF has limited storage relative to other tablets.  And the idea that Amazon's servers will be faster than local processors because web pages will already be in cache is technically sound. But, the performance depends on a balance of factors: enough, but not too many (probably not an issue unless the KF is astoundingly successful),  users accessing the same pages.  Users with fast internet connections who visit the less-traveled web sites may do better on their own. To turn off the Amazon "backend", when you are in Silk, click the menu item at the bottom select options and uncheck the "Accelerate page loading" under the Advanced section near the bottom of the page.Front EndThe best that can be said for it is that none, zip, of the existing browsers on the market (inc. IE) need worry about losing market share.  It is a disaster in almost every respect and bears about as much resemblance to a modern browser as the Gopher Client did to Mosaic (Netscape's predecessor) .Note: I do not expect the functionality of Firefox or even the lesser usability of Chrome but really.  It takes 3 steps to bookmark a web page. and the default order of display of the bookmarks appears to be either (I've not used it enough yet to tell) the most frequently accessed or the most recently accessed.You can't order bookmarks alphabetically or group them into folders (categories).  This won't matter if the web browsing you do with the KF is limited to a dozen or so web sites.  If, like me, you visit a lot more than that, it is painful. (Hint: To go from thumbnails to a list, you need to tap in the blank search box. You can speed things up by typing the name of the web site.)You can't import or export bookmarks.  It took me close to an hour to manually enter the 20 sites I most wanted access to from the KF.  And then I had to go searching through my documentation to find the IDs and passwords for most of them since, of course, my password manager won't work under Silk.  Being able to export bookmarks &amp; then re-import them is important if one accidentally or purposefully unregisters your KF.  (See section on security).  I've not been able to locate any add-ons for Silk akin to Firefox's enormous library..  Since I visit a number of foreign language sites, I really miss the ability to use Google to translate a phrase or a page.Opera Mobile is available for the KF.  Firefox is not yet approved by Amazon and Ive found no way to get it onto the KF. Easy Installer can't find it even though I downloaded it to the Downloads section.  I suspect, based on the Opera Mobile .apk file that East Installer expects the .apk file to be in an sdcard directory which I can't see or access.  Apparently one can get Firefox to work on the KF by using an Android smart phone with an SD card.  Google for instructions on how to do it. I've seen the process referred to as sideloading.TabsI thought there was no way to open a page in a new tab.  But if you press down on the link, a popup window gives you the option.  It's slow but maybe there's no other way to do it on a tablet?  (I should have watched Amazon's video on using Silk instead of just jumping in on my own.)Page displayYou can set options for the KF to use its best judgment, mobile or desktop formatting.  I prefer the desktop formatting.  There is an option under the Advanced Settings called "Website settings" but it does not seem to have been implemented yet.  If you choose to rely on KF's "autoformatting" or find the mobile setting best for most of your web sites, you may find that some web sites offer a mobile/desktop option somewhere on the page (check the top and bottom).  This is one area where the 7-inch size works against the KF.  It is too large for the mobile setting to be appropriate and too small for the desktop view to be easy to read.  I do a lot of pinching and double tapping.PDF SupportWhen you click on a PDF link on a web site, the PDF is downloaded. Tap at the bottom of the screen to bring up the menu of options and select "Downloads" to find it. I strongly, strongly, strongly, strongly recommend getting the free Adobe Reader app.  I found Silk's default PDF reader inadequate to say the least.SECURITY and SHARINGThe KF is not designed to be shared.  There is a "Locked Screen Password" option under More/Security that will limit access to the KF (you are prompted for the password when you swipe the entry screen), but will also add to the time it takes you get into the KF especially if you choose a strong password.The KF is tightly integrated to your Amazon account.  You register the KF to your Amazon account.  You can manage the KF from your Amazon account.  Books, for example, that you have on your KF appear in your Amazon "Manage Kindle" section, so if you don't want somebody else to see what you are reading, you are out of luck.In short, there is no way to set up the KF for multiple users.  This is NOT as some critics have suggested an easy thing to fix.Consider what Amazon would have to do:Have an "administrator" on the KF who can assign userids and passwords.Let multiple userids have access to the same Amazon account (say for credit card access) but, in this case, set up the "Manage Kindle" function on the Amazon account to prompt for a userid/password and, of course, limit the books and apps available to each user on the KF itself.In addition, it should allow each userid on the KF to be associated with its own distinct Amazon account.Then there is Amazon Prime.  If you have multiple users on the Kindle, each with a separate Amazon account, would you need an Amazon Prime for each (assuming you want the benefits of Prime)?  N.B. I've read that Amazon Prime can be shared for shipping but not for videos.In short, Amazon could develop software to make sharing safe &amp; practical but it is not in the company's bottom-line interests to do so.  It wants families to buy multiple Kindle Fires.I do not know how this compares to the security on other tablets.AMAZON PRIMEThe 1 month free trial was a nice add-on and smart marketing because it pretty much forces people to set up 1-Click since you need 1-Click to borrow books or get free Apps.  See next section.Limitations: the free 2-day shipping applies only, as far as I can tell, to products shipped directly from Amazon rather than from 3rd parties.  So the value of the $70/year for fast shipping will depend on your shopping habits.Second, you get some free TV shows and movies with Amazon Prime on the KF but the number is sufficiently small, limited, and, quite frankly, bizarrely displayed (no way to alphabetize that I could find), that is appears to be mainly a loss-leader, designed to encourage you to buy content. (It is more than a little annoying to scroll through the TV section, for example, and see what appear to be multiple instances of the same program but which turn out to be, when selected, different seasons or episodes.  OTOH, you get the first 6 seasons of Buffy for free!)1-CLICK1-Click for the KF is a different animal from 1-Click for your standard Amazon account.You can turn your Amazon account's 1-Click On or Off.Some members have commented that there is a "turn off 1-click for mobile" option, but I found no such option on my account and wonder if by "mobile" what is meant is a smart phone.You have to set up 1-Click separately for the KF and once you have done that, there is no way to turn it off for the KF.  And you cannot set up 1-Click to work with a gift card on the KF which would be one way of preventing a shopping spree.Unfortunately, you need 1-Click to get even free apps from the Kindle Store and to borrow library books.According to an e-mail I got from an Amazon rep, this is because those services are available only to U.S. residents and the credit card associated with the 1-Click proves one is a resident.  I find this an absurd explanation.  The KF is tightly linked to one's Amazon account, and if Amazon can offer credit card options for the KF 1-Click, it can surely ascertain that at least one of one's credit cards has a U.S. address.  (Apparently, Amazon wouldn't mind if you had other credit cards with addresses outside the U.S.?)Re gift cards: if your Amazon account has a gift card balance, 1-Click on the Kindle will default first to the gift card balance before starting on the credit card.  I don't know if you get any kind of warning when the gift card balance goes to 0.This is major security problem. And not, as some critics have suggested, a problem only for families with ill-behaved and untrustworthy children.  The KF, by its very size, is designed to be portable. Forget it someplace, leave it lying around and anybody could go on a shopping spree. If you are going to take it away from home, at a minimum set up a "Lock Screen Password" with a very strong password. (This, unfortunately, makes it less easy to simply pick up the KF, turn it on and start using it.)WorkaroundI added a credit card I rarely use to my Amazon account, then changed the credit card associated with the Kindle Fire to that one. Then I deleted that card from my Amazon account.  1-Click for Kindle disappeared.  Apps I had "bought" (they were free but all turned up on said credit card) still worked.  This is a pain.  But if you have or can get a credit card with a very, very, very low limit, it might be a half-baked solution.  If you have only one credit card and have turned on 1-Click for the KF, wait until all your purchases have hit the credit card, delete it, then put it back after your 1-Click for the KF is gone.I am hoping that Amazon doesn't realize some people are doing this and make it impossible to delete the credit card associated with 1-Click for the KF  rather than just switch it to another credit card.  If Amazon does something like this, we will learn something important about the company.Summary:If you've never owned a tablet, this is a good one to start with - if only because of the price.  You're very likely  to find it useful or fun in one way or another -  provided you understand its limits before you buy -  at least enough to justify the price - and by using it, you will figure out 1) whether you really want or need a tablet and 2) what features or functions are important to you.Bottom Line:I am giving it only 3 stars for 3 reasons:1. The security (esp. 1-Click)  is inadequate for a device that some buyers will want to share and that is designed to be extremely portable.2. The lack of support for Firefox as an alternative browser.3. Usability.  There are just too many annoyances, esp. re the Touch Screen and navigation.However, I am keeping it.  I find myself using it much less frequently than when I first got it, but as it is my first tablet purchase, I still think the trade-off between functionality and price lands on the positive side of the scale.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAbsolutely Great!!!!,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Sally Rogers-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Got mine and have been playing with it.  I am so glad I bought this.  I didn't want to pay the high price of some of the tablets out there.  I wanted something I could just fit in a purse and easy to hold in bed, or sitting on couch.  This is great.  I don't know why so many compare it to the Ipad.  It isn't to be used as a computer, it is to be used as a tablet.  Which is exactly what I wanted.  I wanted a bigger version of my droid phone (which I love)...this fits the bill.  It does what my phone can do (except can't use as a phone, or can't use in my car since there is no wi-fi in my car.  It is a great size and I cannot believe how great the picture quality is.  I am so impressed with this tablet, I took to work to show off.  It is not an IPad!!!!  If you want an ipad, then spend the money for an ipad.  This is a tablet....and for the price, I bet you could not find better.  I think the picture quality is better than my sister's tablet that was $200 more.  So far every internet site has come up very fast.  I mainly go on facebook, springpad, amazon, gmail and yahoomail.  My daughter was playing a game and it was extremely fast.  Streaming from netflix was a little on the slow side, but it is slow on my computer, too...so it is probably my internet provider.  The only thing I would definitely change is the ability to change the amount of memory, but I will just deal with that.....I don't plan on putting my music on this, like my phone, so that will free up more download space.I think you will think this is great, as long as you aren't trying to use it as a computer, but as a fun entertainment-droid based unit.  Also, someone did mention this before, but to read a book at night, you can easily change the background to black and the letters to white, or use sepia tone, it makes it a much better reading experience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSuperb,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Tristan Ng(Pocatello, ID)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have never owned any eBooks in my life and Kindle Fire never disappoint me! The touch screen is very responsive and the web browser is very fast. I haven't found anything that I don't like on this device yet. The best thing is the price is 2 times less than an iPad! I would give it 10 stars if I were able to :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

12 of 15 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsamazing. in every way.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;aidan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle fire is amazing. Its fast, very fast.Its not an ipad, but that's not a bad thing. Kindles were made as eReaders, this is an eReader, with added stuff. Its made for reading books, which it does wonderfully. Sure, the battery doesn't last as long as i'd hoped it would, and its not 3g, nor does it have gps, a microphone, or a camera. But you can watch movies, tv shows, play games, and browse the web on something that was made for books, and you can do all of that very fast.No microphone, so what? Most phones have that capability. No camera, well good. Who would want to walk around recording things with something this big, would look a little silly.Cloud storage is amazing, I absolutely love this feature. And a free paid app a day, that might not seem like much to everyone, but when you're on a strict budget, that's wonderful.Videos look amazing. And the sound is very good.The power button is the only thing about it that I can say is a downfall, everything else is just perfect.I will be recommending this to all of my friends and family.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMore than what I'd hoped for.,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;M. Rupp(Eau Claire, WI)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Firstly, I just want to start off by saying that this device ought to be researched before people purchase it; the reason being is that too many people give it poor reviews for things they could have known about before hand.  I am a college student with a laptop and just a plain old cell phone (not a smart phone).  I mention this because I am just an average joe consumer in terms of tech gadgets.  Having researched the Kindle Fire, I thought that for 199 dollars, it was a great deal for what it could do. After receiving the Fire, I was very impressed with its capabilities.The display is absolutely gorgeous and the Web Browser is great.  I have great loading speeds and the browser actually lets you choose in many cases if you want the tablet or normal version of their webpage but in almost every case, the web pages look how they would on a pc.  The Netflix, Hulu, and Pandora apps are great free starter apps along with tons more stuff.  So far, I've downloaded like twenty apps and paid for about three or four of them.  Not to mention the six books I got that were free to download.  I can't stress enough how crisp the display is; videos from Netflix come in with amazing clarity.So obviously, no, the Fire is not an Ipad 2.  It's also not 500 dollars.  If what you're looking for is a tablet to use with wifi as a general reading/entertainment device, I highly recommend the Fire.  The memory space could be larger of course but I don't really use my Kindle for music at all as I have a Ipod Nano but I do use it for video.  You could store something like four DVD quality movies on it at a time (which would be more than enough for a flight) or about one or two HD movies.  As I said though, I use my Kindle to watch Netflix and Hulu, as well as surf the web, read the news, check the weather, and other similar tasks.  The Kindle Fire has been an absolute blast so far and I really only have two critiques of it.Firstly, when you buy the Fire, buy a micro USB to USB cable with it if you don't have one already; they are like five bucks and you need one to download movies to your Kindle unless you only use the Amazon video feature.  But to the actual critique, the Fire can only read MP4 video format.  This means that any video you want to store on the Kindle has to be in MP4.  This is sort of a hassle but there are free converters like freemake that allow you to convert videos to MP4's if you want to save them on the Fire.  I'm not a 'give me convenience or give me death' kind of guy so for me this wasn't a big deal, but I would love to be able to save movies from the web directly to my Kindle (which you still can so long as they're MP4).  Don't worry about streaming videos, they all work fine.My only other criticism is the lack of ability to configure the home start up page.  The Fire currently saves the app history right on the home menu so whatever you've opened last will pop up, along with the previous app and so on.  What you can do though, for people worried about their browser history for the web, is to hit the little cog up in the right corner, select more, select applications, and finally select the Amazon browser.  From here you can clear the cache and all data which essentially deletes the web history.  Conversely, try not looking at porn if you don't want your wife/girlfriend/kids to discover you.  But as far as the home menu is concerned, I was hoping I could set up the menu to show what I wanted instead of just showing my app history by default.  There may even be a way to fix this but as of yet I haven't found out how.  I have heard the Fire is supposed to have some big updates coming in late December that may even fix a thing or two including what I mentioned.If what you're looking for is an affordable Tablet for leisure/entertainment purposes, I highly recommend the Fire.  I got it about 1 1/2 weeks ago and I still get excited when I come home and remember I have my Fire on the nightstand.  I wake up to read the news in bed with it and watch an episode on Netflix before I go to bed at night.  I love it and if you want a really fun, affordable tablet then feel confident in buying a Fire.  Just make sure you've done you're research on it so you know what it does and does not do.  If you buy ANYTHING before researching it and it doesn't do what you thought, that's on you, not the product.  If you've researched it and it sounds like a great device, I would say pull the trigger for sure.  I love the Fire and it exceeded my expectations.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

14 of 18 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery clean and fast interface,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Anthony Hick(puyallup, wa United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Very cool device. I think Amazon hit all the right points with this. The interface is clean and easy to use. It has easy access to everything with out a few clicks. The form factor is perfect for this device, and the price point is amazing. You know Amazon is losing money on every Kindle Fire they sell, and I think it was a good move for them to cut out all the unnecessary hardware. I have gps and a camera on my phone, why would I need it on a tablet?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsProblem with Parental Controls,May 4, 2012By&nbsp;Big Don-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Last night while using my Kindle Fire, a popup said that the Parental Controls are on and I could not access the internet.  The popup had a place to enter my password to get on the internet.  Since I did not have a password and had not ever set up parental controls there was no way to bypass this request.  Additionally, the fine print under the password request box said that if you forgot your password you will have to do a factory reset of your entire Kindle Fire and register it again and download and set up all your apps again.  Not wanting to believe that was my only option, thinking there must be another option like all other computers if you forget your password  I contacted Amazon technical services. The people at tech services were very helpful and courteous but told me there is no other options which meant I had to go through the factory reset and reset up everything on my Kindle Fire.  This morning I got an email from Amazon advising me that they had updated my Kindle with parental controls and that if you put in the wrong password 4 times you must do a factory reset.  Word to the Kindle user, check and see if you have parental controls on your Kindle.  Make sure you create a password for the parental controls, if you don't you may run into the same problem I had with the popup. If you don't have a parental control password, you will need to perform a factory reset on your Kindle Fire to access the internet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhy so many complaints?,December 25, 2011By&nbsp;Abby H.-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my KF for about a day. I downloaded the 6.2 upgrade, even though I had no issues with the previous software. So far, it has been a very neat little device. I will mostly use it for Internet, Pandora, books, and the occasional game. Hooked up to wireless high speed, it fulfilled these purposes.The KF is an AMAZON Kindle to be used with amazon media services. If you use the device for amazon purposes and the occasional app, you will have no trouble with a lack of memory. Once you finish reading a book, put it in your cloud storage and off of your device. I have everything I need downloaded, and still have 6 GB of space left.Bottom line, if you're looking for something to read books, jam to Pandora, check facebook, play a few games, and breeze around the web, this is for you. If you're looking for something to replace a laptop or other more sophisticated device, this isn't for you.I'm a college student that loves technology. In my life I have owned an iPod touch, K3, Dell laptop, Compaq laptop, HP Mini 10, HTC Desire, and a BlackBerry. When people were talking about how easy it was to use, I thought I may want more of a challenge. That is not the case. The KF is not easy-boring, it's user friendly.As for the people comparing it to an iPad. It is not one, nor will it ever be. I've played around with my dad's girlfriend's iPad and I actually prefer the User friendliness and size of the KF. It's the perfect size for me. I'd recommend it any time. Kudos, Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoved it before and it's even better now,December 23, 2011By&nbsp;Mary B.(California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is a device I've wanted for years. I travel -- and none of the video options for the airplane really worked for me. The laptop died too quickly, other devices were awkward, heavy, whatever. The Fire is fabulous. The image quality is great and the battery lasts a loooong time. I downloaded season two of Mad Men and was happier on a long-haul flight to Frankfurt and then beyond than I've been in a long time.When I got back home I tried out the instant videos. Arrested Development and other shows are free if you have Amazon Prime. I'm not a big home media center kind of person... there's one TV and I don't have cable. I just don't want the complication. I don't  want a bunch of devices, wires, remotes, things to dust, manuals to read. I don't record shows to watch later. All of that is more time and effort than I've ever wanted to put into it. But now suddenly I can be in any room I want, watching things I'd like to watch for as long as I feel like doing that -- and all I've added to my life is something the size of a paperback. This is sort of scary transformative.I launched the browser and checked a few news sites and it worked just fine. I haven't tried email. I'm getting used to the idea that I can delete my downloaded Mad Men and they'll still be up there in my library in the cloud. I'm starting to want to put other things up there, too.I didn't have a mini-USB cable so I uploaded my entire iTunes library (which isn't huge compared to some people's) to the Amazon cloud and then downloaded it to the Fire. It was simple and pretty quick. It's great. The sound with earbuds is good.I'm very happy. If Monsoon Wedding and The Best of Youth were available for downloading, life would be complete.The software update the other day made the touch screen much more sensitive -- so my one quibble, not that this was major, has been corrected.It's my favorite toy in a very long time.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAMAZING!,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;Candleholder-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am so happy with the Kindle Fire.  It is fast and easy and simple to use.  I'm not a techie (and I'm a senior citizen), so I didn't want to buy anything that would be too complicated.  As soon as I connected to my wireless router, that beautiful Kindle Fire started running smooth and fast wherever I wanted to go.  The web is fast, watching videos is fast, downloading apps is fast, and my previously purchased Kindle books were already there and ready for me.  I LOVE this thing.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love this thing!,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;chel rs-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let me start off by saying that I just wasn't into the whole tablet idea because I didn't think I would like reading on it. However, I have found that I love this tablet and I love the way it works. The backlit idea of reading isn't as bad as I thought it would be and so that has been a major surprise. I am amazed at how quickly it downloads with the wifi. My husband gave me this Christmas present early and I am so thankful. I also like the idea that it isn't huge, that is why I personally would never want an ipad. But that's just me so I love the size and I love the fact that I can watch a movie if I want to. I may not do it often but the whole product is exactly as I would expect from Amazon. I prefer Amazon to almost any other online source so I knew that if I did do something like this it would have to be from Amazon. Great device and I would recommend this to anyone!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect,December 19, 2011By&nbsp;C. Preston(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I prefer this over an iPad.  It's small and it works well.  I have not had any problems with it.  The cloud drive works well. I've watched a few movies on it through Netflix and Amazon's instant video.  I've used it to check email, listen to Pandora radio, etc..The sound is good. I have no complaints.  It's a good deal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is AWESOME!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Regina Sharp "ya fiction freaks"(Cincinnati, Ohio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This tablet is everything that I thought it would be and more. I LOVE it! I knew it would be great, because Amazon has great products. I now have the Kindle Keyboard and the Fire. They sync together, so I can read the same books on either system.I have the NookColor and it in NO WAY compares to the Kindle Fire. If you are contemplating which one to get, I suggest that you get the FIRE! You will not regret it. My Nookcolor is going on EBAY now. It seems like a piece of junk now that I have the fire. Amazon prices for apps, and books are cheaper than B&N; AND the Amazon prime for instant movies and TV shows are awesome.Way to go Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starskindle fire,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;kelli-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very disappointed with the Fire. Maybe I expected too much. It is very slow while on the Internet and my screen gets stuck and recently it has just shut down for no reason. I would not recommend it to anyone who expects to have reliable Internet usage. I am hoping to return it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Tablet for the Price (Non-Techy Review),December 1, 2011By&nbsp;PixelPi-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This review is for ordinary folks: I am not a gadget geek or computer whiz -- and this is my first experience with a tablet device. If you're looking for technical details, business uses, and/or comparison with other devices, this review is not for you. If you've never owned a tablet and are reasonably familiar with PC use (email, surfing the web, games, etc.), you've come to the right place!I've been using my Fire now for about 2 weeks, and truthfully I very little negative to say about it. A tablet has been on my mind for quite a while, but the steep prices held me back -- until the Kindle Fire was announced at what seemed to be a bargain-basement price. I couldn't resist, and I'm very happy that I took the plunge.There is no paper user manual included with the Fire. Using the device straight out of the box is fairly intuitive for people (like me) who feel comfortable using PC email, browsing, and game software packages, and there is an online users manual. The display is crisp, colors terrific, and volume adequate. The screen is very glossy and reading in direct sunlight is difficult. Although it's considerably heavier than the Kindle, the Fire handles easily. It does run a bit warm after being used for a prolonged period of time, but has not overheated yet. Battery life is good, but runs down fairly quickly when wi-fi is being used. It recharges quickly, however.  If you've never used a computer at all, the lack of documentation might be problematic. The Fire does not have a camera, which is fine by me as I use a digital camera for photographs.There are plenty of apps available and many of them are free. I have about 30 apps loaded on my Fire, and all of them run with no problems. Setting up magazine apps to read my paper subscriptions online was easy, and they allow new dimensions for magazine articles such as video demos of recipes and crafts, etc. There are more game apps than I could ever want or use. There are also productivity apps available for the Fire such as word processing and spreadsheets, which I personally don't need.The Fire does require users to have their own wi-fi connection or a wi-fi connection at a "hot spot" -- there is no free 3G (as with the Kindle), and I would be surprised if 3G is ever included with the Fire. I think Amazon would find it prohibitively expensive to offer free 3G for customers who would be downloading large files. The Kindle has free 3G because even the most expensive e-books only take seconds to download, in contrast to the movies and web sites accessible to Fire users.I am very satisfied with the Fire and very happy to have spent $199 for such a good product. I would definitely reccomend it to others (and have already purchased another Fire as a gift).I have used the Amazon Prime membership to view streaming videos, and for me the variety and quality of movies and television shows is more than adequate. The streaming is smooth and seamless, with volume levels easily adjustable and plenty loud without earbuds.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBetter than expected!!,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;luka-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got this kindle today, it was a present for my girlfriend. We loved it! I have read most of reviews, both positive and negative, and I did not expect an ipad 2 for 200$, but I got a better device than it seemed before.The screen is just as good as on ipad, touch works great. It's very sensitive, very responsive. The look and feel are both great, the quality is excellent. Keyboard works very good to. Size is just great, big enough for comfortable screen, small enough to be comfortable usage while holding in hand. (which ipad hasn't, I have big hands and still ipad is more comfortable when used on table or sth.I had one big concern about the memory issue, but it was solved in an unusual way. I, myself, have an ipod 4th gen. and I knew that 6.5 gigs (that's what you get for usage on kindle, not 5 gig. as some review-s said) isn't enough for apps, but soon I found out, that the same games, same apps for android are MUCH SMALLER in size than for ios. That was a pleasure, because after installing dozens of apps, she still has lots of space. Plus you get cloud and free prime membership for month.So, considering all the cos and pros, I, personally think, that this is a great device. The price is very good to. I don't say cheap or expensive, I mean GOOD price. It's just how much the kindle should cost, after paying 200$, most of users will be pleasingly surprised with this device.AAAAaaaaand one more thing, Kindle Fire looks COOLER than ipad :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI can't put it down,November 26, 2011By&nbsp;Paul-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)What a great little tool this has been.  I purchased it thinking that I wanted an e-reader, but occasionally surfing the net would be a nice touch for just a bit more.  In the week I've had it, I have fired up my laptop just once.  I didn't realize everything I could do on this.  I check email, update my facebook status, surf the net, and of course read and play games.  It has everything I wanted and quite a bit I wasn't expecting.  I'm so glad I got this device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsBest purchase of the year,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;D. J.(Florida)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I already own Kindle 3G with the keyboard, so this was an upgrade for me. Compared to other tablets, Kindle Fire is amazing. There aren't too many apps to chose from (at least not the ones I would personally use) but the number is growing fast. The price of $199 is decent, again, compared to others. When you add the fact that you can get millions of books in the Kindle format (and a lot of them for free), browse the Internet, check email, weather, and do practically everything you can do on a regular computer, I highly recommend this item. Amazon also offers stellar customer service in general, especially when it comes to Kindle support. Some people complain about Kindle not having a camera. The fact is, Kindle is a reader, not a digital camera or a smartphone, so why some people think it needs a camera, I'll never understand. The only thing that sort of bugs me is that Amazon has decided not to include a USB cable with it - it has to be purchased separately, which is why I'm giving it 4 stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsE-Reader Pumped on Steriods.,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Steven M. Pospisil "TimeBandit"(orange,ca)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is not an Ipad...I repeat this is not an Ipad! Comparisons should never be drawn between the two. I am highly satisfied with my Kindle Fire! The price is great! The quality of the product is awesome! If you want an I Pad, than go buy one. This is the Kindle Fire and if you love to read, use the internet, search for apps and most of all shop Amazon. Than the Fire is for you!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire, I'm Lovin' It!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Cashcraft "Ashcraft_Designs"(Michigan, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After nearly a week of almost non-stop use, I can genuinely say that I am lovin' my Kindle Fire. It's not a perfect tablet, but I hope a future update will address what I feel are the most annoying issues, i.e., the carousel of recently viewed apps/items. Although I've already taken care of this minor annoyance by side-loading the Ice Cream Sandwich Launcher App, no rooting required.On the Kindle Fire video playback is very good (although I do have a good internet connection, up to 6.0 Mbps) I've viewed videos via Amazon VOD, Netflix, and Hulu Plus Apps, video streaming is smooth and crisp with very little buffering during playback and I can adjust the volume control during video playback without significant difficulty.Where the Kindle Fire really shines, in my opinion, is during game playing, my favorites games so far are Angry Birds, Cut the Rope, and Random Mahjong, the graphics are beautiful, and the touch screen is very responsive, which makes playing games a whole lot of fun!A couple days ago, I install the Skifta App and I can now stream mp3 files from my network-attached storage device, desktop and laptop computers, and I've had no problem with Wi-Fi connectivity and/or weak signal strength. While reading for long periods of time (2-3 hours) I do prefer the E-Ink display of my Kindle Keyboard, but reading eBooks on the Kindle Fire is still a good experience.I am surprise at how much I enjoy accessing my email accounts with the Kindle Fire. Overall, the Fire has met all of my expectations; I wanted a small tablet that would fit in a purse, with quick and easy access to eBooks, music, video, and games, at a great price point, and the Kindle Fire delivers.Admittedly, my review may be influence by my frequent use of Amazon's ecosystem, as a Prime member, I make numerous purchases each year from Amazon; I buy eBooks, music, videos, electronics, and lots of other stuff. For me, purchasing the Kindle Fire was a no-brainer and I'm lovin' it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing for $199 ! and you can Sideload Andriod Apps !,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jonthomasdesigns(Usa)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It is a Thing of beauty, feels great in your hand , automatically sets up you amazon account on the fire the first time you turn it on (if you give it as a gift deactivate it on your amazon.com settings !!) With Prime movie playback is fast and looks great ... Amazon Cloud player also works really fast and has all my music in the cloud , plays back immediatelyIf you have an Android phone you are probably wondering why they do not have the entire Android App store like on your phone .. Well you do not need it because you can Copy those apps right off your phone onto the Fire and they work Flawless !!Just look up "How to Sideload apps onto amazon fire" in your browser .. you do not need to hack it at all , nor Root it .. it only took me a free app and 2 mins to get all my Marketplace apps set upThis is a great Present for anyone or even yourself !Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is on Fire,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Randy-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased the Kindle Fire for my wife last night and she loves it. Before I continue with the review I want to say the we already own the first generation iPad.  I know comparing the two is like comparing apples to oranges but after 24 hours with the Kindle Fire I would take it over the iPad any day. I hear some of the complaints that it only has 8GB of hard drive space or it only has 512MB but it didn't affect my decision to buy it instead of buying the Nook tablet. There are some key items that make the Kindle Fire the logical choice over the Nook Tablet.1. Amazon Cloud Storage (5GB Free) but unlimited storage for all digital items you purchase from Amazon2. Amazon Cloud Music player3. Amazon Music is in MP3 format so you never have to convert from AAC to MP3 as with Apples proprietary format4. Reads Word, PowerPoint, Excel and PDF documents.  You can even email yourself your docs to view on the Kindle. You get a Kindle email account (jdoe@kindle.com) that you email your documents to and then you SYNC your Kindle Fire to the cloud and it downloads the attachments.5. Amazon is like your one stop shopping location.  You can buy anything from Amazon.The only thing that really irritated me was when my wife attempted to buy a subscription to a magazine it would not allow us to download it to the Kindle Fire because the Fire had an update.  In order to update the Fire I had to go to my computer and download it. I then had to connect my Kindle Fire to the computer via USB (USB cable does not come with the Fire).  It just happens that the same connector on my myTouch 4G phone is the same for the Kindle Fire so it was easy to connect to the computer.  I'm not sure why Amazon doesn't allow the update to be downloaded straight from the Internet to the Kindle.  Maybe in future updates this will be allowed.Hope this helps those trying to decide between the Fire and Nook.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExactly what I expected,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;K. Borrup-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is an excellent device and great buy.  I read a couple of negative reviews to see what people were saying... wifi issues... book lending through Overdrive.... they seemed to amount to people who did not know what they were doing.  I opened up the box, turned it on and went through the startup, inputing my wifi passcode etc.  It connected and immediately updated itself.  No problems.  I was off and running.  I immediately borrowed a book from Amazon and took in a couple of trial subscriptions.  Book reading was what I expected it to be, like a kindle.  I encountered no issues.  I then read an issue of Discover and was happy to see that I could toggle between the text view and publication view (to see the published form), great!  I was also happy to see that Puffle Launch was free on the Amazon market on Saturday, my kids loved it!  I was also able to utilize Amazon's cloud and play the music that I previously upload from my home computer to the service.  I made a playlist of X-mas music and set it on a bookshelf on the Kindle homescreen and can just click it and have it play through my stereo (connected via the headphone jack).  My kids also had me buy the old Super Friends with the Legion of Doom, so we streamed this to the Kindle flawlessly.As far as email.  I did set up my Gmail account to read it, but to be honest I have an Android phone and mainly use my phone for this task.  For true productivity (word processing etc.) I use my home computer, a PC.This is a great entertainment device, books, magazines, music, movies, apps.  That's exactly what I bought it for!So why 5 stars?  Content is still in some way priced to high to allow for unfettered consumption. For example the NY Times is too pricey at $20/month.  For $7.99 a month I'll get the Times electronically but for $20 a month I'll look to free content on the web, NY Times headlines, CNN, MSNBC, USA Today etc.....  Amazon, exert a little influence on them, perhaps a special deal for Prime members?  The same goes for Amazon's video service, it needs more current offerings for $1.99, too many are at $3.99.  For that amount, I'll drive to Redbox.  If you want be to buy a lot of content, decrease prices.  You need to price things low enough so that I don't have to think about it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire my new digital best friend.,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;szidlon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm not a  techno geek, but I feel I'm computer literate and gadget savvy enough to write a review.  I've had my Fire since November 15th and it's been completely hassle free.  It took me longer to open the box than to actually set it up and the box was easy to open.  I have tried all the facets that were advertised to come with the product and they all work fine. Which leads me to my next comment, why do people expect that they, and they alone, might expect to receive options with their Fire that are clearly not in the description, such as a camera, microphone, 3G, etc.  I personally always read and understand clearly what I am supposed to get with my product and I am not disappointed. Actually, it's much more than I anticipated. So far, I have not spent a lot of money on books, I've been downloading mostly free books and  ninety nine cent'ers but I did happily take advantage of the Lending Library and quickly read through my prize. The free Prime movies stream effortlessly on my home wifi and the books I chose to download are on my device, in literally seconds, never more than a minute.  Will I be miffed if they release an updated Fire after the first of next year, nope.  I will simply hand off my current Fire to a deserving person and move on to the new one if it has enough features to make me feel it's worth the investment.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIf you're looking for a color reading device, look no further,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Cosmin Nicolaescu-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Pros:- great for reading books with graphics &amp; formulas- simple navigation- smooth integration with Amazon marketplaceCons:- heavier than ideal- limited number of apps (not all Android apps will be available on the Fire)Disclosure: I bought this device as a *reading* device primarily, in particular for reading non-fiction books which contain graphics &amp; formulas and where color is useful. I did *not* want or expect a tablet, and thus was not interested in the features which are not present on this device. If you want a _tablet_, then I would recommend getting an iPad.UNWRAPPINGThe box contains mainly two pieces: the device and the charging cable. The device is pre-registered to your account, however it requires an initial sync to download all the content. I received mine on 11/16, which is when a lot of people also received theirs. I easily connected it to my Wi-Fi, but when it came to synchronizing everything, the Amazon servers seemed overloaded and that entire process took around 30-45 minutes, during which time I couldn't do much on the device other than browsing. That being said, I expect the experience to be very smooth once the rush dies down.SOFTWARE EXPERIENCEThe software is very minimalistic (which I consider a positive). The global settings can be accessed from the top of the screen, and the contextual options are accessed through the bottom. The home screen contains tabs for the main functionality (reviewed below), the carousel and the favorites. The carousel animation is smooth, although I found the value of its existence rather limited. I've read on other reviews that people are worried about the privacy aspects of having everything you've accessed recently  available and not editable, but personally that doesn't bother me. I just haven't used it. The integration with the Amazon Store is extremely smooth - every page contains a link to the store, drilled down into the specific area you were exploring (books, movies, apps etc.). In order to make this experience smooth, 1-click purchases get enabled, which does make it challenging if you want children to use this device, or if you're sharing the device. From a security perspective, you can add a passcode on the lock screen (which I strongly recommend), but that's about it. As far as typing goes, the keyboard is probably on par with other tablet devices out there, but I found the auto-correct being less complete than I'm used to, but I probably just got spoiled with my WP7.HARDWAREThe device is a little heavier than I'd like, and it's definitely not as polished as the other Kindles. That being said, it's a nice size, and fits nicely in your hands. It's lighter than the iPad, so you can actually hold it like a book. The controls (power button, headphones &amp; USB port) are on the bottom, and while some people mentioned turning off the device accidentally, I've never had that happened. I credit that to the cover, which has one of the "hooks" next to the button, thus making it harder to hit accidentally. The battery is what I would expect - for my usage, I have charged it once in three days. Personally, as long as the device lasts more than one day, it doesn't bother me. Obviously the charge time will not last as long as the eInk Kindles.BOOKSThis is the primary reason I got this: I read a lot of non-fiction books, which previously looked horrible on the eInk Kindle. Doing a side-by-side comparison with the iPad, the Fire is easier to read. For reading a book for a few hours (2-3) at a time, the Fire works out great. If you typically read books for longer period of times, it will most likely strain your eyes, so get one of the eInk Kindles. I have not yet read outside in direct sunlight, but I suspect it will have some issues. Purchasing books is very easy, accessing them is intuitive, flipping through the pages is smooth, highlighting &amp; notes can easily be added, and your latest location is synchronized across all your Kindle devices/applications. Technical books &amp; PDFs look great, and you can easily pinch zoom to get better clarity.MAGAZINESThe selection of magazines on Amazon is pretty large, and again, they make it very easy to subscribe. You get one 14-day trial, and most of the subscriptions are between $1.49-$4.99 per month. Due to the screen size, the books "look" better on the iPad, but I didn't find that readability is affected since I can easily pinch zoom and read the article. The only thing I found missing is that you cannot add notes to magazines, which is something supported on books.MOVIESPrime membership gives you free *streaming* to a lot of movies and shows. Purchasing will give you local movies for offline viewing. I watched a couple of HD movies, which was very smooth. I expect with time the library will grow in size.APPSNot all Android apps are supported on the Fire (yet). There's a pretty wide selection of apps &amp; games, which can easily be purchased and installed as expected. The apps that are pre-loaded cannot be removed, and they include Facebook, Email, IMDB, Weather. The built-in Email app supports most providers (Gmail, Yahoo, Hotmail etc.), as well as general POP3 &amp; IMAP. Exchange is not supported yet, but you can get the Enhanced Email app for free which does have it. Apps can be pinned just like books on the home screen.BROWSINGThe browser is pretty simple as well. It would be nice to be able to hide the top bar, but again you can pinch zoom. Some people have complained about the loading time for pages, but I haven't noticed that as an issue, although I have not compared it side-by-side with an iPad. I suspect with time, based on the algorithms in Silk, the load time will improve.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsDisappointed,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;East Coast Reader-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm still debating whether the bugs are worth it for the price.Touch screen sensitivity is awful, whether reading a book or surfing the web. If you ever used an iPad or an iPhone, they function seamlessly.  Ifind myself touching the screen over and over again to get it to register.It already froze up several times.Reading a magazine was not nearly as good as advertised - zooming is slow, and at times the content was blurry.Book display is supposed to look like books a shelf, but it actually looks more like depressing cheap 1970s basement paneling - no way that I can tell to change the ugly wallpaper.Web surfing is just plain slow, and this was specifically advertised as being fast!Lack of external volume control is a problem.The actual Amazon app won't take my password - I typed it in correctly over and over and over again and it keeps saying its wrong!! The actual Amazon app on the Kindle fire is buggy????  Are you kidding me?I don't think this thing is ready for prime time...so disappointed. I don't know if it was rushed out for the holidays or what.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for kids,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Jillgadget-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought 4 of these for Christmas presents for my 4 grandchildren.( 2 1/2 up to 7 years old) They currently all fight over my Ipad even the 2 year old. The price point allowed me to be able to buy 4.  I opened and played with it to make sure the kindle fire was what I assumed it would be.  It started up immediately and updated software quickly.  Takes a bit of time to get use to where everything is, but you do that with everything you buy.  I downloaded about 30 apps (all but 2 were free) for the kids; which I am very happy with.  looked at instant movie real quick and worked fine.  The back is rubberized which I felt was impressive, your hands did not slip.  Touch was responsive and the web browser worked quickly.My main concern was making sure the kids could not order content that cost money.  There is an area in the app store when unchecked will force a password to continue.  Works for me!This Kindle Fire is going to be a HIT for Christmas.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNo Worries!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Happy Teacher-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading review after review, I was a little worried that the Fire might not live up to the hype.  The following (and the fact that I already own every kindle ever made) was initially causing my finger to hover over the One Click order button:1.  Slow Touch Response - Not an issue at all for me.  I have actually experienced the opposite.  The Fire is very responsive and easy to navigate.2.  Low Speaker Volume - Very nice volume in my opinion.  The level is just right for a one person listener/viewer and slightly too loud on certain video streams.  If I want blaring speakers, I'll fire up the HDTV/entertainment system.3.  Snagging video stream - Completely the opposite!  This bad girl streams faster than my Blu Ray player (which is "wired) and my Smart TV.  Picture and color are AMAZING!  (For a moment, I actually felt like I could pluck Mr. Darcy out of P &amp; P.  Sadly, it didn't happen and was a good reminder that this was truly just a video.)4.  No Privacy- This was a little scary for me b/c I have a nine year old and am a big fan of trashy romance novels...yes, that's right...I can admit it.  :)  Yes, if you are Cloud connected, every racy, digitized "hot hunk" purchase you've ever made will be there for all to see.  HOWEVER, all you need do is disconnect from the Cloud (turn off your wireless) and clear your recent reads.  It's as simple as that.  Then, you can only leave Dr. Seuss and the Ben 10 movie on the "shelf" for the little ones.  (I have a long standing "no internet purchasing" rule for my irresponsible offspring so there is no need for him to soar into the cloud anyway.)5.  Do I really need another Kindle?  YES!!!  I'm stuck on a long car ride- I don't want to do my taxes or create an Excel spreadsheet!  I want to listen to my music, play a movie or two, and read my trashy romance novels on one device that does not require packing.  That's it- nothing more.So, Apple, keep your "nutritious peel" which costs a fortune.  I'll just take the sweet applesauce Kindle is dishing out and spend the extra cash on a dirt bike for my son this Christmas.  Money well spent!  Thanks, Amazon!  :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat First Web tablet - excellent movie watching.,May 8, 2012By&nbsp;LarryMarrs-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The web browsing is fast.  The ability to watch a bunch of TV shows and movies for free if one is an Amazon prime member is awesome.  Please keep adding selections.One Major Con - CLOSE CAPTIONS are an absolute must for people with any amount of hearing issues.  Please make closed caption on streamed video from Amazon Prime a high priority to provide.  I need to watch with head phones and the sound turned all the way up.  When music plays on videos it is way too loud but dialogue is tough to understand unless sound is on MAX.  I've been watching TV with captions for years and always get a greater understanding of the presentation if the words can be read while watching.Good first cut of product from Lab126 Congrats!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat Kindle, so-so Tablet, still a great value.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Tim Jones(Chantilly, VA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm still trying to decide what I think...PROS:* It's a nice piece of equipment; feels solid and you can tell it has a high build grade* The picture is great.* It's pretty fast.  Slightly faster than my phone opening and closing apps and right on par with the ipad. Scrolling isn't as smooth as the ipad, but it's not bad by any means.* Access to Amazon is great.  Newspapers, magazines, books, comic books and video media all look awesome.  It loads your media from the cloud really quickly, almost like it's stored on your device, I was really impressed.CONS:* A little too much Amazon and not enough Android.o The user interface doesn't look anything like Android.  The Kindle UI isn't bad and it's easy enough to maneuver, but the focus is on the media from Amazon and I find that a little annoying.  It looks like they have attempted to completely cut google out of the picture.* The app market is limited.o I knew that it was going to be limited to the Amazon app store, but I didn't realize that they were missing so many apps that I use (espn fantasy football, baseball, directv remote, slingbox, hbo go just to name a few), they don't even have a native Facebook, Twitter or Gmail application (they have an email app, but it doesn't integrate your contacts or calendar and it's imap not push email).  I guess they are expecting you to use the web browser to access that stuff, but that's inefficient if you ask me.  People are not going to be thrilled with no facebook or twitter apps so I'm hoping they figure that one out quickly.It took me a couple of hours, but I was able to find a way to get all the apps I want, but it's not exactly an easy process.  I had to download a program on my cell phone that backed up the programs onto my sd card, email myself the backup, save the program to my kindle fire, download a program onto my fire that allowed me to explore the files and finally open and install the programs.  So at the end of the day I have the apps, but as soon as they update, I'll need to do that process all over again - that will get old quick.  The icons for the programs don't look great (blown up and look fuzzy) because they are not designed for a 7 inch screen.  However, the apps themselves look great.I'm hoping that Amazon will expand their app store quickly, but it's likely they just don't want apps that are not geared to run on the fire.  If they sell enough fires the developers will fix this eventually.  The new android operating system should also help things along eventually because the new operating system (4.0) is designed for tablets and phones.Bottom line, it's a kindle with some tablet features.  I was hoping for a tablet with some kindle features, so I'd be lying if I said I wasn't a little disappointed.  That being said, it's an awesome kindle so I'll live.Eventually I'll get a full fledged 10 inch tablet with a wireless data phone, but I'm waiting to see how the tablet war falls out.  Right now the kindle is a good appetizer.For $199 it's still a steal, but you might have to get a little bit techie if you want all the apps you're use to on your phone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Device.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jack-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is a fantastic product. Any review that gives the Kindle bad marks comparing to an Ipad  is missing the point entirely. The Kindle Fire is less than  half the price so comparing it to an Ipad is like comparing a Honda Civic to a Cadillac. Of course the Ipad has more features than the Kindle Fire, If you really want to video chat and use a word processor on a tablet (why would you?) by all means shell out $300 more for the bare bones Ipad, I'll keep my money. The Kindle Fire is also far more practical as a mobile media device, an Ipad is a pretty huge device, all those extra features and that huge battery life come at a price. You can't hold the Ipad with one hand and you sure ain't gonna slip it in coat pocket like you can with the Kindle ( or the Nook Tablet ). The Ipad is a great device, but I'm not gonna carry a pound and a half around with me all day just so I can surf the web or read a magazine. Carrying the Kindle Fire around is just like carrying one more book, it's not gonna be the biggest, heaviest thing you're carrying like the Ipad is. The Nook Tablet seems to be a solid tablet as well, I owned a Nook Color and liked it quite well. When it came down to one or the other I chose the Fire because I want to own my movies and music and deal with one content provider. With the Nook tablet to watch a movie, your gonna need WiFi and a Netflix account, to listen to music, your gonna need to download music from a computer or listen to Pandora, does me no good to have that big memory on the Nook Tablet if I can't buy and download music and movies directly. When it comes down to it the Kindle Fire is the clear winner if you want a portable device for watching movies, listening to music, and reading. If you need a pound and a half iphone that cost a half G or a giant netflix player ( it has twice the memory! whoo!) then go for something else.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSurprise!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Randy W. Yu "green frog"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received the Kindle Fire earlier Today and I've been holding on it since then. It's very sleek and the size is just right but it's a little bite heavy. I would highly recommend to my friends. It is truly an A+ product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

9 of 11 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat starter tablet!!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Andre'-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First and foremost it is not an ipad. If you're expecting it to be you are mistaken. It's like comparing a kia and a mercedes. They are not the same thing. However, for what it is, a limited tablet, it is fantastic. It does a good job browsing the web, email and is amazing with media. I have netflix and prime and they both work flawlessly. I needed to add a couple of apps to get it where I wanted to be functionally but now. It is better than I expected it to be. The only complaint I have is that there is no manual except for on the fire which is a problem if you are a first time user and don't know what to do first and getting use to it's OS takes a while. It's not like android or IOS. It takes some getting use to. But once you get it. It's just as good. Well, hope this helps anyone who cares to read it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat Tablet At A Great Price,May 15, 2012By&nbsp;David P. Scaglione(Minneapolis, MN USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I can't give this 5 stars only because it's Android and that platform is still a tiny bit shaky compared to iOS. That, and the Fire still doesn't have all the apps available in the Apps market, but that can be remedied if you're ok with rooting. What I do like about Android apps is that unlike the iPad, when an Android app isn't designed for tablet use, it still looks perfect on the Fire, as opposed to the iPad where it looks like utter crap if it's not made for the iPad.That being said, this is not meant to compete with the iPad. Heck, Amazon loses money on this device, but they make it up in the book sales, etc. But that's ok, because as I show below, not everyone needs an iPad.So I bought an iPad 2 about 3 months ago and after 2 weeks, I returned it. Why? Not because it wasn't a phenomenal device, but because even though I am a road warrior and travel for work on a regular basis, I didn't find myself wanting to watch *that* many videos on a very large and heavy tablet that cost me around $1,000 (64GB Verizon 3G) with all the fixin's.That put me on the search for a cheaper solution and a smaller solution. Now I'm 6'0 and 250 with huge hands, so you can imagine how cumbersome the iPad can be in coach class on Delta Airlines twice a week. Then I discovered the Fire. A friend showed me his Fire and I was like "hey, for $199 I can't go wrong and I won't feel bad about blowing a boatload of cash." Enter the Fire. Enter the Fire Mother's Day sale last week that dropped the price to $139. Remanufactured but it looks great and operates very well for me and comes with the same 1 year warranty.Oh, and most importantly, it fits my hands just fine and is the size of a normal paper notebook or an average sized paperback. And no guilt over blowing a mortgage payment on an iPad.Battery life is ok, but not great. I haven't quite put it through its paces yet, but I would imagine I could read some books and watch a video on a standard 3 hour flight.So, I definitely love this tablet and recommend it to anyone that wants a solid tablet that doesn't cost a fortune. The integration with Amazon and Amazon Cloud is great as well. Amazon instant videos are free to Prime members (free 1 month Prime trial with Fire). Oh, and if the Fire 2 comes out in the next few months, worst case: I'm out of $139 and have to buy the Fire 2. :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Best Gift...ever,May 13, 2012By&nbsp;Jacqueline-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is the best investment you will make! Books you love can be read anywhere..you can control the size of the font...Movies are instantly downloaded and many are free with your Kindle..no more books to lug around..easy to pack..fun to have anywhere..on the metro, bus and airplane..I also got the nifty sleeve to protect my Kindle and I love it. Be smart, be a Kindler!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Great Tablet For Personal Use,May 9, 2012By&nbsp;Bookman(So. California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have owned the first Kindle E-Reader that came out and will continue to upgrade as needed. Amazon has proven itself as a company that knows what its' customers want and need! My wife and I have our own Kindle Fire. This tablet is very useful as a personal reader and browser, while on the go, or at home for quick browsing etc. We love the Kindle Fire, you will to!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCouldn't Be Happier,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;M. Sokoff "mikeyb"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I looked at tablets for quite awhile before getting the KF. Shopped around abit, but went with the KF based on reviews, talking to friends that own one, and my history with Amazon. Frankly, I couldn't be happier. I wanted a reader, something with internet access, and the ability to have a few apps to goof around with. First, as many have said, the KF is not an inexpensive ipad, but I didn't need an ipad. I have a camera, gps, email access, etc. on my phone, so that was good enough for me. (Note: you can set up multiple email addresses on the KF, but will have to download an app that allows Outlook Exchange to be configured. Tried one and it worked, but opted to keep my Outlook email on my phone.) The wi-fi connection works well, the Silk browser has been smooth and easy to use, the reader is great (love the backlight and lending library you get with Amazon Prime), I watch TV shows on the KF every day and, so far, not a problem has surfaced. I ended up buying 2 refurbished KF's (1 for me and the other for my wife) and we love being able to have the same books on each KF. I have had the KF for about 2 weeks and the only drawback I've found is that you have to be careful about plugging the charging cord into the device. It can be abit tricky, and I don't want to break it. The size is good; I am able to fit it in my messenger bag without a problem. I would suggest buying a case to put it in when you purchase the KF. The extra protection and cover for the screen gives me a little more peace of mind. Otherwise, life with the KF has been good. For the price and the functionality, it has been a good buy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,April 18, 2012By&nbsp;Captain Caveman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Excellent value and gives me far more than what i need for a couple of hundred dollars. The alternative being an ipad is far more expensive, and whilst i am not a business user i saw no need to invest more. For my needs it was a correct decision. Who knows the next version may have 3g and may be slightly larger.... if so i shall buy another.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'M ON FIRE WITH MY KINDLE : ),April 18, 2012By&nbsp;A. Franklin-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have NEVER written a review for a product, this will be my first.  I just wanted to say that I received my Kindle Fire back in Feb 2012 for my birthday and now 2 months later, I am still loving the Fire, and I am constantly finding out new things about it.  I love the amount of free books and apps that I have now downloaded, and the amazon prime I used the 30 day free trial and that is wonderful as well...still deciding on the year purchase of the prime.  I have no problems with reading books, playing games or surfing the web which are all the reasons I really wanted a Fire to begin with.  But all in all, I am VERY SATISFIED with the Kindle Fire.  The size is perfect, it fits in my purse just fine and most of all, I loved the very low price of the Kindle Fire compared to other expensive tablet, this little baby does everything I need it to.  If anyone has any tips or ideas on other ways I can maximize the use of my Kindle Fire, please let me know.  I have found some things out by going to youtube, there are a lot of helpful things on there as well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsRefurb Kindle, just like new,April 17, 2012By&nbsp;J. Schumacher "Huskershoe"(Nebraska)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered a refurbished Kindle a couple weeks ago and was surprised when I took it out of the box.  It looked like it had never been touched! I've been using it regularly for the last couple weeks and I've had no problems.  I used the money I saved to buy a nice cover for it as well.  I would recommend buying a refurbished Kindle if you are looking to save a few bucks.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT!!!,April 16, 2012By&nbsp;M. Krovic(Elizabethtown, PA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Due to a back injury, I am unable to sit at my PC to get/send emails.  A friend of mine owns a Kindle Fire and suggested that I purchase one so I could stay in touch with family and friends.  It was the best purchase I ever made. Not only have I started reading again, but the convenience of email/internet without the added expense of a data charge is awesome.  Customer Service for the Kindle Fire is great.  I did have an issue with getting my email to send, but one call to Customer Service and the issue was resolved. I would recommend this to anyone - the price is really great for all you can do - I'm just lovin' it!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove the Fire,April 13, 2012By&nbsp;Deborah S. Gaughf "Happy Maw Maw"(Gulfport, MS)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased this for my husband and he absolutely loves it. Hardly puts it down. We also have an iPad and this does as much or more than our iPad. I had a problem with the first one I ordered, but customer service, via chat, worked with me until we realized we had a problem that we couldn't solve. They sent a new one and I received it quickly and it works perfectly. I would definitely recommend the Fire for everyone. Love it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo in love with my Kindle, I-pad = I-who? and nook is not my type of "book",April 12, 2012By&nbsp;A. F. Colbert "Arlisa the diva nerd"(Lizella, Ga United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Note the kindle is not a replacement for an i-pad, however, the quality and price make it well worth the several hundred dollar discount.  With all of the free wi-fi that is available, and the cell phone aps that enable wi-fi, it serves my purposes fine and exceeds my expectations.I utilize the kindle in the following ways:WITH WI-FI: of course READING, internet surfing, gaming, and email.  Reading includes a variety of books that are $0.99 or free, and downloaded versions of the bible that I proudly carry to church and read scripture right during service!WITHOUT WI-FI: I get just as much use out of it; there are some games you can download that won't require an internet connection (I play spider solitare, solitare, free cell, bejeweled, and several others).I don't miss the fact that you can't add a memory card.I am very happy with the fact that I have a kindle and NOT a nook tablet.  There are a lot of free apps i can get on the Kindle that are not available on the nook.  I also like the compact shape and size compared to the nook which is a little bulky to me.  This is my first e-reader of any kind and I'm glad I waited it out.Amazon Prime members get their money's worth with the lending library and other perks.LUV MY KINDLE! God Bless You.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI take this everywhere!,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;Fawkes77-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am so pleased with my Kindle  Fire! The picture quality when watching movies is fantastically sharp &amp; clear. One feature that I really like  when reading is that it has three settings for the way the background works. First is bright white with the print in black, then a dimmer white with black print. I like that for reading in bed because it's easier on my eyes. There is also an option for a black background with white print. Of course there is also a sliding scale to adjust the brightness more exactly. The only thing I don't like about it is the glare from the screen when reading outside in the sunlight. I know there are protective screens that can help with this but in my experience there are invariably small air bubble that are distracting to me. I do keep my Kindle in a protective case just in case I were to drop it and to protect the screen from scratches. But the screen is made of gorilla glass &amp; seems to resist scratches anyway. I like that a lot. Controls are very intuitive. I also have the original Kindle &amp; the Nook with the touch screen at the bottom. The Kindle Fire is my favorite.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)





4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for what it intended to be!,March 14, 2012By&nbsp;R. Toro "Tech Junkie"(Tampa, FL United States)  -See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I finally broke down and got a Kindle Fire. I had been holding off because I felt that it was the same thing as my Android smartphone (with a bigger screen, but less features). This is true - no cameras, no 3G or 4G, no GPS... BUT, I am so happy that I gave in and got one!At this price point, the Fire is a great mini tablet with the perfect size screen for web browsing and e-book reading. I don't own an I-pad, but I think its 10 inch screen is way too big to be a handheld tablet (might as well get a netbook at that point).The Fire has been great for Internet browsing. The cloud feature solves the issue of limited storage (and lack of SD card). The size is perfect for holding and reading it in bed. It is about the size of a paper back, but thanks to the backlight, it can be read in the dark.My main gripe is that the speakers aren't super loud, and the battery life could be better. However, at this price point, I can work around those issues.For pure reading, the e-ink and battery life of the traditional Kindles is probably still best, but I use the Fire for so much more, that I can't imagine living without one now!I was also very happy to see that all of my apps that I have downloaded on the Amazon Appstore were available right on my Fire via the cloud.If you have regular access to WiFi, then this will work great for you. By the way, this was typed on my Fire (I don't recommend it for typing long documents or emails, but it can be done).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat product!,March 31, 2012By&nbsp;Christopher C Olson-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This kindle is great! and the battery life is wonderful.  It lasted on a round trip to from california to Dallas.  great product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's a must have,March 31, 2012By&nbsp;Matilda128-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It is easy to use and fast. The best part is that I can edit documents on the go and not lug around my laptop. The size and weight make it a great travel device. You don't even have to take it out of your bag at most airports... Games, music, books, and video can be enjoyed on a screen that doesn't make you squint. And you can get two for less than the cost of an IPad. It is the best deal I have gotten this year...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle Fire!,March 31, 2012By&nbsp;DC2Kids-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased my Kindle Fire about a month ago and LOVE it. Even though I promised myself I will never buy an Android powered device again, this one was the exception. People who have negative things to say about this device have to realize that this is not a tablet computer, but an E-READER! So please stop comparing it to the Nook (which is advertised as a tablet) and the iPad (for which there is no comparison, in my opinion).I have been an amazon customer for many years, which is why I decided to get the Kindle Fire. I am happy to finally enjoy reading again. And with the iPhone app, I can continue reading my books anywhere without having to take my Kindle.As for the glossy screen, I agree it's hard to read in bright sun light, but this is very easily fixed with a screen protector, which also prevents cracked screens in case of accidental drops (if you have kids, you know what I'm talking about).For the price, I can only recommend the Kindle Fire to anyone, who is looking for a good e-reader.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA MUST HAVE!,March 30, 2012By&nbsp;Kelly Russell-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)RETURNED THE 900.00 IPAD 3 SADLY TO SAVE SOME MONEY. PURCHASED THIS, ABSOLUTELY LOVE IT! THE COST IS RIGHT, THE COLOR AND CLARITY OUTSTANDING. CONVENIENT SIZE, MORE BANG FOR YOUR BUCK WITH THIS!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWonderful device!,March 29, 2012By&nbsp;Jim Gibbons-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm disabled, and don't often get out to go to book stores or the library. I also get most of my local and national news via Twitter. I stay in touch with family and friends on Facebook. I asked some of my FB folks who had a Kindle Fire what they thought, and got very positive responses. I've had it a month, and am more than delighted. I can watch my Netflix movies via the free app, You Tube, neat things with my Amazon Prime membership, and get out of my room instead of sitting in front of the computer. It's nice to sit outside, and read a book while listening to music.I've had a few glitches, especially in Facebook, where the browser will repeat a screen several times before loading new posts. This only seems to happen if there are a lot of posts, and I haven't logged on in a while.  Screen glare, especially outside, is an issue, so I'll order some of the available anti-glare sheets.. I wish the battery would hold a charge a bit longer, but I do tax it by staying connected to WiFi while reading, and listening to music. (I love that I can play Words with Friends after reading for a while and taking a break.)All in all, a great product at an attractive price. It has exceeded my expectations, and I consider it the nicest thing I've ever treated myself to.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat value,March 22, 2012By&nbsp;Elizabeth(Charlotte, NC)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Background: I have an iPhone for work, iPad, and purchased the Kindle Fire for the family.The screen is very vibrant with good touch sensitivity. I personally like the customized Andriod operating system that Amazon has created. The layout is very organized and at first glance makes more since than the iOS. The smaller amount of device storage is offset by cloud storage. They actually have device and cloud tabs located next to one another and this really makes all the fuss around storage a mute point. I manage the storage capacity on my iPad and the Fire will be no different.Content is great. The Fire has wireless N so Netflix streams and produces good quality just like my iPad.I keep reading website reviews that dont consider the Fire a tablet due to the lack of 3G, GPS, Bluetooth??? Really? I've personally never used any of these on my Pad. Maybe my iPad is really not a tablet...just kidding. :)And finally, I decided on the Kindle over Nook because I felt Amazon as a company was the long term play and would continually support and enhance the product/content.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsOne Click Downfall,March 14, 2012By&nbsp;TerryMc-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)THE GOOD: Great graphics and low price.THE BAD: 1) One click buying!!!! What a Joke!! I accidentally purchased a pair of $200 headphones and immediately clicked the cancel button. But instead I get a "Thank you for your purchase", so I called Amazon to explain what happened and they said sorry, but you have to wait til they ship then send them back. Took two days to take my money will be 4 weeks for a refund! I NEVER added my debit/credit card info into my Kindle Fire, but when I went to my Facebook account from my Kindle it automatically synced all my info onto my Kindle, Including my finacial info that was on my smartphone. When you first turn on the Kindle Fire it asks if you want to activate the One Click buy, I clicked NO but somehow I one click bought an unwanted item. 2) Sometimes the touch sensitivity is a little sluggish. It may take several touches to open an app. Not always, but enough to be aggravating. 3) It says its an Android, but there are Very few free games/apps compared to what is free on my smartphone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo satisfied with my Kindle Fire,February 18, 2012By&nbsp;James L. Riggs-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First, I would like to say that the Kindle Fire is a wonderful product that I am extremely happy with.  As a consumer I realize, too the great role that a companies customer service plays in product satisfaction.  With that in mind, I would like to place the focus of this review on Amazon's exceptional customer service.  Yes, the Kindle Fire is an exceptional product, but let's face it, no matter how wonderful a product is, there can be problems or questions about a product.  This being said, I wanted to share with you my recent experience with Amazon's C.S.  I had a minor problem with my Kindle Fire and went to the Manage your Kindle link on the Amazon site after answering  just a very few questions I was given the option of an email or telephone call from Amazon CS.  I chose a phone call.  Amazon CS called before I even had time to put away my laptop, my wait time on the phone was less than 30 sec.  and in less than 5 min. my Kindle was up and running again.  Not only was my CS rep. quick and efficient, but he was also extremely courteous.  Yes, I know that I was not his only customer, that I was a very small fish in a huge ocean, but I was made to feel important and that my issue at that moment was important to Amazon.  If it were possible to rate Amazon on CS alone I would give also give them a 5 star review.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWow! I love it!,March 3, 2012By&nbsp;fattboy223-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have seen reviews by some people who were not satisfied with their kindle fires, and cannot understand why. I find mine to be easy to use and to have very good screen quality even when watching videos. The fire is a good balance between an e-reader and a handheld computer at a very reasonable price. It may not suit some "power" users or someone who wants to do a lot of tweaking on the device or its' O.S. It is what it is, an easy to use reader with web capabilities and the ability to run a great deal of android apps. Also I like the fact that there are many thousands of free books and books you can borrow free from your public library. Add this to all the other features and you are getting a lot of bang for your buck. The kindle is what I expected it to be and more, I highly recommend it for anyone wanting an easy to use reader and simple but powerful computer at a good price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGood tablet, excellent reader,March 2, 2012By&nbsp;Jay Garcia(Tampa, FL)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm an IT geek - what more can I say.  I own a chinese droid tablet, two HP touchpads, an iPad2, now 2 Kindle Fires.  The Kindle Fires I purchased to use at work, allowing the reading of network design documents, pdf's etc while utilizing the ability of the Amazon cloud &amp; services to share the documents between the two easily.  What I have noticed after having these tablets about a week now, is the screens are beautiful.  I tried steaming a movie from the Amazon prime instant videos, and had no issues and the picture on the tablet was pretty darn good.  The sound is also pretty good, and was plenty loud in our office environment to be heard clearly (granted I dont work on a factory floor or anything).  The response is very snappy, no issues there, apps and docs load very quickly.  The touchscreens are also very good, I haven't noticed any issues or frustrations using them they just work - I like that.  Having to utilize to Amazon's services can be seen as a plus or minus, being a Amazon Prime member, I see it as a huge plus.  Yes it is limited to 8 gigs of memory (6 and change usable) and their is no expansion, but honestly I'm not going to be loading this thing up with a bunch of movies/multimedia, its mainly used for pdf's, word docs, and books...And it excels at this.  For the price, this has an EXCELLENT $/value ratio in my book and I would not hesitate to purchase again.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove the following Strengths...,February 27, 2012By&nbsp;Angelina *Princess*(Floreeeeda)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)OVERALL STRENGTHS====================+ The IPS screen is nothing short of fabulous. I've spent several hours staring at it now and am still amazed. It makes my friend's iPad 2 look grainy. Using this as a high-end photo frame on your desk is actually tempting because the colors are so rich. The screen is very close to 16:9 (15.36:9) and fits movies much better than a 4:3 iPad screen, which negates much of the 2.7" screen size difference between the two (but the reverse is true for old videos that are not widescreen). Overall, the video experience is good enough that you soon become immersed in the movie and you forget about the medium. Plus, since it's so small, you can carry with you more often.+ The overall feel and construction is super-solid. The rubber/silicone backing gives such peace-of-mind; at this price, I don't plan on buying a case for mine in the foreseeable future.+ Compact size. It's about the size of a "steno" pad. You can throw it in your backpack, purse, or coat pocket. Overall the Fire is a great balance between usability and portability--much more screen space than a smartphone (at about the same price) but lacking only one typical phone storage option: in your front pocket.+ Simplicity and UI polish of the overall experience is tight. I wouldn't hesitate to give this device to a total tablet novice. This is a great gift idea for even the most technologically-challenged individual.+ Speed is perfectly adequate for anything I've had to throw at it. I've tried at least half a dozen games now and they are buttery smooth. The crisp display and saturated colors make it such a joy to re-examine all my old apps.+ The email client is slick! I have used apps like TouchDown and want to cry because they are so ugly and complicated. Not so with the Fire! Even though this is not a "creator" device, I am glad that they didn't skimp on a full-featured email client that actually looks nice.+ Silk web browser! Side by side on the same wi-fi connection vs. my dual-core Android phone, the web browser doesn't seem that much faster. HOWEVER--they were both *very* fast! Keep in mind two things: 1) Silk is taking away bottlenecks, but if your existing wi-fi connection is already super-fast (i.e. no bottleneck), you won't notice the difference. 2) The "cloud" improvements will only begin to work when there is a large group of Kindle users who are sending data to Amazon so that they can start proactively caching. It should get faster and faster as more people start using it, so don't feel bad if you're not seeing any speed change out of the box.+ Content, content, content. What sold it for me was the new Kindle Owner's Lending Library. For my $79 Prime subscription I'm getting access to a ton of shows that were are least partially available elsewhere, but no one else is giving away a book a month. I've seen at least a dozen titles I want to read, so my schedule is "booked" (sorry, couldn't resist) for a year solid. I was already a Prime member, but had never purchased a eInk Kindle because, so now I will have a "Kindle Device" that will qualify me to read a free book a month.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsON FIRE WITH KINDLE FIRE,February 25, 2012By&nbsp;Joanne-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm really happy with my 3G Kindle but I was given a Kindle Fire for Christmas.  Both are excellent and I recommend both for each have their use.  Wouldn't give up either one; BUT I do love my FIRE!Kindle FIRE is a tablet barely one step below any "pad", just as a pad is below a "lap top".  For many people, Fire is all you will need and only the lacking keyboard for fast typing of email you are golden with just your Fire.Hand held and only a bit heavier than a 3G.  The color is excellent, clear, sharp.  The features you can have such as Amazon Movies, Netflix movies, etc. are wonderful and a joy.  I can put on head phones and watch a movie while waiting at the doctor's office or when I can't sleep &amp; I won't wake hubby.  Email may not have the ability to store old emails in files but you can easily keep up on the conversations and replies of your emails. If you use Gmail or Yahoo (internet email services) you just go back to your computer and file or store those records you want.Just since Christmas of 2011, the apps that are available for Fire have increased.  Games, big yes; and fun on the touch screen.  Just got a calendar with alarm, to do list, notes.  A Mapquest for Fire app and I swear it is more detail than Mapquest on my computer.  Music!  Well I'm the old style where music must be on great speakers of wood and baffels.  So I got some nice small headphones that fold up for storage and the sound is great, good separation, good stereo.  Pop, soft jazz, it all comes in great sound. While reading my book I can listen to my music, if I want to turn down the sound or change songs on an album..I do it from a dropdown without leaving the page in my boo.  I can store books, documents, apps full of games, tools, maps, music and surf the internet.Do I recommend Fire?  Darn right!  I recommend them to neighbors, friends and family.  So far I have purchased one as a gift and the love I get from themfor the thoughtful wonderful Fire,  you would think I bought them a summer home!  Excuse my pun but this Kindle is 'spreading like wildfire' among my family.  Once they get to play with mine, they have to have one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love this thing... really.,February 21, 2012By&nbsp;S. Blouin-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been reading a lot lately, I absolutely love my Kindles. Yes, I have 2; the Kindle Keyboard for reading for hours and hours on end, and the Kindle Fire for everything else. That thing is fantastic! I can check my email, the weather, the news, look up answers to questions, go shopping, balance my checkbook, watch movies or videos, share pictures, text people or send instant messages, play games, draw pictures, keep my appointments scheduled and reminders and tasks up-to-date, listen to music ...there is no end to the usefulness of this device!Keeping in mind that it is not an "Ipad killer" nor was it meant to be, it has no cameras or 3g capabilities, no gps either. I didn't want any of these things, I have no use for them. As for only being able to get apps from Amazon, that's fine-n-dandy, they have all the apps I could possibly use and a million more besides. I would, if asked what I could change, want to be able to change the background to personalize it. Same with the Kindle Keyboard, it seems silly that we can't change the wallpaper to our own pictures. Hopefully in time.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNot marketed as a tablet...but Amazon should.,February 20, 2012By&nbsp;OnLocationShots-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have owned the Kindle Fire now for a month.  Apart from image editing that I require for my photography business, the fire has replaced my laptop while out in the field.  The size and weight is nearly perfect for everyday use.  I currently use it to read books, magazines and watch an occassional video once in a while.  Where the Fire has really paid for itself is as a business tool. I am currently using it as a portfolio presentation device for my photography.  I have several photo business related apps that allow me to create contracts, model releases, and have my clients read, and sign the forms on location.  Using the EyeFi app and an FTP program I quickly back up every shot in real time to my server while still shooting my subjects. Email, Calendar, Calculator apps help me to complete basic tasks.  Documents to go (which I have used with every handheld I have used since the Palm Pilot) helps me to stay productive when not shooting.  I use a mobile hotspot wherever I go, so the fact that it does not have built in 3G of 4G is not a problem.  Amazon's cloud also allows me to store all of my music online with no limits on space.  This allows me to have all of my music at my fingertips with the Fire without having to worry about filling up the internal memory.  Speaking of Music the built in speakers are pretty loud.  The aspect ratio is perfect for video.  I currently have over 60 apps installed on it and still have room for about another 120. For under $200, Amazon should really market this more like a tablet than a simple e-book reader.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo glad I bought the Kindle Fire!,February 19, 2012By&nbsp;anasazi327-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Normally I do not write reviews but after receiving this product and using it for a while I felt that I needed to chime in. I absolutely love this product! Shipping from Amazon was fast as usual and the upgrade to full Amazon Prime benefits for a month is a bonus. I currently have Amazon Student Prime so i do receive free 2 day shipping but not the access to the Kindle Reading Library or free streaming videos. Providing this trial access is great, it really shows what the Kindle Fire is capable of ( a fact that the people in Amazon's marketing department surely recognized, but hey if you have a great product why not show what it can do!). I read many, many reviews before deciding to purchase the Kindle Fire and I am so glad that i decided to buy it. Sure it doesn't do as much as the ipad or other tablets but neither does it cost $600+. I am a student and a single parent so I thought I'd never be able to afford a device like this. Thank you Amazon for making a product this great at an affordable price! I am an online student and I am able to complete much of my class work with the Fire. The internet access on the Fire is as fast as my home computer and I've had no problems connecting to wifi at home or out and about. The various games and educational app's available amuse my 5 year old (and me too!), many of which are free or just a couple $'s. The Fire does everything I need it to do and more, all within a reasonable budget. Buy this product, you will be so glad you did!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMuch easier to carry around than an iPad,February 3, 2012By&nbsp;Jack-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This device is lot of bang for your buck.  Yeah you can spend $300 more for a device with a larger screen, but being 7 inches makes it super easy to carry around.  I also have an iPad and carrying that around often feels like lugging around a laptop.  But the Fire fits into my coat pocket and it's just way easier to handle when you want your media on the go.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCompletely Satisfied!,February 11, 2012By&nbsp;James(Stone Mountain, GA, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Have had my Fire nearly 3 months, since 11/15/11.  Have used several hours per day, every one of those days, and very happy with theperformance, in every respect.  I have had a Kindle 3G KB for 2 years, and was happy to find out that even though the Fire is backlit, withthe ability to adjust its brightness, it has proved to be a very comfortable e-reader for me, even for extended periods.  With the Marwareleather holder's wide range of tilt positions, I do not experience glare from the gloss display surface.  Also, with the excellent audio capabilities of the Fire, when listening to Music and Audiobooks through the Klipsch IMAGE S4 In-Ear Enhanced Bass Noise-Isolating HeadphonesI purchased with the Fire, I am seriously "one happy camper"!  I would recommend the Fire to anyone wanting an excellent multimedia portable device.For some of the whiners who have written negative reviews, I feel it's important to point out:  1.) In 90 days of daily use, I have not accidentally turned my Fire off (or on), not even once.  2,) Battery life has never been a problem, not even once, simply because I connect itto the charger every night.  3.) I like the volume control exactly the way it is, and DO NOT WANT a physical knob or dial, which CAN be accidentally changed.  4.) I find it incredible to still be seeing negative reviews due to small children making unauthorized 1-Click purchases, nearly 2 months after Amazon issued an update so Wi-Fi can be turned off, and not turned back on, except by entering a password.  No Wi-Fi, no unauthorized purchases - why is that so hard to understand?  5.) And of course, there's the Apple fanboys, many of which are not "Amazon Certified Purchasers", giving 1-star ratings to things they obviously do not own!  Amazon really should screen their reviews more closely - I'm sure the percentage of 5-star reviews could increase significantly.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat device, right price!,February 8, 2012By&nbsp;David E.-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At first I was reluctant on buying the Kindle Fire. I originally wanted to buy a more higher end tablet for everyday use. With two months of shopping around, and being rather reluctant at buying anything at all, I felt as if I finally made the right choice. Although it doesn't have SOME of the features most other tablets have. The Kindle Fire, in itself is a great device for the everyday user. I use it mainly for e-mail, reading, games, and web browsing. Not fully impressed with the amount of space you have. But with the cloud feature it allows for comfortable expansion. I will be using it a lot, and from what I see so far it is heavy (which I prefer), and durable. Great choice for anyone who doesn't want to break bank.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsReally love it. Flaws and All.,February 5, 2012By&nbsp;all6-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)What else can I say? We love our Kindle Fire. I enjoy it more than the iPad. More intellectually stimulating in my opinion. Amazon Prime is one of the most amazing services. $79 a year and you get free 2 day shipping on almost everything and loads of free movies to watch on the Kindle Fire. Download music, books, movies Tv shows and apps. My favorite part is the fact I can check out books from the library frowm my Kindle Fire! *Currently writing this review from my Kindle Fire!*Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsThis was a hit!,February 4, 2012By&nbsp;C. Ralls(Ohio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased this for my mom for Christmas. Basically there were a few items I was looking for in a device for her: 1. Can she check gmail 2. Can she listen to audio books and 3. Can she use Google and browse the web. My mom has never been a fan of email. In fact, she never checked it on the home computer and was always asking me to check her email. Now that she has a Kindle, she checks it almost every day. I set her up with a couple of audio books using Audible, and she loves it. There were some problems with Google search initially. Clicking on a link in the search was not working.  Apparently other folks are having this problem as well. They say it has something to do with the browser and javascript. Anyhoo, I set it to open on Google Search classic rather than tablet, and that fixed the problem. The Kindle Fire is not the solution to everything, but it had exactly the functionality my mom needed. The user interface is easy enough to understand that she can use it. I am very happy with this purchase and so is my mom.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery pleased,February 3, 2012By&nbsp;Michael-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Loooooooove it!  I am very happy with my Kindle Fire and certainly glad I purchased it.  It's basically a poor man's iPad, which is just what some of us needed in this economy.  It's not perfect, but I'll take its few flaws for the spectacular price any day.  Great little device!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsEat your heart out Ipad,February 3, 2012By&nbsp;Jackorigworker-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a huge fan of my little kindle fire. The price was the main reason I purchased the kindle, and it has been a great investment. It is easy to use and provides everything that you want or need from a tablet. Of course it lacks 3Gcapabilities, so when I'm out of service I just read one of the ten books I have since bought. never goin back to paper!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Great Buy for the Buck!,February 3, 2012By&nbsp;jcorrales-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Okay! This thing is a lot of fun! Everyone tries to point to its limitations like no sd slot, and limited android apps. If you really need a machine to do a lot of serious work then maybe you should look elsewhere. But if what you want is a fast, dependable unit to read books, pdf files, Microsoft files, and basic apps, and play games like Angry Bird then this is a device well worth the price. I was able to load my Microsoft docs and pdf files through the micro usb plug with no problems. I simply used the available apps to view them and read them along with my Kindle books. I can later delete or offload them when I need to make some space. Any extra files I need to store can be saved in the Amazon Cloud that can be accessed through the Kindle Fire. I really didn't want to buy an expensive Android device that would just lay around minimally used. I think this was a great buy and I highly recommend it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)

Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)











4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Christmas gift to me,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;S. Carlson(Huntington Beach, CA, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased a Kindle Fire as a Christmas present for my wife, and after having a chance to play around with it and see all the capabilities it has over my older Kindle I decided I had to have one. This thing is incredible. The display is beautiful and just the right size. It has loads of entertainment options beyond its e-reader function, particularly for Amazon Prime members. Read all of the information on the main product page, though. If you're looking for an iPad, this is definitely not for you. This device is all about viewing existing content, which it does very well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI LOVE my Kindle Fire!,January 13, 2012By&nbsp;M. Fletcher(Poultney, VT USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have always wanted a Kindle, and when I told my wife this, we were both thinking about getting the basic one. Then the Fire came out and we decided to get each other one for Christmas. I cannot even describe to you how long that wait was between when we got them to the house (November 22nd) and Christmas day! We did not open them before then, so that morning they were a complete surprise. I love, love, love this thing! (and so does she!)I waited to write a review to see if there were any big problems, and there aren't! Battery life is excellent and I can read books with ease on it. I don't know why people complain about reading on this, it works great for me! I have already read 3 entire books and I am part way through 3 others. I have been a big reader all my life, but haven't felt like I have had the time lately, and didn't want to lug books back and forth to work with me. The Fire makes it so easy! And I also don't have to answer any annoying questions from nosy people who used to see me carrying books and say "what book are you reading?". I bought a cover for it, and I am glad I did. It is always protected.I love that I can play games on it, surf the web, watch Netflix and other movies, email, keep notes, etc, etc, etc! I love that it holds my place in a book and also lets me know what percentage of the book I have read. You can make notes on pages, but I haven't tried that feature yet. I can't put this device down!! It is everything they said it was going to be and more!! I haven't even cracked the surface of all it can do. I learn more about it everyday!I HIGHLY recommend getting a Kindle Fire!!People have complained about the following:1) The power button. I don't know if it's because I have a case for it, but I have never had a problem with accidentally hitting the power off. First of all, you need to hold it in when you want to turn it off, and then press shut down on the screen when it asks you. So I don't know why people have a problem with this. You can put it to sleep by pushing the button once, but this is easily remedied by pressing it again to turn it back on.2) The volume. If you want a device strictly for music, get an IPod. The volume and speakers work just fine for the average person. To find the volume adjuster, tap the arrow at the bottom of the screen and then tap the settings cog next to the wireless indicator and voila! The volume adjuster is right there! (It sounds more cumbersome than it is). You can also see the percentage of battery life left, how much space you've used, and so much more! There is a headphone port and believe me when I say the volume works awesome!3) The keyboard. I guess if your fingers are really fat, you probably won't like the little pop up keyboard. It works fine for me, but of course a touch keyboard will not be as easy to use as an external one.4) The pre-registration and inability to lock. You CAN lock your device. There is a button for it in the settings. If someone hacks that, or if it isn't locked and you leave it lying around or let someone play with it, sure, they can order stuff. I don't know anyone I would let touch it that would seriously order something on my device without asking first. If they do accidentally order something, there is a button to cancel the order.I guess I am not really generous with my electronics. I don't just give them to people to play with, and I always make sure I know where it is. Just warn whomever you let play with it that they shouldn't buy anything with it! And know where it is!If those four things look like something you would have a problem with, don't buy it. If you are an electronics snob who will look for any excuse to complain, don't buy it! If you are someone who enjoys electronics and want a fun and entertaining product, order it NOW!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is great!,January 12, 2012By&nbsp;Mandy(South Portland, Maine USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire! I admit, I have been tempted by the possibility of an ipad for awhile, but it was just too much money. I don't have a smart phone or anything like that so what I was looking for was a portable device that had wifi so I could check my email, facebook, surf the web,youtube, play simple games (Text Twist, Solitaire, etc.) and watch movies on Netflix. Kindle Fire does all of this! The device is very easy to use and I've found the picture quality for movies on Netflix to be great.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsActually meets or beats the Ipad, for real, I have both,January 12, 2012By&nbsp;william j bray-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have the latest and greatest Ipad, which, incidently, is an Itunes focused device, and just purchased a Kindle Fire for my wife for Christmas.  The Fire is an Amazon focused device.  The two devices are essentially equal, speed being completely dependent on your router, not the device.  There are just as many aps with the same functionality.I find the Fire to be more rugged (which is why I chose that for my wife), longer lived battery, same speed and functionality, same resolution screen, browsers are equal, screen touch sensitivity and settings equal.I paid 4 times as much for the Ipad of the same configuration.  I won't make that mistake twice.Furthermore, the Fire is designed to inspire people to READ, the Ipad inspires people and is configured mostly to chat and play games.  The Fire is what you want in your family, especially with kids.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Christmas Present Ever,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;JB-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Received the Kindle Fire as a gift from my wife. I have been thoroughly impressed with the ease of use, browsing speed, available apps, access to streaming videos, lending privileges for Amazon Prime members, and image quality. It's no wonder that Consumer Reports recently selected the Kindle Fire as a Best Buy. I was also impressed to discover that my previous Kindle purchases and Amazon Cloud songs automatically loaded on my new Kindle. Definitely take advantage of Amazon Prime if you purchase the Kindle Fire, you more than make up for the costs with access to free videos and lending privileges for thousands of books.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat mini-tablet!,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;micklemoo "micklemoo5"(Torrance, Ca USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is Awesome!  I love it!  It's half the size of the Ipad and works great!!  Movies look good, great apps and games!  So excited when I got it and it did not dissappoint!  Books look great!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove It!,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;Dana D.(Big Bear Lake, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love it!  I ordered it three days ago and received it at 6:30 p.m. this evening via UPS. Plugged in the charging device and the green light came on about 35 minutes later. I followed the directions and connected to WiFi (at home) with NO problems. I was particularly antsy because I had read all the bad reviews that were posted last year. But I gotta tell you I am a real senior (at 76) and not so real savy in the computer department. I have only 15 years at it. But this gadget is great. I am having a good time with Kindle Fire. My advice to people who are ordering it (even the savy ones) take a page from my book. Be patient with yourself and have fun learning. Thank you Amazon (and thanks to all the people at Amazon who are patient with new users!).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsShort Realistic Review,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;Mike-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Gonna make this short and sweet because this device has a lot of aspects that could be addressed that will lose you attention.I'm a techie, I work for a Media Services firm and Root Cellphones on the side, just giving you some perspective on my review.THE BADThe operating system is a skin on an outdated version of android, so don't expect a god device, it's 200 bucks and you get what you pay for. It has glitches, it lags when switching orientations, and like any android device some apps can wreck its speed. If you have major speed issues with your kindle, uninstall the last couple apps you installed and it will likely be back to slightly glitchy. That being said, TAKE CARE OF YOUR DEVICE! Don't install every app in the world and expect it to run like your quad core 8gb ram computer! I have had a couple of freezes, but honestly I was expecting it, this is not an iPad, it has 70% of the features of an iPad at 40% of the price. That's why you get this, and you love it like I do.The biggest bother I have with the device is the touch screen. I love touch screens, and in 5 years everything will have them. But this one is sub par, not "bad" per-say, but sub par. On OCCASION I find myself pressing two or three times to get the device to register a click. Along with that the hidden buttons (which I'll get to later) are hard to access sometimes because I can't get the accuracy required to hit the sliver of the screen you need to touch to get to them.Wifi is a pain sometimes and using the quick settings widget for wifi causes it to force close frequently, but because I rarely change my wifi connection because i'm on a college campus littered with hotspots of the same SSID I don't have to.So far I have not found a way to add a microphone to the device. I have attempted using headphones with a mic built in, but the button for pausing music doesn't even work. Now that could be a software thing, as the device is not designed to have that button or mic, the programming does not include protocol for button click or mic sound.There is no native drop box app yet. You will have to install the easily downloadable .apk file manually after installing a file browser. Easy if you have any experience or know how to use a search engine (google, bing etc).THE GOODNOW, when you get into an app, away from the "bookshelf" this device is awesome. The dual core 1ghz processor is blazing fast, I have not yet been hindered by processing speed and I'm loving it. The screen is bright and crisp. The battery life is true to its word, according to my battery monitor app, I'm getting an average of 10 hours of use and I'm using this thing CONSTANTLY, maybe not constant video streaming, but the display is really what sucks power, so turn the brightness below 80% to get this awesome battery life.The lack of physical buttons is the future, just look at Ice Cream Sandwich (latest version of Android). I love it, it makes extra room on the device for more screen without making the screen larger.The speakers were surprising, very loud and decent sound quality.I love using this for music, it will play any music on your amazon cloud player, be it purchased from Amazon or ripped from cd's or even downloaded from elsewhere. I have however had difficulty uploading files purchased from iTunes, but that's not surprising, that's why I left iTunes a couple years ago.I LOVE LOVE LOVE the design of the tablet, the rubber back is perfect for gripping the device (unlike metal which gets cold and easily slips out of your hand). I do wish the power button was on the top, but if you really have an issue with that, turn the device upside down, it can work from any angle. If you thought the button was supposed to be on top, it is. There is no difference in holding it upside down.THE ENDWell I went on a little longer than I wanted to, but what I said is important. Key things to take away from this. Inexpensive, Good Design/Craftsmanship, Sub Par Operating System, Good Media Consumption.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars9,875 Reviews later.........  HI,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;okiedan(oklahoma city, OK)  -See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)OK so 9,875 folks have weighed in on the new Kindle Fire.  I own three Fires.  I of course use only one of the three.....  :)  If you are reading this review you are one of those folks who likes to click on Newest reviews first.  I find that often the long winded reviews that basically just go over the known qualities of an item are heavily viewed while late comers like me are so far down on the list that I am writing this just for me.So!  Is the Kindle Fire worth it?  Does it work properly?  I answer a resounding yes.  With a prime membership you have untold shows to watch.  With the Amazon cloud you can upload all of your music to the Amazon cloud and either play it back from the cloud or download it to the device.  (with my hardwire Cox connection running at 50 to 60 MBs it took roughly 20 hours to upload around 40gig of music) (protected files will not upload) (amazon uploader and downloader work seamlessly with my Mac and iTunes)  I find that streaming video works just fine over my WiFi.  I also have no problems streaming music from the cloud.  I have noticed that when in public WiFi areas that sometimes it is faster to just download an album I want via the cloud than it is to try and stream it.  I do wish the Fire supported the 5.0GHz connection as it is a lot faster ......... at least at my house.I hate the Carousel and would love to be able to delete it.  However, in the last few days my hatred has been minimized with the update to software push that let's me delete things from it.  I do have the issue though of 3 Fires on the same account so if anyone else downloads a book, app, MP3 etc from the store it shows up in the Carousel.  This can be a little errrrrrrrrrrrr.The device is much more responsive since the new software download.  Screen is pretty easy to use.  Does seem to bog down a tad if you happen to be downloading and app and trying to listen to an album while reading a book.  Not horrible just a noted bleep..........I will update this as time and need allow.  We all really like our Fire's.  Amazons ability to help me fill it up make it worth while.  Without the Cloud and the Prime videos I would not own it.note:  customer service with amazon just keeps getting better and better.  I also have two Kindle touches in the house and had a small issue.  They solved it quickly and then even called me back a few hours later to just check up and make sure all was still going well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire, what is not to love?,January 7, 2012By&nbsp;P. Lopez "Mamma"(Hockley, Tx)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received mine on New Years Eve (thank you Mr Fedex man for delivering it)and so far I am amazed at all it does. I mean I knew it would show me movies (already downloaded and watched several movies with my kiddos, can't be beat), let me read nice colorful magazines (didn't skip a beat at getting magazines sent to it) and apps galore...my kids are playing a math flashcard game and a geography game as well as some obligatory fun games such as "where is my water" and of course "Angry Birds"...I am also working out with it, having downloaded a few workout videos and I am loving reading on it, especially once I read in a review here that you can change not only the brightness of the screen but also the color on the background when you read books, choose between white, black and a nice neutral beige..my favorite so far.I am one of the original Generation 1 Kindle owners (which still works great I might add, my daughter now enjoys it) and also have a Kindle Keyboard 3G, unfortunately that one only lays around now adays (thinking my daughter might actually love to have it instead of Gen 1)...my Fire gets all the attention...lol.The screen is glossy, YES, I agree, but I have gotten a anti-glare screen protector and it seems to have made that a non-issue for me now.I honestly do not understand what people are griping about...I mean yes it doesn't have 3G...BUT nor does it have the ridiculous pricing that comes along with being tethered to a company...nope I like it just the way it is..Thank you Amazon..thank you for giving me an option to apples ipad...I will never own one, if nothing else just as a matter of principal, I know it doesn't compare to an ipad, but how the heck wants it to?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExceeded Expectations,January 6, 2012By&nbsp;Kim(MN, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire since November. I ordered it in September even though I've owned a Kindle 3 (a/k/a Kindle Keyboard) for almost two years. At work, I use an iPad. I am also addicted to my Android phone. So, I knew what I was buying when I ordered my Fire in September and, quite frankly, my expectations weren't that high. Still, I hoped it would be an easy way to watch movies, listen to music, and maybe play a few games while traveling.  I was wrong. My Kindle Fire has seen very little down time since it was unboxed. I love it! The Kindle Fire is easy to use and has turned me into a Nova addict thanks to Amazon Prime. (I also had lots of fun listening to holiday music and watching the Yuletide Log while wrapping gifts.) Magazine are easy to read on the Fire (once I figured out to switch to Text View). For $199 this device delivers all it promises and more. I'm glad I bought a leather cover that doubles as a stand. This makes viewing movies or reading while eating much easier. Having said all this, you may be surprised when I end this review by admitting--reluctantly--that at the end of the day, when my eyes are tired of staring at a backlight screen, I  prefer reading books on my Kindle 3, thanks to its E-Ink. If all you want to do is read books, buy a Kindle eReader. If you want to read, watch, listen and play buy a Kindle Fire. If you can afford it, buy both.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsABSOLUTELY IN LOVE,January 4, 2012By&nbsp;ana m lopez-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Have had the Fire for 3 weeks now. While if I looked for them I could find complaints (wi fii connectivity sometimes inexplicable, yes there is glare if you are reading in the sun)so far the Fire has done everything I wanted it for and more.  I get books, music,games,android apps,internet, email etc plus all the video I could want. It all looks and sounds great with super easy user interface.  The Prime membership is real value for the money with all the included freebies it offers such as all the free instant streaming movies, free 2 day shipping etc., etc.  I love travelling with it (when wi fii connectivity is uncertain I will just download what I think I will want and then just store in the cloud after).  It is a good looking, highly affordable, highly user friendly, perfectly sized portable media device that does exactly what I wanted it for. If this is the type of device you want you will absolutely love the Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsinsanely fun!,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;Nicki G-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle fire is not just for reading. When you get done youtubing, tweeting and playing angry birds you might decide to read a book. The screen is nice the speakers are better then i expected. Its pretty fast. Internet is smooth downloading aps is super fast. If your thinking about another tablet the kindle fire is very reasonably priced and it does almost everything the big tablets do which i was surprised about. Also its not as big as alot of them which is cool it fits in any purse. The battery life is good i got through several hours of browsing, game playing and watching videos before the battery drained. It looks cool, the apps are cool it just is cool get one!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle Fire-Best purchase Ever!,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;tech-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The choices between an ipad and a Kindle fire is easy. The Kindle Fire is small enough to fit in your purse / briefcase but big enough to surf and watch whatever you want comfortably. Ipads are really in the laptop category. I love my Kindle Fire. The price, size, and WOW are all in my range! I work on it comfortably on my couch instead of at my desk. I am on it right now. I spend more time working and searching than I could before. I learned to.print from google chrome cloud. I haven't found anything I can't  Do on this amazing product. Thank you Amazon, you changed my life!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Simply Fantastic,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;Alan C. Lynch "bopdaddy"(DFW,Tx)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very picky where spending my money is concerned..I did many product reviews before choosing the Kindle Fire.  I was looking to upgrade from my standard nook reader. I am very pleased with the unit so far. Book reading is very good and page turning responds well and is easy on the eyes.  Gaming on Angry Birds was smooth with no lag. Facebook loads quick and is easily viewable. Tried streaming a John Wayne movie off of the Prime service.It loaded quick looked good and I could actually hear it without plugging in the headphones,which is unheard of on my laptop. Music streaming off of Pandora is not great on speakers but fantastic on my JVC earbuds with no lag or stopping to buffer.  Youtube loaded quickly and streamed o.k. in full screen mode..The web browser loads fast and is responsive for an android..So I will finish up by stating that I give the device 4.5 stars out of 5 for the money spent..So I say get off your butt,slap yourself or whatever it takes to get YOU one..You will be happy..Remember one thing it is not a gaming computer or a $600.00 tablet..If that's your expectations look elsewhere....Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMamaw's Thoughts,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;mamaw-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Already have an IPad and think the Amazon Kindle Fire is a wonderful product for the price. Have been more than satisfied with the product and our family now has three of them. It was a surprise to a lot of people just before Christmas without much advertisement.  I truly believe that word of mouth on the excellence of this product will see sales soar.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsNeeds more apps...,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Brandon(PITTSBURGH, PA, US)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Don't do a whole lot of reviews, but I'm hoping I can help everyone who wants a little more functionality out of their Fire (also hoping Amazon reads these reviews and listens to the recommendations). I don't expect a $200 device to replace a laptop, but I noticed that the selection of apps for the Fire is lacking. I depend on apps like Dropbox to keep all my files synced so that I can access them anywhere. This is especially important on devices that do not have SD or USB capabilities. I have a Samsung Tab 10.1, and got the Fire because of its small size and portability. I incorrectly assumed that the Android-based OS would support all of the apps offered in the Android Market. I think Amazon has a hit here if they can either #1 - make all of the apps available in Android Market available on the Fire, or #2 - allow Fire owners to download apps from the Android Market that are not offered in the Amazon Market. Overall, I like the device, love the size, and am still a huge fan of Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI cannot put it down!,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;Jason(St Louis, MO)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been slow to jump into the tablet market...in my 30 years as a computer programmer and IT professional, I have seen a lot of attempts at tablets and they have been lackluster at best.  I refuse to pay laptop prices for the stripped down functionality of the high-end tablets out there, so I was cautiously optimistic when I saw the Kindle Fire come out.  I gave it some time and read all of the industry and consumer feedback I could before finally deciding to take the plunge.  I'm glad I did.Yes, there are annoyances with it.  It is a first generation product, and it does not cost as much as the high-end.  I am not coming into this as an iPad user who is looking for a cheaper iPad; rather, I'm looking for something that I can read books, watch video, listen to music, do some light-weight email and browse the web in a first-class fashion.  I don't need a lot of storage, I might want a video for a flight or something but I don't need to put my huge MP3 collection on it all at once.  The Kindle Fire meets all of those needs quite well.  Here are my overall impressions:Look/FeelKindle gets an A+ here.  It is strikingly beautiful, the screen resolution is outstanding.  The responsiveness of the operating system is good.ControlsKindle gets a B+, maybe an A here.  I am torn because the lack of a physical volume control is somewhat of a pain, but I am also an ex-Zune user and it has the same issue (though the Zune has a physical button to immediately bring up the on-screen controls for volume and track).  So the times that I need to turn the volume down fast, I grumble having to make 2-3 taps to get to the volume control.  However, when I'm watching a video or reading I am really glad the thing isn't littered with buttons so I can hold it however I please and not change things.User InterfaceI heard lots of complains about it not having the normal Android interface.  I've got very few issues with Amazon's interface (and I find Androids to be a less than useful clone of Apple's less than useful interface).  Kindle's interface is speedy and responsive.  It keeps with the book heritage and presents you with a bookshelf that shows you your recent activity in landscape mode or recent activity plus a favorites shelf in portrait mode.  What is missing?  The ability to organize things and create folders (or shelves, or whatever the UI guys decide to call it).  At this early juncture in my experience, it is a limiting factor but not bad.  As I acquire more "stuff" on my Kindle and on Amazon's cloud service, I see it being more and more of an issue.Amazon Cloud vs Storage SpaceI really like the cloud service idea.  I wasn't too sure how I'd feel...as a senior leader in an enterprise IT product organization, I sometimes feel as though I will turn a little green and need to leave the room in a hurry when I hear "cloud" being thrown around.  But the concept really gels on the Kindle.  I was able to put my complete (and extensive/large) MP3 collection on Amazon's service after purchasing the $20/yr upgrade to the first tier of Cloud Drive which includes UNLIMITED music storage (an awesome option).  I couldn't dream of having all my music available like this before, so this has been great.  I've begun to really adopt the Amazon service model and I like it.That being said, the omission of an SD card slot will be the deal killer for a lot of people.  Some, like myself, can live with the absence and work around it easily enough, but if you are one who wants to have everything with you all the time it just ices the whole thing down.  I realize it was important to meet the price point, but I fully expect Amazon to give into pressure and add a slot to the next generation Kindle (even if the price jumps a bit, I think it'd be OK).  If you are around wifi most of the time like I am, it isn't as big of a deal.SizeI find the size perfect.  The ipad is just too big for me...more like a wanna-be laptop than a tablet.  Phones are too small, but the 7" screen here is just right.  Big enough to enjoy videos, small enough to be portable.  I have bad eyesight and require fairly strong prescription glasses to get by, and I don't have any issue reading print on the Kindle Fire.  The size does provide some challenges on very small links on web pages, but this can easily be worked around by pinch-zooming the link and tapping it...a fair trade-off for the very few times I've encountered this (plus, this issue is more about idiot web designers who put "cute" above "useful" in their design priorities and less about the Kindle or its size).Web BrowsingI find the browser to be about 95% "there" as a complete and polished product.  It renders almost all of the sites I have visited perfectly.  It has a good tabbed browsing interface, options to load tabs in the background or foreground when you open them, it is easy to open links in new tabs, the bookmarks interface is decent (note to Amazon: please quit blanking out the URL field when the user hits "next" on the keyboard...highly annoying!).  As a heavy tabs user, I've found it to be a bit limited in the number of open tabs it supports...I keep running into "too many tabs open" and this is forcing a change of my browsing habits in a way I consider a negative.However, after years of seeing only a few browsers ever do a good job of being useful, I applaud Amazon for Silk.  It isn't 100% yet, but it must have been a monumental effort to get as far as they did in time for market.  This is a make-or-break feature and they did it.  It is a solid and sound design and the complaints I have about it really are either device limitations (tab limits due to memory I presume) or obvious bugs I have faith will be fixed before long.  As a long-time software developer, I have sympathy for the guys working hard on this feature and applaud what they have accomplished.SummaryI love this thing.  It has its limitations and bugs, but considering the cost is only a little more than a simple copy of Windows 7 (which has many more bugs!) I'm quite happy.  It fits the needs I outlined in the beginning, and fits them in a surprisingly good way.  I figured one measure of it would be how quickly I felt like I needed to root it and install the Android app store.  In my younger days, I'd have probably done that first thing but as I've aged I have come to the point I just want things to work.  I want computers to enable the things I do as opposed to "be" the thing I do.  I don't feel constrained by the Amazon app store yet.  I don't feel I want to root it, although I do wish it had Google Apps available.Buy it!  You won't regret it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe gift of the season!,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;MichiganMom-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So...this is not going to be a high tech review.  You can read the other reviews for all the detailed information.  As a mom of two teenagers(14 &amp; 16)this was the gift of the year!  We do not have internet on our phones - this is the next best thing.  Larger than an Ipod touch and it costs the same.  Sometimes smaller can be better but the Kindle is WAY COOLER! The only issue - Amazon requires a credit card on file to access the apps - even the free ones. I believe there is a way to restrict the credit card access..but through our bank we can get a shopsafe # for whatever limit we choose and that is how much the kids have to spend.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTurn off the 'Accelerate page loading' feature and it works fine,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;V Dubbya(San Diego, CA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Before I turned off the 'Accelerate Page Loading' feature of the Silk browser, I was going to return the Fire.  Browsing was 'sooooooooo sloooooooow', that I couldn't wait the 30-60 seconds it took to load anything but an amazon.com URL.  I decided to 'Google' it (using my regular computer) to see if this was a rampant problem.  Turns out it was, and the fix was to disable the 'Accelerate Page Loading' option in the 'Web Settings' menu.  As soon as I did that, web browsing sped up, and the device was usable! Now, I am very satisfied with my Kindle Fire.Granted, the Fire doesn't have all the bells and whistles as the 'other tablets', yet it is much cheaper. :)  For me personally, I didn't need a $500-$800 device that is used for reading, light browsing, watching videos, with some email thrown in.  This is perfect for my needs and especially given the current price - $199.Last thought - I have full confidence that Amazon will fix the browser-loading problem.  It is a v1 of the new Silk browser after all.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFire Kindle,December 31, 2011By&nbsp;Chris Larsen(Cathedral City, CA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like this new electronic marvel. I was pleasantly surprised that it has a back lit screen, and I don't need an additional light. The ease of use is basic and good.  I have yet to stream any movies or videos, and hope that there will be some freebies or some lower cost ones available in the future. I love listening to music while I read so this is a great feature. The hi-def screen is so sharp and easy to read and see.The drawbacks are listed here:For newbies there are no printed instructions and the power button is so shy that most people may spend some minutes wondering where and how to turn it on (not me mind you) but I handed it over to a non computer geek and they couldn't figure it out then turned it on by accident after they happened to touch the button.The weight is much greater than the 6" Kindle last generation w/keyboard, I get tired holding it.I was shocked to find an old generation type transformer plug to charge this unit. I love the technological advanced flat plug for the 3rd generation kindle that can easily fit in any socket or pull off the end revealing a USB plug and charge it via a USB. The Fire uses an antiquated cumbersome plug, I miss that flat and neat plug. Maybe next Fire generation we will see a new and improved plug???I do find the keyboard rather too sensitive, and I end up hitting too many wrong keys, but that will just be something to get used to on my end, took me about seven tries to log in to my email/FB.Okay last tiny complaint, it only lasts about 8hrs on a charge while my last generation lasts a month of fun reading. But if anything it just reminds me that I like the Kindle should take a break and let it and me recharge.But the price is good, and for what this geek toy/device does, it will bring much joy, entertainment, many reading adventures and is highly worth the price and the little bit of learning curve involved in using it. KUDOS on a basically fun and great product!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Choice this Holiday Season,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;Platoist-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Love it! Love it! Love it! Problems with the first one received locking up on initial configuration were handled most graciously with replacement in less than two days.  After that, smooth sailing. Fast. Fun to use. Free 30-day Prime practically paid for the unit in holiday shipping alone. Sure, iPad may have more features, but at a way different price point. For the money this thing can't be beat.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsawesome device,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;R. A. Geiger "beccanrobg"(washington)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just received my fire last night.  The battery life is great.  Watched two prime movies and played games and read. At least 4 hours battery life when using wifi.  Easy to use.  I haven't had any issues with the placenent of the power button.  Typing this review on the Fire is easy.  This exceeds my expectations and I am very glad I bought this with my Christmas money.  I have been able to bring my books over easy but haven't yet tried to bring over data off a Pc.  Maybe tonight!  Recommend this to everyone. Won't replace my laptop.  But almost and much more portible.  Thanks Amazon.  Btw gave 3 Kindles to family - almost wish I gave them Fires.  It is sizzling!  Good luck getting in store - call ahead.  Had to order mine and wait two whole days.  Much worth it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsBest purchase in a long time,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Alyssa(Illinois, USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was one of those people who always thought that I wouldn't like to read a book on an electronic device. I was contemplating buying a tablet for streaming videos and searching the web when Amazon came out with the Kindle Fire. I decided to try it out at Best Buy and really liked the easiness of it. I'm really glad I decided to buy this over a tablet because tablets are so expensive and frankly I couldn't afford a 3G network monthly anyway. So, the Kindle Fire was a perfect fit for me. I absolutely love reading books on it and I really thought I would miss reading an actual paperback/hardcover book. I think this is the best purchase I have made in a very long time. If you want the luxury of streaming your netflix or hulu+ videos and having a device for storing books then this is what you want. I have an iPod touch, so I already knew what to expect from an iPad and might have purchased one if I was willing to spend $500 or more on a tablet. I'm really glad I went with the Kindle Fire over an iPad because the kindle was everything I wanted in a tablet. I commute on a train to work every day and it is so much easier to hold a kindle over a book. I don't feel the strain on my neck or in my hands from having to hold it, but I would if I had an actual book with me. I find no difficulty in holding it and turning the pages. I'm waiting for Amazon Prime to have better access to movies and TV before I buy a membership, but I'm glad I could try it out for a month. If I couldn't rent books from a library using my kindle, I would probably consider having the membership for the books only. I love that they have daily deals! They offer some really great books at a great price! I know some people complain that the price of the ebooks are more than the actual book, but if you consider shipping prices and the waiting period I think it balances out and works in favor of the ebook version.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStreaming media player,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Frank L. Warren-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre-ordered mine and ended up getting another for an 11yo boy for Christmas. Will pre-order 9-10 inch version when they become available for this summer(?). Recently got all my media (2+TB of movies, photos and music) setup for wireless streaming from my LAN to my Kindles (Skifta on Kindle, serviio on my linux machine). Works great!! Great consumption device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;Liz P-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We got this as a Christmas gift for our 14-year-old. He hasn't put it down for three days. He treats it like a baby. He ran out to buy a cover for it with his own cash on the day after Christmas. To say he loves it is an understatement.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 26, 2011By&nbsp;Robert Seaman(Naples, Florida)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire is an excellent reader and tablet. Great color screen quality and provides quick access to the web. Finally decided to buy the prime subscription for the year for $79. Benefits seem to be worth the expense, after discussing the tradeoffs with the Amazon customer support staff. The Fire is not good for reading in the sunlight due to the back lighting of the screen. Same issue as the iPad. Overall, great buy for what it provides.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGood for the price but that's about it,December 25, 2011By&nbsp;K. Liang(Bay Area, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had this kindle for about a month now and i think it's overall pretty good. it's even more amazing if you're using it to access Amazon content such as watching Amazon VOD or using it to your Kindle books. However, that's pretty much about it. I don't know if my kindle is defective or what but it's extremely slow when it comes to browsing the internet or using it to watch youtube. it's so slow that i have just used my iphone instead most of the time. Sometimes it'd take about a minute to load a website (like youtube or even google) and it takes even longer to search for a video on youtube. Sometimes after a while it just stops loading the pages. I really don't know why. Also, it's absolutely stupid of Amazon to put the power button on the bottom of the Kindle. I have accidentally turned off my kindle on many occasions because of that.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI want to love it and DO!!,December 25, 2011By&nbsp;Brian(Louisiana)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Sure read all the reviews, I did. Read all the NEWS, I did also. Then I bought one because Amazon has a good return policy. But, sorry Amazon I am keeping my Fire and you can't have it back...lol Yes, I own an Iphone, Ipod Touch, Kindle 2G, Kindle Touch, and have played on an Ipad.The Fire's touch screen works great. The web browsing is fast and the screen is beautiful. My only issue is I get fingerprints on my screen..lolIt is just as responsive as my Iphone and Ipod...I notice NO difference.I do not understand all the bad press or reviews however I don't understand MOST of what goes on in AMERICA anymore either.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsMerry Christmas to me!,December 23, 2011By&nbsp;bluemoon219-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had a Sony eReader years ago that stopped working after 2 years. Since then I convinced myself that I already have a netbook, a desktop, 2 personal laptops, and my business laptop, add in my smart phone, I really didn't see the need to purchase yet another ebook gadget. Well nothing beats just having an eReader especially when you travel a lot and have to go through TSA.After multiple discussion with myself about purchasing a tablet- I was looking at the Samsung Galaxy, Nook, and Kindle. I decided to get the Kindle 3G/Touch- but found myself picking up the Kindle Fire in Best Buy. I really just need the tablet to read ebooks since I do quite a bit of reviews.After a full 24 hours with the Kindle Fire- I must say I'm hooked. I'm using the trial of the Amazon Prime and I will purchase that as well. The Fire holds my books from Amazon and the PDF used for my reviews. I was able to watch a movie on the Fire w/o my glasses since there was little to no glare, I surfed the web, downloaded a few applications, played a game, and basically lost myself in the new toy.There are moments when I second guess my decision to not get the Nook since I'm a BN preferred reader and get discounts, but for the most part I'm happy with my purchase.I do have a few 'I wish the Fire had...' moments.  I wish there was a USB included or a portable one not attached to the plug for easy use with charging and with computer. I wish a stylus came the device. I wish there was 3G/4G coverage (since I already pay for that with my cell coverage).As of right now I don't have any negatives about Kindle Fire- maybe because I know that it isn't like the Galaxy Tab or iPad and for right now I'm able to do everything that I think I want right now.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat gift item,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Joseph Rivera "prophet60"(trainer, pa. United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Since I recieved my Kindle Fire a couple weeks ago, I have used it everyday. It has great portability, and great wifi conection. Downloading is easy and quick. Browsing the web is a snap. I have read some complaints about there being no external volume control button. That isn't much of a problom. You can easily find it at the top of the page on the tools icon (shaped like a gear). Tap that and you have a slider control for the sound. I do think they need to allow the volume the go a little higher than it does on the exteral speakers, esp. for hearing speach.Music comes across better. of course, using headphones works fine with the volume. The main problem I have, is that I can't seem to use links on the google search page. A minor inconvience, I just type in the web address at the top of the browser. I was surprised that I was able to order and watch an I-pay-per-view, which was a CZW wrestling live event. It came accross beautifully. Oh ya, you can read books, comics, mags, etc. with ease as well as play games.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Douglas H. Case(S.E. MICH. USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have only had my Kindle about two weeks, so I have a ways to go to find it's full potential.In my opinion the display is very good. I have watched some you tube videos and a couple of movies on it, the definition is very good and the WiFi stream is excellent.The kindle can be a little quirky, I've had the touch screen zoom back to small print when I cancelled a pop up (the touch screen is sensitive). I has also shut down out out of the blue, it had more than 50% battery, my thought was I may have touched the little on/off button(it can also be sensitive), but it usually asks shutdown or cancel (but not always).Over all I am very happy with my purchase it exceeds my expectations and I would recommend it to a friend. I can access my e-mail, send e-mails, check IMBDb for actors names, you tube, yahoo news, TV listings, sports news, Wikpedia and Google all from my recliner.I strongly advise that if you purchase a Kindle Fire read the Kindle Fire User's Guide end to end first, it will save you some frustration later.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDo your research and decide for yourself!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Hellcat6-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very happy with the fire and if I wasn't so lazy I would echo what most of the positive reviewers are saying.  Runs everything I throw at it, really like the size and feel of it.  No, not as sophisticated as my iPad, which is not as sophisticated as my laptop. See my point?  Screen is great.  The back arrow does have some issues and doesn't always respond.  Battery life is not great but I just accept that too as the compromise for only spending $200.  I believe you would be very happy with it too, but if everything has to be perfect you should continue to look (let us all know when you find the perfect product).Normally if I am going to spend $200 on something I will research the product and then perhaps purchase from someone that I know I can return it to and then take it for a real testdrive.  How else are you going to know for sure?  If you are reading this, that probably means you believe in doing some research also.  I enjoy the reviews, positive or negative, from the folks who really took the time and are speaking their minds.  You can learn a lot that way and then maybe you won't be the guy who is returning his because he thought it had 3G!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsCan't beat it for the Price,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Paul G. Strahan "Biff Hardcore"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Lots of people seemed to expect this to be an I-Pad I have an I-pad and this device is in fact all the things the I-Pad is not. DRM free makes it the most friendly of media and web appliances I have ever seen. I am a prime member and I have lots of free Movies to choose from. Anything I buy on amazon will play on this device and any other device I want including the I-pad. The I-tunes model is not friendly like amazon. Amazon will be my media provider from now on. For 200.00 there is nothing that comes close. I am sure in the future they will make a fater one for more money. When the do. I will get that one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - pertect!,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;Andy D-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire! I've read some critical reviews online, but it does everything I want it to do, and everything Amazon said it would do. I have large fingers/hands and don't have any trouble turning pages or operating the touch screen, and have found the entire unit very easy to operate. I don't expect it to replace a laptop in terms of storage, I use it purely for entertainment and I'm quite satisfied. For this price I think it's an excellent value, and recommend it highly.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEasy, fun, and entertaining!,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;jessjanjoe-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was really excited when I got my kindle fire. I was worried after reading some of the reviews some people have written on here. So I bought it anyways and hoped for the best.Pros:1. First of all, my kindle fire arrived two days before the estimated arrival date. I didn't have to sign for it (which I agree should be required) and it wasn't left on my doorway either. I actually found it in my mailbox. We also had snow and mud that week so I was glad my kindle wasn't left out in the snow.2. Setup was incredibly easy! I opened the box, pushed the power button, and signed into my amazon account. I had no problems connecting to my wifi either.3. I found tons of free apps and books to download. I have 25 books and 40 apps so far that I haven't paid a dime for.4. The touchpad is very responsive, and the sound quality rivals my computers!5. Very light and easy to travel with.Cons:1. The battery doesn't last as long as I would like it to. But I also read for most of the day so that does effect the battery.I would also like to address some of the other concerns that some people mentioned:1. POWER BUTTON. If you flip the kindle upside down, then the power button is at the top and it doesn't get bumped as easily. It doesn't work on every app, but I flip it everytime I read.2. EASY ACCESS: Go to the settings, select more, select security, turn security password on, and set a password. As long as nobody knows your password, nobody can get into your kindle!I love my Kindle Fire and I would definately recommend it to anybody who asks me. If your looking for something to replace your computer then you won't be satisfied with the Kindle Fire. I use both a lot, but there are still things that are easier done on a computer. The Kindle Fire is nice to use when ready away from home (or at home). The Android app store has tons of apps that are entertaining and handy for a busy mother like myself. A huge plus is that most of these apps are free! If you are thinking about buying a Kindle Fire, consider what you are wanting to use the device for and research other options that might be better for you. Thank you for reading this!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon Kindle Fire,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;A. Sharma(MO, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is an awesome product. I bought for my high schooler son, he originally wanted ipad, but this is working great. He has access to so many books and also can check in books from the local library. Take notes in class, Also so many apps available. Pretty much everything you need in a tablet. Also the graphics and speed of browsing is unbelievably crisp and fast. i will recommend anyone buying wifi Ipad to consider this. The 7" size is just right. I always thought Ipad is little big to carry around. Loving it. I just ordered a second one for myself.Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Review,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;Cantatta-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a great product for what it does.  What it does is deliver Amazon digital content, and I think it does this pretty well.  Is it the best device on the market?  No.  Is it a direct competitor to the iPad?  No.  However, the Fire is a great product, none the less.  While not being a full functional touch-screen tablet, it does most of the things that other tablets do.  It is Android based, with a little research you can Root the Fire and open it up so that it functions more like a true tablet.  You never truly own an Android device until it's Rooted.All of your content appears on the main screen in the order of most recently viewed or used.  This applies equally to web pages and e-books, videos and documents.  Each item is represented by an icon, and all of the icons appear in a flip-file or rolodex fashion. You just flip through the list until you find what you want.  The downside to the flip-file setup is that there is no security or privacy.  Whoever uses the Kindle Fire will be able to see exactly what the last person was doing.  You cannot change or remove items from this list, and there is no way to setup multiple users with different lists.  As long as you aren't doing anything wrong, or you don't share, this shouldn't be a problem.Additionally, on the main screen there are menu choices at the top, most of which are simple filters for the content you have on your Kindle.  There is also a clock and a settings menu at the upper-right of the main screen. You can choose between Videos, Docs, Web, Apps, etc. When you choose to view one particular item type, you choose further filters that will sort according to most recent or alphabetic, for instance.  It might be nice to have more choices for sorting, but the availble options work well enough.  There is a back-arrow at the bottom of the screen that will take you back to the previou screen, or back to the main menu, depending on where you are in the menu structure or inside an app.  There is also a Home button, represented buy a house icon, which will always take you back to the main menu from anywhere.As an e-reader, the Kindle Fire is as good as any other on the market. Gone is the E-Ink screen of the other Kindle devices. The color multi-touch screen funtions well, with plenty of sensitivity and good response and feel.  Occasionally, you have to press something twice before the Fire responds, so there is definitely room for improvement here.  Even so, the screen displays vivid color and high resolution graphics and video.  I find it easy to read web pages, e-books and PDFs.  Zoom functions allow you to get up close for fine print, if needed, and the zoom function is pretty snappy.  Navigating different digital documents is easy and intuitive, and the Fire loads them up pretty quickly.  I bought a DC comic book to see how it handles that kind of media, and it does a fantastic job.  You can zoom into individual frames on each page to get a nice closeup of the artwork and the text, but you can also read the comic just fine without zooming in, too.I had a little trouble viewing some streaming content on the Kindle Fire, but it was mostly with Amazon video content. Installing the Netflix app and streamuing from their service has been working much better, though I think there is room for improvment with the video streaming, just the same.  Most of the time the video looks great, but occasionally it gets blurry and pixilated.  This could be a bandwidth issue and not the fault of the Kindle Fire, I need to test streaming in more locations to be sure.  While not the most polished feature, streaming media does work on the Fire, and I have watched quite a few movies and TV shows on mine.  The screen provides a sharp, clear picture, though again, this will sometimes depend on bandwidth available on your wireless service. It is important to note that all tablets, PCs and smart phones are subject to this problem, not just the Fire.  The more bandwidth you have, the better streaming media will look and sound, no matter what device you are using.The Amazon App store is your sole source for apps on the Kindle Fire, unless you Root the Fire and install the Android Market manually.  The selection in the Amazon Market isn't as vast as that of the Android Market or iTunes Store yet, but there are a lot of good apps out there for the Fire, even so.  And something I don't think either of the other two offer at all, Amazon Market offers one free App every day.  This includes apps that you normally have to pay for.  I have gotten a few gems this way and often check in daily to see what's available.  I like this feature so much, I added Amazon Market to my Android smart phone.I will admit the price for the Kindle Fire influenced my decision to purchase.  I have wanted a Kindle since they first came out.  By the time they became cheap enough for me to consider buying one, rumors were floating around about a color Kindle, so I decided to wait.  The day the Kindle Fire was announced, I orderd one.  The price was right and I knew that it would do a lot more than a standard Kindle.  However, I never thought the Kindle Fire was going to replace the iPad or other tablets.  It isn't really designed to do that.  However, as I said before, it does what it's designed to do pretty well, in my opinion.The Kindle Fire could use some improvements, no doubt about it, but for the price, there isn't anything better available right now.  Amazon is planning an update in the near future, we'll have to see what is in store for the Kindle Fire.  As it stands, I'm pretty happy with my purchase of a Kindle Fire.  It does everything I want it do, and it does most of it pretty darn well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle fire, for the most part,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;Sandy Shore(Muskegon, MI  USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my new Kindle fire, it's a great e reader and I like that I can put music on it too.  I like playing games and using the web browser, but I wish it were more like a computer and less like a cell phone as far as browsing, all web pages are not usable or accessible.  I also don't like that it stores my web pages, so I can never really sign out of my email or facebook.  If I were a single person living alone, I guess this wouldn't be an issue, but I have family and I prefer to sign out of social networking sites and email, rather than let everyone have access.  Also, I need to recharge it almost everyday, because my son is addicted to Angry Birds, so I wish the battery lasted longer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoving it!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;K. Wasson(Mill Creek, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for just over a month. I love it. I have been reading all the reviews and feedback which I also did before I purchased it. Many complaints are that it isn't an I Pad. If I wanted an I Pad I would have bought an I  Pad. I did not expect it to perform like an I Pad. I wanted something to instantly download books to and games along with movies. I love reading on it because it is just about the size of a paperback. It can become heavy at times but my case has a stand on it so I can read that way too. I love the games, (Angry Birds addict here), videos and movies. The Amazon Prime trial was great and I just re-upped for the next year. I think with all the free stuff that comes with the Amazon Prime membership it will more than pay for itself.Today I had the screen freeze up on me. I went to the Amazon.com and got the tech support. Up and running in 3 minutes flat. For someone who is not the most computer tech sauvy I love the Customer Support for the Kindle Fire. It is written in plain talk unlike Apple's instructions.  I would highly recomend Kindle Fire...and actually have to many frineds and family.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExactly what we wanted and expected,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Duane A. Priest(Saint Louis, MO)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The news is full of gibberish comparing the Kindle Fire to the Apple iPad.  Why?  These products are not designed to compete other than the fact that they are both essentially tablets.  Amazon and Apple are targeting two different markets, and I believe that was Amazon's intent from the beginning.  Every time a new tablet device is introduced it seems like the world has to compare it to the iPad whether it's designed as a competitive product or not, and that doesn't make sense.  I own and use an iPad2 daily for business and personal purposes; the iPad has replaced the notebook computer I used to lug about in meetings, when traveling, etc.  It's an excellent tool that I keep at hand all the time.  It will perform most all of the same functions as the Kindle Fire as well as the functions I need for business purposes.I purchased the Fire as a media device for use at home:  my household uses it daily to read books, to listen to music, to watch video and to play games.  It replaced an iPod Touch, actually.  It's a very convenient way to browse the web, check email and so on.  We use the internet heavily, and the Fire is an excellent portable household portal for our needs.  The Fire compliments the iPad in my home by making these services available on an additional device, or becomes the primary portable device when I'm away from home with my iPad.If I was pressed to find fault with the device, I would have to say that the power button on the bottom of the tablet is sometimes a bit difficult to find.  Since ours is in a leather case, we don't have any issue with inadvertently turning it off like some have reported. I would also like a some more flexibility in organizing the apps/books/media on the main screen.  For the initial release of a brand new product, I'd say it's pretty rock-solid compared to the other technologies I've reviewed in the past.  I understand an update will be coming out within the next 2 weeks, and though I don't know what that will contain just yet, it does speak to Amazon's commitment to the product.Some have complained about the ease with which apps and books are purchased using Amazon's store, making it possible for children to make unsupervised purchases.  Personally, I have no problems with this and appreciate it... this device is a physical extension of Amazon's massive media marketplace and users know that before they purchase the Fire.  Entering a complex password each time I make a purchase can be difficult, particularly when you're in a hurry or on the move.  Only adults use the device in my household, and if children do get access, they do so only when they are supervised.  Would I buy the Fire for a child to use?  No, or not likely. In my opinion this is not a child's toy and parents who purchase them for their children should understand these and accept these risks up front.  If Amazon were to implement a series of parental controls and other "child safety" features in order to appease this minority I would hope they would do so with a master control to either enable or disable the feature, as it seems unjust to punish the majority for the errors in judgement of the minority.I would definitely recommend the Fire as an excellent alternative to other Reader devices.  This device has a wealth of features that make it a wonderful personal media device.  The strength of Amazon and the wealth of media they offer makes the device makes it a winner.  Buyers who are looking at this device as a desktop/notebook replacement should rethink their strategy and look at other devices that are more appropriate.  We're happy with our purchase decision and we look forward to the ongoing innovation Amazon continues to offer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNo Complaints!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Sharon M(Central AZ, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire as soon as they were shipped and I have been thrilled with it!  This was an upgrade from a Kindle 2 for me. I've read some of the negative reviews and although I've noticed some of these issues with my KF, they were simple to resolve.  I use a stylus on the touch screen for easy and accurate maneuvering around.  I got the Kids Place App and have it set up with kids games so I can hand off the KF to my granddaughters and not worry about unintended net searches or purchases.  I have inadvertently turned off the KF a few times because of the location of the power button, but you get used to its placement quickly.  If this bugs you, simple turn the KF upside down and the power button is on top.  I love reading books because of the backlit screen, and newspapers come in sharp and clear, including photos and illustrations.  It's so convenient to touch internet links within articles that I'm reading to quickly take me to new sites of interest.  I also love the Tunein Radio Pro app for listening to all my favorite NPR podcasts on MY schedule.  I plug in earphones and put the KF in a pocket, so I can listen while I'm doing chores around the house.  I've watched videos and played music--all come through perfectly.  For months, I had been considering getting a smart phone but I really can't afford the monthly charges, so I figure the KF is my *smart phone* with all the fun features, but no phone, GPS or camera which I don't need anyway!  And the price is right at the one time cost of $199!  Can't go wrong!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome Multimedia Device - I Love My Kindle Fire !!!!!,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;Scott David Oconnell-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire for a month now, so I am well familiar with it to give an honest review.  I've used this device on a daily basis and have found that it fully meets all of my expectations.First of all, the device is the next generation Kindle, not an iPad or even a Gallaxy Tab for that matter.  I bought it understanding this and wanted solely for the following uses:Read Magazines, Newspapers and BooksListen to MusicWatch Movies, TV Shows and VideoAccess and read common docs such as Word and PDFInstall Basic User Apps (Alarm Clock, Google Calendar, Contacts Sync, Games, Hulu, Notes, etc.)Check and send email from multiple accountsSurf the web with a full featured browserThose are the primary reasons I purchased my Kindle Fire and I must say that it has actually exceeded all of my expectations in this regard.  It was extremely easy and intuitive to setup and configure my email accounts.I am a bit of an audiophile and I think the built in music player sounds great.  The player includes various equalizer settings to fine tune the sound for user preference.  I don't think the quality is quite 100% audiophile quality, but I found it to be rather good none the less and completely acceptable.  It does not produce a hollow sound like some of the other streaming players out there such as Pandora.  I found the audio quality highly exceeded that I had heard in the past from Pandora streaming.  If you are a Pandora fan however, the Pandora app is available for free on the Kindle Fire.For the same price as one unit of the number one premium tablet on the market today, I could buy 2 Kindle Fires, one for my son and the other for my daughter and drop them in their stocking.  I would also have $100 left over to load their Kindle Fires up with all kinds of content.The video player works great, all the apps I have installed also work great.  The fact that there are only 1000+ apps available on the amazon app store is fine with me.  I know the apple app store has over 10,000 apps, but that just tells me there are 9000 useless apps on the apple app store.  You are only going to have a few dozen apps at most that you commonly use anyway.If you purchase the Fire for your kids, you may want to setup the account to use a gift card that can be loaded when wanted to prevent any accidental purchases.  I've heard some complain about  accidental purchases being made but I think that this either fixed or is being fixed.  Easily solved by setting up a gift card or visa gift card that can be loaded with more funds.If you expect it function like the most premium device on the market that is 3X the cost, then buy something else.  If you want to the things mentioned in this review, then the Kindle Fire will work great. As long as you have proper expectations, you will be happy with your Kindle Fire purchase.  It really does work great and serves a need for such a wonderfull price.  Thanks Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVideos play and look way better than on the Nook,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;cocofan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own a B&N; Color Nook (I'm computer-savvy so I don't do Apple) so my review is more of a comparison with the Nook.  So far it has a slightly more intuitive UI to it (the 'carousel' is annoying but you don't have to use it; you can drag things off of it onto the shelves below).  Unlike Nook, it at least recognizes that I need to pull up a browser window to authenticate to get internet access (although it keeps bugging me about logging on even after I've hit the cancel button).  Both Nook and Fire have the same problem of unresponsiveness to touch but I'm finding this is a problem with all Android devices (not sure what the problem is here).  What I really love (and the reason I gave it an extra star) was watching TV and Movies on it is a real pleasure (very responsive and quite crisp screen).  The Nook freezes sometimes when watching YouTube videos.  I mainly bought it in the hopes of getting more choices in things to do with it.  B&N; only provides books, magazines and newspapers and doesn't provide anywhere near what Amazon does.  In this I wasn't disappointed although I do have to pay for the content.  I'm not complaining about that since I do think Amazon needs to make a profit somewhere as they're supposedly not making it on the hardware (I guess some people want everything free in life even if it means running everything into the ground. Sigh).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it.,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Eric C. Welch(Illinois)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)OK, let's get my technophilia out of the way first.  I have an iTouch, an iPhone, a Kindle 2 (now my wife's) a Kindle 3, have had my Kindle Fire for about a month, and a Gingerbread rooted color nook.  I have used, but not purchased, an iPad (1st generation only.) The Fire and Kindle 3 are may favorite devices (although the iTouch is great for reading in bed, it being so small.) The Fire takes some getting used to as it handles files and recent purchases differently.  I know some have complained that it doesn't hide what you were doing if someone else picks it up.  Frankly I don't care who sees what I have been reading or watching. I've sent documents to my Fire through Readbility and it works great.  I love the screen.  Yes, I wish the on/off button were in a different place, but I easily adapted to it. Yes, I wish it had an external volume button, but once familiar with the software it's second nature. I have listened to my music in the Amazon cloud and watched Netflix and Amazon movies (these could use better buffering.)  I could have bought an iPad but they really don't compete, especially since the iPad is double that of the Fire.  Would I buy the Fire again?  Absolutely. The Kindle 3 and Fire complement each other nicely and the Amazon software beats Kobo and B&N; hands down (I have accounts with them too.)  Did I mention I was a software junkie, too?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot an Edsel,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Leslie-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just finished reading a review of Amazon's Kindle Fire comparing it to the Edsel. Are they kidding me? I bought my Kindle Fire the first day it was available so have now been using it for almost a month. I also own an ipad. I really see no difference except for the PRICE!  Whether I'm checking email, surfing the net, watching a movie or reading a book, the performance is amazing! Watching a movie, the picture is crystal clear. I got the Amazon Prime free for the first month and am hooked!I especially love the lending library! All the apps on my ipad I have found for my Fire! I just stick it in my pocketbook and away I go! I just love it! There is no way I can say enough good things about it. Don't listen to the nay sayers, try it for yourself and decide!Well worth every single penny!(Buy Amazon stock with the difference!)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Value, GREAT PRODUCT!!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Steve-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have purchased from Amazon for many years but never took the time to wirte a review on any product until now. Guys this reader is fantastic.I purchased this kindle originally for reading books but was pleasently surprised at the form and function. It is sized just right for books, but the video and gaming capabilites are wonderful as well. When i turned it on, all by previously purchased books downloaded without a hitch. It streams videos smoothly, and downloads them if you wish as well. The video is really amaizing to me. As good or better than the iPad. Music, no problem. Web browsing is easy and fast. I have an expensive laptop, and put the Kindle against it to see which was faster when browzing the web. The kindle held its own every time. Apps, TV, all great, and you know what, i even love Amazon prime. Many of the TV shows and movies are free and frre shipping every time? Heck I'll pay for the kindle in just those savings.Thanks Amazon, This is one of the best values I've purchased.SteveHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsResponse to some of the Fire negativity,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;F. McCouan "Freddi"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been reading many of the negative and mediocre reviews of the Fire.  I disagree with most of them and I suspect that the people who are complaining did not research it before buying or expected it to be a mini ipad2 or maybe I am not as fussy as they are.  the Fire does exactly what I want it to and will be great for travel.  I will use it in place of my netbook and have more features in a smaller, lighter package.That being said, it took me several weeks to get used to the android platform but now I am navigating with no trouble.  In response to some of the complaints, I do not find the silk too slow.  I have uploaded all of my photos to Picasa Web and can view them on the fire without using up memory.  the no 3g can be solved by a mobile hot spot on  a cell phone  ($20 with Verizon.), I own a decent camera and do not feel the need for one on my tablet,  the small keyboard can easily be used with a stylus (6.95 at Amazon), more and more apps are being added everyday, the reading with backlight is fine in doors and for outside I use my kindle 3.  the carousel is a little annoying but I don't seem to use it very much.  I go right to my favorites on the web or in the apps.To sum things up. it was a great deal at $199 and I spend hours each day discovering new features.  Iam fine with the Fire and it does everything that I need ot to do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI totally love my Kindle Fire!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Veronica T. Coffin-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I can do everything I want on my Kindle Fire.  I can use  Netflix, I can log onto network websites and view TV shows like Hawaii 5-0 on [...].  I can play games, I love the free Android app every day.  I can log onto my local library site and download the kindle versions of books from the library.  Recently, I went to look at the competing Nook and I don't like it's slimmer and taller 7" style.  The Kindle fire is more stubby and you can view websites a lot easier.  I can also tweet - with tweetcaster being my favorite twitter app and use Facebook and Pandora.  In short, I've been having a lot of fun on my Kindle!I've read a lot of ads downgrading the Kindle Fire and it must be a political thing.  The on/off switch is nice just where it is and works fine.  Downloads are fast enough for me.  Web browsing could be a little faster but that might be due to my network channel.  The browser on my PC isn't that much faster.  Also, I'm not one for reading books on an e-reader, but its not that bad in a pinch or when you're waiting on something while out and about. I appreciate the pricing, but have heard that there are new tablets coming out next year which will be about $99 for a Novi7 (?)  However, for that price, I wouldn't expect too much in versatility. All in all, I'm thoroughly enjoying my new Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhy the flack?! This is amazing!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;CheshireCat "cheshire_cat0"-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire. I received it for my graduation present from college. This machine is exactly what I needed. The streaming video is amazing. The book selection is amazing. My eyes have not gotten tired once from reading one of the books. The power button on the bottom makes no difference to me. I have a cover and I have not accidentally pressed it once. The videos that I have streamed while working out are beautiful. It is small and light and inexpensive. I constantly am using it and thinking, "This machine is too beautiful for this price."I couldn't care less about the cloud storage, so I have no opinion on that. It is incredibly hard to access and should have a button on the main screen.I don't understand why people are comparing it to the IPAD. I now know 4 people that have given up there IPADS for a Kindle Fire.I don't want an IPAD, never have. People need to stop giving the Kindle Fire bad reviews and start actually using it! I know they will be impressed.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNever thought I would enjoy reading on an e-reader!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Avid Book Reader-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have never written a review for a product I have purchased before.  But after reading a negative news article about the new Kindle Fire I decided to jump in with my two cents for the thoughtful consumer.  I received the Kindle Fire from my mom as a Christmas present (early obviously).  I am a stone cold paper book only kind of reader...I was very leery of this kind of e-reader because I work in an office and stare at a bright computer screen all day long.  I figured how relaxing would it be to read on a screen after a long day at work?  Well since the Kindle has a 30 day trial I decided to give it a real try.  I must say I am hooked!  While I might still feel the urge for an old fashioned book now and then....the take your library with you ability of Kindle is awesome...the Fire makes it feel like a real reading experience and I forget it is not a paper book...the screen adjusts and is not too bright for my eyes.  Last night I was cooking dinner and I couldn't find a recipe I had printed out online a few days before....my Kindle Fire was nearby so I fired it up and did a quick web browse and found the recipe right away and propped up my Kindle and used it as my cookbook!  The web browsing is a bit slow, but my wi-fi at home is very fussy; and I don't like the way when you click a link in the search results it doesn't highlight to show it registered your touch (like on my Motorola Android phone which shows a link click).  But that is my only real beef with the Kindle Fire....which is not so big considering it is a new product....like a new car line they come with hiccups that are worked out in successive model years.  It would certainly not deter me from keeping the Kindle Fire....I love it and after one week of thorough trial I think I will not need the balance of the thirty days to make my decision!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt's not an iPad and I LOVE it!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Anita E Askew(Smyrna, GA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've read a lot of reviews about the Kindle Fire and was somewhat skeptical to purchase but what did I have to lose.  First, I wasn't looking to purchase a device with all of the bells and whistles of an iPad nor did I want to pay the price.  With the ever changing world of technology I just couldn't bring myself to fall victim to Apple and iPad considering the price.  I was looking for mobile internet at my fingertips that wasn't bulky.  The Fire is living up to my expectations and is one of the best purchases I've made this year.  The only reason I didn't give it five stars is because I had to purchase the Sprint mobile broadband card with 3G/4G which is $50/mo.  The positive to that is my company pays for my cell phone so I'm ok with paying for wireless service.Second, people should lower their expectations and stop comparing the Kindle Fire to the iPad.  I'm sure Amazon had no intentions to replace iPad and people need to get over it.  Stop comparing the two or just buy an iPad for God's sake.Thank you Amazon for producing a device that gives me what I need!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsserves it purpose,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;badham11-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased Kindle Fire about 2 wks ago. Had read all the negatives about the Fire. Still wanted it despite what was said. Was and is impressed what it can do. bought a case for it so i'm not having a problem with the power button being accidently pushed. Yes screen does freeze up every now and then and yes having fat fingers sometimes cause unit to be un-responsive. Having the case also might have something to do with freezing up for that second or two, because of the heat build-up. Even though i knew about the privacy issue with someone knowing what's on your unit i didn't think it would bother me...but it does. But not enough for me to not want this Fire. Plus as i watched the morning new today (12/13/11) i seen where Amazon is going to send out an update on these very issues within the next 2 wks. Way to go Amazon. So buying a new items which hasn't been tested on the open market is the rish that we make. So until Amazon send out updates i'm going to continue to enjoy my Fire. The cost of the unit, plus the willingness of Amazon to correct known issues makes me a very satisfied customer. So if you're un-sure about this product it's up to you to purchase and find out for yourself whether these or other issues is worth your time and money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome tablet!!!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Ricster76-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We bought a Kindle Fire to replace her iPod touch that had a software meltdown.  It is a fantastic device that she uses more than she ever used her iPod!  With the Amazon uploader, I was able to keep all the music that we had previously purchased through iTunes.  The apps that we have found so far are great, and our son is wanting to trade in his iPod to get a gift card to use towards a Kindle Fire for him.I have read several bad reviews, but it works perfectly for our needs: games, facebook, music, video, and email.Way to go, Amazon!!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsif I picked 5 stars, you wouldn't take me seriously....,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;unamaste-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Please read with me out loud:"the Kindle Fire is not a replacement for a real computer, it is not a peasant's Ipad nor ever meant to be". Ok, now that we have that out of the way, we can appreciate this device for what it truly is...a media consumption device or perhaps and ATM for Amazon in my house. Either of those is ok with me as I really like the device. I can check email in a flash, mindless games, watch video etc. If I wish to surf the internet a lot, I go for my laptop but with kids etc. I don't have time to do that anyhow. It is a decent reader but I'm not reading as much on it as I have my early Kindle which I sent back to get this Fire. I recommend it if you are somewhere between a techn-o-phile and tech-newbie, but neither of those end-member-case folks may be happy with the device. Great screen and the volume issue is really minor...I mean if that is worth talking about or reading articles about that complaint, get something else.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAWESOME choice for the money.....,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Susan K. Thompson-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my "Fire" and I can honestly say that I love it!!!  I had played with the IPAD before but it was too big for my taste.  I was drawn to the fire for its size initally and the idea that I can easly shop with Amazon (which is a MUST).Now that I own one, I do understand more of its quirkiness.  My bigest concern was with the websites sometimes freezing up when trying to load.  However, even on a PC you have the same problems depending on the weather, internet traffic, ect.  So that is not going to make me to disapointed.I have read that some people are concerned about there not being an external volume control and the power button can easly be pushed and I am not sure why that is an issue.  The volume control is one tap on the screen and a slide adjustment, really pretty easy actually.  As for the power button, I put my fire in a case and have no problem with that at all.I have no regrets making this purchase, my husband actually wants one now too!  It is well worth the $199 in my opinion.  I strongly recommend this Fire to anyone wanting an smaller version of the IPAD.  This is a good buy!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsADD Enabler.,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Gary Perry "Gary"(Opelika, AL USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Perhaps the worst part of the Kindle fire is that it is an enabler for ADD.Someone described the Kindle Fire as a media consumption device. This is very true. Once you get a Fire in your hands you will not be able to decide what you want to do. You can easily read books, there are more free books available than you'll have time to read. You'll be able to read documents you have uploaded, read magazines in full color, watch TV episodes you've missed or haven't been able to see on cable. You'll have more movies than you have time to watch especially if you sign up for Amazon Prime. What's even worse is that you get a month's free membership in Amazon Prime. Of course if all else fails for lack of interest you can surf the web. The Fire does a very good job of rendering pages even if they're not optimized for mobile devices.With that somewhat tongue in cheek review, though still true, let me give you some advice. If you have a Kindle e-reader, keep it. You will want both. I was a little disappointed at first with the Fire because I expected it to replace either my Kindle e-reader or my laptop PC or both. It won't do either. Contrary to what some people have said I do believe it to be an iPad killer. So far I haven't found anything the Fire won't do that an iPad will. Keep in mind that the iPad does have 3G and a built in camera but I don't need either of those. You will want to keep your Kindle e-reader because there is absolutely nothing better to keep in your glove box or pocket to pull out and read while you're waiting in line or waiting on your wife to finish shopping. If you write a lot you will want to keep your laptop because you can't beat a full-size keyboard but chunk the laptop and get a new one if the screen is smaller than 17". You'll prefer the Fire for anything smaller. You can upload your documents to your Fire and edit them there.I made the mistake of giving my daughter my Kindle e-reader. I plan to rectify that situation as soon as I get my Amazon Gift Cards for Christmas. I will be purchasing the $79 e-reader. That's another good point. If you are particularly difficult to buy gifts for you now have the perfect gift to tell all your friends and relatives. Amazon Gift Cards are the perfect accessory to the Fire.This brings up a couple of accessories that are a must have. You will want to purchase the Pro version of Quick Office. That's a must if you want to edit documents. Secondly, the screen is too reflective, glare is a problem. You'll want an anti-glare screen. You'll also want a small USB cable to connect to your laptop to upload documents directly to the Fire. Don't try to send them through the Amazon email. You won't be able to edit documents sent through the kindle.com email. You'll want to purchase a set of earbuds if you don't already have them. You can watch movies and videos discreetly at the office or traveling without disturbing anyone else. Lastly you'll want the fold up cover that acts as a stand. For standing the Fire is small enough to hold in one hand but if you can sit it on a desk or table that is much more comfortable.All of the changes I would like to see revolve around the operating system. Personally I do not like the carousel. I would prefer to be able to delete that and use the apps screen as my home page. Secondly, the Fire ships with some apps on it that can't be deleted. IMDB for one. There should be some way to delete apps from the cloud setting on the Fire. The Fire should be shipped locked or unregistered. The Post Office delivered my Fire to the wrong address but luckily I got it back. I found once I opened it that it was ready to order anything off my Amazon account with one click. I read a review where another customer had a Fire misdelivered and ended up with over $300 in charges before they could stop it.The fact that the Fire has limited storage and WiFi will need to be managed. By managed I mean that when you take the Fire away from WiFi you will need to decide before you leave the WiFi connection which movies, videos and songs you want to store within the Fire since it only has approximately 6 GB of storage available for use. You won't be able to stream from Amazon Prime while you're in transit from one hotspot to another.Future updates I'd like to see include the changes to the operating system I mentioned above and a USB connector or port to allow the use of SD cards. That would solve the memory problem altogether and it already has a mini USB port available for recharging and connecting to the PC. It should be a simple matter to have a mini USB connector on a Memory stick reader. A dongle with a mini USB connector on one end and a female USB connector on the other for Flash Drives is an option. The ability to read SD cards seems to be built in but until an SD card can be plugged in that is speculation.Lastly, I can't give the Fire a 5 star rating simply because it is not perfect. It is close but it does need the changes and accessories I mentioned.One last bit of advice that doesn't cost anything at all. As soon as you get your Fire in your hands, change the security setting to where it is locked and password protected. As an added precaution because I'm paranoid, add virus protection.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsAntenna warning/customer service warning,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;H. Stevens(Crownsville, MD USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I wanted to love this.  I DID love it the first time I turned it on and connected flawlessly to the wifi in my house.  I watched  a movie. I browsed the web.  I downloaded a game.  I relished the lightweight sleek design.Then I moved to a room that was more than ten feet from my wireless router.  My Kindle fire became just an overpriced reader, because the connection (at 15 feet!) was so tenuous that nothing that needed an internet signal could be used.All the hours spent on discussion boards, all the attempts at resets and reboots and moving of the router... ...all to no avail.  My call to customer service was equally as frustrating.  The CS rep was clearly working from a script and, since Amazon's script didn't include any acknowledgement that there could be a design flaw (which MANY frustrated buyers have reported in hindsight, I now see...) having to do with the antenna, I was simply told, in the end, "Thank you for letting us know.  We will report your issue to the development department."  No offer to replace.  No suggestion of what to do, at all.  The implication seemed to be that I should be content with the ten foot reception range.Really, Amazon?  Really?  You didn't try very hard on this one.If you order, be sure to thoroughly check out the wireless reception in every room of your house that works with other devices.  Do it before your 30 day return window closes.  Hope your experience is better than mine!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPeople need to get a grip on reality,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Daniel Morris-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've made very few reviews in my time, but after reading a bit of very bizarre reviews about the Kindle Fire, I felt I had to speak up.There is this constant need to compare everything to iPads, but they aren't remotely the same device, nor are they in the same price-class.  I have a Honda Accord that cost me about $22k.  Do you see me writing up reviews about how it just doesn't hold up to the $66,000 Mercedes SUV?Please.  What is wrong with people?If someone is such a little hipster that they can't hold any electronic appliance without comparing it to an Apple product that costs three times as much, perhaps they shouldn't dirty their little hands.  I just got through being told how I was a fool to buy my little toshiba laptop instead of a macbook.... only to find out that the guy had paid THREE TIMES AS MUCH for his mac book.  Sorry, but I can't afford to be that cool if the one that costs 75% less does the same job.Believe it or not, I actually HAVE and iPad.  (eeekkk!!)I like it, but it is just a bit too big for what I need.  I read a lot and I have an infant.  So, for me to rock a baby to sleep and read means I need a paperback, or something I can hold in on hand and turn the pages with my thumb.  -&gt; Kindle.Can't do it with an iPad.  Sorry Mac fans, but i need my ipad to be smaller, there's no App for that.I also carry around a ton of junk wherever I go and my kindle actually fits in my back pocket.  (yep, it does).  I keep my books on it.  I read on the bus, on BART, at the Caffe, wheverver I have to wait.  Pulling it out of my back pocket is a one-handed maneuver.I used to use my phone to read on, but now I've got the Fire.Maybe a Nook would work too, probably, but I've used the nook and the Fire is a bit better.  I'd say that it is fare to compare the Nook to the Fire, but anyone comparing the Fire to an iPad is someone who's already biased towards the iPad.  No person with a actual clue about reality would compare the two unless they were making a point that the Fire could probably take care of 80% of what people actually do on their iPads.In fact, the only "threat" that the Fire ever held towards the iPad was that most iPad users actually would have been satisfied with a much more basic tablet, therefore the iPad absorbed many sales that it shouldn't have had in the first place, but gained only due to the fact that there was no product to cover that market sector.Now, just to get off the iPad irritation, I also want to point out that some people have kids.  I have 3.  They break stuff constantly.  They love to delete things.I've already had one iPad disaster, I'm not going to have another.  With that little kindle, I pop a movie in and hand it to my 5yr old and she can drive it with no problem.  My 3yr old has already tossed it down a flight of stairs -not a scratch.  She left it outside all day in the son - no problem.  I've sat on it a number of times (back pocket).  So far the thing is a rock.  And if it breaks, seriously, it isn't all that big a deal.  When that iPad got fried, all my pics that hadn't been sycned up were hosed.  I lost a ton of crap (yes, my own fault, but think about it.  I didn't have an option to leave them unsupervised, and now I do.)If you're going to get a table for $199, there is simply nothing on the market that is remotely close to this.  period.  nothing.It isn't perfect.  There's all sorts of crap that I'd like to change, but for $199, it rocks.There is nothing even close to the capabilities for that price.  nothing.  not even close.And, if you do have $600.... think about exactly what you "need" before you drop it all on an iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTurn it 180 Degrees,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;William Sutton(San Antonio, TX United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)If you find the on/off button location annoying, just hold your Fire so it's on top. Problem solved.  And so far our Fires are everything we wanted and more.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsI like it and it works but the kindle fire can be frustrating,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;highlander-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I so wanted this to be it, Amazon has done well in some respects and poorly in others..The good: Size - I can carry it and I can read it. Videos and Music - Both work reasonably well and the screen looks very nice. Speed - It is reasonably quick. Wifi - easy to set up and works reasonably well. Amazon Shopping - Excellent work here but then I wouldn't expect anything different. The bad: Touch Screen - Doesn't register touches poke poke poke to get something to work. Email - Default app is lousy and no way to set any other as the default client. Software - Disabling support for Google services is just plain wrong. Facebook - Really no app.. Web browser was supposed to be the fastest, I had to turn off the Silk browser since its performance was less than optimal. Battery Life - I can not get anywhere near the life that is advertised...The power button - I keep turning it off accidentally . External storage - No SD or uSD slot to hold additional movies or books for long flights with no wifi. But do I like the overall idea of the Fire? YES.. Am I thrilled with its current incarnation? Not so much. Is there room for improvement? Absolutely YESHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsOne major grumble...,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;milojah-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As a fairly technical person, I have found the Fire to be exactly what I hoped it would be. It's a 7" Android tablet.My only complaint would be that it's integration w/Amazon's purchasing is a little too easy. Anyone can pick up the tablet and order something on my credit card without a password prompt. Turning off 1-click doesn't make a difference. Fix this, Amazon, and get my 5th star.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire Fills the Gap,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Deborah Veerkamp "RansRider"(Minnesota)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)To start this review I must say that my Kindle Fire is at my side 24/7.  The Fire is not the first Kindle I have owned.  I started with a Kindle 3 and really enjoyed it for reading but I have been in the market for some time for a tablet device to provide more than just the ability to read and play a few games.  The Kindle Fire was my answer to that.  I have had the device since it came out and have noticed a few negatives (thus the 4-star rating) such as the loss of catagorizing my books on the device which the Kindle 3 did well.  I was also assuming that the Kindle Fire, being an Android device, would allow any Android app to run on it, especially unhappy that I can not use my Google Calendar with it.  I am still hoping that Amazon will rectify this--please!!!  With that said, I still will not part with this new Kindle.  The touch screen is great and I do not miss the page turn buttons of the K3.  I did not expect the device to match what a $300-500 device can do but was pleasantly surprised by its abilities.  It's user friendly and Amazon has the BEST backup support of any company I have delt with and I did call them a few times with miscellaneous questions about the Kindle Fire.  My K3 did find a good home and will hopefully provide that cozy reading experience that its original owner experienced.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Me-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire for so many reasons.Size/PortabilityIt is very portable but not small. It is about the size of 3 IPhones from top to bottom.Easy to useIt's so simple and can do almost exactly what the IPad can do.PriceThis has been so often compared to the IPad and it should. It costs 200 dollars in comparison to the IPad which starts at 500.The CloudThe Cloud is amazing all I did while I waited for it to come was upload my music. If you have Wi-fi you can access anything in the Cloud. Since there is only 6 GB of on-device storage it really helps. You get 5 GB free and you can buy more. When you buy books it copies them into the cloud and onto the device.Amazon SilkSilk is an extremely fast web browser if you have a good signal.The CarouselInstead of pages to go through the Carousel puts the most recently used apps and books at the front. Also if your not a Carousel fan there are also tabs at the top labeled Newsstand, Books, Music, Video, Docs, Apps, and Web also categorized by most recent and by title.To sum it up it is awesome. People of all ages can use it.I hope this helps you make an important decision!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStunned!!!!!!,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;SirArti-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My younger son (14) likes to read so much that the only way I could keep up a couple of years ago was with the kindle.  Having the books at his finger tips, and whisper fast has made him an e-ink worm. My my older son came to me with a request for the Kindle Fire, it was a no brainier.  I got on Amazon and read all the new things it could do, and you could still read books on it.  The he showed me how I could connect to watch my college basketball games, after I got it for him.  That was all it took, one for dad is on it's way.  I can work in my studio, and watch games wile wood carving... note to self, buy band aids.  Oh, and I can read books off it too.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt is all about how you look at it,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Thomas "mrpalmer420"(Hackettstown, NJ, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got mine today and i am loving the Kindle Fire Experience so far. is it the speediest computing device i own, not by a mile. But is that what i was buying it for, not even close. If you are looking at this item to replace the iPad than you are going to be very disappointed. The ipad is more of a creation device and a true tablet for computing. The fire is a content delivery device. I bought the Fire in order to read my eBooks, to watch some video, listen to music,  and to do some very minor web browsing. So far it delivers handsomely in all four of those categories. I am a photographer, and in no way do i think that the addition of a camera on this sort of device is necessary.Will I want an iPad down the road? maybe. But at the moment i have no need to do all the things that the iPad can do, and therefore would have wasted the 200 extra dollars it would have cost me to get such a device. For 199, to get all the power and ability that this device provides me is astounding. My only wish is that it had 3G but i can understand why it doesn't. Unlike a regular kindle that simply uses the 3G to get books and sync your place. With a device like this that is streaming audio and video, the bandwidth that would be needed would be too much for them to be able to provide free 3g access.Perfect size, perfect ability and perfect price. A great device as long as you are not expecting a full tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Vernon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Really like this product.  I have had it at work several times and everyone is really interested in it.  Two of them have order one for a Christmas present for family. It is extremely easy to use and having the user guide preloaded is a very handy tool.  Like it so much I purchased one for my wife as well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars=)) i love it,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;red-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ive had my kindle fire for over 2 weeks now. my notebook broke and i needed something to hold me down until i could buy a new laptop. i read alot of reviews especially the negative one before i decided to buy one and what i noticed it was reviews by alot of old ppl, im 22 i would like reviews from ppl my age who actually know how to work electronics. i LOVE my fire it fits my needs. i read alot about the kindle not coming with a guide and how they didnt know how to work it.. ummm its a freaking kindle they are promiting books electonically so why would it come with a paper guide.. the guide is on the kindle.. then ppl are complaining about the power button being on the bottom, ive never had an issue with it being on the bottom now have i ever accidently pushed the button. another thing was it didnt come with a usb cord.. we live in 2011 i have like 4 usb cords just from my other phones and electronics im sure u can find a cord really cheap on here. ppl said the browser is slow. for me it works fast so it must be ur internet.. time to upgrade to highspeed. another issue was parents complaining that it has the on click buy option and their kids are buying things on there.. ummm why would u even buy ur kids this?? i have a 3 yr old and if she does want to read or use it she sits on my lap while we read or play games together.. i would never leave her alone with this. another issue ppl complained about the carousel... i love it when im lazy i just click my books on there or when im bored i just scroll threw the pages. also the weight.. ehh its kind of heavy but i like it it doesnt feel cheap and it doesnt feel like i would easily break it. im very glad i didnt listen to all these old ppls negative reviews.... this product works fine it streams videos fine too yeah the speakers kind of suck but buy the little portable speakers or headphones so u can hear it better... and reading on it is amazing has me hooked on books... i think this is the best product u will find for 199 but be smart and get a warrenty.. u should always have a warrenty on all ur electronics.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starssuper companion,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Edy-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle fire is my super companion cannot leave without it. Btw, Amazon has an outstanding customer service by  advance notification of items shippedHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOutstanding! It needs more Apps though!,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;BookDan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is outstanding. Reading my New York Times every morning is actually far superior to either print (no messy hands, nice compact size) or computer screen (easy to lay on the couch and hold the fire with one hand). Using the internet works well (although aiming your finger on zoomed out websites can be tricky at times). Several critical reviews have stated that "normal format" websites are difficult to read on the 7inch screen. I actually prefer using the normal websites and zooming in - the finger-spreading zoom feature is so easy/fun to use!I think improvement on the device should be focused on recruiting more great comapnies to create apps. I would like to see a great finance app (Bloomberg? CNBC?) as well as a Google-made gmail app.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything its advertised to be and more,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Gma-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The fire was everything I hoped it would be and more. Sleek design,easy navigation,lots of apps and beautiful touchscreen. A great alternative to iPAD.  Love it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome device for a low price!,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;William Brennan "wreckingball34"(Rockaway, NJ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased the kindle fire as a birthday present to myself, and I must say that I LOVE IT! I know that it doesn't have a lot of the fancy features that the iPad has (Bluetooth, HDMI), but I wasn't worried about that. For $199, I wasn't expecting the iPad. This is a fantastic device to own if you're an Amazon Prime member. THOUSANDS of free movies and TV shows are at your fingertips. You can rent movies and episodes also (they tend to range from $1.99 for TV shows and $3.99 for movies. Prime members get free, unlimited music storage on the Amazon Cloud player. Amazon Prime costs $79 per year, and you get free second day shipping and $3.99 next day shipping on any products sold directly through Amazon.com (they are clearly marked), plus everything listed above. Believe me, it's well worth the $6.50 a month. You have plenty of cheap and free apps and games to choose from as well. I'm a fan of the smaller size as well. It fits in my coat pocket, and it's just big enough (for me anyway) to watch movies and read books without straining my eyes. The screen resolution is pretty nice as well. Downloading has been super fast and so has the web browsing. My only reservation so far is the USB port. It seems a little weakly constructed and it's a VERY small plug. I've been extra careful when plugging and unplugging it. Other than that, I've been absolutely thrilled. I suggest buying a nice Marware case for it so you can prop it up for hands free use. For the price ($199), you just can't beat the kindle fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle fire review,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;gman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love this Kindle Fire. the screen is big the battery power last a long time even when watching videos.  easy to operate and reading is much easy than reading the book over all the speed is good and i enjoy it very muchHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove My Kindle Fire,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Anita-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I recently purchased a Kindle Fire and I am very pleased with it.  Actually I was so pleased I purchased 2 more for my grandchildren for Christmas. Also, as an avid reader I love the fact that Amazon has a large selection of titles to select from.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery happy with my Fire,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Laser Beam-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let's get this out of the way, this is not a generic Android tablet. It is a Kindle Fire for consuming Amazon's media. If you don't understand that, then this is not for you.  Yes, Android Market redirects to Amazon Appstore. This is for your convenience as Google hasn't allowed their apps on this device.I love my Fire. Small things can be polished, but it's a home run. I now take it daily with me to work and I can't wait to take it on an extended trip.  More and more Appstore apps are being approved for Fire and it does excel at my main focus, ebooks and video.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for what I need it for,December 6, 2011By&nbsp;Succotash-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This kindle does it all, and then some. I can check emails, surf the web, watch movies, and read any book or magazine I want in full color. It is completely touch screen with no buttons getting in the way. Since I never owned a standard black and white kindle, I can't compare it to an earlier version, but I'm very pleased with the Kindle Fire so far.The only drawback to this I can see is its limited connectivity via wireless - unless I'm using it inside a network, I can't surf the web. And if you are comparing it to the ipad - it is on the small side. But, for what you actually use it for (and what it's made for), this fits the bill and then some. Very pleased with my purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product...priced well!,December 5, 2011By&nbsp;LittleMissAmazon "manhattangirl"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Really impressed with the Fire. Bought it as a gift for my mom along with a subscription to Netflix and Hulu. I own an IPad and am a techie and I was very impressed with the features, ease and style of the Fire. My mom is going to love this!!! Nice cloud setup, mail, documents, hulu, netflix, games, books, web browsing WITH ADOBE FLASH!!...ALL for $200...unbelievable deal...it may not have 3G...but is a very nice alternative to a full laptop when at home...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsan amazon peripheral to sell their media, not a bad thing,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Carryit(iowa)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)kindle fire is an interesting amazon peripheral.. it has better resolution then my ipad... i gave it to my 7 year old grand-twins to play with but they still fight over the ipad... the fire is pretty much useless to me... i assumed because it has "kindle" in its name that it was an ebook reader... not really... no more then any other software book ereader for an any-os tablet.... and it has no text to speech.... wifey tries to read magazines but you have to zoom to read... ipad is easier for magazines... so if you are looking for an e-rider device the fire isn't for you.... it will hold lots of books with 6 gig of user memory but 'so what?'.... why would you have a large library on the device if you cant catalog the books.... or add them to collections.... a few of your favorites is better.... i suggest the kindle touch or keyboard kindle as a better alternative for an ereader.... the little kindle is cool but it wont hold my library like the others and i need text to speech for traveling.... i have a model of all the kindles ever made and use them.. the eink nook touch i recently purchased does not meet my needs i un-registered it and gave it away.... i'm loyal to amazon... if the fire had an sd card reader like the nook touch it would be a worth while device, as it stands you will need to make your media decisions BEFORE you leave home,,, you wont be able to pick and choose on the fly unless you are tethered to wi-fi it is also sad about the 'color kindle' not being a robust ereader from the git go because 6 gig would be plenty for books....Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFun and useful, no problems so far,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;Sarah "madameraz"(Irving, TX, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire yesterday at Best Buy and was able to connect to my wireless network and link to my Amazon account very easily. I've been impressed by how seamless everything is. It can access my Amazon account and my Audible account easily, and all of the apps I've downloaded have installed without any problems. I am a Prime member and have already enjoyed streaming a couple of TV shows and had no problems at all. I also downloaded an audio book from my Audible.com account to the device.I wanted this as a daily tool in place of a smart phone, and since there is wifi almost everywhere I go, it serves that function well and much more affordably than a phone with a monthly fee. The size is perfect for carrying in my purse. I have installed a bunch of free apps that are all useful to me including a calendar, a couple of kids' activities, a calculator, a calorie counter, and a note pad. I've also got Angry Birds :) These apps really make the device worth it.If you're concerned about letting your young kids play with it, there's an app called Kids Place that creates an environment to allow children to access only the apps you designate so there's no danger of them accidentally buying everything on Amazon with one click or deleting things from the device. It works for us.It's very easy to use, too. If you use a computer you can figure this out, and the included manual is helpful. I love how easily I can access my cloud storage.I give it four stars because there is the occasional touch that goes unnoticed by the Fire, but it's rare enough that I don't mind.I do not like that when you look at something, it shows up in the carousel with no way to remove it but looking at other things for awhile. This includes web pages, so if you accidentally stumble upon anything embarrassing, it'll be on your screen for a little while. It does eventually go away.For reading, I prefer my Kindle Touch because of the e-ink. It is possible to read on this device and it's nice that my books are in both places (LOVE the "sync to last page read" feature), but the other Kindles are much easier on the eyes if I'm reading for more than a few minutes.I do not want a big tablet, and I do not want an expensive smart phone. What I want is something that can play music and audiobooks, stream TV and movies, hold my calendar and contacts, let me access the Internet away from home, and entertain me and my children. This is the perfect device for me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I Needed,December 4, 2011By&nbsp;gadgetrn-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was looking to replace my multitasking Coby Kyros which served me quite well despite the occassional freeze. The Ipad is a little pricey for my needs. I read the reviews for the Fire and decided it would fit me perfectly. My gamble paid off and I have been thrilled.There are numerous free apps and books as well as music. My library has gotten quite large already and my only purchase has been some Christmas music.Speaking of Christmas, I have done much of my shopping from my Fire. Amazon has made it very easy to access their website, as well as others, for smooth transactions.I can't tell you how invaluable my Fire has been in the 3 weeks I have had it. Since I am a professional by day and sports mom in the evening like most moms today, it allows me to kill time between games or while waiting for practice to end. I play games, read, check e-mail and much more.I have read that other users have taken issue with the wi-fi only aspect of the Fire. I have not found that to be a problem. Most places have wi-fi anymore. For example, I am taking a bus trip to Washington DC with my daughter's school and was happy to learn that charter buses have wi-fi now.The Fire may not be enough for those who like to create and need a more full service device, but that's what your pc is for. For people like me, it's value exceeds the cost.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsenjoying the kindle fire,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;frank r-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)the fire has exceeded my expectations so far. it replaces my laptop for email, browsing, FB, etc. i am happy never to use or carry or buy another laptop again. i will spare you the details. i highly recommend this product to anyone who's not super picky or super techie.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle Fire....!!!,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;F. D. Knapp "book worm"(columbus, ohio usa)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Fire on November 17th and I love everything about it...so fast, great sound, colors and picture are so sharp they pop..Email is fast, Web browsing is great...Music sounds so clear...love, love, the videos...Thanks Amazon...you never let me down...Kindle 3G is still the best for reading...can't beat E-InkHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI can't believe I like it better than my iPad,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey C. Burtoft-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I knew I would like it, but I didn't think we would use it more than my iPad.  It's actually a great size.  Screen is a little small for web browsing, and the browser chrome is way to chunky while web browsing.  25% of the screen (in landscape) is chrome.  It would be better to have no chrome in landscape mode.For everything else it's perfect.  Videos are great.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsMiss Folders and Categories,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Michael Stigall "JavaCat"(West Virginia)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had over 300 books from Amazon on my Kindle DX, and used folders to group and categorize the books by topic.The Kindle Fire doesn't provide any way to group the books. I can search by author or title, but I still miss the folders.Otherwise, I've been very happy with the device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Smooth,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;James C-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased the Fire after doing a fair amount of research on it.  I have to say that I am very impressed with the Fire.  Web surfing, which is one of the main questions I had before the purchase, is very good.  Smooth, faster then I had expected, and the display is crystal clear.I did not have a kindle before I purchased the Fire, but reading on the Fire is very nice.  I do suggest that you change the spacing between the lines, and change the background color from white to sephia.  much easier on the eyes.Overall I really like the Fire and suggest it to anyone that is looking for a lower cost option to the iPad.  I have used both, and for the basic functions its just as good, espically for the price difference.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAfter a week of use - couldn't be happier,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Kay Hayes "knitting ninja"(San Jose, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(TOP 500 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire is my first e-reader and I am very impressed thus far.  I have had no quirks or glitches - nothing but a great user experience.  Browsing the web, setting up the wireless connection, downloading apps (many are free), making purchases, downloading music and accessing the cloud are just so easy.  I also like that it can be charged with any of my mini-USB cables and chargers.  Another big plus is that, when connected to the computer, the Fire shows up as another drive on the PC so files can be easily loaded onto the device (no awkward software interface needed).  Watching movies with my amazon prime membership is yet another great feature and I found the quality to be excellent - especially when using headphones.I must say, I was very skeptical of a backlit e-reader.  But the available adjustments make reading very pleasant.  You are not limited to a white background and black text.  There are three color modes available, several font sizes, three line spacing options, three margins and several different fonts to use to get an optimum reading experience.  Bookmarks, settings and searching are a breeze and very intuitive as well.The fact that I can get a book free each month is yet another plus and I have already finished "the Hunger Games" gratis.  To top it all off, I can rent from my public library and download it to my Fire through Amazon.  I found the library checkout process as easy to use as all of the other Kindle features.  All in all, I am thrilled with the Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Little Device,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;T. Stricker-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The GF had the Kindle Fire for a few days now and loves it. It easy for her to use and does what is needed for her.My opinion of the Kindle Fire is it is a cool little device. Read the product description before buying it. All the bad reviews I think are mostly buyer remorse for not doing there homework. It does have a password protection. Flip it over so the power button is on the top, Also with a case it does not turn off that easy by accidently hitting it.  The icons can be deleted from carosel. Email was a breeze to set from a Comcast account. Amazon has the the proper ports listed for Comcast. The WiFi is good and again is only as good as the network it tied into.I don't find anything bad with the touchscreen or operating system. It is a E Reader with more options not a computer. What do you want for $199 bucks. It not meant to rival a Ipad. It feels like it well made and sturdy, but to each is own I like itHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Dan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My wife &amp; I both love our Kindle Fire.  It is really fast and the color screen is fantastic.  We were not familiar with Android but it has been easy to learn to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat device for the price, but has a HUGE drawback,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jill Granik(New Jersey)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for a few days now and definitely agree that is is NOT an iPad. But it does have a lot of similar features, and, for the price, it's a winner.That being said, I have two BIG issues with it.I am very unhappy that the Fire does not give me the ability to organize my content in categories or folders (such as mysteries, romances, games, utilities, etc.). I am already beginning to acquire an extensive library of apps, and I have over 300 books already on my Kindle account. I don't always know the name of the book or app I want to access, and I can't imagine trying to scroll through over 300 books to find a new mystery to read or through loads of apps to find a game to play! I hope that Amazon considers adding this feature in the near future.My second issue is that I'm finding many of the apps in the app store don't actually work on the Fire, maybe because they're designed for Android devices and are just not compatable with the Fire. I heard that Amazon is being very choosy about which apps they allow to be developed for the Fire. Let us decide! It sure would be nice if the people who write apps for Apple would write them for the Fire, too.Other than that I'm relatively happy with my purchase, especially the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'll not use my iPad again!,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Rebecca A. Bowen "Rebecca"(Charles Town, WV)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great device for the price - easy to set up, quick, and agile enough to install my favorite Apps from the App Market. Most of all, I'm an obsessive reader and having my 300+ library of books in my purse like Hermione Granger... well, it does seem like magic, doesn't it?  Great job, Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I Expected and More,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;E. Loschky(On the road, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been an Amazon customer since Amazon started. I can honestly say that I have never been disappointed in them. With that in mind, I took the plunge with the Kindle Fire. I was wary of other Android tablets and iPad was financially out of my reach. I purchased the Fire because I trusted Amazon and I purchase almost all of my media from Amazon anyway. The Fire arrived on time, worked straight out of the box and I have been more than pleased with the quality. Sure, they make it extremely easy to purchase from the Amazon storefront, but that was actually one of the pluses for me. I understood from the get-go that the price point of the Fire included an implied agreement that I would purchase content from Amazon. I was totally fine with that. Everything that I have downloaded for the Fire: TV episodes, books, magazines, and apps have all worked perfectly. I couldn't be happier.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm in love,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Melissa-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love this device. I have messed around with it all day and I'm very pleased with this purchase. My daughter is 7 years old and she is happy to have her books in color. I am happy to have my Tank Girl comic, it looks awesome. I haven't looked at magazines yet though. The video is good quality and the sound is good too even when turned all the way up (remember I told you I have a 7 year old). The fire is lightweight and fits in my hand perfectly. The screen size is perfect. The web browser definitely exceeded my expectations. However the only kindle I have had is the first generation one (I used it until it started to have problems). The e-reader is great! I love that you can choose your font and background. My eyeballs thank you Amazon. The backlit screen is a delight and works perfectly in the dark. The only problem I have had with the fire is that the keyboard is hard to get use to. It may take me awhile to get my shakey, excited hands to calm down and press one letter at a time. I highly recommend anyone getting this. It's a great product for the whole family!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsMay not be perfect but a great device,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Innisai-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered Fire as soon as it was announced and was eagerly waiting for its arrival for more than a month. Though I was slightly disappointed with some of the early reviews, within a few minutes of using the device, I realized that they all were wrong to dismiss Fire as an average device. Few call Fire as Kindle with additional features, but I am not afraid to call it as a Tablet. Not all the tablets have to have front facing camera - of course, it's good to have but its absence does not make Fire any little. I am not going to go in detail with comparison here but features and flaws.Some of the + points:1) PriceThough I don't want to use the price point alone to recommend this product over other features, but it's worth pointing out. Like many of you, I too have owned tens of gadgets but not many times I have felt so happy to get an "useful" gadget in this price range. I loved using iPhone - I bought it for $700 on the 2nd day with no contract - but I could not stop thinking how expensive it was. Even iPod touch costs around $200.2) Colors, Fonts and controls.I have not owned an android device before so I am not sure how much Fire resembles other Android devices in terms of Fonts and Colors. But Fire looks so refreshing with the dark gray and orange colors. Beautiful! I also like the overall UX of Fire software (Easy to navigate, organize, control apps). Initially I was annoyed by the fact that I could not change the music while in other applications. Later I figured out that I could tap on the system tray (Where notifications, system time are displayed) to achieve that. It's pretty cool.3) Out of Box experience:I was surprised to see my name displayed as soon as I was done with initial setup (or even before, I don't exactly remember). I did not have to enter my name, user id, password. Everything was right there. Amazon has an advantage in this case because they are being both the seller as well as manufacturer. However, there are few other companies but how many of them do that?.4) Cloud experience:Many may have already pointed this out. I was easily able to sync my MP3s from Amazon and instantly watch prime videos with no issues.5) Connecting to PC:I like that, unlike iTunes, I have the freedom to access the files through USB mass storage. I was able to copy Music, PDFs, Pictures to Fire with no issues. I like not having a bloatware to take care of transferring contents. It will also be helpful to copy files from any computer to the device or from the device to any other computer.6) Decent set of AppsNot all the apps are available, but I found most of the apps I regularly use. It comes with the decent Mail client that helped me setup Gmail. It also claims that it has Unified Inbox but I have not tried setting up another email account.Mint, Texas Poker, Social apps, Adobe are the few others. It also comes with built in Amazon app which is easy to use and, as Amazon like you to do, purchase. I was even able to find an app to handle Microsoft Exchange email accounts but I have yet to set it up.7) DocumentsReading experience is smooth. Built in reader handles PDF documents much better than Adobe reader can.9) TouchFew earlier reviews pointed out that touch experience was not good. But I feel that touch is actually good. It's smooth except in few scenarios - it depends on the application. If you are navigating the home screen or looking at the contents from your device - for e.g. reading a document - it's fine. I noticed that when a cloud app (like App Store) is used, it feels sluggish but in other places, it's alright. I believe that it's got more to do with the way apps cache the items and images.Few drawbacks:1) Apps:As I mentioned above, not all the apps are available yet. I could not find a decent messenger for Live or GTalk. I believe that this will get improved during next few months. Some of the apps have been poorly ported. For e.g. Kama (I guess I have spelled it correct) Texas Poker, is one of the popular poker apps in iOS devices. But it looks horrible in Fire. It's not well scaled and the placement of buttons like "Call", "Raise", is worse. In iOS, it makes sense because there's no system controls in the bottom of the screen (Landscape) but in Fire, bottom of the screen is where you find the controls to go to the Home Screen or to go back to the previous screen. Not only those buttons were placed right above the system controls, in spite of bigger screen, the size of the buttons are still small - just like iOS versions - and makes it very hard to preciously touch them.With in-built Amazon app, I had difficulties placing an order - it was continuously asking me to sign in. I had to eventually use Web Browser to complete the order.2) BrowserI like browsing in 7" screen compared to my iOS devices. However, browser feels partially done. Not only is it slow but it sometimes does not render things correctly.For instance, while signing up an email account through Live, I had to tap and type on the same text box multiple times in order to enter the user name. It took me more than a few minutes to complete the page.3) VideoIt does not seem to play MP4 or other video formats.4) PC transfer rateTransfer rate is much slower than other devices. iTunes to iOs devices is much faster.5) MagazineI could not find WSJ on Fire. I thought that it was available in Fire but unfortunately not.6) Language supportI noticed that support (browser rendering) for few languages are missing.Other than these minor nuisances, I am a happy Fire owner and am looking forward to Fire 2nd generation with these issues fixed, front facing camera and Skye, Google apps for 199$ :-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;amazoniangirl-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have obviously only had my device for a day but so far I have no complaints. I love it. I am a techno addict and we have the original IPad as well as a Kindle 3G and although I love my Kindle 3G for reading books I love having the IPad/Kindle in one device. The video streaming on the Kindle is far superior to the IPad. I plan on keeping my regular Kindle for reading outside and on vacation besides Amazon didn't offer much to trade it in for a new Fire. I seems sturdy and durable. Time will tell. I have not noticed any lag that others have talked about. I was a bit sad to learn that when we get additional Kindle Fires for our household that only the primary can use the lending library. However to rent of $2.99 isn't a bad deal. It seems very user friendly for those that are not computer savvy. And I cannot say enough good things about Amazon customer service. Anytime I call I love that it is smaller and can fit in my purse. Inevitably every time we go out somewhere and we take the IPad I hear hey honey can you put my Ipad in your purse, and here are my keys and cell phone. I was tempted to get my husband a man purse because my purse always ends up weighing a ton.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAwesome For $200, Minor Issues Can Hopefully be Corrected in TIme,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Princess B-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a $200 (forked) android tablet. It is not a $500 iPad. Do not make the mistake of thinking that it is, and you'll run less risk of being disappointed.We have two Fires. Both on the same account, which means we share all purchases. If you're in a family, I can't stress how important that is! Registering Kindles to different accounts means you can't share books (outside of lending) and apps. So make sure that if you DO have multiple in your household, you order them on one account!The free month of Prime upgraded our conditional Prime account (Amazon Mom) to include streaming of a large selection of movies and TV shows. This is a welcome addition to our Netflix account (the app for which we reviewed at 4 stars due to minor issues with playback volume which can hopefully be fixed) as it has a different selection. We will, no doubt, be paying for Prime at this rate. (And will be checking out the Kindle Lending Library as well, of course.)The Fire's touchscreen is fairly responsive and of course suffers from the OMG SO DIRTY issue that all touchcscreens have. Using a microfiber cloth regularly helps this a bit. While not as large as a 10-inch tablet, the Fire's 7-inches are sufficient for email, twitter, facebook, app usage, playing games, reading books, etc. I've had no real issues reading full-size manual PDFs on it, though that does require use of the two-finger zoom function. In addition it is quite portable and much lighter than a 10-inch tablet. (Though nowhere near as light as our Kindle keyboard, of course.)I would give the Fire 5 stars, as we are absolutely loving them, were it not for some minor issues with the details. A few examples of niggling issues include applications that are listed as being available on the Fire (all of which are supposed to be curated) which either do not install or do not function. We have not PAID for an app and had it fail yet, but I am willing to bet that it's possible to do so, at which point you'll need to get in touch with Customer Support in order to seek reimbursement. The keyboard is "ok" but could perhaps be improved upon. Organizing books (such as into a series) and documents (like by project) is a non-starter as there are no collections or folders allowed at this time. There's a "light sensor" in the upper lefthand corner (in portrait mode) but there's no setting for using auto-brightness, so what this sensor is used for is beyond me.The Kindle Fire is, of course, even more useful for people heavily into the Amazon ecosystem. Our household has used Amazon as our primary source of electronics, household items, etc. for a long time. We already own a Kindle (keyboard) as well. This makes it a logical choice over the offering BN is coming out with (the Nook Tablet) despite the lesser system specs of the Fire. For others who don't mind dropping an extra $50 and who aren't "hooked on Amazon" like we are, it may drive a purchase decision the other way, but this does not make the Fire a poor product, period.If Amazon continues to improve the Fire's software, their curation of Fire apps, and continue adding value in terms of Prime benefits, the Fire will grow to be a true 5-star item. The wide variety of reviews for the Fire right now is due to some people reviewing for potential, some people reviewing (like I am) for current ability, and some people reviewing for unrealistic expectations. Again, don't expect $500+ worth of hardware for $200 and you'll be much, much happier in the end. (We have two Fires for less than one iPad, making us twice as happy, for 25% less . . . ;)(P.S. If you ever think your accelerometer is broken, make sure you haven't "locked" your Fire in the settings bar. One of the Fires got "stuck" in vertical mode for a while and it took some fiddling to figure that little detail out!)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome For The Price,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;nevareg-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let me start off by saying, I really don't review many items I buy, and I'm no tech genius.  With that being said, I just purchased my Kindle Fire this morning at a Best Buy store (I didn't want to wait for the 3-5 days til it ships). It's absolutely awesome, I love it, and it's everything I thought it would be!! I do have an ipad2, so people who are trying to compare the two are just off, the fire is obviously nothing like the ipad, but seriously what can be? The Fire has an awesome screen, the color is so vivid and clear, the apps store is user friendly and I love the andriod system bc it's super easy to navigate. I hear customers have issues with their connectivity, but I was able to connect to my wifi and it's really fast as well.  I had to take a break to let it charge :( If you're bouncing back and forth debating to get this, I say get it, it's 200 dollars and worth every penny. I only wish it had 3g now that would make this great product perfect!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)











26 of 35 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsCan't restrict purchasing,November 27, 2011By&nbsp;Rodjon(Concord, NC United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)THE GOOD:1. Good build quality.2. Easy to use &amp; manage.3. PriceTHE BAD:1. NO PARENTAL PURCHASING CONTROL! if you have Wi-Fi connectivity and access to the fire, anyone can purchase anything. This is absolutely embarrassing, C'mon Amazon. This should be a simple sw change to allow the current default behavior or to require authentication..2. Touch screen is sometimes unresponsive.I did notice when I first received the device that the micro-B connector seemed a bit weak. After less than week of use both of my fires micro-B ports had noticeable play when connected. With with one I had to move it around to find the correct position before it would charge. Seems like a significant design flaw for something that has to be used on a daily basis. I really don't want to return the fires, but both will need to be returned.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSimply the best!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;K. Woodcox(United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have seen reviews that list the Kindle Fire as an iPad killer and they are wrong. The Fire does not replace an iPad, it fills the price gap and user void the iPad created.  The Fire is priced so that consumers will buy multiple Kindles and not a single iPad. I purchased two Fires for less than the price of a single iPad and can do everything that I would do as a consumer (read, play games, check email, video, etc) on the Fire. I am thinking of buying a Fire for my niece and nephew since they can totally use the device and if it breaks I am only out $199 vs $499. I love my Fire and want to use it every minute.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhat a handy tool...,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;myra kavitch-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I first thought when I opened it, look like just another tablet, a smaller Ipad. However to my delite it was so easy to get running and connected. I have never seen the operation of this thing and figured OMG here is another electronic gizmo with complex instruction booklet. NOT, it was so easy to review how to use it, then upload content ( pretty fast loading of movies). I even quickly figured how to add documents and pictures from my desktop. just a USB power cable which I happened to have from one of my cell phones and I was pumping music and pictures on to the tablet!! I rate this guy a 5 because it never left me guessing on how to use it, the viewing of content A+ and the speed just right. ANd of course I get to read my books on this guy instead of my desktop, so lookout couch I get to sit back and relax and read my books without neck aches.... Thanks Amazon, way to go...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsCompletely satisfied!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;F. Felts "eisheth"(Texas United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't feel that there is anything I can add, however, I wanted it known that this is an awesome device!  I wanted to counter the people who gave the device 1 star because of poor customer service or shipping times.  Which I might add is completely disrespectful to the people who trust the reviews on Amazon to help us make logical purchases.  You should be ashamed of yourself for your intent to drive down the ratings because of your childishness.I actually have my Kindle Fire and it fully performs the functions that it has been advertised to do.  I usually spend the afternoons on my iPhone but I didn't even remember to take it from my purse when I got home and realized my Kindle Fire had arrived.  My brother has an Ipad and I will not compare the two devices, but for the price I paid and the features that are delivered I am fully satisfied with my Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it, amazing product for its price!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Nelle-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Extremely user-friendly, didn't even have to look through the user guide. Web browser was surprisingly fast and the speaker was nice and loud. The size is perfect for someone who travels a lot, slips very easily into my bag. And the smaller size (but not too small) fits comfortably in your hands. A very sturdy product,I love the fact that the back is made from a rubber material so it's hard to slip out of your hand. Other tablets I've held (won't name any names) have felt way too awkward and slippery in my hands. As soon as I received the fire I started downloading apps, books, and videos right away. They look really on the screen, no problems at all. Definitely a wonderful product that you won't regret. The Fire would make a great gift for someone of any age *hint hint*.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet for the casual user,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;chris "chris"(fairfax va usa)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle this morning and I have been playing with it all day and I am loving it. I have always been interested in tablets, but I never felt the need to get an expensive power tablet because I knew it would eventually just become a lounging device.The performance of the Kindle Fire feels great. I haven't experienced many slow downs and movies, games, and web pages seem to load pretty quickly and perform well. However I do not own any other tablets and I am sure that the Ipad and the other power tablets will blow this thing out of the water in terms of performance, but that is a $300+ dollar premium.I have seen a lot of people listing Cons for the device such as 6.5GB Storage with no expansion, no camera, no 3G, No bluetooth, No Mic, ETC and I can't really think of these as negatives because these are things that were advertised/known about upfront. I knew that I wasn't getting any of those things so I can't really hold that against it.The only con that I notice is that navigating could be a little confusing. I found myself using the home button quite frequently and also trying to figure out where certain menus may be hidden. For a first time user this could prove to be even more confusing especially since the on device user manual only really gives a broad view of the Kindle UI features/functions.This device is built for casual user who just wants a cheap portable media tablet that they can use around the house and on trips. It is not a power tablet and was never trying to be considered one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome Product. Best money i have spend in a long time.,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;oliver-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre-ordered the Kindle fire on the day that it was announced, so i was really excited to get mine today. Thanks Amazon for the expedited shipping.To cut through the chase, this is an awesome device. Just what i have always needed, something light i can carry with me to read the news, watch TV shows, movies (thanks to Prime) and also play light games sometimes. I have no regret getting this product, its far from perfect but i am an apple fanboy who sold my iPad and happily replaced it with the fire, that should tell you something.It has no camera, so? get a cell phone or a camera ( who uses a tablet/e-reader to take pictures?, no bluetooth, thats what your cellphone is for, No extra memory slot? what for? use the cloud.No need thinking about it, its an excellent device..!!! Go for it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

4 of 4 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Value! Great Product!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Patrick-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I can not be more satisfied with my new Kindle Fire, it performs as expected. I did not expect the Fire to be an iPad killer, I only wanted it for general use and to compliment my Amazon Prime account.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOne of the best gifts I have ever received,February 16, 2012By&nbsp;wanda-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle fire for over a week now, and I am so very pleased with it.I read reviews of this device, the Nook products and countless android tablets. This wins hands down! I wanted, first and foremost, a quality screen for reading and the ability to run few apps like eBay, Pandora etc.  I was not looking for an iPad or a straight out computer, since I already have a handy little netbook.  I wanted something to fit into my purse and a touchscreen; due to joint pain, keyboards are not always my friends :).I didn't want a device with a camera, gps etc.. I have my android phone and a nice digital camera.  I also didn't need to have an expansion slot for a micro sd card, since I intend to stay pretty loyal to Amazon content for my Kindle and I keep on top of what I have on my device. Books download so quickly, it is simple to remove old ones and add new ones.Reading on the Kindle fire is great.  I have read 3 books so far, and find that reading for a couple of hours at a time is not a strain for my 40+ year old eyes.The Kindle is also not very heavy if you hold it in your hand to read, but I recommend a case to make it easier.  I have my Kindle in a zip around roocase and that makes it very easy to stand up in front of me to read, email etc..As soon as I turned it on, I was in love with this device.  It detected my home wi-fi within seconds and I have had no trouble with it at all. Downloads are so swift, it's amazing. The Silk browser is everything it was described to be. I have watched a few streaming tv shows and it went perfectly.As for app selection, the Amazon app store is great.  I have installed a couple non Amazon apps, and that process was very easy.  I considered rooting the Kindle, but I don't want to give up all of the benefits of Amazon streaming etc.. I will stick to rooting my phone, and keeping the Kindle just as it is.The speakers are very nice, in my opinion.  My husband, who is the musician in the family, was impressed with the sound.  He watched several youtube videos and was pleasantly surprised.  His only comment was, "needs more bass", but he says that about every system :).I have sent several documents to my Kindle and they display perfectly.  I find more things to do with it every day. It's just a handy little gadget and very easy to use.If you are looking for a device that looks great, works great and is very intuitive, this is it.  Do your research, be clear about what you want from your device and don't be negative when you find that no device does everything.  Research, research and research some more.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsDepends on what you want,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;Wes F(Minster, Ohio)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My wife bought me my Kindle Fire for Christmas after debating whether or not to surprise me with it or a IPad.  First and foremost, those purchasing this device should not expect the IPad experience.  They are not even in the same league.  (Sorry Amazon - they just aren't).  With the being said it is a great product for basic usage.Internet Access -  The Kindle Fire works well and the speed is decent.  I have been able to access almost any news or sports site that I generally visit online.  I do LOVE the WSJ app and reading the morning paper on my Fire.Apps - Typical Android apps.  The more you have the slower the Fire runs.  Also Android offers a huge selection but it pales in comparison to Apple.  If you use an Iphone you will be disappointed.Reading -  This is were the Fire sets itself apart.  I love to read and absolutely love the back lighting of the text.  Easy to read in all circumstances.  Five Stars hereOverall -  It truly depends on what you want to use the Fire for.  If you an looking for a cheap IPad you won't find it with a Fire.  If you are looking for a great reader that also allows you a few extra's you will not be disappointed.Personally - I love Amazon products and the easy of use.  I would recommend this product to anyone looking for an excellent reader but be warned it is not a less expensive IPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars6.2 and updated to 6.3 performs at and alittle above expectations,April 8, 2012By&nbsp;Scarlett's Fire-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Time owned:  about 3 days.Why buy Fire over iPad? - depends on your needs.My needs: Reading books 1st. android/Fire games and web surfing 2nd. 3rd. A touch screen tablet small enough to fit in my purse with plenty of room to spare with a eBook vendor market that is large enough for my variety of books and gives a great user experience. 4th. It has a soft yet a slight "grippy" feeling back to the device to make holding it more comfortable. 5th. It won't overheat and start burning a hole through my hand.lol.Completes my needs: Check.Good price to value ratio: check.Plenty of storage ( regardless of HOW the content is stored): check.Unlimited cloud storage on Kindle/Amazon purchased/downloaded content is kind of a no brainer for me.  All my favorite book authors are on Kindle book store online.  Win win.Youtube Videos WITHOUT black bars on top and bottom ( when you rotate the device in landscape viewing and depending on the how the video's vendor recorded it, what he recorded it on, and how he uploaded it):  check.Wishing movie creators would record/create their films in 16:9 aspect ratio instead of that dumb super wide 2:25 or whatever others:  to be continued.lol. Again the less black bars ( without distorting or stretching the movie image)...the BETTER.  I care about the content .not the stupid black bars.Excellent quantity and quality of free Kindle Books library available: CheckGood Internet browsing speed ( if google.com fully loads in less than 1.5 seconds on Kindle Fire that's fast enough for me..literally hand timing it ftr.  I must view webpages and do more intensive internet stuff much quicker, I have my husbands custom built gaming rig for that) with STOCK settings: CheckPlease note my wifi is a netgear wndr 3700 router my husband bought back in 2010 and is connected to a Motorola 6120b docsis 3.0 modem getting ( per speedtest.net) 30 mbps download and more than 4 mbps upload here in jackson mississippi.  Also I'm less than 10 feet away from the router while it's on the floor basically nothing blocking it's line of sight. Thus your results may vary depending your internet distribution devices, your isp, and many other things.Flash that works as it should for websites and other content that requires it to fully load/work/show up: Check. ( although I have yet to encounter anything that requires it that I need when doing a Kindle Fire : husband's win 7 pro 64 bit gaming machine's website test on more than 30 different flash including websites.)Great battery life: Check( I read the reviews and specs of the Fire claiming it has up to 8 hours of reading, I set the brightness to 70%, sound completely to 0, turned off Wifi, version 6.3 updated already, and I literally got 7 hours 45 minutes on the dot from a 100% battery until that last minute the device auto shut down. Good enough for me.  I read alot but never more than 4 hours straight without a break anyways.)Only speed bump in my experience with the Fire so far was getting it updated to 6.3 from 6.2.  I did not know I must purchase a micro usb data/sync charge cable, download the update from another computer, connect the cable to the Fire ( the rest is in the instructions on amazon.com's website. Easy to find) However, I figured out a fairy easy ( although tedious for me) way.On the other computer you're using for reference, right click ( if in windows.  or secondary click if on a mac) the link of the update that you normally click to download for the Fire.  copy the exact url into your web address bar at the top..  don't go there just paste it in there.Now, on your kindle pull up whatever webpage you want ( my case. google.com) in your address bar at the top type in the EXACT url you have in the address bar on your Reference computer.  You will then automatically start downloading the update.Here's the exact url link as I found it.[...]**Very important**Not sure if this matters.. The INSTALLATION process for the update did NOT begin UNTIL the battery reached at least 40/41 percent battery charge level ( was in the middle of charging the Fire with the including ac wall adapter)  Thus I believe the battery level must be at that as a minimum.Also the installation process did not begin until I rebooted the Fire but pressing ( not holding more than a second if that)  Just food for thought in case anyone didn't feel like spending more money on a cable just to update the device. I ordered one anyways ( the $5.45 one) so that I can easily plug in the Fire to hubby's pc to transfer any media I need.Yes I know.  TEDIOUS, but still it worked for me.  No headaches or hassles other than that.This device ( In my opinion) doesn't lag but rarely and it's never more than once.  You're not paying top dollar for hardcore hardware under the hood.  If you want a guaranteed lag free touch screen experience on any tablet ( bigger than 7 inches) get the 3rd gen or the " New iPad" and spend that extra 300 bucks if you want.Fire has all the tweaking settings I need.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire and Breast Cancer,April 3, 2012By&nbsp;Linda M. Blowney "Agrissa"(Philadelphia, PA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just want to say that as a woman undergoing treatment for breast cancer (currently doing radiation therapy), I would be lost without my Kindle Fire. On days when I am feeling energetic, I read - often the cheesey novels I can get at a great discount or even free (and which are about as much as my brain can handle). On days when I am not doing as well, solitaire or other simple games keep me entertained. Waiting for appointments, or even in the evenings when I am too tired to do anything else, it keeps me going. And I can send messages or read Facebook to get some encouragement when I need it, especially when I can't use my cell phone.There are many other patients I see with their Kindles at the hospital. Really, if you know someone who has been diagnosed, why not think about getting them a Kindle? They will appreciate it more than almost anything else you could do for them.Addendum: I want to add a big thank you to those who have responded with good wishes. I am lucky - they caught my cancer early, and I have really amazing doctors (I work at a large university with a remarkable medical research center). I sincerely appreciate your comments!-L.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot perfect, but close to it,March 29, 2012By&nbsp;Jeremy Morgan "A good book on your shelf is a...(Gaston, Oregon)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok, so I've used my Kindle fire enough to give it a review, I really wanted to break this thing in before doing so. I'll post all the stuff I would want to know before buying it. I've beaten this thing up and used the heck out of it and now it's time to review itNote: I make comparisons to the 2nd generation Kindle Keyboard because that's what I had before. There are a few differences you should know before ditching that old kindle.The Good:There is tons of stuff to do on this thing. You can read a book, magazine, news, watch a movie, play a game, whatever. It's a quantum leap from the old Kindle where you could read and play some very limited games. This thing is a boredom killer.The colors and graphics are fantastic. It simply looks great and there isn't much more to say about that.Netflix and Hulu stream PERFECTLY on this device. You'll only be limited by your internet connection. It delivers crisp, high definition video smooth as silk. I was amazed at what video looks like on this thing.Type is easy to read on this device. You can switch from black on white, to black on sepia or white on black depending on preference. The type is clear, legible and you can adjust size and spacing easily. My longest time reading so far is about 3 hours, no eye strain, no headaches.The sensitivity and accuracy of the touch screen are top notch. I've been using a lot of tablets and touch screen phones lately and this is among the top for sure in that category. It's extremely sensitive to taps and touch so you won't get frustrated using this. I intentionally let the screen get a lot of smudges on it to see how it affected it, and it did fine. It's at the level of an iPad in this department (if you've ever used one) and light years ahead of these cheap tablets on the market. Angry birds is a breeze and you won't have to tap multiple times to get it to listen to you.Battery life is pretty good considering what it does. It's nowhere near my 2nd gen kindle but that's to be expected now that we have a bright screen and way more features. It's enough that you can use it to watch a movie or read for a few hours and be ok.PDFs seem to look pretty good on it. I transferred some to my old Kindle and could barely read them, but with the fire they are very close to a Kindle book, legible and look great.Fast response - I haven't had any problems with response time at all. Everything flows very smooth and quick.Feels tough - My last Kindle died young, and I know it was party because of how I treated it. I used it daily and carried it everywhere. This one feels a lot more sturdy and I think it will hold up much better than the last one. It's a tough thing to describe but it just feels more sturdy.Space - They give you ample room to put your books and other media on this device. It's nice to not have to worry about space for objects.Keyboard - This ties in with the touchscreen part but it works very well. You can type up twitter/facebook posts with ease, and works good even if you have big fingers like me.Fun - this thing is just fun to use, and has so many features.Quality - I'll reiterate this point - it feels very sturdy, performs well and is easy to use. I can really see the effort and amount of care that was put into making a great product here. It is far beyond what you'd expect for $200.The Bad:Well there isn't much!The lack of 3g - I understand why they did it: obviously streaming movies, tv shows, games etc over 3G would be very cost prohibitive for Amazon. I get that. But it is something that you miss if you had it before.The fact that most of the books live in the cloud until you download them - This was kind of annoying and ties into the 3g part, when I first got this, i opened up one book and looked at it, and the next day went to work (where we have no wi-fi) and it was nearly useless. All of the books had to be downloaded (which I eventually did) before they could be read when you're away from a wireless connection. Kinda crappy.Lack of folder support - I transferred many of my books from my old Kindle to the new one because they were separated by folders. The Kindle itself didn't recognize these folders, but when using USB transfers it was easier to organize everything - fine on my 2nd gen kindle - but with the fire if it's in a folder it won't find it. So I have to dump all my books into the root directory and it's a huge clustered mess. They all show up on the carousel the same but I liked having folders to organize stuff.Speaking of carousel, the last stuff you used being popped up on there all the time can get annoying, especially when you delete it and it comes back later. A very small thing to get upset about, but it's there.Sound kind of sucks - Not the greatest, but when you consider the size of the device they're doing the best they can. Headphones work great.Too much distractions - If you want to read, it might be hard not to play angry birds, read some news or watch Netflix. If you just simply want to read books a 1st or 2nd gen kindle is fine, but if you want a bunch of other distractions in there too, the Fire has it.The Final Word:GET IT. There is no really compelling reason not to get this if you can afford it. I have tested and tried several tablets for work and spent a lot of time with them and if you consider the Kindle fire "just another tablet" it's still the best in the $200 market, by far. If you think about it as a Kindle it's leaps and bounds ahead of the 2nd gen which is only $60 less. Why on earth wouldn't you get it?It's very well done, a high quality product worth getting. It's how things should be made.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsRefurbished Kindle Fire,March 27, 2012By&nbsp;CMC-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the refurbished Kindle Fire for $30 less because I wasn't sure how much I'd use it. It doesn't look used and functions as promised. I've only used it a few times, so these are my first impressions.Pros:Color screen for games, magazines, videos, etc.Plays MP3s.Adequate processor speed.You can change font size and background color.Cons:Bright, shiny screen is hard on the eyes.There's no way to categorize books. I have about 700 books. If I want to look through all my recipe books, I have to look through all my books or search, which may not find all of them.You can only delete a book from your kindle. You have to log into amazon to delete it from your account.No page numbers.Overall, it's great if you want a device for all media, but if you're looking for something that's mainly an e-reader, get the Kindle or Kindle Touch. The E Ink is so much better for your eyes.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,March 21, 2012By&nbsp;K. Anthony "Bookworm"(Nebraska)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My boyfriend got me the Kindle Fire for Christmas this past year.  I had always told him I didn't want a Kindle because I love having hard copies of all of my books - I love the smell of books, turning the pages, and basically everything that comes with "real" books.  (total book nerd).  With that being said, I'm IN LOVE with my Kindle Fire.  I can surf the web, update my Facebook page, play games, watch Netflix and do some awesome things on it.It did take me a month or so of having it before actually reading a book on the device, but I must say it's not as annoying as I thought it would be to read a book on an electronic device.  I can adjust the screen color so it's not a stark white background (I chose a slightly yellowed color) which makes the pages easier to read and puts less strain on my eyes.  My one complaint about reading books on the Kindle Fire is that the page numbers do not show up correctly so there's no way to tell how many pages you've read in a day (something that I always like to know when I'm engrossed in a book).  I really enjoy the fact that there are so many free books available to download to the Kindle Fire, especially since many of them are fairly current releases.  Having a Prime membership definitely enhances your Kindle Fire because you can rent a book a month from the kindle library and you can watch amazon instant streaming shows for free on your device.I will say the browser on the Kindle Fire is not exactly the best- every time I go to use the web or load my facebook app it sort of freezes my Kindle Fire for about a minute, then returns it to the home screen and I have to load the browser or facebook app again and even then it freezes for about another minute before asking if I'd like to load my previous tabs or not.  I'm not sure why this glitch continues to occur, but hopefully it will be fixed with future updates.All in all it's an incredible device for the price.  I would recommend it to anyone looking for a fun side device to take on trips, have for breaks at work or just for everyday use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPleasantly Surprised,February 24, 2012By&nbsp;Beth Q-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had purchased a Kindle last April, and was displeased that only 6 months later, the Kindle Fire came out for only ten dollars more.  I have read and reread the reviews for the Fire, and hesitated to spend the money to buy another reader.  Well, a few weeks ago, tax refund in hand, I purchased the Fire, and I have had my nose in it ever since.  People have said on the reviews that it is a reader, not an Ipad.  Well, I find that not to be entirely true.  I can read books, play games ad nauseum, check my email, surf the net, and send and receive documents.  I can correspond on FB and Twitter as well.  What's not to love?  It is as close to a mini laptop as you can get.  Will I eventually get an Ipad?  Maybe.  I have been extremely pleased with my Fire.  Well worth the money.  I take it everywhere.  Waiting at the doc's office?  Pull out your Kindle and the 2-hour wait flies.  The battery does not stay charged as long as the former Kindle does, but the Fire does so much more that it takes more out of the charge when in use.  Take your charger cord with you when you are on the go and plug in to an outlet at your bakery restaurant of choice, bagel and coffee in the one hand and Fire in the other.  I just love mine.  So so glad I finally clicked the purchase button and quit thinking about it.The only down side that I can find is that reading books on the Fire is not as friendly on the eyes.  Much easier to read on the older Kindle.  Other than that, I am in heaven.Oh, and purchase a stylus for your Fire.  Easier to hit the buttons.And the main selling point for me was that I can watch NetFlix on it.  No more dragging the laptop around the house to where I want to watch, or going to a certain tv to watch NetFlix.  Go anywhere with your KF, and as long as you can get internet access, you are watching shows/ movies in ten seconds.  Now, I am finally getting my money's worth out of my NF monthly charges.  Love love love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKINDLE FIRE - LISTEN 2 ME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;JesusIsLord(Michigan)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)5 STARS FOLKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!First of all, I have read probably 50% of all the reviews posted for the Kindle Fire and said ok, now it's time for me to speak up. I hope you find this review to be helpful. Wanna hear it? here it go:I was given the Kindle Fire for Christmas and mind you, wasn't that hip to the hype surrounding it. Everyone was talking about how nice it is and how it's comparable to an Ipad but I hadn't did any personal research on it until now. Nevertheless, I was soooooooo excited when I got it because this is my first E-Reader/Tablet so I was anxious to dive right in.I opened it and immediately liked the face of it. Nice, slick and clear. It does not come with an instructional. Amazon provides both manual &amp; video instructionals via their website (which are very helpful) and there's also a "Kindle Fire User's Guide" on the device. Also on the device, You can go to "Quick Settings" and then go to "Customer Feedback and Support" to get further help. NOW TO THE SPECIFICS:SETUP/REGISTRATION: My setup was not that easy because the very first thing it asks you to do is to choose a wifi network (Internet Connection) to connect to and I do not have wifi at my home. So I chose the option to setup later and proceeded to register my Kindle but I needed wifi to do that as well. I was however, able to bypass all of that to get to the main screen just to see what was what but again, was limited to what I could do without a wifi connection.WIFI: This is actually the only thing that I dislike about the product. 90% of the Kindle's functions center around wifi. As irritating as this is, I have a feeling that Amazon is preparing us for what is to come concerning technology. Everything will probably be Wifi centered. Moving on, this can get a bit frustrating at times because when I'm trying to play games, read a magazine, or some other things, I keep seeing a message come up saying "No Internet Connection". So I called Customer Service (a number I retrieved from Amazon's website) and they informed me that I need to either contact my Internet Service Provider (For me is Comcast)or simply go to Target or Best Buy and purchase a router for my home. In the meantime, going to a "hotspot" such as Star Bucks or McDonald's would be the only way to retrieve wifi. That is what I did and have been doing until I resolve this issue. I mainly go to Star Bucks, both stand alone and one's located in Barnes &amp; Noble and it connects just fine.SCREEN GLARE: I have seen reviews about people complaining about a glare and I have not experienced that at all. I think the screen is perfect and whatever I am doing, I see it very clear and there is no glare.POWER BUTTON: People have complained about the location of the power button on the Kindle Fire and folks, don't believe the hype. I hit the button one time and it just shuts the "screen" down, not the whole device. Before it completely goes off, it will ask you "are you sure you want to shut down" so if you press the power button by mistake, it will not power off. Once I realized that, I became conscience of how I held it and it's been smooth sailing ever since. It also is rotatable, you turn it sideways and upside down to avoid hitting the power button by mistake.FUNCTIONS: So far I have downloaded some apps, games, and magazines and everything works just fine. I have no problems at all concerning it's functions. People have said that it freezes up and you have to tap it repeatedly before it moves. I have not had these problems. I'm able to nagivate very well on my Kindle Fire.MUSIC TRANSFER: I am a music lover so I was hoping and praying I could transfer my music from my home computer to my Kindle Fire via a USB cord and thank God I could. Now the Kindle Fire does not come with a USB cord but I happen to have a Sprint Evo and the USB/Charger I use for that is interusable with the Fire. So I was able to transfer my music to my Fire and it sounds awesome. Love it!CUSTOMER SERVICE: I have called Amazon's customer service to help me when I was trying to connect to wifi and download some apps and they were SUPER! Patient, kind, and very helpful. Thank you Amazon!KINDLE FIRE VS IPAD: Ok ya'll listen to me. TWO TOTALLY DIFFERENT DEVICES! I have seen and handled an Ipad and now the Kindle Fire. The Kindle Fire is designed to be an E-Reader with Tablet bonuses. If you go to various websites, you will see that it comes up under the E-Reader's section, not necessarily the Tablet section. Comparing The Fire to an Ipad I feel is not fair because people are being misled of people saying how the Fire is better but it depends on what you will use it for. It's like comparing a cell phone to a lap top. On most cell phones these days, you have the bonus of internet, camera, USB connections, apps, etc BUT it's primary use is to be used as a phone, not a lap top. Likewise with the Kindle Fire. You have the bonus of all these other additions, but it's primary use is as an E-Reader. The Ipad is something that does over and beyond right now because it is taking the place of desktop computers so it's functions are more durable and sustainable. The Kindle Fire is a wonderful device doing everything it should be doing AS AN E-READER.Overall, I really enjoy my Kindle Fire and can't imagine life without it. I hope this review has inspired you for the better. It's all about preference folks. I'm not going to sit here and tell you this beats an Ipad or any other tablet because everyone wants something for various reasons. I love to read, go on youtube, twitter, play games and listen to music. With The Kindle Fire, I feel my mission is accomplished. God Bless :-)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Christmas Gift!,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;Genevieve R. Thompson-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire and cannot believe everything it does for the price it sells for.Set it up myself and had no problem.  So easy to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 31, 2011By&nbsp;M. St Clair "megsaint"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have an iPad and I love it. It's probably my favorite gadget ever. The Kindle Fire is no iPad. And, you know what? That's a GOOD thing! I didn't buy my Fire to replace my laptop or my iPad. I bought it as an eReader to use at times and places where it would be inconvenient or uncomfortable to use my iPad. I read all the specs before I bought it so I knew it didn't have 3G, didn't read books out loud, didn't come with a cable, didn't do windows or walk the dog. So, I wasn't disappointed that it did none of those things. I am, after two weeks, quite happy with its performance as an ereader. The hardware has performed to spec. WiFi has worked flawlessly. I've checked some ebooks out of my public library for the first time. I enjoyed using it on a long holiday trip; it was the only "book" I took with me. It's smaller and lighter than my iPad and feels very durable.  I've not commented on things like web browsing, loading apps from places other than Amazon, using email because, frankly, I doubt I'll ever do any of those things with my Fire. If you want an ereader that doesn't use eInk (I find the low contrast of an eInk screen fatiguing to read for any length of time) and Amazon is your preferred vendor for ebooks, the Kindle is an excellent choice.I've given it a four-star rating rather than a five for a number of reasons. 1) The touch screen is a little less responsive than I'd like in some situations, most notably in the solitaire game I sometimes play. I don't know if this is a software issue or related to the extra strengthening of the glass. 2) Battery life. Yes, I miss the battery life my original Kindle had when it was new. But it's not bad. 3)Only life changing products get fives. This is not life changing, just life improving.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;julie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)my husband bought this for me as an anniversary gift and now we fight over it.  it's especially great b/c of the web access and ability to watch videos on it.  my 3 year old can play games, I can read books.  seems to have something for everyone in the familyHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt's Good!,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;Aaron Tensen(Oregon)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire on Christmas so I have had it for about a week now, but have used it for countless hours in that short amount of time. It works pretty perfectly for my needs, as I have already purchased many TV shows, books, and have uploaded most of my music to Amazon's cloud. Having all of my content ready from the get-go was a definite plus as I was able to start consuming content immediately after opening the box without waiting for hours while my music or movies downloaded on the device. Of course if I'm on the go I will need to make sure I have some content on the device, but that seems to be a breeze and a computer is not needed to do so.Web surfing seems to be as good as one would expect on a 7inch screen. It's decently fast and gets the job done, but convenience is really the Fire's strong suit as I no longer have to lug around my hot and heavy laptop to visit my favorite web pages. My laptop is now hooked straight up to the TV for watching videos on the big screen and is controlled via All In One app from the appstore, so it's a win-win for me.The screen looks great on the Fire and makes playing games or watching videos a joy. Plants vs. Zombies is what my girlfriend and I have mostly been playing, but the free app of the day from the app store has added several other great games to my library. I can't really say how reading is on the Fire as I have a 2nd gen Kindle that I still prefer to use while reading, but the screen is certainly sharp enough to read in comfort.As far as the battery goes, I have to say that I was impressed with the life it has especially with the screen being so vibrant. I haven't timed how long it lasts, but I can use the Fire for a good chunk of the day without worrying about the battery. This makes using the device a real treat for me because my laptop has a bad battery and only lasts for a few minutes, so my prior mobility was limited and I'm happy to no longer be tethered to the wall.It's easy to go on and on about what I love about the Fire, but I do have a few problems with it. First of all, it sometimes fails to detect my headphones when they are plugged into the jack and just plays audio through the main speakers instead, which is a real drag. Restarting the Kindle fixed this problem both times it has happend, but who wants to do that every time headphones are needed? Certainly not me. Secondly, since there are no external buttons, (Home, volume) adjusting the volume or going to the home screen can take a bit of time getting used to. Once I learned how to adjust the volume from any screen it's not really that big of a deal for me. My biggest problem with the no external buttons is when I have the keyboard up while browsing, there is no easy access to the home screen, or back buttons which can be frustrating. There needs to be a button to bring the keyboard back down, and perhaps there is but I'm just missing it.  Another problem I have is when I open the browser it automatically opens a web page that I looked at long ago. I tried deleting my history, or looking for some sort of homepage option that it may have been set to, but so far no luck. All of these problems are minor and seem to be ones that could be fixed in a future update.All in all, the Kindle Fire is a great device for my needs and comes at a great price. If you are looking for something to do some web browsing, play some games, and watch some videos then this is the device to get, especially if you have already invested in Amazon's content library.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - Best Bang for your Buck,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;A. Trent "Dren's B-Spot"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received a Kindle Fire for Christmas from my husband and I LOVE IT! It's the perfect size and provides all the functionality I need for on the go access. The Kindle Fire does what it's supposed do - give you access to movies, books, magazines and the web. I already have an Ipad through my job - so I know the difference between the two devices and for me - the Kindle Fire gives me everything I need. I have my own hot-spot too so access to the internet is only a click away for me.My only complaint is that there's no Text To Speech for the Fire.  I love that feature on my K3 and I'm keeping my K3 so I can continue to utilize that feature.  So it's a win-win.Best Features:Amazon Prime - Streaming Movies and TV showsLending Library - gaining access to books I wouldn't normally buy; but picking up new to me authorsFor the $199 price. You can't beat this. You just can't!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire!,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;BRSLaw(Massachusetts)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle for about a week, and I absolutely LOVE it!!  I honestly don't even notice a difference from my husband's iPad, even though I know the Kindle Fire is not supposed to be a true competitor for the iPad (although the Andriod app store is definitely inferior to the iTunes app store; I have an iPhone and many of my faves aren't available in the Android store).  I have been reading books like a fiend, browsing the web, playing Tetris, checking my email, reading magazines, including an app for Cooking Light that comes with a print subscription and also purchasing Dressage Today and Runner's World digital editions.  It is soooo easy to use, has a remarkably long battery life, is very easy on the eyes to read (I use the off white background and brown text option).  The touch screen is equal in quality and use to the Apple touch screens.  I find the 7" display to be the perfect size.  Also, the WhisperSync is great.  I've bought a couple books while using my regular computer, and the next time I go to use the Kindle (on wi-fi), there the book is!  I also like the cloud storage.  You can delete a book that you have finished from the Kindle and it will stay in your Cloud.  Pretty handy.I am also very excited to start using Amazon Prime.  I have a free month trial and am reading Moneyball from the Lending Library (one book/month).  I haven't tried the streaming video yet, but plan to buy an AmazonVideo-compatible Blu-Ray to use the Prime video library on the big screen.  I was a little hestitant after reading some reviews complaining about various aspects, but for someone who wants to read digital books and magazine, browse online, play games and check email on a screen bigger than a smart phone, the quality and price of the Fire can't be beat!  (And, of course, you need to be near wi-fi to use online/email/Kindle store features; I have wi-fi at home and am getting a new iPhone with a hotspot, so I will always have wi-fi available).So far, I have come up with one complaint: when typing, you can't paste a copied section unless you are pasting over words;  that is, you can't tap twice and have "paste" appear, unless you are tapping on already highlighted words.  That is so minor, I will certainly get over it.If you don't feel like/don't have $600+ to spend on a tablet, this is the one for you! (Plus it has Flash; just sayin').Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI HATED IT....For about an Hour,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;Ir8prym8-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am not a tech guy. I bought my first Kindle (Keyboard 3G ) and liked it quite a bit. Then I saw the Fire.. SHINY. I liked the idea of playing games, watching Video,etc. I had used the browser on my 3G, and though it was FAAAAR from great, it was fine for me. The Fire arrived quickly and was ready to go, right out of the box. It was a NIGHTMARE. Everything was a mess,I couldn't figure ANYTHING out...for awhile. After about an hour, things got better. Soon, I was on the Web, goofing around, downloading apps, putting select books from my kindle library on it, and honestly having a great time. The reading took a little adjusting, but it has turned out to be a GREAT DEAL. I highly recommend this as a READER WITH AWESOME FEATURES. I join the legions of people who have reviewed this product for the purpose of saying yet again: IT'S NOT AN IPAD!!!!! It isn't supposed to be. What it IS... is FUN. This is a great device for the money. I was at a computer store in the city this week and saw 2 Kindle Fires on a table for reselling returns. I wonder if the people who returned them had the same initial reaction I did when they tried them out for the first time. If so, it's their loss. The only thing I wish for on my Kindle Fire, is 3Gmmmmmmmmmmmmmm3GHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Great Device for $200,December 22, 2011By&nbsp;IlPrimitivo(San Francisco, CA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For me the Kindle Fire really fits the bill.  It provides as much connectivity as I need -- to get what I want and to do what I want -- without having to buy a full priced tablet.Will it allow me to program code, write novels, create massive spreadsheets, diagram my next presentation, create 3-D animation, or create harmony and World Peace (is there an app for that)?  No, not really.  But for me I kept my expectations in check reminding myself that this is just a reader with additional functionality and not to expect perfection for $200.  I'm pretty satisfied with the device and I am no longer tempted to buy a full functioning tablet at 2x or 3x the price.If you want a modestly priced digital-consumer device with nice vibrant colors, touch screen, wi-fi, responsiveness, digital books and magazines, email, apps, and access to almost all Amazon.com has to offer in one small nicely built package then this works.  Yes, there's room for improvement but the Kindle Fire is pretty darn good right out of the box.It's not a laptop, it's not an iPad, it's not a smart phone -- It's a Kindle Fire.  And it's terrific.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing value,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Wade Bloom(Fargo, ND USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We purchased 3 Kindle Fires for Christmas. With the latest software update I have found them to be rock solid and full of exceptional value.App purchases can be shared as can the book purchases. Combine with an Amazon Prime membership and Amazon Cloud storage and you have amazing value.I've found battery life to be better than expected. Movies look great, music sounds great.Nicely done Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome device,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;pistonhead-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Got it as a gift and i am very impressed with every feature. I stream movies and tv shows without issue.  Before I got it I saw reviews with concerns over issues like the power button getting hit to easy, not true.  A+Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsDoes everything I need it yo do,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;ChefBoyJared-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I honestly can't understand it every time I hear anything negative about this device.  Are there seriously still people out there who make purchases without doing a little research first?  The kindle fire is an excellent pocket sized entertainment tablet.  All of my media in one small device.  And as a chef, I can load recipes on it for the road.  I don't need it to do all the crap the iPad does.  I'd never use half that stuff anyway.  And I saved enough money for a weekend outta  town.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoving it!,December 25, 2011By&nbsp;A. Blair-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Fire for Christmas this morning. I have connected to two wi-fi networks (home and in-laws) with zero problems. Update downloaded right away. Have been cruising and loving it since. I admit, I was a little nervous, having read some negative reviews, but I honestly can not find anything to complain about. The touch screen is responsive, downloads and Internet are very fast. The only thing I am remotely struggling with is the keyboard, but that's not a problem with the device.....I just need to get use to it.But, considering I have typed this review on my Fire, must not be too bad, huh? :-)A very merry Christmas to me!Update 12/26: 36 hours of use, and I have never accidentally turned it off by hitting the power button....another concern I had from reading reviews....and I don't turn it upside down while using it. I keep waiting for it to lock up, stop connecting to wi-fi, blow up...something bad. But no, just pure Fire. Again...I am loving it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire is great,December 24, 2011By&nbsp;Kenneth Idskou-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a great 200 dollar tablet and e-reader.  Amazon could get away with charging more for this but were smart enough to make it affordable to most consumers.  I have not experienced the same type of issues that others are complaining about.  It's fast, easy to type on, very responsive, and has an excellent screen resolution.  I can highly reccomend the Fire for people who don't need all the bells and whistles of a 500 dollar tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsgood product  for the money,December 23, 2011By&nbsp;jb74-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am not a tech nut and read a lot of reviews before this purchase. If you are looking for fancy. Flashy item, get a ipad. If you a useful tablet for entertainment, get this one for $200.00. It works wonderfully and arrived the next day as promised.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsbest thing i bought in a long time!!!!!!,December 23, 2011By&nbsp;nkwestrick-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am thoroughly enjoying my kindle fire!!!!!  It does.everything I need!!! I would recommend everyone to get one of.these.  it is truly User friendly.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for what it's intended to be,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Donald Gillette(Nashville)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've read quite a few reviews about the Kindle Fire and all "its problems" but so far after using it daily for a month, I've seen no problem at all.I'll take what it does one thing at a time, but honestly, the only thing it's not great at is browing the web and that's just because it's a mobile device--they all suck at browsing the web, even the venerable iPad.E-reader: I prefer it to my Kindle 1 because the print is sharper and I can read it in the dark.  Swiping the screen to turn the page may seem inconvenient to some, but it's no more inconvenient than clicking the button on the other Kindles and it beats hell out of the terribly difficult task of turning a page in a real book. That was sarcasm. It's missing the text-to-speech feature of the other Kindles so far but rumor is that'll be available in the next update. I personally hate "listening" to books but some people love it.  If you've gotta have that feature, you might wait for the update and see if the feature's in there.Videos: Great for Netflix, Hulu, Amazon video, and DVDs that have been converted to MP4.  It plays MP4's, not avi files or mpegs. The built-in speakers are just "okay" but with headphones, the sound is no different than an iPod.Email: Perfect little machine for reading emails.  No better or worse at writing them than an android phone, an iPhone, or anything else with the keyboard on screen.Apps:  Every app I've tried works great including the all-important Angry Birds. Some apps aren't available through the Amazon app store and that's where you're forced to go when you try to download any app.  HBO GO, for example, is not available yet for Kindle Fire even though it works like a dream on an Android phone.  I assume Amazon's playing catch-up with this. Or at least I hope so.Web browsing:  Not great. Better than an Android phone or Blackberry, not as good as a desktop. It works for a quick google search but you wouldn't want to spend all day on it because it's a pain just like all tablets. In my opinion, without a mouse or a keyboard, web browsing isn't worth the time--even on a netbook with a mousepad, it's no treat.Photo viewing:  Very cool.  Sharp, clear, and zoomable.Music: Also great, just like a big iPod, but really--you don't buy a Kindle Fire to listen to music.Shopping on Amazon:  Way too easy. You have to watch yourself or you'll be buying the kitchen sinkWhat you're getting with a Kindle Fire is an Android phone with a big screen and a lot longer battery life but without a camera, microphone, or telephone.  There are a lot of things they could have included but then the price would be through the roof.  I bought this because it was $199 vs. the iPad's $499 and to me, that's a huge difference. It could use a USB port, an exterior volume control, and text-to-speech.Some of the critics are slamming it because of an unresponsive screen, claiming that anybody with big hands can't use it and that's baloney. My big Irish mitts are the size of boxing gloves, and I've had absolutely no problem. You have to ~learn~ how to use it and that takes a day or two. Just grabbing it and dragging a ham across the screen isn't going to work. You didn't get behind the wheel of your first car and win the Daytona 500, so don't expect to become a Kindle Fire wizard right out of the box, but just a little practice and use and you'll love the thing. Seriously, every negative review I've read on the Kindle Fire has "impatient moron" written all over it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Tablet!!!!!,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Tay-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire base upon the price because I was unwilling to paid 500 dollar for the IPAD. I love my IPHONE but I couldn't see myself spending that much for a tablet.I think people tend to forget that the Amazon Market is a protective mechanism by Amazon from the Android market itself. I just installed the Kindle Software Update Version 6.2.1 and the touch screen is much faster; the wireless connectivity seems 10X better. It been a month since I bought by Kindle and I barely touch my laptop anymore because I believe it's an all in one device to stream movie/music plus it an e-reader. (Great TV shows streaming from CBS.com, FOX.com, and ABC.com)The Fire is not an IPAD killer but it comes really close to it because if you are looking for blue booth, digital camera, and computer; then the fire is not for you.I believe Amazon will eventually catch up in the Android Market once the apps are built because the Fire is so new.Overall for me, I love my Fire and it's very easy to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent for the price!,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;P. Swain "Parabolee"(NJ, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let's be clear from the start, I am giving the Kindle Fire 5 stars because of it's price. There is simply no other Tablet on the market as good as the Kindle Fire in this price range. Also let me note that I am an iPad 2 owner reviewing this product I bought as a gift. So I have no bias towards the device as an owner of one. As I am not.Let's start with the devices positives.+ The device has a wonderful UI that is nicer than most Android UI's. The dual-core processor is fast and the device is easy and fun to use. If you are in the market for an inexpensive tablet, you really can't do better than the Kindle Fire.+ Also since it's from Kindle you know it will continue to be well supported with updates and improved features over time.+ The browser is very nice and it handles emails very well. I also tested it with several 3D games and it ran than great.+ The screen is gorgeous and a high resolution. Higher than the iPad (although half the size). After looking at this for a while the iPad screen looks very low resolution.+ Anything you buy from Amazon is stored for free in the cloud to save your storage.Now the downsides. You get what you pay for as the old adage goes. But we are only talk a lack of features that many would not want/need, rather than a lack of quality.- No Android marketplace. The Amazon app store is great, but limited in choices in comparison to the Android Marketplace. And while you can "side-load" apps that are not on the Amazon app store, many will not know how to do that so you app choices have limitations. The Android marketplace can be installed if you have some hacking knowhow or are good at following guides, but it's a pain and currently will be disabled whenever Amazon send out an update (although it can be reinstalled).- No bluetooth. Few will care, but this means no Bluetooth keyboard or gaming accessories (see OnLive's bluetooth controller)- No external storage options. This also applies to the iPad but many Android devices allow the use of SD card to increase storage.- No 3G option for those wanting internet access on the go. You pay an extra $100 for this on the ipad but it would be nice if Amazon offered a more expensive model with this feature.- No volume buttons, volume accessed via on screen menu only. Pretty minor this as it only takes a few seconds to pull the menu up onscreen. But buttons would have been nice.As I said there are better tablets on the market. But none of them are close to this price range. If you want something better than the Fire you really need to spend $500, so the price difference is huge.GREAT TABLET. LOVE IT!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNice tablet, once it's wide open,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;agFinder-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Amazon will likely crush this review, but my impression of the Fire is based on what I'm seeing after rooting and gaining access to the 'full' Android experience.  Once I was able to install a different launcher (user interface), the Android Market, all my Google applications (Docs, Reader, Voice, etc.), and various enhancement apps from the market (MS Exchange mail, Google-sync'd calendars, custom lock screen, etc.), this thing became an actual tablet computer which can be, I think, reasonably compared to the iPad (esPecially at this price).It's beyond me why the Fire wasn't sold this way.  The Google licensing fees couldn't have been that high, and you just take so much away from the Google/Android integration by limiting the device.  Still, I'm sure that many users are going to have an excellent out-of-the-box experience (again, especially at this price).  The hardware is very sound, crisp response, and the Silk browser is a masterpiece.  The form factor is also quite pleasing.  Remember it's essentially designed to hold/carry, and 10" is just too big for that.  The screen size is absolutely not an issue when watching video, browsing sites, etc.If you buy the Fire you won't be disappointed, but if you can 'get behind' the Amazon skin and restrictions and really open this thing up - you'll be ecstatic.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMikey B,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Michael-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This product does everything it claims to do and does it well...  All those negative reviews comparing it to an Ipad need to stop.  it is not-- I repeat NOT a direct Ipad competitor.  It is a low cost affordable Tablet that gets you hooked into the Amazon way of life.  The Amazon store and streaming of movies and books and music etc is great, plus the fact you get TONS of reviews on everything since it is all linked to Amazon.the Prime program is pretty much a must have...  ive have used it many times so far in my free trial, by streaming various programs and movies and renting a book.  i have also purchased various items on Amazon such as the Marware case and cables etc taking advantage of the Prime free 2 day shipping.There are some negatives which i hope amazon addresses in future updates etc.  such as tapping sometimes does not take command and thus you have to tap multiple times before the tablet takes action.  it doesnt happen very often but it does happen.  the web browsing is good, the apps all run great, i like the Pulse app which keeps me entertained for a long time reading News and Blogs etc.So far i give it 5 Stars for delivering great Portable Entertainment at 1/3 of the cost of the competitors and yet still manage to offer amazing services with the Prime Video on demand program and of course the whole software connected to it Amazon store in various ways.I love the kindle fire.!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsloved it,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;teresa-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I already had a kindle so I thought it was excessive buying a second one.....but I am so glad I did!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire and I'll tell you why.,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Silvia Carry-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own all the other products (Ipad, Iphone, Itouch a Kindle2 and a Kindle3), so I can talk with "some knowledge of the products).While the Ipad is very nice and I use it a lot....It is over glorified.(I couldn't see myself taking a photo with it...how cumbersome can anythingpossibly be)... Why?I like my Kindle Fire VERY MUCH....I like the the portability (its just the right size)...the friendliness of it, the fact that it has all of the features I need and some that I "might" need someday.I'm sure that more apps are going to start being released soon to complete the package.YES I definitely like to be able to create folders for my different type of books (fiction, non fiction, etc), I can do that on my regular kindle, so I imagine they'll come out with something like that soon.My pet peeve with ALL the kindles, is that while you can highlight an item and share it on FB or Twitter, you cannot e mail it to yourself (or others), so if you want to quote from a particular book, you have to jump through hoops.Other than that its fine and more than fine. One shouldn't either knit pick or expect "everything and the kitchen sink" for $199...I bought several for Christmas gifts. So  there....Sil12/31/2011 Update of original review:Its been almost a month and my 5 Star review still holds.I find myself using the Fire more than the Ipad...Why?... the portability, the fact that it has FLASH, which makes all videos an movies available without tweaking ( I CAN watch items that require flash in the Ipad, if needed be, but I have to use another browser, which is slow as molasses.I bought 4 Kindle Fire units, 3 of which were gifts for my daughter, a 4 year old grandchild and a 6 year old grandchild.My granddaughter (6) fell in love with it immediately and doesn't part from it (she's been told she cant bring it to the table during meals).My grandson (4) took 2 days to figure it out and does better than some adult reviewers here.I love the fact that now you can remove items from the Carousel. And a few days ago they added my favorite meditation timer to the available apps.I can't ask for a more friendly device.SilHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat little device,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Gadgeteer-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was recently given a Kindle Fire as an early Christmas gift and could not wait to take it out of the box, if only to see for myself if the controversy about it is correct. I will say upfront that I live in both the Apple ecosystem and the Amazon Prime ecosystem. I own Macs, iPods, iPhones, and an iPad. With two adults and three children in our home, we considered adding another iPad, as our gadgets are in constant use. After using the Fire, however, I can safely say I will postpone that purchase if not cancel it altogether.I find the interconnectedness with Amazon Prime to be fantastic. I was able to immediately stream a free movie with zero buffering time and no jerky video that one often gets when viewing video over a Wi-Fi connection. As with all the Kindles, downloading a book is a breeze. I have also used it to mindlessly browse the web while watching TV. That experience was satisfactory, if a little kludgy, but I expect the forthcoming software update to address any issues with the Silk web-browser.While the touch interface is not quite as graceful as the iPad, i find it to be very intuitive and easy to use. Many of the negative reviews have focused on the "Carousel" feature (this is like cover flow on an iPod, except you can leaf through every activity you have used). Currently, it cannot be edited, so your history is there for all to see. I would like to see this feature be editable, but again, I am pretty sure Amazon has heard this complaint and will allow this in the software update. Its not that anyone is trying to hide anything, but if you navigated to a useless webpage after a search, this would remain in the Carousel. So it is more of an annoyance than anything. Many of the features, like its e-mail aggregator, work as easily as the iPad, although using Exchange e-mail supposedly requires a separate app. Overall, however, the user experience is well above average.In the first three days I've had the Fire, I've read a book, watched a movie, used it to conduct web searches (and watched Flash video), answered e-mail, played games. I'm like a kid in a candy store with my very portable little tablet.I rarely write reviews, but given all the controversy and bad publicity the Fire has gotten I felt compelled to set the record straight. The Fire would be a great tablet at a higher price point as well, but for $200 it is a steal, especially if you already use Amazon prime. While I love my Apple products too, I've loved my Fire. I can't wait to get home at night to play with it some more. I'm pretty sure the naysayers own a large position in Apple stock.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Fire more each day !,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;Kristasgram-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was a bit apprehensive before my Fire arrived because I'm not the most tech savvy person. Within minutes of removing it from the box, the update was successfully installed, I easily connected to my wifi  network , set up my email and facebook accounts with no problem.I've had the Fire for almost 2 weeks now and I love it more each day ! The color screen is beautiful for magazines and games.The streaming video from amazon works flawlessly.I have another android tablet - Apad IMX 515 -which is decent but in no way can compare to the Fire.Great product, great value !Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;John P.(Florida, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just wanted to put my two cents in and recommend the Kindle Fire. I've had it for a few weeks now and haven't been able to put it down. Very well made and I still can't believe they're selling them at this price. For reading books, magazines, and news and also web browsing and keeping up with social media the Kindle Fire can't be beat, especially at this price. Sorry but I can't think of any bad points!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire will stand the test of time.,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Joshua B.(North West Ohio USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought this item out of impulse due to the fact I have a Kindle DX and love it to death, so I thought the Kindle Fire would make an excellent addition due to my ebook fascination and love of electronics. It runs smooth and pretty fast although not quite as fast as an iPad, it is not in any way slow. Reading on it is still nice even though it has a back-light cause you can change the background to black if you dont like the brightness of the standard "white" background. There are some features I would like to see but by no means diminish the quality of the product. Added with the fact it is only two hundred dollars compared to at least four fifty for an iPad or two fifty for a Nook tablet. I think this is an item that will stand the test of time and be there in the future. I would recommend this to anyone wanting a tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGood economical reader and mostly Android tablet.,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Brian Trotter-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)To be clear, this is not an "Ipad Killer".  If you want every feature of an Ipad, then pay four times as much and get one.  However, if you want a solid reader, a decent web browser, and a decent selection of Amazon's Android apps, this is a very good bargain.Out of the box, you'll get a system update, but that's par for the course with lots of consumer electronics.  Apps are available from Amazon's app store.  You will be locked out of the standard Android app store, but in general the items in the Amazon Store are certified to work with the Fire's features.There is no camera.  This wasn't an issue to me, I have plenty of cameras.  It does have a decently responsive touch screen, and I was able to use it to draw a decent resolution drawing with a $1.99 app in the app store.The web browser is NOT as fast as Amazon claims it is... which I think is in part that they miscalculated the effect of server load on their cloud web server.  If their claims about cloud serving are true then as Amazon scales up its servers you should see better performance.  So far, I haven't found any website that was inaccessible or unreadable.  Overall, the browser performs well.The keyboard is tricky for folks like me with big ham hands.. in portrait mode, I tend to hit the wrong buttons a lot... If you get a stylus designed to work with the Ipad and IPod, you'll find it works very well on the Fire.The acellerometer works quite well, allowing you to play games that run by tilting.There are two issues I've had.  The first is that the power button is literally right next to the usb port. If you're not careful, every time you unplug the fire, you'll turn it off by bumping the switch...The second issue, and this is actually a big one for me, is that Google's platform functions are locked out.  This means android programs that are designed to sync with Google Calendar or use Google Apps functionality simply will not work as intended.  As such, those apps generally don't even find their way to the Amazon app store... an notable exception is Pocket Informant which syncs with Google Calendar on every other android device, but cannot on the Kindle Fire.  Ironic that on 12/7/2011, it was Amazon's Free App of the day...  The apparant reason behind the Google Mobile Services lockout is to force app designers into the Amazon Web Services.  This is an issue I hope Amazon changes their position on for future updates.Overall, if you're looking for a good economical tablet to read, play games, and surf, this is a good bargain and quite probably your best bang for the buck.  You can compare it to the Ipad 2 if you want... but prepare to factor in the 3 times higher price while you make the comparison.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEven and old lady can use it!,December 6, 2011By&nbsp;Marilyn J. Trujillo "Mo-Jo"(Georgia)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)At the age of 77, one might think that this new little technological gadget would be too much for those of us who are still marveling at the invent of television.However, I am having so much fun with it --- I even have the police scanner AP!I can link up with a gajillion jazz radio stations across the country, as well as enjoy my downloads from Cloud.  I could go on and on, but this is my Christmas present to me from me and will be a great companion during the hours that those of us at this age spend in doctors' waiting rooms, etc. Now there will be Solitaire, and Trivia, and on and on.........Thank you, Amazon!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot perfect, but perfect for the $$,December 2, 2011By&nbsp;susijoe-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading many positive and negative reviews about the Fire, I decided to post a review on this device. I am not going to get into many detailed technicalities since there are plenty of good reviews about that. I bought this device as a Christmas present for my dad, so I haven't been using it as I would if it was mine. Overall, I think is unfair to compare this device with an iPad or any other high-end tablet, but the performance I have experience with the Fire could very well be. I really love this unit. The browser is impressively fast, unlike many of the negative reviews that mention the unit is slow. The games play well and the touch pad is pretty accurate. The unit also came unregistered.I am one of those that never (I mean EVER)buy anything first generation, but my dad loves his Kindle so much, I couldn't resist the urge to make him happy.Without a doubt, there are many other features I wished it had and didn't have (SD Slot, different Home layout, etc), but when I think about this and start getting picky, then I remember that I only paid $199 for it. I don't doubt there are some defective units out there, being 1st generation and all, and I am one of the lucky ones to have one that works well. I KNOW my dad will love it! Happy reading, gaming, videoing to all!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsJust what I wanted,November 30, 2011By&nbsp;B. Dunn(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)In short:  Kindle Fire is great for email, streaming, internet, books, and it is offered at a fair price.  Bad because of some concerns with the way Amazon ships, and not sure if putting the power button on the bottom is so smart.  See below:First, before you receive your Kindle, you need to take steps to protect yourself.  If you purchase for yourself, Amazon will automatically link the Kindle to your account.  What this means is that someone can intercept your shipment, and can use your new kindle to make purchases under your account.  ALL WITHOUT LOGGING IN.  What I recommend is when purchasing you select "this is a gift", so Amazon won't automatically link your device to your account.  If you have already purchased the kindle, and are still waiting for it to arrive... IMMEDIATELY log into your account and deactivate your device.  You can reactivate it once it is in your hands.  This way if someone steals your package, it is only the device and not your wallet.  Amazon doesn't require a signature, so UPS will leave it on your doorstep!Second, many people have complained that there is no lock feature for the device.  There is, you just need to go into the set up and activate the lock feature.  It is there..you just need to set it up.  I recommend that you use this feature because once you activate your kindle... as I said above, it is linked to your account.Some of the navigation in the books is a little difficult.  One tip I can tell you is that if you are reading a book, and you want to back out... you need to tap the screen to get the icon to return to the home page.  It would be nice if Amazon included an update that has a "pop up" telling people that.Overall, I am very impressed with the Kindle Fire.  The screen looks amazing, and it seems to work very well.  I have used it to download books, email, internet, and stream videos on Amazon and Netflix.  Netflix seemed a little pixilated, while Amazon seemed clear.  But I noticed no jerking or slowing of the streamed content.  I am running on 10M on my internet download speeds.I have downloaded one magazine thus far, and it seems acceptable.  It is not one that contains the interactive material, so it is just the basic magazine.  I have downloaded several books, and the text looks great on the screen and the controls to change the text and lighting are easy enough to change.  I know some people have complained about the brightness, but I don't think they are aware that you can change this.So, if you want a smaller device than the iPad, something that gives you email, internet, streaming, reading, and simple gaming materials, then I would recommend the Kindle Fire.  If you want the larger screen, then the iPad would be more for you, but if you go that big, why not just get yourself a laptop?  The Kindle Fire won't fit into your pocket like a cell phone, so purchase yourself a case... I'm still waiting on mine for some reason.The power button on the bottom is a bit of a pain, but so far for most of my apps, it hasn't been a major issue.  I just turn the screen so that the power button is on top.  Only some games and apps seem to have a problem with this, but the things you would use most like email, video, and internet seem unaffected.I would and have recommended the Kindle Fire to my friends.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire gets the job done and then some,November 29, 2011By&nbsp;M. Porter-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)If you really REALLY want an Apple iPad, I doubt the Kindle Fire is going to replace it in your heart.  Comparing the two is much like comparing apples (har) and oranges.  I say this because I've noticed that most iPad fans really like what makes the iPad stand out in the field of tablets.  That said, I was interested in an iPad but absolutely did NOT want to pay the premium price (Full Disclosure: I am an Apple fan and have a MacBook and an iPhone and love them both dearly).  What I did want was something similar, with similar functionality, perhaps smaller and at a much more affordable price.  In that regard, the Kindle Fire is exactly what the doctor ordered.It does not replace my iPhone, as I still use that when out of the house and other functionalities.  It does, however, make reading on a device SO much more attractive.  The reader function (my primary reason in wanting the Fire) is great; I love reading books on my Fire and the ease of acquiring new things to read is a VERY handy feature.  Reading blogs is also nicer on my Kindle for much the same reason.  I haven't watched a lot of movies on mine, but my husband has on his and he loves it for that.  I haven't played a lot of games either, but then I'm not a big gamer.  I did play a round or two of Angry Birds though and was impressed with how "cushy" the large screen felt during gameplay.I do wish there was a slot for an SD card or something, to improve upon the storage options.  However, there are things you can store in Amazon's cloud which means I haven't even come close to running out of room yet.  I also wish the Fire had come with a cable that allowed me to connect to my laptop.  I plan to go buy one as soon as the holidays are over but in the meantime, the lack of it grates on my nerves.I also feel the Fire needs a case or something.  The device itself is a good size and not overly heavy or anything.  But I do find myself wishing for something else to "hold onto".  I guess it's the vestiges of someone who is used to reading physical books.  Again, this is something I plan to purchase after the holidays.Battery life is definitely sufficient.  Seeing as how I use it mostly to read books, I only need to charge it about once a week or so.  I've been very pleased with the battery life, considering the features.Again, if you really want an iPad, you should just get an iPad.  But if you're not terribly picky and you want something iPad-esque, then the Fire is a fantastic substitute.  I haven't regretted the purchase for a moment.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)





6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBang for the buck.,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Charles T. Calhoun-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had been thinking about getting an iPad or Nook to read books primarly.  I just could not justify the investment in the iPad, and was leaning towards a Nook Color (my wife has one). Then I started to read about the Kindle Fire and the great price point.  So, I preordered one and got it the day they became available.  The display is stunning, and the size is really just right for reading.  Plus I can check email, surf the web, use the great apps, and probably more I haven't discovered yet. So far I am 100% pleased with the Kindle Fire and expect to be for a long time.  At the price it's going for it really is the best bang for the buck!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent buy,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Skipro-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am an owner of an original Kindle and an iPad and absolutely love my iPad. The Kindle will never replace it, but - at the price, it comes close. The iPad is larger, has many more apps, seems "a bit" more responsive to the touch but that is about it. The Kindle Fire is smaller so fits in my bag easier, plays most of the same apps my iPad does and the movies/shows are just as brilliant. If you are looking for a machine that you can use for reading, playing a few games, surfing the internet and just goofing around with - you can't beat this machine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon's Kindle Fire Is Great!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;BillP(Rescue, CA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I may have to purchase a second Amazon Kindle Fire because the one I bought is being monopolized by my wife and three year-old granddaughter.  My wife is using it to read a novel and play games and our three year-old granddaughter is playing games, looking at books for children, and watching a streaming "Angelina Ballerina" movie from Amazon Prime.I have a 10.1 Android tablet (the ASUS Transformer with the keyboard/dock) and I had some reservations about a 7-inch tablet.  I have found, however, that the Kindle Fire is fun and easy to use.  I have looked at books and magazines and the 7-inch screen is large enough for my old eyes.  My wife said it's easy to read her book on the Kindle Fire and it's easy to hold.  I've also found that the onscreen keyboard is fairly easy for me to use as long as I hold the device in landscape mode (which provides a larger keyboard).I think Amazon has the right idea in selling a tablet for $199 with just those features that people want and use.  I'm not sure why most other tablets, both Android and iPad, duplicate the features found in smartphones.  Most of us carry our smartphones with us and it makes sense for the devices to include a good camera and GPS.  Tablets, on the other hand, are used around the house and don't need those features that won't be used and add to the cost of the device. Here is an interesting excerpt from a post on kindle-fireforum.com: "My granddaughter has an iPad .. and she really likes the FIRE better .. because it fits in her hand better, weighs less and she has a smooth operating experience zipping and doing everything she normally does with her iPad .. (Uses it in school to do notes and research too)."Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I Hoped,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;j0rd4n "j0rd4n"(Oklahoma City, OK)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love the kindle fire.  It far exceeded my expectations.  I've been looking at a way to replace the primary functionality of my laptop without spending $500 on a tablet.  For $200, the fire goes a long way.  I've read some of the criticisms...but I disagree with most of them.  The size is perfect to fit in a single hand.  It is heavier than traditional kindles but not enough to be a noticeable problem.  The access to Amazon content is flawless.  This is the true focus of the fire....not to be an app centric tablet although it does a good job at that.  At first I found a few tap sensitivity issues but after a few days I was able to tap without issue.  My only gripe os the position of the power button which causes it to accidentally get pressed.  Just rotate it upside down and that fixes the issue.  Any other limitations are more Android faults than anything.I love it and wouldn't go back.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars80% of the iPad for 30% of the price,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;rndmprsn "rndmprsn"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Kindle Fire for about 3 days now and I guess you can say that I'm still in the honeymoon period, with this thing one can never be bored, you can stay informed, be connected and yes it might make you smarter too. I think Amazon has a big hit on it's hand with this little tablet that could...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWonderful.,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Julie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am not tech savvy, don't have either an e-reader or another tablet, but having been wanting an affordable tablet for months now, so the Fire is perfect for me.  I am very tired of hoisting my laptop and bag over my shoulder to go down to Starbucks for some relaxing web-browsing away from the furkids on the weekends.  The 7 inch Fire goes right into my purse and it is very easy to handle in a sitting position.  I use the landscape view, so the power button was never an issue for me.  Don't need the memory card, can't possibly read 1,000 books in my lifetime (I'm 53), so that isn't an issue either.No children, so no worries abt the password or privacy issues.  Dogs cannot use a credit card, another plus of four-legged creatures.I hate retail shopping and do alot of buying over Amazon whenever I can.  For example, I buy my dogs all their bullysticks and dental chews from Amazon, it's much cheaper.  Already a prime member so it's a no-brainer to get a Fire.I fly only 2-3 times a year, but now when I leave for x-mas, I will download a video the day before and have it for the flight.  Also my new Stepen King novel.  Will read and watch a few movies while at my mom's house, where there is no internet...just hop down to the coffee shop and download a few more if I run out.  Regarding the airlines, to me it's no biggie to rent...the airlines charge you 5 bucks to watch one of their mediocre movies on their inflight tablets, so I come out ahead any way you look at it.  And I won't do it often enough that it will become an expensive habit.The picture is beautiful.  I'm using the cream background, larger margin and font on the e-reader, and am having no problems with eyestrain, but I only read a few pages at night before I go to bed.This device may not be for customers who demand marathon and varied use from their tablet, but for the casual user, as a source of entertainment, it can't be beat.Halleluia, or however you spell it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA great tablet,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Spinning Fox "EC"(NYC)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It's a fully functional tablet.Book Reader: ExcellentBrowser: Reasonably fastVideo: Some glitches viewing amazon instant video; however Hulu+ is fast and smooth.Audio: Good; Speaker could be better.Battery life: Reasonable.Other: Missing bluetooth support; some gesture control similar to iPad will be nice too.Overall I like it a lot; time to shop for a cover.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStop complaining, this thing is awesome...,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Hollis87-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Look, I have never had a iPad, or tablet, I got this as a gift for a 10 year old, and I opened it last night to set it up for him.  I played and played with it and I think it is pretty cool.The color is great, the sound is great, apps all work wonderfully, games are fantastic, video looks vivid and clear, comic books rock out at you too.I mean for $200 bucks what do people want?  My grandson is gonna be a happy kid on Christmas morning, now maybe I can pry my iPhone out of his hands!Things I'd change if I was the Amazon God...I would put credit card controls on it, I loaded an account for him with a $75 dollar gift card, but still needed to use a credit card to get it working, I just used one that expires in December.When I turned it on it began the free month of Amazon Prime, but I'm going to call and see if they can begin it after Christmas.A slot for an SD memory card would be cool, as would a camera... but again, I feel like I got more than I paid for already.It is a fun little gadget.  Just play with it America and stop complaining!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Crimsonsnow(NY)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been playing with my Fire(nicknamed Sparky :) ) for a few days now and I just love it. For $199 you get a lot of bang for your buck. There are a few kinks here and there but it IS the 1st gen of this product. I haven't had any problems with the responsiveness of the screen. Streaming movies is a breeze and I love listening to the radio from the app I got in the App store. I love the cloud storage. I don't really see a problem with it being wi-fi only. With movies and music, just download what you want to take with you when you aren't near a wi-fi hotspot, then remove it when you get back if you choose to. Removing things is super easy. I look forward to updates and more apps in the future. Don't hesitate to buy the Kindle Fire, you won't be disappointed.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent for what it was intended for,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;J. Cleary-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Let me start this by saying the people comparing this to an iPad are either here for the sole purpose of talking up their iPad, or are just misunderstanding the intended audience of the Kindle Fire.Ignoring the price point would be silly, as the price point should give some indication as to what to expect from the Fire. It is NOT a full blown tablet, nor do I believe it was intended to be. This is clearly a e-reader/tablet hybrid designed to mix a little bit of both worlds for a funcational tablet to serve the masses.People are also complaining about things that with a little bit of reading they would have realized a lot sooner. The product clearly states it is wi-fi only. So that fact you are putting 'OMG NO 3G' as a con and acting surprised either leads me to believe you are here to just talk down on the Kindle, or you lack the intelligence to actually read product specifications before making a purchase.With that rant out of there, here are my thoughts on the Kindle Fire:Pros:Display is clear and crisp. I thoroughly enjoy watching videos on this device. It's just the right size to make it practical when traveling and moving about without being awkward.The build design and quality of the build is great. A lot of people have complained about the button being on the bottom and accidentally hitting it. This has not been a problem for me, as I am aware the button is on the bottom and thus I do not hit it, even accidentally.The OS is responsive and fast. Sure there are some occasional hiccups, but this stuff will get ironed out as more updates are released. It's current state is fully operable for me and I have not had any problems with the functions of the OS.Because the screen is so crips and clear, it makes reading on it quite pleasant. Sure, reading on bright white background with black text could certainly irritate your eyes after a while. Fortunately you can adjust the background and text color. I personally like the black w/ white text. I have read for an extended period without eye strain. The beige is also nice and quite comforting. It looks like you are reading paper, albeit illuminated paper.Cons:This isn't a problem for me, because I quickly found instructions online to enable sideloading of apps, and if you are saavy enough you can root the Kindle Fire and get native Google apps functionin on the Kindle (Gmail, etc.) But it would be nice if the Kindle Fire supported more apps or worked with Google on getting support in for their native apps on this device. Not everyone is fluent with technology and may not be comfortable with sideloading apps and certainly not rooting their device.External volume rocker or buttons would be nice.HDMI port would be nice.All things considered (price, target audience, etc) I don't really have any other issues with the Fire, and adding in things like a HDMI port or GPS would increase build costs which would then force Amazon to raise the price. Would I pay $50 more if it had the above features? Probably. But some wouldn't. Amazon is just about losing money on the Fire as is (banking on Fire users investing in Amazon Prime, etc. to make up the dollars).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe "beach cruiser" of Tablets,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Bryan M. Weiss(Sherman Oaks, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have now had my Kindle Fire for a week and am ready to post a review, specifically addressing the "iPad vs. Fire" debate.  I have titled my review as the "beach cruiser" of tablets for this reason:  Suppose you have two bikes in your garage - a 21 speed road bike with all the bells and whistles and a single speed beach cruiser with thick heavy tires.  The iPad is the 21 speed road bike; the Fire is the beach cruiser.  Sometimes you want to take a 50 mile bike ride in the countryside, so you hop on the 21 speed road bike.  Other times you just want to ride around the corner to the market to pick up a loaf of bread and a gallon of milk - the beach cruiser is perfect for that.  Could you use the road bike for that short trip?  Sure, but that's alot of firepower for a loaf of bread.  Could you use the beach cruiser for the 50 mile ride?  Perhaps, but it would not be much fun.  Thus, both bikes come in handy for their respective strengths.Being the owner of both an iPad and now a Kindle Fire, that's how I view these devices.  The Fire does not have 3G, bluetooth, camera, microphone, a 10" screen, and many other features of the iPad.  But, there are times when none of those features matter and all you want to do is be able to take a small device with you somewhere, read a book, listen to music, check a website or two, and send a few e-mails - the Fire is perfect for those occasions.  Bigger than a smartphone, smaller than an iPad.With that in mind, and given the price tag of the Kindle, this is an amazing device.  Especially if you are already  embedded with Amazon (as I am) for most of your online purchases.  The ability to instantly download content is wonderful.  The Cloud storage and ability to download to device on demand is fantastic.  The screen is vibrant (ironically, the e-reader Kindles are actually better suited for pure reading than is the Fire because of the Fire's bright screen).  There are some shortcomings - no hard volume control on the device, very limited apps (no CNN app, no Band of America App, no USA Today app, etc.), weird "carousel" home screen which puts everything you ever accessed on the carousel in the order of access without user's ability to modify, limited photo use and seemingly no ability to customize screens.  But again, if you just want to jump on a beach cruiser to have a fun drive around the corner to get a cup of coffee, this is great.  If you are looking to work on spreadsheets, manipulate photos, or do anything that requires a large screen, grab the iPad instead.Post-script:  I think its funny that when the iPad first came out, these kinds of comparisons were between the iPad and a notebook computer.  Now the iPad has become the standard-bearer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPlayed with it for a while...,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Teach142 "Teach142"(Torrance, Ca)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Here goes...  I was an early adapter of the original Kindle.  I have owned all the versions of Kindle. I also own an iPad, iPod Touch, and an iPhone.  Yes, I love the gadgets!I bought the Kindle Fire out of pure curiosity.  I am pleasantly pleased with my purchase.  iPad it isn't.  A minimal tablet it is...  I spent most of this past weekend getting to know the Fire.  I have downloaded many popular apps.  I have used Facebook, Twitter, Mail, and several games and magazines.  All worked well.  I downloaded some of my own music and a few of my own books.  Again, all worked well.  I watched movies on Netflix and Amazon Prime.  They streamed well.For $199 the Kindle Fire is definitely worth it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Fire is as advertised,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;G. McNeil(Spokane, WA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First, let me say I am new to the "tablet" world.  I have looked at quite a few, and decided on the Fire mainly because of Amazon (and the price).  I have been a customer for many years and this device fits my needs.  I was looking for something that would allow internet access, e-mail serivces, and a few games to pass the time on long trips.  The e-book portion was not a consideration at first, but I am impressed.  Having no experience with other e-readers I cannot evaluate how it compares.  I will say I have read 3 books on it so far, and I am hooked.  I had no eye strain or any problems with the unit.The setup was quick and painless.  It took me a while to adjust to the touch screen, and getting around, but feel like a pro at this point.  I also have an old style cellphone so this is my first experience with a touch screen as well. Once I slowed down and became a little careful with my touch, it works fine.  The only time I have issues now is when touching the screen by accident.PROS:FAST INTERNETon my home system.  A little slower but managable on other networks.  Starbucks was the worst I have found so far, but it was usable.EXCELLENT SCREEN FOR movies, videos, etc.  I am very impressed with it.  I can tell right away I will need a car charger for it, as my lovely bride has already ordered a few movies to download.A GOOD READABLE SCREEN FOR BOOKS -  I adjusted the font and background to my liking, and I can imagine many hours spent reading.  I am plesently suprised how much I like this feature.  Others have commented it does not reach the level of the current e-readers, but for me, it is perfect.IT HAS MORE APPS THAN I WILL EVER USE/NEED.  The free app every day is a cheap way to start learning what is out there.  Since this is new territory, I guess I do not know what I am missing, but there is more now than I will ever use (OK - never say never).GOOD E-MAIL SERVICE.  Another reviewer complained it does not delete mail on the server.  Go to options/fetchmail and you can set it up any way you want.  I like the way it works.  Fits my needs exactly.STREAMING VIDEO - Was not a selling point for me, but now it is.  I love it.  G3 would have been nice, but I knew going in it required a wireless connection to function.  Except when in a car, I have wireless available most places I go, so it is not an issue.  Still, G3....CONS:A LITTLE HEAVIER than I thought (I know, I know-the weight was clearly stated, but still, I'm sayin...).  It is by no means too heavy, and I have already adjusted to the weight, and don't notice it now.THE CAROUSEL - Amazon needs to fix it so I can delete or hide what shows and what does not.  I want it be be functional and usable - I like the idea of it, showing me the last few usages, but even in my short time with it, it is becoming huge with stuff I looked at, decided against, and deleted.  The stuff never goes away (so far).ONE-CLICK - Well, not an issue with me but I understand the concerns others have mentioned with no way to lock it out or require a password.  I understand that means it is no longer one-click, but the option should be there.  Also, protection when going into settings.  I could turn off wireless if a password was required to turn it back on when my granddaughter is playing with it, as I am sure she will.MEH???THE CLOUD - not sure if I am a fan or not.  It works as advertised so far.  I have no problem with storing my stuff there and downloading when I need/want it.  Just too new for me to decide about it.  I think more memory or an SD card would be nice, but so far its not an issue with me.  In fact, I still have over 6 gigs available.  I know the first movie or two will take a huge bite, but watch it, delete it from the unit and go get another, knowing it can be downloaded again whenever I want.  Given the memory restrictions, the cloud might be the answer.  Time will tell.TOUCHSCREEN -  I would like to see a means to adjust the sensitivity.  Also, sometimes it is very touchy and sometimes my hand brushs past the unit causing it to respond.  Probably user error.  Again, time will tell.  I am already better than day one.Overall, I am impressed and very happy with the unit.  I would recomend it to anyone provided they understand what it does and does not do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat little device,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;tweet(nc)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is an incredible device, especially when you consider the price.  It's fast, light and the perfect size to take along when I'm going out.Amazon has done a great job!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI knew what I was getting BEFORE I bought it- and I love it!,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Data-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just had to do a little review here just to say what I think about the Fire.  Let me say first off that this is my first ebook/tablet.  I have never owned a tablet or ebook reader before.  So I knew that I wanted something that would give me a little taste of what it would be like to own a tablet before I spent $600.00 for one.  This was the perfect opurtunity.  I researched and researched and watched viedeo review after video review about this one (The Fire) and the Nook.  I knew that it didn't have Bluetooth, or a SD slot for external memory, and that it only had 8gb of internal memory.  I also looked at what file types it supports, and the only thing that made me mad was in more than one place it said it supported epub- which it doesn't.  No problem though- I just searched for an alternative- I downloaded a program that converts the epubs- works perfectly!  The apps are fun- not a lot yet- but I knew that!  The video veiwing is fun and very good.  I just transfered the ones from my PSP over and they are only 600 x 480- still looks good on the Kindle and only 400mb per video!  I had to figure it out that they don't show up in the video file (only those downloaded from Amazon do)- which is weird, but instead they show up in the gallery app. Ok, at least I can see them, I don't care where they are on the Kindle- as long as I can find them and play them I'm happy.  So over all I really love this thing.  I like the way I can study some of my publications on it.  This is really worth the price.  Just do the research and know what your buying BEFORE you buy it and you wont have too many surprises or disappointments.  Remember- it's not an iPad...but its a little stepping stone for those wanting to get their feet wet!I just had to add one thing about the account being activated- I didn't like the fact that it let me buy anythign I wanted without a password, so I went into my amazon account and deleted my credit card info, now if it gets stolen- they wont be able to download 500.00 worht of apps and songs :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love it,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;T. Anderson "tma"(PA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ive read alot of the negative reviews before I received my kindle fire and have to admit I was a bit worried, but it must just come down to what your expectations are.I am not a techy type. I dont need to run out and get the newest and latest to come out. Ive contemplated getting a kindle for years and when I saw this upgraded version for the low price, I figured I'd give it a shot.To me, Its the perfect combination of my smart phone and my lap top. I absolutley love it, and it was so easy to figure out and start using. I had already loaded my itunes library into the cloud and couldnt believe it was all there waiting for me when I opened up my fire. I purchased a book and it was on my fire in seconds. I watched a few tv shows and a movie and was impressed by the speed of the download and happy with the quality of the picture for a 7"screen. I love that you can rent movies from amazon.Ive only had it 3 days and have only been impressed and surprised so far. I have a vacation coming up and cant wait to take my fire. it will awesome for plane flights and for sitting by the pool or the beach.A couple of observations...I was always sceptical of a kindle because I love my hardback books. I read every night in bed before I go to sleep and last night as I started reading on my fire, I loved it. so light , so clearly lit. I found myself reading twice as much as I normally do, I believe because I was so comfortable doing it.I almost purchased headphones , but realized the ones I purchased for my LG smart phone work just fine, so If you already have some, try them out before buying new.ive already recommended the fire to many of my friends and coworkers and will continue to do so.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsValue for value - meets my needs &amp; the price is right,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Missa Jim "Lover of Liberty"(Galt's Gulch (in my mind))  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire primarily for reading blogs/RSS feeds and for use when on vacation for checking e-mail &amp; things on the web.  I was looking at a tablet but didn't need the additional functionality (I have a desktop PC and if I really needed mobility, I'd get a laptop) but the price point was more than I could justify.I've used this device for a few hours now for web browsing and am very satisfied.  I think this will perfectly fit my needs.  The scrolling at times can be a bit odd (right &amp; left plus down) on some of the RSS feeds I read but I'm slowly figuring it out.  Now I can catch up on my online reading &amp; e-mails but be with my family instead of in another room on a PC.I haven't figured how to transfer pdf files to it yet but am working on it since I have some pdf's I'd like to read on this.Good luck Amazon with this, I think it is a game changer for the market niche it occupies!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Portable Media Device,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Pacman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm pretty impressed.Set Up- SimpleSystem navigation- SimpleVideo Stream Quality- Very goodMusic choice- Very goodMagazines-  Tried a few  now and all very good.I wanted a device that I could carry around with me when I am out and about while giving access to music, photos, video and web access. A device that would not cost me a fortune should I lose it or break it.  Something I could use on flights and travel. No it doesn't look as nice as Apple Products but it is by no means ugly and hey I've seen the pictures before I received it.  The Fire s compact, easy to hold, and simple to operate.I can understand some of the gripes about the lack of a physical volume control and extra storage capacity but these are not really so important to me.  My want was a small portable media device.  Kindle Fire was advertised as such and for me hits the mark and all for $200.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWhat it does, it does well,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Al "rox4jox"(United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been fooling with my Kindle Fire for a couple of days now, and confirm that it is a good implementation of a tablet design. Given the established limitations for this device, I think that it works quite well. The Kindle Fire is no Apple iPad, but it was never meant to be a direct competitor. The Fire does a great job as a book reader, has a passable Web browser, an ever-expanding App Store, and it can display videos and photos quite well. Compared to an iPad, the screen and the keyboard are small; on the other hand, the Kindle is a lot easier to hold in one hand. The screen is vibrant and bright, the sound is acceptably loud and clear, and the touch screen is quite responsive. This is tough to beat for $200, unless you have unreasonable expectations for the Fire's capabilities.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is Everything I Expected,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Eric N.(Bellevue, WA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a long-time Amazon customer, including being a Prime member, using Amazon Cloud Player for my music, and occassionally using  Amazon Instant Video.  I pre-ordered the Fire on the day it was announced and eagerly awaited its release.I've owned a Motorola Xoom for several months (it was a corporate gift, I don't think I would have paid full price for one), and I found it to be a decent but not great device.  Despite the quality hardware, I often found myself turning it on and then not knowing what I should do on it.  The problem was a lack of content.  There was basically a web browser, a motley collection of Android apps, and little else.  I mostly used it for browsing the web and checking email from my couch.  I never used the camera or GPS (using a 10.1 inch tablet to navigate in a car is an unusual use case), and there wasn't even Netflix support until very recently.With the Kindle Fire however, the entire thing is designed around content.  When I use it, I almost feel overcome with ADD.  Should I listen to my uploaded music on the Cloud Player?  Should I watch a movie on Netflix?  Should I play some games, read a magazine, open a book, power up Pandora, check Facebook, watch some TV shows on Amazon Instant Video, do some shopping?This thing isn't "magical".  It's not running on quad-core processors.  This is the tablet for the rest us.  It simply works.  With a clean and refined interface, it's built around the idea that people don't need a tablet for the tablet's sake.  It focuses the owner on all of the activities you should be able to enjoy from the comfort of your couch or bed, with no hassles or extravagant costs.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is fabulous!,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;PamelaD(USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I preordered two Kindle Fires, got them and within 5 minutes was up and running on both.  They both work perfectly.  After having a Kindle 2US for a couple of years, which I love, I didn't really realize how wonderful it would be to have color.  Immediately ordered some art books and the color is truly unbelievable.  The reading experience is great!  I've downloaded apps without a problem - easy as pie - and playing them is both a visual and auditory experience.  I've watched some of the movies streaming from Amazon and the picture and sound is wonderful.  I have had absolutely no problems and am really enjoying every aspect of the Fire.Thank you, Amazon, for another great experience with your Kindles.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSolid Tablet, Good Price,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Robert S. "Bob"(Seattle, WA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When I opened the packaging, I was reminded of the experience of opening an iPad box. Just the unit and a charging cable, all someone would need if the interface is designed properly. Like the iPad, you can play around with it for 5 minutes and figure out how entire experience operates without an instruction manual. As soon as it booted up, it knew I was its owner and my Amazon.com account was already tied to it. It had to install an update before it could get started, whch I thought was weird since it just came out 2 days ago.The unit itself is sleek with only one button on the entire device, which is the power button. To adjust the volume while watching a movie you have to touch screen and then options to pause, adjust volume, or exit appear. The speed is pretty quick, much faster than a Nook Color. It has a soft backing which has some grip to it on smooth desktops and it's almost the exact size as a Galaxy Tab 7. The only thing I don't care for is the power cord connection to the device. It rocks back and forth when it's inserted and feels like it might snap off at any moment. Its the same size plug as an HTC Thunderbolt so some Android smartphone users can always use one of their existing chargers. The power cord is also pretty short, so it's hard to find a spot in the house where you can use the device while it's charging.The Cloud system that stores all of your digital Amazon.com purchases is nice and since the physical memory storage is so small on the Fire, I can only assume they prefer you use the Cloud service. Devices like the Nook Color and Nook Tablet utilize a microSD card, which hackers exploit to root the devices to install uncensored versions of the Android OS and Marketplace. Opting out of a microSD slot means users will have to use Amazon's App Store and Marketplace, which will compensate for the money lost on each Kindle Fire sold. The downside of limited storage and reliance of the Cloud is that you'll have to choose carefully what books, movies, TV shows, music, pictures and apps you actually save to the device if for some reason you're not near a wi-fi hotspot. The good part is that wherever you have a wireless internet connection, you have access to all of your Amazon.com digital purchases.One thing about the Kindle that I'm pleasantly surprised about is the fact that you can go into settings and allow app installs from unknown sources. This is huge for developers because you can test your .apk files on the Kindle Fire before you submit them to Amazon for approval. I tested this with the app "Mosby's CEN Exam Prep" that I developed for MC Strategies for Android phones. Interestingly enough, when I spoke to someone from Amazon tech support they said the CameraRoll function won't be supported and must be removed from the coding or the app won't work. This actually didn't cause any issues on the app I tested, and CameraRoll coding is fine to use if you're using it for screenshots and not accessing a physical camera, since the Fire doesn't have one.Even though the Kindle Fire is very much a limited system and you can only download apps that have been approved by them, the fact that you can install your own .apk files shows their not totally closed off. A device such as the Nook Color doesn't even understand what an .apk file is even though it too, runs on Android. For $200 it's a solid eReader that comes with plenty of extras. People have a tendency to try to compare it to an iPad, which it is not. A $200 tablet made for accessing your Amazon.com media is not going to be able to compete with a $500 device that some people use as a laptop replacement. However, for what it is, the Amazon Kindle Fire is well worth the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy son loves it,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Matthew C. Fraley "65MustangFan"(West Liberty, KY)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought one of these at Wal-Mart for my son's birthday.  He had used my wifes iPad a little and actually wanted one of those.  But, I thought I would take a chance on the Kindle Fire as it sounded good for the price.  All I can say it that I was wrong.  It was great.  My son downloaded a free book and read a few chapters, he downloaded a few games (some free) and really enjoyed those and has been able to use it to find things on the internet.  He has not put it down at all.This unit looks really nice.  The screen is clear and looks great.  The touch screen is responsive and works very well.And being able to keep items in the cloud for later use is a nice feature.Only isssue so far is that everything on my Amazon account, that cloud thing, shows up on my sons device.  It may no be installed but it still shows there.  I am looking to see if there is a way to limit what items the device can see from the cloud.Overall, I would say that this is a pretty nice item.  Cannot say anything bad and the fact it was only $199 makes this even better.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsHeats up, hangs all the time,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Amit-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Within 5 minutes of installing the updates, the rear bottom half of the Kindle heated up badly. It wasn't just uncomfortably hot, my palm felt burnt. I actually had to put ice on my hand. This seems unusual. I am sure this unit is faulty and not all Kindles will have this problem. That can't possibly be right. Either way, I am surely returning this one. Don't want to get burnt again.I used it for a couple of days after that and the gaming apps crashed very frequently. Touch sensitivity is pretty bad as well. Extremely disappointed.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm in love..... with my Kindle Fire,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;N. Brett "DarlingNikiWyre"(Clearwater, Florida)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am absolutely in love with this guy.  I have a Generation 1 Kindle, a Generation 2 Kindle, a Kindle DX, and now a Kindle Fire.  I even own an off brand eReader that I got because of lighted screen for reading in dark.  The Kindle Fire takes all the features I love from all of these items plus my iTouch and puts it in one device.I am disabled and spend most of my time either in bed or in a recliner.  This little guy works faster and better than my netbook plus is about 4 times lighter.  I was able to hook up to amazon, facebook, twitter, yahoo email, gmail, hulu, netflix, google + and messenger within minutes of starting it up.  The touchscreen and touch keyboard was a big improvement on those tiny buttons that I couldn't push with my swollen and painful hands.  If I can use the touch keyboard with crooked and swollen fingers, any one can!If you turn off the wireless when not needed it almost doubles the battery life.  I left mine on yesterday during my first day and got about 7 hours of usage and reading before it beeped to tell me the battery was getting low.Another new feature is the notifications.  You can pick different sounds for the notifications.  For instance, yesterday I was not expecting it to chirp when someone commented on my Facebook status but it did!There are so many cool apps available for it.  I could probably play with it for weeks and still not learn all the bells &amp; whistles.  Love the cloud player / storage!ereaderlove.comHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsdevice is everything I need.,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Timothy Driskell-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't understand all the poor reviews just after one day. This is everything that our household needs and will be purchasing more for the kids for Christmas. It amazes me is how prissy some of the reviewers are, so bad I wonder what kind of people they are in person and how legit the review really are. Even the Apple products are constantly updating the OS to get all the bugs worked out. I personally Can't find anything worth docking a single star, Yes there could be improvement but FFS its $199.00 that is a drop in the bucket for tablet and to get 99% of that I need it to do before the first update I can do nothing but smile with glee. Its fast, easy to use and can't wait to start reading from it like its original purpose. So all in all keep in mind that you are purchasing a KINDLE that ALSO has the functions of a tablet not a tablet that can reads like a Kindle, tho it almost nailed the tablet side.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTotally Satisfied!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Lo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am going to make this review short and simple:I now have had my Kindle Fire for about 4 hours and I must say I am very impressed.  I also own an IPAD and also the ASUS E SLIDER.  I enjoy my Asus E Slider much better than my IPAD however, of course the Kindle Fire is no IPAD wasn't made to be, but I am very impressed and have starting downloading books and aps with no PROBLEMS AT ALL.  I love my new Kindle Fire and will buy 2 more for Christmas Gifts for my teen and adult child.This was worth the money and MORE! Highly RECOMMENDED...........Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Pleased,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Glenn E. Graham "Glenn Earl"(Pflugerville, TX USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't know why everyone wants to compare it to an iPad? iPads are $300 more! So I will not.Slick and easy to use. The interface took only minutes to learn and the apps I have used ran super. Browsing is fast and books look great. I am hard pressed to say anything I did not like about  my Kindle Fire. I really like mine and I'm very happy with it.Still Loving it. Been using it non-stop. Don't agree with the negative posts accept for the external volume button. Everything else is fine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFantastic,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;James Beswick "In my day, we had 9 planets."(Austin, TX)  -See all my reviews(TOP 1000 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kudos to Amazon for producing what's basically the first affordable, stable Android tablet. The design has fixed some of the clunkiness of the Android user interface, leaving users to enjoy what is a very fast and easy-to-use machine.Other reviewers have covered the technical specs admirably so I won't repeat them here. The key thing is that once you start using the Kindle Fire, you'll use it all the time. Whether you're on the sofa, reading in bed or waiting in line, the Kindle Fire becomes as essential as your wallet. And at $200, this is cheap enough to own a couple per household.If you're new to the whole tablet experience, you'll be astonished from the moment you get the machine out of the box. It's beautiful, elegant and simple. Get one today!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLooks great, works great, is great!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Michele M Siedenburg(Wyoming)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for a few days now.  At first it was kind of like getting a new phone.  I put on my favorite apps.  Added my favorite games. Added my favorite books.  I started playing with the music feature yesterday.  The sound quality is really nice.  I am impressed! I had a few free albums in my "cloud" and nothing on the Fire.  Music played flawlessly.  I decided to upgrade for $20.00 for the year to add the extra cloud space.  By adding this space, I was able to put my music in the cloud for free.  The uploading was not quick.  I have about 4000 songs on one computer and I still have not started on my other computer yet.  The music plays flawlessly and I don't have to have it on my Fire.  This is PERFECT.  I really want to have access to all my music, but I have never really wanted to sort through everything I have in order to select the small amount I could place on my phone, or tablet or IPAD.  I am thrilled.  My books, my music and my games.  I am happy.  (I didn't need another IPAD... I didn't need another laptop... I didn't need another camera, I didn't need to drain my phone so I can't make a phone call.) As I said:  PERFECT.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGREAT PRODUCT!!!! I'd take the FIre over the iPad any day!!!!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;cboyd-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought two of these for our kids for Christmas. Received them yesterday, and LOVE them. I was worried about being disappointed because we were hoping for a kid friendly, budget friendly iPad alternative. Then, I was reading reviews yesterday, and some tech sites were saying that the Fire is NOT a true tablet, and it shouldn't be compared to the iPad. Some said that the browser was 3x slower than the iPad browser. I was beginning to think we had made a mistake pre-ordering these. THEN, we took them out of the box, and I am VERY impressed!!! The screen size is PERFECT with great picture quality. The browser is just as fast as the laptop I'm typing on right now. The Amazon App Store has all of the apps my kids play on my phone. The Netflix app works great with even a FAIR wifi connection. The books are going to be wonderful for them, and our local library rents ebooks now (yay). My kids will be able to read, play games, research internet topics, facebook, listen to pandora, and their own music, and watch movies. Also, the cloud is fabulous!!!I can't think of anything that they would want or need it to do that it doesn't!!!!! I, personally, think it is crazy to spend an extra $300+ to get the iPad just to get a bigger screen (also makes it much heavier, not good for kids), GPS, and a camera. I guess if you have it to spend it's not a big deal for you.I'm not a real techy person, but I am a mother of 2 (9yo and 4yo). So, I can tell you that I am VERY PLEASED WITH THE FIRE!!!! I recommend it to any parent wanting something to entertain their children AND aid them with school work.WAY TO GO AMAZON!!! THANK YOU THANK YOU THANK YOU!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsQuick &amp; snappy - really, really nice!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;baquila-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a web developer so computers are a 7 day a week thing for me. I've been dying for a tablet for a while now, but didn't want to fork out $600. When the Fire came along at $200, I was excited, but leery. I thought the iPad was a bit sluggish when surfing websites (the gray checkerboard when scrolling? Seriously?) so I was a bit concerned the Fire would be sluggish. Not at all! It's incredibly snappy. The screen isn't the highest resolution screen ever, but it's solid. The device feels a bit heavy but solid in your hands. And the Kindle reader, the web browser, and its linking ability with Amazon seem flawless to me. I'm really incredibly pleased - pleasantly surprised - especially for $200. Typing is fantastically easy. The 7" screen is a great size for reaching all the keys. When I would try typing on the iPad, it was harder reaching all of the keys if you had it in panoramic view instead of vertical. The 7" screen is perfect for that. It's also very comfortable when you're laying down reading - which is exactly the point!I'm extremely happy with this device and I would highly recommend it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Device for a 1st Generation Tablet,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Joseph-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been an Amazon customer for many years and as a disclaimer I live in two ecosystems.  I am an avid Apple user and purchase a lot of content from the Apple iTunes Store as well as a lot of content from Amazon and their cloud services.  As such I feel that I can speak on a great deal when comparing the two content ecosystems, which is really what you are buying into when you get an iPhone/iPad or a Kindle Fire.For starters the Kindle Fire is a very clean looking device.  If you had ever used a Blackberry PlayBook (and why would you have as that was a terrible product) then you will have a great sense as to how the Kindle Fire looks.  However, that is where the similarities stop.  The software driving the Fire is really the killer app.Pros:Amazon content at your fingertips:  This cannot be understated...Amazon's Kindle Fire allows you to consume Amazon content with an ease not seen prior.  Not even Apple's online store and suite of devices can compare to the ease of use and content delivery/acquisition that the Fire brings to the table.  Everything from navigating around the various book, music, video and app stores to uploading your content to Amazon's cloud music player is remarkably simple and organic feeling. When I use my Fire I feel like I have all of my Amazon content right in front of me."Android" software: The kernel might be Android but this is basically the Amazon OS.  While quirky in some areas the OS is very polished and items like the favorites board and the carousel work fantastic.  For the most part the unit is very responsive; however, it certainly could have benefitted from 1GB of RAM as opposed to the chosen 512MB.Form Factor: I owned the iPad 1 and currently own an iPad 2 and for what I want to do (i.e. read books, watch the occasional videos and browse the web) I have to say that the 7" screen is an ideal size for portability and comfort.  Is web browsing a bit awkward?  Yeah, but the tradeoff is well worth being able to easily hold the unit in one hand and read without feeling like my arm was going to fall off after 10 minutes of use.Cons:Sluggish (sometimes) Performance: Given that the Fire has a dual core processor there really should be no lag when turning pages in a book or moving from each screen, but occasionally there is.  I feel that this is more of a software optimization problem as opposed to a hardware issue and am looking forward to seeing Amazon evolve their OS.Storage: This is the single greatest weakness of the Kindle Fire.  It only has 6.54 GB of usable storage space.  Granted, Amazon allows access to an infinite amount of content from the cloud but given that I have easily a 200GB video library on Amazon Video On Demand and a 65GB music collection stored in Amazon's Cloud Music player I would love the ability to have more local access to my content when out of Wi-Fi range or when I am traveling.  I am sure this will grow with future iterations of the Kindle Fire but really, 6.54GB of usable space is not enough, even for a casual user (and I am not a casual user).Weight: This is more of a gripe than a real detriment but for a 7" tablet the weight is a little more than what I expected.  It is not heavy, as I mentioned in the Pros that it is certainly light enough not to cause strain when handling with one arm, but I would like to see Amazon put the Kindle Fire on a slight diet for the inevitable second generation machine.Overall: When you take into account all that the Kindle Fire does at the low price of $199 then this should be a no brainer so long as you are willing to use Amazon's services and utilize their cloud storage.  Even Apple fans will find a home for the Kindle Fire and Android fans...there has not been a better "Android" tablet yet.  Buy this now and you will not regret it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect tablet for *PRACTICAL* usage!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;GoldenTiger(USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just received my two ordered Kindle Fire tablets, and am quite pleased.PROS:-UI is very snappy and responsive-Size is perfect for one-handed portrait reading or two-handed landscape web browsing and typing.-Screen is extremely high quality thanks to the IPS display, with flawless viewing angles and excellent color.-Setup was dead simple: enter router/wifi settings, automatic update of software done by the Fire, then enter Amazon password and you're off!-The software integrates your content as well as Amazon's in a great, pleasant-to-use fashion.-Weight is very light.-Web browser has tabs, making browsing multiple pages with some the background easy!-Software is rock-solid stable... no crashes, errors, or glitches in around 7-8 straight hours of use today while setting it up and exploring what it has to offer.-There is already a root mod available on XDA.-1024x600 resolution has better DPI (dots per inch) than the iPad, and looks fantastic on a 7" screen.-Battery life is strong... 20% left after fully charging and having used it for about 7 and a half hours nearly straight once fully charged with mixed web browsing, gaming, and video watching through Prime streaming.CONS:-The rubberized backing is very slippery at first, but after using it for several hours now it seems to be becoming more "grippy" and not sliding from my hands. I have a case on order which hopefully will alleviate any remaining issues at that point.-Screen size is a scrap small at times for web browsing, though in general I prefer it to my 10" Asus Transformer for most tasks.-"Frustration-free" packaging requires you to tear it to open... very strange!-Audio quality from built-in speakers lacks bass; however, this is expected for a tablet, and overall the quality is better than I expected.------------Overall, I'm very impressed. I was keeping my expectations relatively low due to the somewhat mediocre previews, but I am encountering none of the quibbles they had with it. Perhaps the day-1 software update I mentioned above is partly to thank for that, but the shipping units are great.To touch on the storage "issue" people keep bringing up... in all practicality, it's not an issue at all. Considering a video encoded for these sizes of screens is about 800mb to 1gb and is 1hr 45m to two hours long, even if you're taking a round-the-world plane ride you can fit 4-5 movies, hundreds of songs, and hundreds of books all on local storage. If your plane were to have wifi access you could browse the web as well. Barring that rare circumstance, for virtually everyone else it is plenty to be able to carry that amount of content with you and access the web through your cell phone.I really can't stress enough how well Amazon's team pulled this off: the Kindle Fire user interface is extremely intuitive and well-designed. I am a programmer by trade and build my own PC's, and find it fine. A relative of mine who is a computer neophyte found it fairly easy to use, with little guidance needed from me as she played around with her Fire.The bottom line is, this thing does and performs 90-95% of what any other tablet could. Price aside, even though it's extremely inexpensive for a tablet at $200, it is a fantastic product. Sure, it lacks rarely-used features such as a "front-facing camera" for video chat, and can't hold fifty hours of video, but... truth be told, do you really need to be able to video chat off of your tablet? Do you really need to have multiple, non-stop days worth of content on your tablet to watch at one time? Considering the streaming video and the overall capability to store a few movies plus hundreds of songs plus hundreds of books plus your apps/games, I'm really having trouble thinking of a scenario you could "run out" of content other than being stranded on a desert island for a month. The Kindle Fire does everything virtually all users, with few exceptions, could want or need, and at a fraction of the price. Heck, with the current price point you could buy this tablet/reader PLUS an Asus Transformer on sale or other similar 10" tablet, all for around the same pricing as the base iPad 2 model ($499 + tax/shipping, Apple stuff rarely goes on sale).RATING: 5/5Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for a person who has never had a tablet!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Katie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm horrible at reviewing things but I'm going to give my first impression of the Kindle Fire. I find the home screen very user friendly and bright and colorful. Streaming video has done pretty well the only reason I can't say great is because our internet has been spotty here the past few days. Graphics are super clean. Web browser is pretty quick in comparison to my iPhone. Facebook mobile app is very similar to what I'm used to. One thing I thought was strange was viewing videos on facebook. You have to download the video before it will let you watch instead of stream. In some ways that is nice because the video is flawless, but it concerns me about getting tripped up with these virus videos. I haven't really tried to read on it yet because I'm too busy playing with the apps and news sites. There are plenty of decent Fire approved Android apps, many free or inexpensive. I found one news app that has all the newspaper websites from all over the country and I love that one! Just like any tablet/smartphone the keyboard can be tricky but the predictive text format is helpful and will take some getting used to. It's much better than the iphone predicted text because it will give you suggestions instead of just pick some crazy word. Battery life seems to be that similar to my iPhone so it will not last a whole day if you are playing on/reading it constantly. Buying content is easy and quick using the one-click payment method. Apps, books, video, are instantly sent to the device. I know some people are tempted to take data/files outside of the amazon realm but it seems like more trouble than it's worth. I'm a avid Amazon user and have had a Kindle 2 for the past 2 years so I already have an extensive digital library of free classics and other books I haven't gotten around to read. For a good "starter" tablet this is just perfect for me for the price. Since I don't have an iPad I can't compare any of the other features but it is half the price so that's all gravy!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFits My Needs 100%,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;J. Smith "average consumer"(AZ)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great device.  It isn't in IPad for sure, but that isn't what you are buying (and you aren't paying $500-$600).  For my needs, it is perfect: it surfs, it reads, it plays all my Amazon prime free movie content, and it has day 1 support for Conde Nast and a number of other magazines.  Great display and touch screen.  Nicely done Amazon - you made great technology affordable and accessible to the masses.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot an iPad Killer - but other Android tablets are dead,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Stephen Rawlins "EnglandGreen"(Houston, Texas USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Pre-ordered. Waited patiently. Got it. Love it. I deliberately did NOT compare it to my iPad 2, but rather to other Android tablets I have used. The Kindle Fire is head and shoulders above the other Android tablets. the Gingerbread OS is well hidden, the Amazon interface is smooth and slick, there are a few annoying things but for $199 - nothing even comes close in this price range.Recommendation? Buy it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsImpressed,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Seeker(Seattle WA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Based on my prior experience, I was expecting a CD, a book to study and many more things. Instead I was pleasantly surprised to see a device and a power cord. There was a small card explaining how to turn it on. Then the device essentially melt away in my hands. Never ever I fell in love with a device because it was so easy to start using right out of the box. I don't care whether it meets Ipad or not. But for me, it does the job, right out of the box and the size that I can hold on my hand. I was apprehensive when I preordered my first one, but after opening this one, I have already ordered one more...Good Job Amazon....Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsJust Love it!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;PatrickSG(CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Nov 16th 2011:Received my Fire just couple of hours back, and I have already fallen in love with this Chubby, Little, Hot Fire. It is little bit heavier and chubby side, but it is amazing! Very fast, very responsive...and well attractive.I previously had iPad and iPad 2, but this is much cutie! Easy use handle and easy to read books, and magazine (Zinio). I have to test PDF (I have bundle of high quality colorful books). Haven't tested the Music, Movies etc. But, my primary use is reading and I am well satisfied!Will update later when I test it more!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFirst day and still happy...,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Skip of Alabama(Alabama)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Update 11/27/2011:My wife still loves hers. I am sending mine back.Not really anything against the Fire but, except for Amazon VOD, the iPad does what I need video wise. But I just flat prefer my Kindle 2. Longer battery life., I can read it anywhere (cover with the light). Did I mention longer  battery life? Absolutely to be expected with what all the Fire can do. One thing. Some magazine subscriptions ONLY work on the Fire. Some subscriptions ONLY work on IOS devices. That was a surprise.Navigation "is" a, well, trifle glitchy. I figure the Kindle Fire version 2 will be a nice piece. For me, an absolute technophile, it was still a trifle rough around the edges. But I would have kept it if  not for my Kindle 2.-------------------------------------------- (original review follows) ------------------...but tomorrow is another day, Scarlet.I can't believe there are already over 500 reviews. We JUST got ours. OK, about an our ago.First impressions. Love the fit and finish. Like the texture to the back. Makes it feel like I can hold on to the thing securely.Saw one "official" reviewer that said he didn't like the transitions during page turning (OK, I see it but it IS a 1.0 device) I figure there will be updates coming. Also, he said that he didn't like how "sluggish" movies were. Get a better wifi connection, says I. I watched the first 15 minutes of the Lost pilot without a hitch. Without a glitch.I intend to return to update my review as I go on with my new Fire (Skip's Fire - I always did have a way with words :D ).My library is all there. My music plays from the Cloud or I can download to the device.So far I am WELL and truly pleased.My wife will also be submitting her own review. But, spoiler follows: she likes hers too.Update (Yes, already):Under Help &amp; Feedback "Contact Customer Service" is a blank white screen. I guess they don't feel it will be necessary.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

13 of 17 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything it's cracked up to be - and more...,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Mark Marshall(New York)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought one of these for my sweetheart - who is the most diehard of diehard Apple fans - she uses an iMac all day long, has a Macbook and an iPhone.  But I couldn't justify spending the big $$$ on an iPad... not 'cause I don't love her - but because when I gently queried her about getting her a tablet, she was a little reticent to say she'd use it all the time.Well... I couldn't resist - I got her a Kindle Fire, and gave her this one Xmas present early.We both do webwork of one form or another all day long, so we're very computer-savvy... me more so than her.  But being savvy doesn't matter.  The Kindle Fire is simple, beautiful, more powerful than you'd expect (if you know what to expect in the first place,) and right out of the box, it worked like a charm.  I had her Kindle connected to the Wifi in less than a minute.  And less than a minute after that, she was connected to her Amazon Prime.So we went off to our workdays.  She came down for dinnertime, and asked if I wanted to play with her toy now.  :)  So I did - what a nice experience.. smooth, responsive - the sound is nice (I'm a musician and recording artist - sound matters a lot to me, and the Fire didn't disappoint,) and the video is beautifully crisp, too.  Forget the naysayers... if you're thinking about getting one - take the leap.  Seriously.So there I am playing with hers... and out it comes... she got me one too.  (YAY!)I've had it for about 36 hours now.  I've added Dropbox, Netflix, Wired, got Gmail connected... it's light, but way more robust than using my iTouch (which I would normally do when away from the desk.)  I LOVE typing on this keyboard.  The form factor of the Fire is such that, when held in landscape mode, you can type VERY nicely with your thumbs.  (I HATE - HATE trying to type anything on the iTouch... Yecch.)And just now - the "diehard Apple fan" came into the livingroom, and said... "I am LOVING my Kindle Fire... LOVING it."Me too.And for what she and I need... it's perfect.---------------------Followup one week later:Not one regret.  It's still as awesome as I thought it was when I wrote the above review.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat little tablet for my uses,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Brad Dickinson "B-Rad"(Florida)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have owned every iphone and the original ipad and ipad 2 so I am very familier with apple products and love them.  Also a huge Amazon Prime customer so I bought this little tablet and am very impressed so far.  Everything I do on the ipad the fire does in a smaller package.  It is not perfect but neither is the ipad.  For listening to music, browsing the web, playing a few games and  watching videos this thing does just as well as the ipad at a fraction of the cost and in smaller form fator that I was looking for.  This is amazons first tablet and I think it does a great job, the deivices and software will only get better with time.  Love Amazon, keep up the great service and products.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOne Word....WOW,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;E. Jones-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I will go ahead and say it, I'm an "Apple Fanboy". I own macs, iphones, ipads, apple tvs, and ipods. Love their integration together and their customer support. But enough about them! I got my Fire yesterday, opened and set it up. Then downloaded apps, tried the browser out, downloaded a book, watched netflix, listened to slacker radio, and checked out OS.For $199...I am completely Overwhelmed at the picture, sound and the performance of this device! The touch screen works great, and looks great! Not to bad on fingerprints, about the same as ipad. I was worried about the size before i got it, but i have to say that i like the size!I only Have only one complaint that i have run into, and that is the power button on the bottom. I actually hit it once while browsing the web on the browser. But it was easily fixed with the case that i bought.If you just want to enjoy the web, books, movies, magazines, music, games, do you want me to keep going her? Then just Buy you one Today!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGood for the tech. Great for the price.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;AndrewRN-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I was really exited to get this thing yesterday and all-in-all I am really pleased. I was not expecting a full fledged tablet PC, but rather an e-reader with a functional OS and immense usability, which is what I have gotten.Pros- Seems very fast and setup was a breeze. Easily connects to wifi (both personal WPA2 and office 802.1x) and reading is very comfortable.Cons- App Store does not seem very flushed out, but this will probably change with time. The interface does sometimes fail to recognize when I press "back" and can sometimes be choppy when trying to switch to and from window panes.Truthfully, I would have liked to give this a 4.5, but I don't feel it warrants a 5 just yet as this is the initial release and is of course going to be a little buggy.tl;dr: Really happy with device. Could be/likely will be better in future releases.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Fire is hot,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;R. C. Watkins "SoulMan"(Pasadena, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire is hot. I'm an iPad guy but a dedicated Kindle reader. I was expecting a.Kindle on steriods but the Fire is so much more. I love the feel, the look, and the ease of use. It is the perfect device between my iPad and iPhone. Simply awesome.  It is worth the investment.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLike it so far,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Philter-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been looking for something to replace my iPad because I am not an Apple fan, but I haven't found anything I liked as well for the same money. However, for $199 I am going to try the Kindle Fire. I've had it for about five hours now, and all of my usual apps from the iPad are set up and working well, including my email, which took about a minute to set up. The interface is intuitive as I had no problem accomplishing any of the setup tasks immediately. Like many people, I do wish it had a full size USB or a card slot, but I can live without that. One thing that is a nice surprise is the sound of the speakers. While they are by no means audiophile, they are stereo and sound pretty good considering their size. The cloud interface for music works really well. Can't wait to play with this some more!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBetter than expected,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;warder(GA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Today my Fire arrived and I'm happy to say that it beats my expectations in that it is incredibly simple to use and supports the key apps I need.I was wondering just how the Amazon interface would work but it is slick and makes my other Android tablet feel clunky. The ease of playing my music from the cloud is transparent. I love that you turn it on and it instantly has access to my media.The smaller size is better than my 10" because of the lighter weight and portability.Screen is bright and good angular visibility.I have seen a few clitches - when playing background music it can stall when starting a big app, but for the most part the OS appears solid. It did update on first run so hopefully they will push more updates out to fix the tiny glitches like that.If I could change anything, it would be to add hardware volume buttons, but the unit works amazingly well for one without any buttons! Build quality is good. It feels solid.Great value, I'm already considering another for the wife. While people say its not an iPad, Apple should be scared as this has the core iPad functionality used daily for a fraction of the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

6 of 7 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything they said it would be.....,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Paul Gifford(Southgate, MI USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire today, unexpectedly, did not realize I would get it shipped to me on the day of release. That was a big welcomed surprise.Just getting into it, but it appears to be as advertised. It's well built, a little heavier then I thought it would be, but feels good in the hand. Apps download and install quickly, the browser is awesome, and the screen resolution for video is really good too. Enough boasting about it already, I'm off to start reading 'Kill Alex Cross'!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product, Great Price!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;R. Tucker(Santa Ana, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The moment I turned this on, I knew I was going to love it. The set-up was very simple, so I was using the Fire in a matter of minutes. After many hours of using the Fire, I am very confident in telling customers that the Kindle Fire is worth purchasing. The reading was fun to use, the touch screen is very smooth, the screen is vibrant, and watching video's from Amazon was entertaining. Also, the sound was very good. Setting up my email and putting it on the favorites shelf was a breeze. The apps were easy to purchase and use. If purchasing the Kindle Fire, please purchase the Prime membership because it takes the Fire to a whole new level. I know it comes with a free month so make sure to check it out. I highly recommend this product, especially for the price, you just can't beat it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsas advertised and more!,November 26, 2011By&nbsp;G. Negin(Fort Myers, FL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought two of these, one for each of my two teenage sons.  These are pefect additions to their arsenal of iphones and home computers.  This weekend they watched multiple movies while we traveled and had internet access when needed.  The wifi and internet browser run fast and without a glitch. For the price and what it offers it is fantastic!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Content Delivery Vehicle,November 24, 2011By&nbsp;R. Guffey "Southern Rock  Addict"(Austin Texas)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)WOW.. Was going to send back after an initial review... Have not put it down since I received it... Perfect size and the content from Amazon is awesome !!  I love my iPad but damn I LOVE my Fire !!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsPleased with the First Generation Kindle Fire,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;BasicGreatGuy(Georgia)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading a lot of the reviews, it appears that many consumers did not bother to read the product description before purchasing the Kindle Fire. Amazon clearly states, that the Kindle Fire is Wi-Fi only. For those that are complaining about their purchase because the Kindle Fire does not have 3g or 4g access, the only one to blame in that regard, is the person who made the purchase, without understanding what was being purchased.As to weight, the Kindle Fire weighs less than a pound. I don't understand the ire many seem to have about the Kindle Fire being too heavy.I received my Kindle Fire on November 15th. I immediately connected to Wi-Fi at work, and the Kindle Fire proceeded to download the update on the original charge without any problems. After installing the update, I fully charged the Kindle Fire before testing it out.The screen - It is nice. I haven't had an issue with glare, as some others have. I have not spotted any screen bleeding, or any other abnormalities with the screen.The touch screen - It is not consistent, in regards to launching an app or using the device. Many times, I have had to touch the screen more than once (sometimes 2 and 3 times), to get the Kindle Fire to respond. While the aforementioned doesn't occur every time, it happens enough to be more than noticeable. I don't know if it is a software or hardware issue. If I had to put a percentage on the ongoing occurrence, it would be approximately 20 - 25%.Wi-fi - I haven't had any problems with the Kindle Fire not connecting (or staying connected) to my home or work network. I haven't experienced any(movie)buffering issues at home, but I have experienced some at work, while on lunch.Battery - Thus far, my mixed use battery life has been consistent. It has been anywhere from 6.5 hrs to 7.25 hrs. Charging time has been less than 4hrs, when charging from 15% or just under.Storage - Available use is just over 6gigs out of the box. I don't see a need to load my Kindle Fire down with a lot of my personal music files, as I make use of Pandora. I also don't purchase movies to watch on the Kindle Fire. If I do purchase a movie, I get the physical movie to watch on my plasma t.v. As such, the lack of a 16gb+ Kindle Fire device is not an issue for me.Reading - Eye strain hasn't been an issue thus far. While I still use my Kindle 3g for reading, I do find myself going to the Kindle Fire more and more.  Font display has been crisp and consistent. The lack of text to speech feature is not an issue for me, given the archaic manner of the Kindle 3g. If the Kindle Fire had the feature available and it had the voice quality of Siri, I could see myself making use of it. At this point in time, the feature or lack thereof, is merely a preference.Internet - While Silk is not blazing fast, I have noticed that it has gotten faster and faster, as it learns more about my preferred usage habits. Sometimes, pages load almost instantly, and at other times, it takes 2 - 3 seconds. In the grand scheme of things, 2 -3 seconds is not a big deal, at least for me. If a few seconds extra loading time is what some reviewers call "sluggish," then maybe their expectations are too perfect for imperfect world me. If the issue is more than a few seconds loading time, I haven't experienced what others have.Sound - Listening to music via Pandora has been more than adequate. I haven't had a need to readjust the volume to a higher level. With movies, I have found the sound quality and volume to be much less at the same level. Even with the volume turned up, it has been hard to hear many times. If I connect my Bose headphones, the sound quality and level is fine. In fact, I have had to turn the level down a few times. In my opinion, one should not have to rely on headphones, in order to make proper use of movie viewing. If you are looking to be "blown away" by the sound of the Kindle Fire, you are going to be disappointed.Keyboard - It is very responsive. I haven't had any problems with it, save my getting used to the layout, versus being use to my IPHONE.Carousel - While I don't mind the look and intent of the carousel feature, I would like to see a software update from Amazon, that gave the user the ability to turn off the feature, or the ability to categorize book, movie, and document sections of the Kindle Fire.App selection - I would like to see more app availability. Hopefully, it will increase. I haven't loaded many apps on my Kindle Fire. The ones I have loaded, have worked without any problems.Overall, I am happy with my purchase. While the Kindle Fire does have some "bugs" to work out, I think it has made a solid opening debut. I give it a B.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - First look - and Amazon Customer Service,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Michael Rothberg "Michael"(USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire exactly ONE day after the product release.  Very impressive.  Within the first 24 hours, I discovered that there was a problem with the power switch (the only moving part on the whole device.) For some unknown reason, the device sometimes would not go on, - totally unpredictable failure.  I went through all of the hoops of reset, shut down, reset ... but I could not duplicate the problem.  It was as if it had a mind of its own. I figured that I must have been doing something wrong ... but it really seems as though the design was idiot proof ... therefore I should be safe.Well, after a day or so, on Thursday, 11/17/2011, I sent an email to tech support.  Within hours I received a reply suggesting I call them at my convenience because they thought they might have to replace the unit.  On Friday, 11/18/2011, I called Amazon tech support.  I waited all of two minutes to speak to a rep.  After explaining my difficulty she told me that she was shipping a new Kindle Fire immediately.  I would have 30 days to return the old one.  She sent me a link to the shipping label, which I printed.  Today, 1 day later, I received the new device via FEDEX Saturday Delivery.  I synched my device to the cloud to save my bookmarks, and de-registered the device.  The new device appears to work perfectly.What can I say?  There will always be hardware issues now and then, and I was just unlucky enough to get the odd device that was faulty.  However, AMAZON SERVICE IS AMAZing!  How can you fault a company that responds this way.As for the device itself, I am totally enamored with it. Sure, it doesn't have a camera like the iPad, but it was a conscious decision on my part that that was not a deal-killer.  I just don't need that.  It doesn't have the memory of the iPad, but it is supported by the "cloud" if you should need memory. Accessing your books from the cloud is seamless - a slight downloading delay and that's it. 3G/4G cellular might have been nice, but there are enough WI-FI hot spots that I don't envision this being an issue.The screen on the KF is crisp, clear and vivid.  It is glossy, so I don't know what it is going to be like reading in sunlight.  I don't think that will be an issue.  The font and background of books is the same as the monochrome Kindle, and is very easy on the eyes.  Whatever Amazon did on the original Kindles has been preserved in the KF.Navigation through menus and screens will take a little while to get used to, but it seems to be intuitive enough.If I were to highlight any issue, it would be touch typing on the virtual keyboard.  I think my fingertips are just too big.  I'm getting used to it, but I have to watch to be sure I am not hitting adjacent keys.  There are a few special characters that I would include on the alpha layer of the keyboard since they are used fairly often.  The period (.) and comma (,) are the only ones there.  I would also include the slash (/), "at" sign (@), and the colon (:), since these are often used in URLs.  Thoughtfully though, if you are transitioning between different KB layers, another line appears on top of the KB with a variety of special characters.There is an auto-correction option that you can select for common typo and mispellings, but I must warn you that it is very INSISTENT.  I was typing one word and it kept forcing its interpretation (another word) on me.  I either would have had to return to the options and turn off the auto-correct function, or just find another word to say what I wished.  Most auto-correct functions allow you to backspace over the correction and your subsequent entry will be accepted.  I think there may be updates in the future, and things like this are easily correctable.I guess I could go on and on.  The bottom line is that if I were faced with the decision to buy a tablet today, again, I would do exactly what I have done.  You just have to understand your requirements, and whether another $300 for a basic iPad is really worth it. The Android operating system looks like it is gaining very substantial industry acceptance, and is likely to be a serious contender in eating into Apples market share.  That means that more and more apps will be developed for the Kindle Fire in the very near future.One note, and I admit I am blowing my own horn:  When I bought my Kindle 3G/WiFI a few months ago (lost it), I played with the "experimental browser."  I wrote at that time that Amazon really needed a touch screen because the browser was just impossible to use with the 5-way navigation button.  I am not that conceited that I would suggest that they listened to me ... but it does please me that they came to the same conclusion that I did.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNot Your Granddaddy's Kindle,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;George Angus "Tumblemoose"(Palmer, Alaska)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've owned a Kindle for a couple of years now. I love it. I have since it first arrived and though I love my paper books and my full bookcase, most of my book reading has been on the Kindle over the past year or so. So, when I went to Amazon a few weeks back and saw the Kindle Fire announcement, I was pretty stoked.Now, I'm not a gotta-have-the-newest-tech kind of guy. Didn't get an iPhone until last year. (and you'll only get it from me when you pry it from my cold, dead hands) And even though I love the concept of the iPad and all things Apple, I just can't imagine what I would use it for so I am iPadless. When I saw the Kindle Fire, I though, "Wow. That's cool." But I didn't think I'd get one. After spending some time researching the Fire and all of its features, I decided to make the leap and ordered one.It just arrived and here are my initial thoughts:First, it shipped and arrived from Amazon about a week before they said it would. Super Saver shipping was free and it took less than 4 days for it to arrive in my mail box - here in Alaska, no less.I opened the box. It contained: 1 Kindle Fire device. 1 charging cord. 1 playing-card sized with quick start instructions. Huh. Simplicity in its purest form.I knew I had to register the thing so I anticipated a lengthy process involving passwords and possibly a call or email to tech support. Well, Amazon came though yet again (like they always seem to do for me). I hit the "on" button and it fired up, automatically downloaded the latest software and registered the Fire to my account. Bam! I didn't have to do a danged thing. Off to a good start, me thinks.Amazon PrimeIt's important to take a moment to talk about Amazon Prime. One of the features and a big selling point is the inclusion of a free one month Amazon Prime membership with your Kindle Fire purchase. Your free month starts automatically, as soon as you fire up your Fire for the first time. When your free month is up, the annual fee is $79 if you choose to continue.Amazon Prime benefits include:Access to over 10,000 TV shows and moviesFree 2 day shipping for all your Amazon purchasesAccess to the Kindle Owner's Lending Library10,000 TV Shows and MoviesI have to admit that this was one of the reasons I bought the Fire. I've already spent a lot of time looking at what's available. If you're looking for first run, current movies as part of your Amazon Prime membership then you will likely be a bit disappointed. If quirky, sometimes classic, sometimes "B" movies are your thing then you are going to feel right at home. Sample titles: A Clockwork Orange, Time Bandits, Gentlemen Prefer Blondes. The TV shows are every bit as eclectic as well: Lost, Gilligan's Island, 24, The Wonder Years.Before you purchase the Fire, go to Amazon and you can look at and search for virtually all of the Amazon Prime titles.Free 2 Day ShippingA no brainer, really. No price minimum like there is with Super-Saver shipping.Kindle Owner's Lending LibraryEvery month, you can download and read one free Kindle book. There are lots of titles available and quite a few of them are best sellers.Okay, on to the rest of the review.The first real test happened within a few hours of registering. My 8 year old daughter (who was more excited than I was about getting this, I think) got home from school and immediately wanted to download a movie. I went to the video section for her and she took it from there. She started streaming "The Iron Giant" all on her own with *zero* help from me.Here is how the videos work: Amazon Prime titles are streamed. This means you have to be connected to a wireless source. Amazon Prime titles cannot be downloaded to watch later. You have to stream them. This differs from the other movies and tv shows available for rent or purchase on Amazon in that those things that you rent or purchase can be streamed from the cloud or downloaded to the device for future viewing. Being able to download  to the device is kind of a big deal for those of us who have kind of a sucky internet provider plan that sticks it to you for usage overages. being one of those unfortunate souls, I plan to use the "free" wireless at coffee shops and such to download any purchased movies and otherwise occasionally stream an Amazon Prime show. Along these lines (and it is not a criticism of the Fire), it would be nice to know how much data a particular movie or TV show is prior to downloading or streaming. Thus far, I can't figure out how to figure that out.The ReaderTruly, the thing I will use the Fire for the most is as an e-reader. I have a bunch of Kindle books already and like I said, it is how I read most of my books these days. The Kindle Fire kicks all previous versions to the curb. Big time.When you go to the Books tab, all of your Kindle titles are there. Now, they are all in the cloud, so they are not in your device yet. If there is a title you want to read, you have to tap on the cover and it will then download to your device. Also, with the Whisper-Synch technology, the book will be synched to the last page read, even if you started the title on your earlier Kindle.There are a lot of improvements of previous Kindle devices. The most significant improvement is the ease of use in terms of changing the font size and such. Tap the screen and the menu is right there. Change font size, typeface and the background color. You can customize your reading experience and ain't that grand.One of the things I'll have to get used to is the screen. Much like an iPhone, there is a definite glare. It hasn't affected my reading experience yet, but I need to try it under different light conditions.In GeneralThe touch screen works pretty well, but it doesn't tend to work as smoothly as the iPhone.I would like to see a scroll bar. There isn't one and I'm used to having it.Even when you put the Fire in "sleep" mode, it appears the battery drains and I haven't figured out if it still stays connected to the wireless in sleep mode.You can load videos, music and pictures from your PC to the Fire using a micro-USB cable.I love how you can watch or read things in wide screen just by turning the Fire sideways.I haven't had the Fire long enough to know about battery life yet. I'll probably end up posting another review after I've had it a month or so. This also goes for the web function. I'll play with it and let you know.FinallyI'm pretty happy with the Kindle Fire so far. For 200 bucks I think it's a good deal. Also, my sense is that I will sign up for the Amazon Prime once my free trial is done.If you have been on the fence about getting the Kindle Fire, I hope this helps.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWhy are there any bad reviews ?,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Ms Lulubelle "Lulubelle"(Maryland)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Yes, if you compare it to a I-Pad, I'm sure it comes up a little short.  But, I didn't want an I pad, I just wanted an upgraded Kindle.  And if that's what you want, it's super-great.The wireless connection is not slow, and once you learn the interface, what's the problem ?The 3 things I wanted to do with this device is read a book, see a movie, and surf the web, and it does all of those things just fine.The only scary thing is the lack of security.  Hoping that Amazon does something about that soon.  I'll be really nervous every time I bring the Fire out of the house.Gotta tell you, though, the UPS guy threw the box in the back yard where my dogs got ahold of it.  By the time I found it, they had already downloaded "Marley and Me' and surfed LOLCATZ.See?  Sturdy and easy to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsChanged my life overnight,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey D. Davis-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a developer, and yet new to the smartphone/tablet phenomenon. The reason? Price.Now there is finally a device where the value justifies the price! Over the last two days I have downloaded 40 or so apps and can do just about everything I use my computer for (except work!). I can track everything I do (calorie counter, exercise, car maintenance, emails, IMs, yes even fruit ninja!). Access my office email at home while I am eating breakfast. Listen to npr, listen to my music. I can read my books anywhere, at any time. I can even read them at night with the lights out!I am very, very, very happy with this purchase. I love the alarm clock extreme. Suddenly I can get up in the morning because there is an alarm smart enough to make me get up. Then I turn on the local radio app and tune to npr. I carry around the kindle with me (in my pocket!!!) while I go through my morning routine.My wife is happy because now we have a truly portable radio/music player. The speakers are just the right loudness and quality.I can read the news in the morning while I am waking up. Like the title says, changed my life.My one complaint is that the touch screen is a little hit or miss. It's like it sometimes just doesn't notice that you touched it. I find that it works well, you just have to be patient and touch *slowly.*This doesn't bother me. As a developer I am used to working with things that aren't quite perfect, but that is how I would describe the touchscreen. Very nice. Beautiful, actually. But the touch is not quite there.I am glad to deal with that slight annoyance to have a tablet that does everything I want (and more than I ever expected!) for $199. Way to go Amazon!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

15 of 20 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat product, but open door for unauthorized purchases,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;T Ponder "avid reader"(St.Louis, MO USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Most of the reviews have done a good job detailing the new Kindle Fire, but the BIGGEST issue I have with the product is that my kids can purchase any book, movie or music without authorization.  This is totally crazy.  Plop this device into "juniors" lap and he could be watching someone being cut to pieces or some nude seen in two seconds.  Not to mention accidental purchases.iPads, iPods and iPhones require the appleID password for a reason!I'm a big Kindle user. My family owns 5 of the monochrome devices, but the Kindle Fire is too open door.Please don't make this a discussion on parenting.  This is a technical issue.  Purchases should be authorized.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (21)

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsBest value in mobile computing,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;D. Brady(Dallas, TX)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my Fire this afternoon. When I first received it and got it running I have to say I was a little disappointed. As someone who has had iOS devices since the original iPhone, I thought the UI was lackluster and the performance spotty. After spending 6 hours on it though, my thoughts have changed. This is a great device for someone that doesn't want to take out a mortgage for a tablet.Pros:PriceEase of useCover-flow style of the home screenBattery life (I've used mine off and on for 6 hours and have 60% left)Cloud syncing is really, really simple and quick, I found myself not even noticing when something was on the cloud or on the deviceCons:My biggest complaint is the lack of apps, but with enough units being sold that will change quicklyLack of featuresNo physical home buttonNo physical volume controlsI can't give it 5 stars because of some major physical issues with the device. I hate that there are no volume buttons or home button. This is a great tablet for anyone that is looking for a simple, easy to use, and most importantly affordable alternative to the iPad. I love it so far, and I'm confident most people who buy it will love it too.Found myself accidentally hitting the power/sleep button on more than one occasion, the device seems like it should be flippedNo expandable memory, but that's a much more minor complaint than anticipated. The cloud is a great resource to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAbsolutely love it!!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;britt2289-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is wonderful!  I got it this morning and have nothing but great things to say about it. The touchscreen is very responsive, unlike most other tablets, tons of apps to choose from. Its very fast as well. This was a great buy! Excellent price too, I would have expected to pay a lot more for this, especially with the ipad being priced at $500. Great product, love it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStop the hate!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;C. Chapman "hammockbrain"(Waldorf, MD)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Everyone of you who bought this knew it wouldn't have a camera, bluetooth, yada yada yada. It's a simple tablet, period. Granted, I've only had it for 5 hours, but have played a little angry birds, watched a little netflix, read a few pages of a book, been on facebook, twitter, surfed the web, played some music (sounds good to me). So far, no problems. I don't consider this Ipad competition, just a great little machine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWOW!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;A. Brown "ZiggyB"(Rose Capital USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have an iPad1 and an iPad2. Had to get the Kindle Fire because its just so neat. Very compact, fast and oh so User friendly. A purchase I'm very glad I made. Amazon wins again!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOutstanding!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;technonaut-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I should start by saying that I'm an IT professional and write programs for mobile devices occasionally, so my expectations might be different from a normal user.  I previously tried a cheap Android device and returned it.  My viewing of a Prime instant online video was easy and looked terrific on the device.  As I write this video, I'm listening to the cackling of the kids upstairs playing Angry Birds which answers any questions I had about whether it would help entertain them.  Kids - 1, Adults - 0 :)  This device gets two thumbs up!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

8 of 10 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFits My Needs - Recommended!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;C. F. Hill "CFH"(South-Central, PA USA)  -See all my reviews(HALL OF FAME REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(TOP 10 REVIEWER)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The "Kindle Fire" is really more of a tablet than a Kindle and, that being said, will be (and has been) compared to the iPad. This comparison is really not fair to either device as they are for different user types. I have used the iPad and it does a lot of things really well, but at a much larger price. The Kindle Fire seems to be geared more to users who are interested in accessing Amazon content (Kindle, music, apps, videos, etc) and for causal use of Internet browsing (Yahoo, YouTube, etc), all for a very reasonable price. Here are my observations:Pros -+ Amazon centric device, as might be expected, and that works well for me since we are heavy Kindle users, buy most of our music and apps on Amazon, and have Amazon Prime (for "Instant Videos")+ Cloud storage gave me instant access to all of the Kindle and music content we had previously purchased+ Apps support is very good, supporting EMail, Netflix, Angry Birds, Plants vs Zombies, and all of the other "must have" apps I tried+ Display is outstanding, providing a very sharp image for videos and pictures+ Battery life is really very goodCons -- Sluggish response to some commands, most notably the "Back" button (resolved in v6.3 update)- Weight is much more than I expected- Stereo speakers are at the top of the device, so you lose the stereo functionality when rotating it to watch moviesMisc -* Kindle book support is very good, but does lack the "audio" functionality of the standard Kindle* Navigating around the device takes some getting used to, but becomes more "natural" with use* No 3G support, so must have Wi-Fi access to get on the Internet (not a "Con" since I knew this before ordering)* No SD Card slot (not a "Con" since I knew this before ordering)* No Camera (not a "Con" since I knew this before ordering)This is a great device that met my expectations since I was aware of the features it had and also what it wasn't going to do as well.Recommended, with the caveats above!CFHHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

15 of 20 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsdead in two weeks,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;T. J. Scott "senior player"(CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I didn't open my fire kindle until Thanksgiving although I pre-ordered and received about the 15th. We set it up and I noticed you had to touch the screen several times before it registered then it was not always right. I thought I would give it a chance and it improved. A few days later it would not recognise my w/f which is very strong. I called Amazon and they had me clear my Fire and start over, which worked. This morning I started to read my book and my fire would not turn on even though I knew it was fully charged. I plugged it in and it was deader than Marley. I called Amazon and they told me to wiggle the cord and wait for an hour for it to work, duh! I told them no sale, but I did try it before I boxed it up to send it back. I was going to buy one for my daughter in law but no way.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Jace-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Its exactly what I expected, simple, perfect, powerful, beautiful!!I LOVE IT!Its very responsive, very fast, and I can see myself getting heavily addicted to the massive media environment that amazon provides for it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWho needs an iPad?,April 28, 2012By&nbsp;Just In Time Book Reviews "Noah Nance"(New York, NY, USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been using my Kindle Fire for several weeks now and am completely hooked. This is one cool tablet. I was at the mall today with my friends and I had my Fire in my pocket. While waiting for a friend to come out of the store, I read a magazine article on my Kindle and bought a book for later. I thought it was quite funny that I was at the mall buying things through my Kindle.  How life has changed.The Kindle fire is an excellent deal for the following reasons:1. The cost is just right.2. The screen is sharp and big enough to read a book, magazine, or webpage--without being too big to shove into a rear pants pocket or purse.3. There is enough memory in the Kindle Fire to hold plenty of apps, songs, books, and games.4. I can use stream videos from Amazon Prime from any place I can find Wi-Fi. There are no extra connection costs since I am using easily available Wi-Fi.5. It is backlit so I can read for a while at night in bed without having lights on.6. The little tablet is plenty fast and can handle about anything I've thrown at it so far.7. I can get my email, get on facebook, and watch videos from wherever I can find a Wi-Fi signal, which is pretty much everywhere, these days.Some minor negatives:1. No camera.2. No GPS.3. No 3G or 4G.For the money, it's a great little tablet and connects you into the largest source of books, magazines, songs, and general goodies on the planet. I love to order stuff online while sitting in bed eating crackers. (Not sure why the crackers matter, but it still adds to the experience). I highly recommend a Kindle Fire for those on a budget who want a nice tablet with plenty of features.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsReturning mine,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;J Schlapper-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After having to get a replacement for the first Fire because of a black line running through it, I am returning its replacement as well. Although I have a strong wi-fi connection, the device will not keep an internet connection.(I was connected approximately 3 times in three days.)  Once connected, it was a dream! In order to get that connection, I had to: 1) shut down my lap-top.  2) Re-boot my router.  3) Hold the power button down on the Kindle for 20 seconds the turn it back on. I had to do this for each attempt at a connection. As I said, this worked 3 times.In the past week, I have spent over 2 hours on the phone with tech support. They wanted me to run the new update for Kindle but, NO INTERNET CONNECTION!  And of course the Fire does NOT come with a USB cord.  They even asked if I had a cell phone or camera USB that would fit. (wouldn't that compromise the warranty?) At any rate, they seemed to "think" if I updated my router, that could solve the problem.  Ummmm...let me see...my husband just spent $200 on the toy of my dreams, which hasn't worked since day one...and now we need to spend MORE to make it work? (when I do not have connection problems with my lap-top or iphone).For the money, a simple tablet would have done the same thing...and probably actually worked.As for my kindle experience, I think they rushed the product before it was throughly tested. I will use my credit once it's processed and either get just the reader or shop for a decent tablet in the Amazon market.  Then maybe NEXT year I'll try the Fire again, once the bugs are worked out of it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWhy are people complaining.. $200 is a deal,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Martido(Orange, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Perfect for surfing the web, checking emails, playing games.  Everything I bought if for.  Complaints I've read include... web page lags.. sometimes;... not as sensitive as an iPad... yes but still pretty good;... no external volume control... it's pretty easy to access.. and how often is it really an issue?  8BG of storage... not a problem yet.. but yes.. I wish it was atleast 16GB.Yes it is not nearly as functional as an iPad - but honestly, I didn't buy it thinking it would be.  I wanted something to check my email, surf a few web pages, and pass time playing games/watching movies (like at the airport). It does all of that.. just fine.  Smartphones do exactly the same thing... but the screens are so small...Yes this is no iPad.. it's not supposed to be.. it's $199 and Amazon doesn't charge sales tax... (Use tax laws will change.. but until then.. IRS can eat me).. iPad is $499 + 9% CA sales tax.. almost $550...  no comparison.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsHmmm. Fire?,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Thomas H. Williams "towillia"(Harvard, MA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My Kindle fire really did not work well at all. I returned it. Thanks Amazon for being so cool. I thought the interface sucked, the touchscreen was frustrating on a good day, and the content deals were kind of a ripoff. So I wil continue to buy books on my regular Kindle, which I love, but this thing is a missfire. Bigtime.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsIt doesn' work!!,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Jim K-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Besides having somewhat confusing directions and the fact that the touch screen often does not work, the most serious flaw is that the software version on my Fire would not comment to my Wi-F. It was interesting that my "old" B&W; kindle connects just fine.  It is very troubling that Amazon would send out merchandise that does not work.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE LOVE LOVE This Tablet!,November 28, 2011By&nbsp;AmazonGirl1983-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just can't say enough how much I love this tablet!  I am not a fan of Apple at all and I was so happy to see that the buzz for this Kindle Fire was so great.  So I went ahead and got it and I'm just like a kid with a new toy!  It is the perfect size, with a screen big enough that my eyes don't strain, but small enough that it fits in my purse perfectly without taking over.  It is convenient, easy to use and honestly, it's just a sexy little tablet!  Since I have Amazon Prime, I get one free book from the lending library every month and I have access to all of my music on the Amazon Cloud.  So convinient and sharp!  I highly recommend it, and do so every time I see someone catching a glimpse of it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

10 of 13 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBe fair!  It's not a tablet.  It's a Kindle with insane functionality!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Stacie L. Helsing "stacielc"(MA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First, lets be clear, it is not really a tablet, nor is it pretending to be, so people really need to be writing fair reviews.  It is a super deluxe media player, and it's insanely good at it.  The display is great.  It is light and thin and is quite fast, even when playing some games that I play on my phone that my husband's tablet could not handle.  I am thoroughly impressed.Is it missing some things I'd like?  Sure, but it's not like I did not know these things were not there when I bought it.  It fills an exact void in my travel kit and will be used on a regular basis at home too.  I don't think I will be quick to stop using my old Kindle since I will get tired reading at the rate I do using the back lit display, but for vacations, I see no reason to bring them both.Amazon did it right here.  It's a great, no phenomenal product for the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)





Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)







3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove, Love,Love it!,April 14, 2012By&nbsp;Ruth-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I already have a regular Kindle and enjoy it, but now that I have the Kindle Fire...I couldn't be happier!  I love the interactive features.  Enjoy the games, like Angry Bird, Solitaire, etc.  I did notice that the battery doesn't last a long, because of it's features and the back-light feature.  But I play or read on it 2 to 3 hrs a day and the battery is good for 3 days.  It's difficult to read outside in the daylight but I use it more in the house. *I use it to read books, whle I'm waiting in my doctor's offices (so I don't have to read magazines with germs all over them) I also have my scriptures down loaded and can use it at church without carrying my scriptures with me.  Very easy to navigate from book to book and chapters.  Would advise anyone to get one; I love mine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm in love with this thing!,April 20, 2012By&nbsp;jmca62-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am so so happy with my Kindle Fire.  It is perfect for what I use it for.  I take it to work with me to read on my breaks and I can also check my email, etc without lugging around my laptop.  It syncs very easily with all my amazon purchases. I ordered it and was happy with 2 day shipping but to my surprise it arrived the very next day. It is very user friendly. You don't need to be computer savvy to use it.  I'm very pleased. I would highly recommend it to anyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Happy!,April 20, 2012By&nbsp;Linda-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had been saving for an IPad for a couple months, but a co-worker showed me his new Kindle Fire.  Loved it!  It met all my user needs.  Once I showed my husband..he wanted to know when his Kindle Fire was being purchased.  I took a risk and bought two refurbished Kindle Fires.  No regrets.  They are like new and I purchased two for less $$ than 1 IPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Thing I Ever Bought For Myself,April 20, 2012By&nbsp;caitybug-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was looking at the Kindle Fire ad on TV and mentioned to my Mom that I would like one. She told me I ought to get one and do something for myself. I was concerned I wouldn't use it enough to warrant the purchase. Was I ever wrong!! I read more now than I ever did! I especially like the option of changing the page color and type. This is the best!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire. Period.,April 18, 2012By&nbsp;Suzanne Faunt(Chicago, IL)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My sister gave me the original Kindle when it first came out, I got one of the very first ones. I loved it, loved it, loved it. So of course, I didn't think I could ever want a new one, until, drum roll, the Kindle Fire announcement. I did wait until after the Christmas rush (I was just too busy), but I bought it right before a 2 week California vacation in January, so I could really run it through its paces.It was easy to register and access my account. I loved that I could upload all my iTunes songs to the cloud and play them on the plane &amp; beach when I got tired of reading and watching videos, which was pretty much never. The free 30 day Prime membership is such a great way to try it out, I finally got around to watching all seasons of Arrested Development which my brother had been nagging me to watch for years. Worth it. Fast video, fast access to everything. I have an EVO, so I'm familiar with the Android OS, which made this an easy learning curve.I got a Belkin case for it, so it stands easily vertical or horizontal, so I just have to swipe my finger to read a book or watch a movie. The speaker is robust for the size of this, but I use my earbuds most of the time. If you are on the fence, buy it, get it, you'll love it. It's only $199, which is such a low price for all that you get.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWorth the Money,April 17, 2012By&nbsp;Joni-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very pleased with my new Kindle Fire.  It's versatile and is handy for chatting on facebook or reading in waiting rooms or at home.  I have had no problems so far, with the exception of maybe some improvement on "auto-correct" for messaging.  It's a little bit of a pain.  Other than that, I'm very pleased.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFire is COOL!,April 15, 2012By&nbsp;HArry Palms-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle fire, it does a LOT of things, great for games, magazines, books, email, just about anything. Some functions require an internet connection, but most places I go have free WiFi. I do recommend this thing!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDifferent than ipad, should not compare,April 15, 2012By&nbsp;Varma R(Waukesha, WI USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Refurbished but fits the right profile... excellent screen but lacking volume buttons and camera and mic. But not complaining since it already mentioned.Some time the UI lags and all you need is restart, amazon video and Netflix works good. but getting back to previous screen is little inconvenient. Book reading is easy, but make sure that you dim the screen brightness as it might hurt your eyes. Wifi is good but didnot try sync features.Browser needs special mention as its not like android browser. you need to do more taps to get to required webpages. Need to side-load apps like dolphin browser. I have not tried yet. Battery life is acceptable with high brightness. Speakers can be a little louder. No Physical buttons. Even though no camera , mic should have been made available as it would be more easy for voice chat and others. No camera is also bad but not complaining at this price point. Even VGA would have been good.Browser opens full websites not some mobile only versions. And at 7inch screen and easy on weight, its very easy to hold in one hand.Need to try CM9 or side-loaded apps for more functionality.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWell spent money!!! out of the US,April 9, 2012By&nbsp;Jeff Cuentero-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am from Costa Rica, and I recently bought my Kindle Fire.It is easy to use, great for reading, wonderful resolution!I have a LOT of free e-books, in Spanish too! And kindle books are pretty cheap.However, one thing that some people may dislike: My card is not from US, therefore, I can not buy (not even the FREE ones) apps!If you like to have a tablet as a gameboy, and you are out of the US, then Kindle Fire is not a good option.If you love reading, music, videos and internet, then it is the best option you can buy!I made a lot of research, and I am truly pleased with my Fire.Tip: Buy a USB-MicroUSB cable, like the one for smartphones, it is easier to transfer videos and music you already have in your computer.By the way, I use Linux, and my Kindle works perfectly!I mention this, because I know that sometimes this aspects shows up.$199!!!  $250, at my door, in Heredia, Costa Rica, Central America. Right next to a platanilla plant.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (5)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHow did I live without this?,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;C. Turner(West Sacramento, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)All I can say is that, wow, how did I live before I got my Kindle Fire!?!? I love reading, but sometimes it's just not convenient to carry a printed book with you. With my Kindle Fire, I always have all of my books with me in one small package. I can read them at anytime, day or night, and in any place, out to breakfast, lunch, dinner, waiting on the doctor or hair stylist. It's easy to slip into the pocket of my coat, or the back pocket of my jeans and the "pages" won't get all dog-eared! I love it! I know there have been other longer reviews, but, why take hundreds of words to say what can be said in just a few, or even just five, "I LOVE MY KINDLE FIRE!"Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI Shouldn't Have Waited So Long,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;Katamb "katamb"(Utah)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I did a ton of research on tablets and e-readers before buying my Kindle Fire just to be sure the $200 was worth it because I wanted it mostly for reading and couldn't spend over $500 for an ipad. After a year of research and recommendations from people who know such things, I finally plunked down the money. I've had it for 3 weeks and love it! I love that I can read books without eyestrain on a screen, I love that no matter what book I feel like reading it's there or I can download it (especially on long airplane trips), I love having the wifi internet connection, I love playing Angry Birds on it, etc. So far I haven't found anything not to like. I'm totally pleased with this purchase as my first tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsMy First Tablet,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;W. Sherman "shermanwen"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I thought long and hard and looked at many tablets, although I did not consider an iPad because I just could not afford it.  When Amazon Warehouse had refurbished Kindle Fires on sale for $139.99, I decided to give it a try.  I actually bought three, one for myself and one for each of my daughters, 9 and 12.  So far, we are all very pleased.  They have downloaded enough apps to keep them entertained for hours.  I was able to access all my previous Kindle keyboard books immediately after powering on the Kindle Fire.Set up was simple.  I entered the password to my wireless system at home and we were connected and everything worked great.  My daughter had one issue a couple days after getting her Kindle Fire when the screen just went all white and we couldn't seem to get it powered up but the situation resolved itself and I'm glad to know we have the 1-year warranty if it happens again.Overall, these were a great purchase.  My husband, a total non-tech guy, even told me last night how much he enjoyed using a radio app on one of the Kindle Fires. These are perfect for us -- we wanted a reader, we wanted to watch some movies and we wanted internet connection and apps.  No need to spend more if this is what you're looking for.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsWOW.  What a nice little notepad.,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;GREGG-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My 6 year old has been driving us crazy to get a notepad.  He has been using them in school for educational games.  We broke down and purchased one a week ago and the whole family loves it.  Easy to use, affordable and the picture quality is terrific!  My son thinks it is a little small compared to the IPad, but overall a great product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon's Silk Browser,April 11, 2012By&nbsp;Tim "Buckaroo Bonzai"(Portland, OR)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire. Touch screen works so well. The integration of the device memory contents and the Cloud is flawless. I was concerned at first about the amount of memory, but that is a none issue when you can swap music, books, movies, etc between the Cloud and the device memory.My biggest complaint is the Amazon Silk browser. I noticed it took a very long time to download any website except Amazon's. It would take almost a minuter just to load the Google homepage. Over 5 minutes to download a New York Times Op-Ed page. I searched for another browser app and found Maxthon Browser. Google homepage loads under one second. The New York Times Op-Ed page for Maureen Dowd loads in about 3 seconds. It is also very easy to use when setting up bookmarks and bookmark folders.All in all I would recommend the Amazon Kindle Fire, just don't waste your time with the built in Silk browser. It stinks.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat Price, pretty decent tablet.,April 9, 2012By&nbsp;Nevedita "KU"(Suffern, NY)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)No. 1 - Please do not compare this tablet to the iPad or iPhone in any capacity, it's meant as a reader that is enhanced to do some of the tablet functions on the market today.2.  Handles really well.  Does the job as far as the reader, pdf documents, videos go.  Also really great HD graphics for this price range when looking at hulu plus or Netflix (provided the video is HD).3. Cannot handle the graphics of high end games that might be sold on the iPad, so no surprise there as it's not meant to really become a choice gaming product.4. Buy a stylus with the soft tip meant for this kind of touch display.  I found so many of them on ebay and my family members have even stolen it on occasion for their ipad, motorola zoom and kindles.  I told them GET YOUR OWN.  The fire is a capacitive touchscreen technology so the stylus you're looking for is the broad soft-tip type.  Not the ones that comes with gaming systems like the 3DS.5. Lastly, it lost a star because there are quirks, albeit just a few. Mine restarted on me today with 60% battery life.  I thought the tablet died on me for a second.  I'm not sure if it was a software update that I just didn't notice but it was annoying as I was in the middle of something.  Also, very rarely but it has happened, there are apps that crash.  Also there are apps you would think would be so great to get on the fire but it's unavailable for our specific tablet while available to everyone else on Google play and you have to bypass it to download outside apks.  These quirks I can live with because it was meant for me to read books in color and watch a few movies here and there, and that it does really well.Overall, impressed - but as with all technology, expect it to become a paperweight when the fire 2 comes out.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle fire,April 9, 2012By&nbsp;jlugo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire. I love to use it and am always using it. I have it constantly with me and its a great tool to read and play games on. Great product I couldnt be happier with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,April 1, 2012By&nbsp;UncleLarryN-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I saw the Kindle Fire was refurbished and decided to buy it and have not had any problems.Wireless is kind of slow but that was expected.Color is great.Love it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsawesome tablet and Ereader,April 4, 2012By&nbsp;Kayla R. Demmer(Moses lake,WA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got this as a surprise from my fiance. I didnt even know really what a kindle fire was until I looked it up. and when I finally recieved it in the mail and checked it out, I was pleasantly surprised!Pros:Love the cloud storage and the easy way to download my music from the cloud device on amazon.com. its very easy to manage what I want on my kindle and what I dont. download does take a little longer, but not too long.its easy to hold. its not too big, like the ipad and not too small that you cant enjoy movies and magazines. the nonslip backing makes it easy to grip with one hand. Its also very portable.lots of apps! some people have complained that there arent as many apps for the kindles compared to the apple store. I beg to differ. I have fruit ninja, angry birds, facebook, netflix, ect. all on my kindle. these are the same apps that you can find on the apple store and i dont think there is a shortage of amazon apps at all!The Price! this is by far the BEST of all. you get almost all the same features in the kindle as you would an ipad or ipod, at a fraction of the cost!webbrowing is pretty fast, as is the keyboard. I have trouble typing on a touchscreen keyboard, but I find this one easy to use. The speakers on it are awesome! very loud! the only thing is that I tend to accidentally cover the speakers and muffle them.the screen is brilliant! very bright, vivid and colorful. you wont be disappointed there.sooo.. the cons.No volume button! the only volume control is on the screen itself and if you need to turn it down quickly it can be bothersome to find the volume scroll on the screen. the screen, while brilliant and colorful, is extremly reflective and has an aweful glare. I cant use my kindle in the sunlight, outside ect. it doesnt come with a micro usb cord, which is needed to transfer music, pics, documents to the kindle. I wish it was included to make downloading content a little easier.All in all, its a great device! I love my kindle and, honestly, would reccomend it to anyone over an ipad!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for what I need!,April 4, 2012By&nbsp;Roman-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Everyone that has purchased the Kindle Fire has pretty much summed up the pros and the cons for this amazing unit.I purchased mine refurbished when Amazon had the $139 and as of today I do not regret it. I am an avid reader and even though many users say that it is not acceptable for reading, I have found that controlling the brightness works out for me. You may not be able to read it outside, but I am ok with that since I like to do other things when I am outside;play basketbal with my daughter, go for a walk. The apps store is decent for me since I am not big on apps and they have what I need. The size is perfect for what I need and it has come in very handy at school; especially when I can read PDF files for school.Cons? I really can't think of any. I see a bunch of people complaining of things that are very clear in the description. I know many say they wish it had 3G, but I personally do not need it. I guess it all depends on how you intend to use the Kindle Fire.It's not an Ipad and I honestly don't care; if I wanted an iPad I would have purchased one.Apple is a great company with great products, but I don't see it cost effective to spend $400-$800 on an iPad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsJust what we needed for the price we could afford.,April 4, 2012By&nbsp;SoCal Boy "SCB"(California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Main motivator for getting the Kindle Fire is to keep our our 18 month old occupied on an overseas flight to England from Los Angeles. We've been playing around with it for a few days and it's amazing. We're Apple heavy, with Macbook Pros and iPhone 4S's and we are definitely looking to an iPad once we can afford it, for the functionality that it offers.  But for the price of the Kindle, it's definitely the best tablet alternative to the iPad, if you're not looking for the specifically Apple extensions and apps.  I read the reviews about how it's limited... haven't run into a wall yet.There's also a kid app, that locks the main functions of the tablet away from your kids. You can use it as a gateway for other Apps such as Netflix, Fruit Ninja, etc. and once you try to exit out of it, it just goes back to the App's main menu. Perfect for any button mashing, touchscreen swiping 18 month old who has deleted applications, called 911 on Emergency Call mode, and discovered laptop and phone functions their parents can't get out of. You have to verify you're an adult to exit the program by either verifying your age or drawing a letter "Z".We got a refurbished unit which was on sale, one of my main concerns was battery life. No hold backs there. Charged it once and it's been running for 3 days (useage of about 2 to 3 hours each day) with about 60% of battery life left.  Just downloaded our son's favorite movies and video clips to it. I think it's going to keep him occupied all the way to England and back just fine.My recommendation, if you're comparing between the iPad and the Kindle and you're on a limited budget. If you can't think of something that is specifically iPad exclusive. Get the Kindle. My personal example of an iPad only application that I would have is using the DJay application with a DJ controller. But I already have that combination on the Macbook Pro with a backup on the iPhone. For those of you who don't even have an Apple product, you won't miss anything by going with the Kindle. In fact you'll have $300+ more dollars in your pocket to buy music, movies, apps and accessories with.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire (Reburbished),April 4, 2012By&nbsp;MaryBe-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After being a generation 1 owner for years, I decided it was time to upgrade.  (The fact that I accidentally set something heavy on my old Kindle screen by accident may have had something to do with it).  I've been using the Kindle app on my Droid but knew I needed something  a little bigger.  After extensive research and comparisons, I decided on the Fire. I ordered a refurbished model which I was a little nervous about but it turned out fine.  I have family members who have iPads which are great but I didn't want to spend that much money.  Obviously this doesn't do everything that an iPad does but between my Fire and my Droid I am covered.  I love how many books I can store on it, the internet is fast and the graphics are great.  I am beyond pleased with it.I also love that Amazon Prime comes free for a month with it.  I have Netflix but I'm pretty sure I'll sign up for Prime when the free month is up.Don't be afraid to order a refurbished Fire.  I have had no issues at all.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat,April 2, 2012By&nbsp;doradorita-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I Love my Kindle Fire. don't leave home without it. It has all the features I need in a hand held device. I can see my emails, look up details, Google, download Music.best of all I love to read and it makes it easier to download all types of books and read.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!!!!,April 2, 2012By&nbsp;Phaathit Komphonphakdy(Naples, FL 34113)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely love my new Kindle Fire for its small size, ability to hold it one hand, the clairty, &amp; its speed... Remember this is an eReader with a few plusses so don't go expecting an iPad for less money... I actually have an iPad as well and am considering selling it because the Kindle does enough for me to be satisfied with :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,April 1, 2012By&nbsp;Jeenee-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My boyfriend bought me the Kindle Fire for Christmas.  He had heard bad reviews and was skeptical about spending the $199 on it.  I begged and am so glad I did!  I love reading on it, but it is so much more than that.  I read my email, play games, check facebook, and surf my favorite shopping sites.  I also have an IPAD2, but I spend more time on my Kindle (much lighter and user friendly).  My grandkids fight over it when they are here so I may have to buy another!  One of the best gifts I have ever received!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsomg this is wonderful,March 14, 2012By&nbsp;S. Schultz "s.schultz"(usa)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just received today ove it easy to. use such great fun. So much free books and games Love it.I will use this every day...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOMG!!!!,March 31, 2012By&nbsp;MissJay-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Fantastic! My daughter came to visit me on my 58th birthday.  She was carrying this little "notebook" around...by the time she showed me just 5 minutes of the features, I made my purchase.  Now, my iPad sits on the shelf, lonely and collecting dust particles.  I even got to use Amazon credits so my final price was another treat! Love it, love it, love it!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe BEST tablet on the market!,March 29, 2012By&nbsp;Mrs. KiD-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My husband bought me the Kindle 3G Keyboard for my last birthday and as soon as I picked it up I was in love!  I found I read through books much quicker and its portability allowed for me to take it with me anywhere.  Because of my love for the Kindle 3G Keyboard, and how much I used it, he then bought me the Kindle Fire as a surprise for our anniversary.  The Kindle Fire is so amazing!  My son has an iPad so I have tinkered with it and was actually surprised that even though I really liked it, it did not offer as much as I would've expected.  On the contrary the Kindle Fire offers FAR MORE than I ever would've expected and you cannot beat the price of it for a tablet and it seems to far exceed the versatility of my sons iPad.  There are a few apps that I wish I could get on the Kindle Fire that are not yet available but I'm pretty confident they will be made available in due time.  I couldn't be happier with my Kindle Fire.  Its battery life also exceeds my expectations and seems to last longer than my son's iPad as well.  I would strongly recommend the Kindle Fire to anyone in the market for a tablet.  I take it everywhere I go and find mores useful apps daily.  It is absolutely amazing!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat product for the price,March 28, 2012By&nbsp;ArmyWife0609-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is not an iPad or Galaxy. It is more of a media tablet than a full function one - which is why Amazon can sell them for hundreds of dollars less than the other tablets. If you're looking for a tablet computer, this is probably not the device for you. If you're looking for something small enough to fit in a purse to use to read, play games, listen to music, web browse, and watch video then the Kindle Fire is just what you're looking for.Pros:-Good battery life (have had to charge it a couple times, but since I am not using it constantly, I can't tell you how long it last)-The color and sound are great for watching video. Obviously, if you're streaming from the internet, it may lag depending on how fast your internet is.-Great selection of apps (many that are free). There are apps for just about every age group. My two year old loves some of the free apps I've downloaded for him.-I really enjoy listening to music on my Fire. It's so much easier than dragging around my laptop or dealing with headphones for my MP3 player if I want to listen to music around the house.-Children's picture books - I love regular books for around the house so that my son can look at them on his own, but having them on the Fire is so convenient to occupy him in the doctor's office, while waiting on food at a restaurant, etc. There are also apps that let you read the book on your own, read with help, and have it read to you.-The internet browser is easy to use and is just as fast as the one on my laptop. You can have multiple tabs on the browser. Since the screen is fairly small, you will have to zoom and scroll around more than on the laptop/desktop.-Very user friendlyCons:-While the Kindle Fire is better for reading in low light/dark situations, I much prefer the E Ink display from the regular Kindle. Reading on the Fire is like reading on the computer screen, and the E Ink is a lot easier on the eyes.Other comments:-A lot of reviews complain about the carousel of recent items that takes up most of the screen. This doesn't bother me because the most recent apps are the ones I use the most anyway. If there's something on there that you don't want, you just tap and hold your finger there until the option menu comes up and you can remove it from teh carousel or the device. I don't really like that every book you have purchsed for the Kindle shows up in the carousel whether you've downloaded it to the device.-A lot of reviews also mentioned the lack of security. I can see how the initial security might be a problem since it comes registered to your account, but once the Kindle Fire is in your hands, you can add a password to be able to unlock the device. You can also add a password that is required to make purchases from Amazon. Just say that it's for a gift so that it's not registered to any account when you order it and initial security won't be a problem.Overall, I highly recommend the Kindle Fire. For what it is, it's a great product. It's a lot more affordable than full function tablets if you don't mind not having as many features and less storage space.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,March 24, 2012By&nbsp;Sharon Marshall "SGM"(Shelton, CT USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have a both the Nook color and tablet.  My daughter wanted the Kindle Fire for her birthday.  The fire is smaller and lighter than the Nook, The design is also sleeker.  However it is a little more complicated than the Nook.  This is our second one because the first one purchased would not stay on.  Amazon replaced it within 5 days.  I also noticed the Kindle Library books and apps cost less than the same products on B&amp;N.;  The Kindle tends to be somewhat slower than the Nook.  With all this being said my daughter loves the device. She search the web, read books, and listen to music on her Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle,March 18, 2012By&nbsp;mcrose-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Wow! I love my Kindle, just what I was looking for and does enough for me. My only complant would be I wish the battery would last longer, it's fine for smaller applications, but if you watch movies it runs down fairly fast, but all in all, this little Kindle is awesome, thank-you Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Tablet out there!,March 17, 2012By&nbsp;Alex-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)WOW! for 200$ i was not expecting a lot at all, and was completely blown away from the moment i turned it on!i have watched TONS (unlimited) movies and TV shows with 1 month free trial that starts right when you turn it on (dont have to do anything)Amazon has made a lot of software updates and they came on my Kindle so i dint have to wait for it to install.i have had no problems with WIFI or any wireless/web problems and runs internet very smoothOverall: in my opinion this is an Ipad with a kindle logo on the back, and is pocket size (which i prefer)LOVE IT would definitely buy it againHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsI Love This,March 17, 2012By&nbsp;FKava1-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I read so many mixed results before I bought my Kindle Fire.  I have to say, I am impressed with this device. I had the IPad 2 and when the new one came out yesterday, I just wanted something different.  Instead of the new IPad (which is super expensive) I bought the Fire.  The Screen is Beautiful, way clearer than my IPad 2 was.  It has all the apps I had previously and the selection of books is endless.  If you are on the fence about this devise here are all the positives:- Really like the 1 free book per month feature- The size is perfect for travel, I take the train and it fits right in my pocket- Excellent battery life- Streaming is super fast (Amazon Prime movies and Netflix)- Love the internet, its fast (Not sure why some people said it was laggy, its super quick)- It multitasks seamlessly- Love the free cloud storage- Links to wifi effortlessly- Great Sound- Light weightUpdate:Ok after my review, I decided to return the Fire a few days later and here is why - After a few days of using it, it does start to lag (esp on the internet.  While it grabbed onto my WiFi at home, at work it kept logging out of WiFi.  When that happens I had to keep putting in a password.  It became super annoying.  Finally, the screen is super reflective.  It felt like I was looking into a mirror instead of reading the book I downloaded.  I think this is a nice sized device, but its not ready for primetime.  I sent it back and bought the new IPad.  Sometimes you really do get what you pay for.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI take this with me everywhere,March 6, 2012By&nbsp;vlvwt-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I enthusiastically recommend the Kindle Fire. The lighted screen makes it easy to read anywhere in the house regardless of how poor the lighting is. It does a great job with video - you'll enjoy your free trial of Amazon Prime so much, you'll probably end up subscribing like I did. There are so many apps to choose from, that I find there is always something fun to do with my Fire. With so many wireless hotspots around, it's great for checking mail or light web surfing. I also recommend getting a capacitive stylus to use with it - it makes it much easier to type on the onscreen keyboard and to select things than using plain old fingers (plus the screen will stay cleaner).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent,March 14, 2012By&nbsp;Alison-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I will have to take a lot Literature classes for school and I didn't necessarily want to buy every single book I needed in paper back form. At the same time I wanted to be able to see the book covers in color and have apps that could be easily accessible. These reasons lead me to buy the Kindle Fire and I am absolutely happy that I did. It's very easy to use and the long battery life is wonderful! Not only can I read books and get apps, I can also check my email and browse the internet. Definitely a great buy!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle-mania!!!!,March 14, 2012By&nbsp;jerry-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love this product. Was unbelievably surprised on what this thing can do. Fast download. Easy to use. The size is perfect. Other tablets are to big and bulky. The Kindle Fire is more easier to store or fit in a pocket. Battery life is pretty good. The only downside I could see is that you cannot connect to usb port to a computer and it doesn't give you the option to add more memory. Other than that ever since my daughter received it, I found myself using it as much as she does.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat little tablet for the price.,March 13, 2012By&nbsp;Adriana D(Midwest)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My husband has an Ipad 2 that his work got him, but I didn't want to spend that much on something that was mainly for fun for me.  This turned out to be the the perfect device for me.  It works great for me as an ereader (I prefer backlit), and I can surf the web on it.  It can move a little slow at times, but nothing horrid.  I cannot stand the amazon silk browser thing that comes with it, but I downloaded the dolphin browser and that runs great. The size is perfect for taking along and feels comfortable to hold, the weight is good, etc.  I'm very impressed with what they managed to deliver at this price point.  I had not expected it to be as good as it is, and I'm very pleased with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my new Kindle.,March 12, 2012By&nbsp;Old Film Lover(Tucker, GA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My only wish is this:  I am hoping someone will create an app (or something) that will help us organize everything, i.e., books, apps, etc.  The carousel flowing by is a bit cumbersome.  I am hoping...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for the price!,March 8, 2012By&nbsp;Nichole D(Lawndale, CA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I didn't think I would like this tablet. I have a smartphone and a regular kindle. I received this as a gift and must admit I use it more than I thought it would. I won't go into a super long review as others have stated everything I would write. I wish others would realize what this kindle does have to offer instead of giving it poor reviews for things the fire never claimed to be. I think it is well worth the price tag.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVERY NICE PRODUCT, FOR THE MONEY,March 8, 2012By&nbsp;greed-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)i received my Kindle Fire on March 7th, I love everything about it.  I also own a the Kindle 3g with the keyboard,  and was amazed how all of my books transferred over to my Kindle Fire.  i had no problems getting started and learning the FIRE.  i was able to go right to my emails, pandora, and other apps with no problems at all.  I sat my Kindle Fire down, and my husband picked it up to play with it. He was amazed to see everything that the Fire has to offer. I guess I will be ordering another Kindle Fire for him shortly.  I will never compare the Kindle Fire to a tablet or a notebook,  I use my Kindle Fire to READ and listen to pandora. My husband uses it to go online and search the web................WE LOVE IT!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes what it is designed for very well,March 7, 2012By&nbsp;Mike McElfresh(Jacksonville, FL, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my KF for a month and am very pleased. Would I buy it again after owning it for a month? Yes. I started buying music from Amazon because of the quality of the audio and no drm nonsense. When I got the kindle fire took about 5 minutes or so to connect to LAN and play my music on their cloud. Can also access music and video on the LAN, that took more time and effort.The speaker volume is not particularly loud, but it is louder then the iPod video the Fire is replacing &lt;joke&gt;. The Fire works very well with headphones, the audio quality is as good as the old iPod. Watching a video on the KF is, of course, much better. I've only bought one movie so far, excellent quality as I expected from Amazon.If you are looking for a very portable, reliable media player, the kindle Fire is highly recommended. Of course I looked at an iPad and a pretty neat Samsung Galaxy(?), but I can buy the KF and 20 to 30 movies for the same money. And I don't have to screw around with a server, Amazon takes care of that.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for a guy that likes gadgets,February 27, 2012By&nbsp;T. Price(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle fire is one of the greatest gadgets I have been given.  I honestly do not enjoy to read.  I would rather be climbing a mountain.  I found myself reading more in the morning instead of watching TV because of this device.  I enjoy the free application for USA Today to read what is going on in the world every morning.  I also enjoy reading email and writing emails on this device.  Typing on the fire feels like texting.  Amazon Prime members can stream thousands of movies and TV shows for free.  They can also read a free book every month.  The cloud drive is great because it does not take up extra space on your drive.  I enjoy streaming my music from the cloud drive when I am laying down at night to calm down.  The Kindle Fire will pay off the most when traveling.  Its smaller and lighter than carrying around a book.  Most Airports have free Wi-Fi "atleast for a half hour".  You can grab a magazine for $2 instead of $6 at the airport to read on the plane or in the lobby.  The device feels very durable, though I have not dropped it yet to confirm that.  The screen color and brightness does not hurt your eyes at night.  I honestly have more to say, but the average person would lose interest.  To sum up myself, I am a person that enjoys the outdoors and gadgets.  I can take this camping, traveling, regular morning reading with coffee before work, at work, basically everywhere.  If you are like me, then you will love this device.  Reading in color is great because most books have pictures.  Seeing the pictures from the news is great.  Enough, I'm done.  This device is awesome.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWonderful!,March 4, 2012By&nbsp;Livia Jayne-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It took my Kindle Fire forever to get here, but I couldn't have been any more excited when it did. It is such a great little tablet. It may not rival the IPad with Apple's massive amounts of apps, but for the price, the Fire is absolutely amazing. I would much rather have this than an IPad. There's so much you can do on it! And although some people complain about the limited apps Amazon has, I find their app store sufficient. If you wanted all the fancy apps, then spend the extra several hundred dollars on an IPad.I've spent so much time on my Fire already, finding free books and free apps, checking out movies I will watch in the future. (Prime as Mrs. Doubtfire! I know what I'll be watching. I grew up with that movie.) It will be great for college next year, since I'll buy my textbooks on my kindle, rather than carrying around heavy textbooks all the time. The Fire is a great investment, and I would recommend it to anyone who wants a wonderful eReader with a ton of extra perks.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT! But Needs Account Management Improvements,March 1, 2012By&nbsp;J. Bean "Human, Husband, Father, Geek, Blogger"(Indianapolis, IN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been using my Kindle Fire now for about 5 months and I can tell you I still love it. It's great! Does more for me than I really expected, and if it were ONLY a book reader it would still be fantastic.I'd like to focus this review on just a few improvements I think they need to make with regards to account management.Since I've purchased my Kindle Fire, I've also purchased a base Kindle for my 9yr old daughter and begun using the Amazon Marketplace app on my Android phone even more. The challenge comes from trying to manage content across all three devices now.I want my daughter to be able to purchase books for her Kindle through my Kindle Prime account, but I'd like to be able to limit the content she can both see in the catalog of books as well as buy based on what I believe her maturity level warrants for her reading. I'd like to be notified of items if she'd like to purchase them, and then purchase them for her and have them delivered to JUST HER Kindle upon my approval.The problem now is that if she purchases a book or downloads an app, that same app and book gets pushed to my Kindle Fire and my phone. I don't like that!Creating sub-user accounts that are tied to each device would solve this problem I believe. I know with the "Manage My Kindle" dashboard on Amazon, I can push things specifically to a device, but I want devices to be blocked by default unless I specifically request them to be pulled into the device, or specifically push them to that device through the Amazon/Kindle web interface.Anyone else have these same kinds of issues?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTerrific deal,February 29, 2012By&nbsp;JasonSif-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I picked up my fire a couple weeks ago after watching my roommate toy around with his iPad for a few days.  I had thought tablets in general were useless until i started seeing how much more convenient it was to carry around than a laptop.  Another roommate had also said he was hoping a kindle would get him back into reading.  These ideas together convinced me to get one and I have no regrets.  The Fire's a little short on apps compared to the iPad, but certainly has enough to keep me occupied.  I didn't care much for its limitations (camera, skype, etc) because i have an iPhone. The kindle's been a great way to conveniently carry around class notes (evernote), good books, and internet and whatever else without worrying about my laptop.  The iPad is built to be better but I dont think its worth 2.5x the cost; the kindle has all I personally need and more.  It seems like an even better deal when you think of it as more of an advanced kindle and less as an iPad compromise.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThis is just what I wanted and I had no idea how much more I would get.,February 29, 2012By&nbsp;Avid Reader "Avid Reader"(Oklahoma)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Don't be afraid to try a Kindle Fire.My Kindle was a gift and the giver wanted to be sure I knew what I was getting so let me use theirs for a few hours.  I had been reading about it and had no belief that I was getting an I pad or Blackberry. From the first there were so many positives that I never had to call support and I didn't worry about what I didn't know.  I knew I could comfortably read from the Kindle.  The keypad was fine but really great after I got a stylus. I got plenty of use just downloading the free books and buying the Journal and Note apps. It will be nice to travel with.  I tested going online for facebook and gmail along with others. I even attached a photo and have it.  I had a lot of music in my cloud that I can easily access. I have had my Kindle two months and there is still much to learn. I downloaded for my husband and didn't mind sharing.  After awhile I decided I would see what it took to read from my cloud on the laptop.  All I had to do was find my book in my list and click read. Now we both read after dinner and I don't need a light to read in bed.  Thank you, Amazon  PS I had Prime and felt it a great value even before I got my Kindle.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI sell tons of these,February 29, 2012By&nbsp;Brandon E. Bedell "KabraxisX"(Arizona, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I sell tons of these at radio shack, and as I show customers how to use it, both the customer and I are amazed at what we see. Super easy to use, fast, and reliable.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,February 29, 2012By&nbsp;Hatchetman0-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This has got to be the coolest device I own and I have lots of cool electronic toys. It is fast and very responsive when I'am using it. The graphics look amazing. It is a must buy for anyone who wants a great tablet but can't afford an iPad or other tablets.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Device I Own!,February 27, 2012By&nbsp;H. Potter "Oldhiker"(California)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)According to media reviews, the Fire was not supposed to be as good an e-reader as the E-Ink Kindles, of which I have two. Not so. It is a superb e-reader, unless you sit in direct sun all the time. For indoor lighting, the bright screen is perfect; it looks much more like a paper book than the old gray and white, and you don't need to shine a bright light on it. There are also more choices in typefaces, brightness, margins, and overall appearance. And the screen image automatically changes if you switch from portrait to landscape format and back.It is great for Web browsing, too. Its speed is terrific, sometimes faster than the high speed cable attached to my desktop. The screen is sharp and videos are very crisp. But wireless use drains the battery very rapidly. It probably wouldn't last much more than two hours if you were downloading content all the time. I wouldn't seriously consider using the Fire to watch TV or movies. But then, books are better entertainment, anyway.The only trouble I had with it was learning how to work the touchscreen surface; I was pressing too hard. It takes a very gentle touch. It responds to the same pressure as my IPod Classic (sorry Amazon, I won't be downloading music to my Fire).The only criticism that seems justified is the one about the power button. It is right in the middle of the bottom and it is really easy to turn the thing off by accident, especially if you lie on your back and rest the Fire on your chest. So I turn it to landscape orientation to avoid the problem.  A sliding switch, as the older Kindles have, would be a better solution.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome!,February 22, 2012By&nbsp;minecraftportal21-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I think the Kindle fire is really awesome. It's better that the iPad because you can do everything you could do on an iPad, and it's only $200!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire!,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Lola59-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This was a gift.  It is a great alternative to the size and the expense of the iPad.  Full access to the Internet, email, books and movies.  Last weekend I was in a hotel where computer access was limited.  I used it for directions, local entertainment -- everything.  I have no idea how I got along without it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsImpressive Device,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Gadget Girl-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I gave this device to my husband to replace his original Kindle.  Comparing to my Apple Ipad - it is an awesome device for a lot less money.Would highly recommendHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Abby Alexander "abalex"(Philadelphia, PA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just love my Kindle Fire! It's so easy to use, it's so versatile, and connections are so much faster than my laptop.  I've already watched tons of movies, tv shows, downloaded books....and so much of it for free.  There's really no need for Netflix or any other movie app if you have one because Amazon basically has every movie you can ever think of!  At first I had a few questions about things that confused me, and Amazon's customer service responded very quickly and they were extremely helpful. The Kindle Fire is really an outstanding tablet.  It's basically replaced my laptop completely.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTHE BEST!!!!,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Julie-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)While I was looking up reviews on the internet someone said that "If ipad were to have a baby this would be it!"  My friend got an ipad and after I was playing with it for awhile I was wanting one so bad and I didn't think I would be happy with anything but an ipad.  I am so glad I got this...LOVE IT!!!  I am still learning how to work it because I only have had it for 5 days.  Until I become rich and famous this will be what I always get.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove My Fire,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Michael Alexander "greenacres"(greenacres)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First let me say I do not own a laptop or a smartphone.I am really happy with my Kindle Fire. I love it and I can surf the web to check my emails without having to turn on my computer. I can take this from room to room. I take this on the bus to read my books and watch my movies. I also like to use this that for travel and vacation. I love to read so this comes in handy. I love the Fire and I cannot wait to see what Amazons does next.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLittle pkg with big results,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;PaPa K-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It took a while to pick the Fire out of such a large market. I wanted some thing that was easy to carry that allowed me to view e-mail and surf the web. I am retired and don't need to carry my lap top when traveling, this fire does every thing I realy needed. I enjoy the screen size as it is much better that my phone. Now the suprise is that I find it so easy to read at home or on the road. Every thing is working as it should and if I shut off the wi-fi I get a long run time on the battery.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;Ruth-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love it!  At first I was a little confused, but after learning to navigate around it, I think it's awesome.  I don't know how I ever managed without it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat gift,February 17, 2012By&nbsp;LJ-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love to read but I hate to get rid of my books,so I have an over abundance of them.  Kindle Fire is great I can read all I want and not have to make room on the shelf!  I can take it any where and it is so easy to use.  The screen is great and easy to see.  I am looking forward to down loading some movies next!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTraded in ipad 2 for Kindle Fire,February 20, 2012By&nbsp;B. Henry "Henry"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got tired of lugging around a big ipad.  After I studied the features on the Kindle Fire I decided to make the switch.  I love the kindle fire!  It is just the right size for reading and I can get just about every app I need on it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsReally Nice Device But It's Amazon's Service That Clinches It,February 20, 2012By&nbsp;J. Windham "Book and Movie Lover"(Grand Cane, La USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Critical Review of Nook vs. KindleI own the Nook eReader and I own a Kindle Fire, and while I know these two devices aren't quite on par (one being an eReader, one being a color tablet), owning both has allowed me to interact with both Barnes and Noble and Amazon and this review is more a critique of the companies' services than the devices themselves.Let me say first of all, that I love both my devices, the Nook and the Fire.  I use them often and have recommended them to others.  All things being equal, I've yet to find a great deal of difference between B&N;'s devices and Amazon's devices.  Their eReaders are very similar, their color tablets are also very similar in design and functionality.  A friend of mine has the Nook Tablet, so I was able to compare this to the Fire.  There might be some slight differences (and I'm sure other reviewers have gone into the nitty gritty of what differences exist), but they are so similar I think either device would please its owner.The true difference lies, for me, with the companies themselves: the level of customer service, the amount of eBooks available, the price of books and apps.  And in this aspect I think that Amazon wins.Here is a list of some of the critical points I have noticed where B&N; falls short of Amazon:* On more than one occasion, Barnes and Noble has not had a book available in eBook format for its Nook, yet I can go onto Amazon and find that same book available for the Kindle.  I don't know exactly how the contracting with the book publishers works -but it seems that if Amazon had it in Kindle format, than B&N; should also have it available for the Nook.* Amazon makes it very easy to find free eBook selections.  Barnes and Nobles tends to bury to free selections, making you search thru their higher prices versions and the .99 cent versions.  You can often use the trick by typing 0.00 after the book title to see if a free version is available.  Amazon usually lists the free selections first, making it very easy to find.* Barnes and Nobles has an extensive list of Classics that it offers in eBook format - Jane Eyre, Treasure Island, Little Women, etc.  Only about five of these are available for free, the rest are priced at $3.99.  Amazon has every single "classic" available for free.  Since these books are beyond their copyright expiration date, there is no reason why they shouldn't be offered for free.* Barnes and Noble does have a selling point in that they can offer in-store, in-person customer service.  If you have a question or problem with your Nook, you can walk into the nearest B&N; and get some help.  When you are purchasing your device, it's also nice to be able to go in and actually try one out - something that you obviously cannot do with Amazon.  This is a big selling point.  When I buy devices like the eReader, I like to be able to actually see and touch what I'm getting before I buy it.  Ironically, however, this same advantage also brought a problem to my attention.  I was in our local B&N; perusing the Sale Book section when I spotted a book I wanted.  I took out my Nook, logged into B&N;'s wireless and brought up the book in their Nook store.  Under Nook, it was full price - almost $15.00 more than the in store sale price.  If B&N; puts their in-store books on sale, then they ought to make their Nook books match the sale price.  I have never searched a book on Amazon where the Kindle price and the paperback price didn't match.* Barnes and Nobles should consider implementing a loyalty program like Amazon's "Prime Membership".  I am a member of Prime and the perks are completely worth the yearly fee.  You get free shipping on items, you get reduced prices on eBooks, movies, apps.  Often, under Prime Membership, you can get normally priced eBooks for free.  Barnes and Noble does have a yearly membership that gives you in-store discounts....but as far as I can see, they have not extended this to include eBooks.Now, some might read the above list and think that I am completely anti-Barnes and Noble and this is not the case at all.  As I stated earlier, I love my Nook eReader and for all of B&N; shortfalls, I wouldn't trade it for the world.  This list does highlight, however,  several things B&N; could do to improve and if they want to continue to compete in the cut throat world of eReaders and iPads , I think many of these things must be addressed in the futureHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsEverything is great except for the Wi-fi.,February 20, 2012By&nbsp;jxo106-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I must say the picture on this thing is great and HD quality.  I love the functionality of the games and apps.  I am, however, frustrated by the spotty wi-fi aspect of the device. At home, using the comcast wi-fi, it works seamlessly. Outside of the home, though, it barely works at all. Even with full bars of signal!  It's pretty frustrating to say the least.  If it had worked in all areas like at home, where I need it least, I would've given it five stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI got 3 Fires, and 2 IPAD 2's,February 19, 2012By&nbsp;Jill R Kurk-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really should sart getting rid of some of my devices. I got IPOD Touch, Ipod classics, Zune Touches, Zune Classics, 2 IPAD 2's and 3 Fires. The IPAD is more of the sitting on the couch device, even though while my wife uses the IPAD I usually use the kindle fire. I travel more with my fire. There are some games I love on my fire, and would love my fire a whole lot more if they just would allow all the same apps as the Android Market.So Here we go PRO CONS and Fire vs. IPADPROS:1 of course is cost. If you have an 8 year old boy he'll love this and you won't have to worry about dropping it or breaking it like you might with a 500 dollar IPAD2.2 Ease to travel because of its smaller size3 has and plays the popular games4 I use it for reading where as I wouldn't use my IPAD for reading.5 cloud drive is nice. I got so many electronics is nice being able to buy on one and grab it when I need it on another6 Battery life when reading is exceptionalCONS:1. Obviously its locked and you can't use it like a regular android device. Can't change your background pic (that I've found however you might be able to), etc.2. It lacks a home button. Sure it has the touch one to bring up.3. Some 3d games are nearly close to beiing as good as IPAD. But again like i said, the popular apps are there and play great (Bag it, cut the rope, etc. etc.)4. Touch screen not as friendly as the IPADIts not fair to compare it to an IPAD. The IPAD is 499. This is 199. So in the end I say its still a great deal. And exceptional deal for young kids, a good device. can't wait till they get some more baseball apps on there.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThis thing rocks!,February 18, 2012By&nbsp;Kitsune-242-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my Kindle Fire last night for an early birthday present, and I'm already in love. As somebody who is a technology geek, I'm hard to please on the mobile device front; I can always find problems that would completely remove the value of a product. But I havent been able to hate the Kindle Fire. It just gives me no reason too! Let me give you a quick rundown.Great wi-fi speed.So easy to use, you can be a pro in minutes.Speedy downloaded(and a bundle of awesome free downloads!)Amazing display quality(crisp, clean, bright, what more could you want?)Sound quality makes it feel like you're standing at the concert/actually in the movie.Easy to navigate/customize your Kindle Fire.Compact; a lot of power in a small devicePortable; way more so than an iPad, or other larger tablets(can fit in a medium coat pocket.)And that is only some of them! If I had waited even two more hours to write this review, I would have another paragraph of upsides to add to this review. The only downside I can think of is that if you want to download an app - even a free one - from the app store that came on your Kindle, they will require you put in a credit card number, and a billing address. If you're a teenager like me, and don't have a credit card, I found a loophole(go to the amazon store, and search for your app - make sure its for the Kindle! Download it from there.) That is easy to use.All in all, if you're thinking about buying a a tablet for yourself or a loved one, for whatever reason, I suggest the Kindle Fire. It's fast, colorful, and best if all, affordable. I definitely recommend it over the mammoth known as the iPad.And just to let any readers know, this entire review was written in under six minutes, on my Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNice tablet!!!!!,February 17, 2012By&nbsp;Stan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have tried just about every tablet this is very responsive to the touch and very fast. I could think of any reason to get another IPAD. I love the 7 inch screen not to big not to small. movies are really sharp!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love My Kindle,February 17, 2012By&nbsp;Beth-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for over a week now, I was so excited when I saw the package and using it from the start could not have been easier. Where I go, my kindle follows, thanks for a great product Amazon. I am telling my friends who are looking for a tablet,get the Kindle Fire it is a awesome product. Thanks again it is worth the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSo glad I chose this over the iPad!,February 11, 2012By&nbsp;B. Nichols "SleepingTiger54"(VT, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It does everything I wanted from a tablet at a price that cant be beat. Movies, games, music, web...and more.PROS: holds nice, stunning clarity, fast browser, easy to use right out of the box, sound is good, lots of apps. Good battery life.CONS: A bit heavier than I expected, screen has mega glare and shows fingerprints galore (definitely get a stylus with it), power button is in a bad spot (I'm constantly turning it off accidentally). Amazon's one-touch purchasing is convenient, but I would prefer a password required for making purchases, just in case it fell into the wrong hands (or my touch-happy toddler!).If it only had a camera it would be perfect. I love it! But definitely subscribe to Amazon Prime. It's worth it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat reader,February 15, 2012By&nbsp;ajcook-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had a 3rd-generation Kindle for about a year.  I loved it.  I find reading eBooks on Amazon's Kindle devices to be extremely satisfying, and convenient.  I finally gave into the temptation to buy a Kindle Fire, and I love it.  The color screen is bright and clear, the user interface intuitive, and downloading books and documents fast and easy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI like it very much,February 15, 2012By&nbsp;Jay Hocking(Illinois  Arizona)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't use it every day, but it is easy to use and pretty user friendly. I keep a lot of user manuals for various devices in it so it can be onsite if I am working on a washing machine, car, motorcycle etc. I had a bit of trouble getting it to connect online, but it was because of a security level in my router.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIf you love Amazon u won't be disappointed!!,February 14, 2012By&nbsp;T. Starr(Michigan)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just received this as a Valentine's day gift from my hubby, and so far so good.  I've only had it a few hours but in that short time I've grown to love Zuri(yes I named my Kindle fire) .. I'm so excited to read my books, listen to music, play games, surf the web and explore the numerous other things I haven't found yet.I must say I'm not an Apple user so I really can't compare to ipad, but I love amazon and I  love my kindle fire...Best gift ever!!!Loyal Amazon customerHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt exceeds my expectations!,February 14, 2012By&nbsp;Lemonia-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For those of you that bash the Kindle Fire, and leave bad reviews, I highly disagree with your opinion of the device. Now, it might be because of my undying loyalty to Amazon, but this tablet exceeded my expectations. I spent a good month going back and forth, trying to figure out whether or not I should get the Kindle Fire, or it's rival: the NOOK Tablet. I am very proud of myself for the decision I ultimately made. The only two downsides to the device are the poor placement of the power button, and the fact that I cannot change the wallpaper on the home screen. Nonetheless, I will sacrifice my issues for an amazing tablet. If you're a Prime member, you will love it even more. I will be using it during my lengthy breaks at school. I cannot wait to start watching movies and shows on my Hulu Plus and Netflix accounts. I definitely agree that the Kindle Fire is an iPad killer. I definitely would save $500-600 and invest in a Kindle Fire. The setup was a breeze, and I was downloading apps and books (most of them free!) in a matter of seconds. Do yourself the favor of getting a Kindle Fire. It's especially the perfect accessory for college students!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsawesome,February 14, 2012By&nbsp;juan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great product nothing else to say..product as described for a very reasonable price reading in the kindle is great awesomeHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfection,February 14, 2012By&nbsp;Darwin Hunt-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Everything I had hoped for.  Only problem wasapplying the screen protector.  It's hard toprevent air bubbles.  It would be nice if theywould apply it at the factory.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Coma Emma,February 13, 2012By&nbsp;Emma M. Morton "Kindle coma"(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased my Fire about three-months ago and have yet to find any real fault. My primary interest in the Fire is to do one of the things I like most-reading. The mega selection in the free books library is enough to keep me reading for quite some time.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,February 4, 2012By&nbsp;The Miller-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There is a reason the Fire is eroding iPad sales. It is an excellent reader with extras to satisfy those who don't need all the iPad offers. The only reason I didn't give the Fire 5 starts is because it is heavier than I expected. If you've held a Kindle before, be prepared for a lot more heft in the Fire. This is not a huge issue, and it is not  big surprise given the increased functionality, but still, some may find it a bit tiresome to hold for a long stretch of reading. Of course, buying a nice cover that folds into a stand for it relieves this problem.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,February 8, 2012By&nbsp;Charlene(Cincinnati, OH United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Although I'm still learning all the features of my Kindle Fire, I absolutely love it.  The fact that I can view books with pictures is a big plus.  I enjoy the games I have and I can view the weather or get sports scores in just a few minutes.  I highly recommend the Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest purchase decision ever,February 7, 2012By&nbsp;Parker916 "Parker916"(Seattle, WA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle is so awesome. I love how bright and colorfulmagazines look on it. I've started doing a lot of things with my kindle; keeping my grocery list, playing movies, games, music, reading a book, writing a quick post it note. I've only encountered one problem with the kindle and that is on one oaccassion it didn't power up... I googled and discovered that others kindle users were having similar problems. Thankfully, it comes back on after an hour. I think the problem occurs when you keep the device in standby for an extended period of time. I turn it off when not in use and haven't run into that problem since. Also, I only wish the device would tell me what page I'm on instead of telling me a percentage but this is not that big of a problem. Overall, this is a great device and much more affordable compared to the ipad.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars!!!!,February 7, 2012By&nbsp;Bananna-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire is the best Kindle yet!! Full color with games...it can not get any better. The only downdside.is that it may defeat the purpose of reading since games are available; as long as the Weather, YouTube, Internet, and other 'late and great' features. Only has wifi...no 3G. Videos and music are awesome to listen to; the sound system is great. Like the regular Kindles, you can find a definition or highlight a word. Highly recommended.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSecond kindle fire for our house,February 7, 2012By&nbsp;Manic Mechanic(Houston, TX)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Our son loves to read and plays a game or two every now and then.  The kindle fire is perfect.  He first purchased a cheap tablet for $160 he saved and it was junk.  I returned it to Amazon and received a full refund.  I then kicked in $30 for him to get a fire, and he loves it.  Excellent product just like the one I have and durable.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest item I could ever own!!!!!!,February 5, 2012By&nbsp;AshleyA-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My hsuband got me my Kindle Fire for Christmas 2011.  I use it daily.  I have my own laptop but find myself using my Kindle Fire more often because it is easier to hold and it does everything that my laptop does. My family saw how much I used my Kindle and they all went out and bought one.  The Kindle Fire is very user friendly even if you have a hard time using a computer.  The best advice that I could give anyone when using this is to always used the tool bar where the BOOK/NEWSTAND/APPS etc are located. From there click on what you want to download. To purchase the items you need to click store from the area that you want to purchase (BOOKS/NEWSTAND/APPS) which would be on your top right side.  This will give you all the items that are for free or have a purchase price. If you use the WEB on the tool bar it will not download to your Kindle until you purchase it from the store.  So to save you time always go to area you want first then from there go to the store. Believe me this is the only thing that I wished I new right off the bat.  I love my Kindle!!!!  Buy it for yourself or for a gift.  Anyone would love this!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNice little tablet,February 5, 2012By&nbsp;Eric-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Nice little tablet for the price. Not perfect though... couple of things...I have two, 1 for me 1 for my wife.First, i lost a book into cyber space. White page with title on top, no words on page. Customer svc said it's glitch and amazon is aware of it. Walked me through a hard start and all came back.Second, my wifes has a very small scratch on the screen already. We are not tough on things so I was surprised, Made a leather cover for it to hopefully help.Third. even with wifi my wife's had an issue with email. Lost a day's worth of emails. Just as mysteriously as it stopped, it started again, but the mails were lost. Related to the first?So far very happy otherwise, I would buy on again.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsfrom a novice,February 4, 2012By&nbsp;susan l-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I own an android phone and I like it well enough.My PC is several years old and I finally got wireless internet.. That is the extent of my electronics knowledge.  AND  I love my kindle fire!!! I have purchased and rented and downloaded movies with no problem regarding the purchase, rental, or playback. I have several books stored and a few games. I can do anything on my kindle that I could do on my PC. Facebook is great, the music playback is great(although I wish it were a tad bit louder). Overall I would recommend  this product to anyone. It is a great price. Why spend $500 on an ipad? I wont.! Thanks Amazon for a great product..I am 1 satisfied customer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)







Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI cant put it down!,January 22, 2012By&nbsp;Justnoemi-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I cant express how much I love this device. My mom bought a tablet 10" and didn't care for it. She returned it and I told her about wanting a fire. She then bought us both one for the price of 1 tablet with money left over. She and I both love are fires. Being kindle and amazon fans just made it all the more loved. It does everything a larger tablet does. Has tons of great apps and my 2 year old son watches netflix on it in the car. I love it! Its another hit for amazon. Oh and all my books where already on it. The read to me feature on children's books is awesome. I can do the dishes in peace while my 2 gets a book read to him. Its not easy to sit a lil person down for even 15 minutes anything that helps rocks!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle fire,January 24, 2012By&nbsp;Leslie Kokko-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)does everything but make a phone call or take pictures. But I have other devices for that. The picture is outstanding. I can read at night without bothering my husband with a light on.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSatisfied Customer,January 24, 2012By&nbsp;Rev Nelson W. Cheney(Texarkana, TX United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As a senior citizen I am still learning how to use my Kindle Fire.  Thus far I have enjoyed it and everyday I find out something new.  It is everything that it is cracked up to be.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo fun!,January 23, 2012By&nbsp;A. Williams-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have enjoyed every minute of my Kindle Fire right out of the box. Easy to use and so much fun!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle + Tablet = Success,January 23, 2012By&nbsp;Sizzle-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Going into this purchase, I was already the proud owner of a Kindle 4 and an iPad. I never really use my iPad, and I was wishing the Kindle could do just a little more, to save me from pulling out my laptop when I'm away from the house. So, I was looking into some options, and it came down to upgrading to an iPad 2, and installing the Kindle App, or picking up a Kindle Fire. In the end, I picked up a Kindle Fire, and I don't regret it.First, picking up an iPad 2 would not only have cost more than twice as much, but it would have felt foolish with the next generation coming to stores so soon. The price of the Kindle Fire is definitely appropriate for everything it can do. It's basically a small Android tablet, backed up by Amazon, and its Kindle powerhouse. Sure, it's a little more sluggish than the iPad in loading up webpages, and the user experience could use a few tweaks, but there really isn't anything that gets anywhere close to pushing me away.Since the purchase, I've thrown a screen protector and Seidio Active case (with a hard screen cover and stand) on this little thing, and I throw it in my bag every morning before I head out to class. When I need to check a little something online that goes beyond my iPhone comfort (PDF file or the like), I don't need to pull out a laptop. That's not only less time-consuming, but it's less revealing in some situations (think, showing a bunch of strangers that you have a MacBook Air in that backpack). Even better, I don't have to completely stop walking to check these things (but that doesn't mean I'll be tumbling into any fountains, or at least not on camera).It's also great as a tablet for watching TV. It gives me enough internet access and other functionality to, once again, keep me from reaching for a computer, and it's small enough that it really sits on the couch easily, and it seems solid enough to handle the possibility of someone bumping it.So, for a couple hundred bucks, Amazon hooks it up with a great little tablet. Sure, it could use a few upgrades to bring it anywhere close to the iPad, but it's a great entry-level tablet, with dimensions some might find more comfortable, and it's also a Kindle with a turbo kit. I'd give it five stars if they worked on some simple user experience issues. I really want to give it 4.5 stars, but that's not an option.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsbest value,January 23, 2012By&nbsp;capsfan88-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After days of scanning online reviews, careful research, and trying out several tablets, I decided to buy the Kindle Fire.I must say that I am very happy with my purchase. The device is perfect for what I need: E-mail, books, and occasional movies and tv shows.Strengths:- Size: While the small screen isn't the greatest for magazines or Pdf's, its actually great for ebooks, and it feels  much better in your hand. Other larger devices (ie Ipad2) feel awkward and cumbersome after a while for reading over longer periods.-Amazon Prime: In order to get the most out of this device, you need Amazon prime, the service which lets you borrow 1 book a month from the Amazon kindle library, gives you access to certain shows and movies (the selection is comparable/slightly inferior to Netflix at the moment, but will presummably be beefed up in the coming year), and offers free two day shipping on all Amazon products.-Video/quality: Overall selection and feel of apps, and the quality of video were a positive surprise for a $200 device.Weaknesses:- Sound: The volume doesn't go high enough. Period. The quality also leaves something to be desired.- Power Button: Much has been made about this in online reviews. The location, while dumb, isn't the end of the world. I have hit it by accident a few times, but there's an easy fix: Rotate the device so that the button is on top. Problem solved.-Storage: simply not enough if you want to have a lot of music and movies.My advice to those looking into getting a tablet is know what you want to use the device for. Originally I had planned to use the device for a bit of business + Books and a few apps and occasional movies. I realized that even the Ipad2 isn't very useful for business (taking notes that sort of thing). Thus i settled on the fire, primarily for its price, functionality (gives you everything the high end tablets give you without the bells and whistles).For those who watch a lot of video and listen to music, this may not be the device to you. If a few movies on the device is all you need, and you otherwise focus on ebooks, apps, e-mail and web this is the device for you.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsbest gift evah!!!!,January 22, 2012By&nbsp;nla47546-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got the fire for Christmas and seriously use it every single day.  I check the weather before I roll out of bed so I know how to dress, I link into Pandora while in the shower, or use tunein app and listen to my local radio station. I link into my netflix account and watch movies easily, have dozens of free books, have tons of free games by taking advantage of the free app of the day. I check facebook, email more often and love using it around town. My four kids use it every day to play games, only prob is that they fight over it!  Lol! At least they like playing the word games and other silly apps too, better than sitting around in front of the boobtube. They love the children's books that I have down loaded for free and enjoy using it as a reader,too.  My boys love checking the ESPN app for their team's scores, too! I planned on becoming a prime member, but didn't think I had signed up for the free trial, but three weeks in got an email that said I had just a week left on my trial Prime membership. Didn't take advantage of the free book-borrowing though, I didn't need to since I already had so many free books so far!  I am sure I will become a Prime member eventually, but for now, I am pleased to bits without it. So don't feel like it's a necessity to have the membership like I did at first.  Buy this for anyone as a super gift, they will love you for it.  My six year old loves it as much as my 8, 9 and 22 year olds!  Get a protection plan so you don't have to worry about it when it is in someone else's hands and ENJOY!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAmazon hits a Homerun!!!!,January 22, 2012By&nbsp;J. Demmi(Katy, TX United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I think Amazon has nailed it....this tablet is darn near perfect!!!ProsSturdyHigh qualityGreat sizeSuper price pointGorilla glassEasy to useEasy wi-fi setupConsThe only con we see so far is no external volume control. We really have complaints yet, if this changes we will come back and update the reviewHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMust Have,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Chris-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my first time writing a review about anything. The Kindle Fire blew my mind and impressed me so much I thought the very least I could do is write a review for it. I bought the Fire for my wife for Christmas, she really wanted an IPAD 2 but when I saw the price I knew it wasn't happening. Spent endless hours comparing the Fire and Nook Tablet to deicde which one to go with. Looking at the specs, I knew the Fire was the better buy. The Fire has a nice sleek modern look, and it fits perfectly in your hand, its fairly easy to use! (My 3 year old daughter can operate it). Web searching is ultra fast, looking for a book or magazine is easy, looking for a new app is simple. Overall if you want a great affordable tablet that is easy to use, that dissapears in your hand, does everything you need. Go with the Fire, hands down...5 Stars...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTHIS IS IT.  THIS IS THE TABLET FOR THE MASSES,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;T. Hodgson(Philadelphia, Pa)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)SUMMARY: It does everything I want and need: that makes it perfect for me.PROS:1. Performance is excellent.  It's responsive with games, and other apps alike.  I haven't noticed any lag with any of the games I've played.2. It has the essential apps that I use: games, movies, music, magazines, comics, note taking, and more.3. Media: I use Amazon prime video and Netflix to watch movies every day.  Plus, I can watch movies that I have on my PC after a simple conversion.  It's super easy to transfer files over.4. Small form factor is a plus and, for me, better than the iPad that I have.  Yes, I prefer it OVER the iPad.  I can hold the fire in one hand while I read.  That's the deciding factor for me.5. The price.  Seriously, $200.  Who can complain about this.  Apple products are okay, but I'm really tired of paying hundreds of dollars every couple of years for, well, for a built in camera that doesn't get used (have you seen people take videos with an iPad - dorks).6. Battery life: With constant use, it lasts all day long.  I bought a charger for my car, but have only used it once.  I charge it at night, unplug in the morning, use it all day and evening, read in bed before sleep, and it typically has 50% or more battery life left.  That's excellent.7. Mini-usb charger.  No need to buy an overpriced, specialized charger.  I have an extra one lying around from an old Motorola Razor, and it works with the Fire.  Bonus.8. Kindle eco-system: kindle lending library, tons of existing books, easy book ordering, the online store is excellent.9. Amazon eco-system: the ratings alone are priceless.CONS:1. When typing, it isn't 100% accurate.  Could be improved, but not much of a complaint.2. Needs even more apps.  Yes, there are a lot, but there could be many more.3. Speakers could be louder.OTHER THOUGHTS1. Would like to have external volume buttons2. Would be nice to be able to insert an SD card, but the cloud makes up for it.3. I've been using it for one month and it goes with me everywhere.  I own an iPad and an iPhone, and I find that I use it more than the other two: The iPad won't fit in my coat pocket, and the iPhone is too small for note taking or watching movies.  Those products are fine, but this one is in some ways better.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome tablet!,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;Kenrick Chow-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Highly recommend this tablet! I have used the iPad and that is very good itself, but the Kindle Fire is very similar and portable. The part is you can stream and buy media through your amazon account and also rent! A Great Buy!! This is a must have!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI read more now than I ever have before,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;Philip A. Hilton-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had the Fire for almost a month now and it has been just fantastic.  I've been reading just about every night and this is from reading maybe once a month.  I hate turning and messing with paper pages in a regular book. The Fire makes flipping those pages so much easier.  I also really love the fact this is a backlit device. One of the things keeping me from e-books of the past was that you needed a light source to read.  It's also a perfect size to read in bed. Prop it on my chest and I can read for hours.  When I'm tried of read there's, of course, tons of other stuff to do on the Fire.  I highly recommend it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsi love my kindle fire,January 21, 2012By&nbsp;sofiya-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love this device best ever.  It does so much and everything is fast, easy and fun.  Don't hesitate to buy one you wont regret it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle is on Fire!!!,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;HD Eyes-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First of all, I have the older kindle for reading and love it. When I saw the Kindle Fire came out...I knew I had to have it. I receieved it as my christmas present this year, and I love it. It is so much more than I ever imagined it would be. I love playing time management games on the WII, and was so pleased that the kindle had many games to play. The only  drawback is that I can't put it down and I am constantly playing games. The picture is crisp and clear, and the colors are very vibrant. Having only one computer in my house, I love going online with my kindle fire. It is simple and easy to use and had no problems moving around the web. I placed my favorite songs in there, and I love Amazon Cloud which connects my music from my kindle, to computer- very easy to use. The movies and videos are crisp and clear. There are two speakers so the sound is above average, but for even better sound just plug in your headphones and you are good to go. The battery life isn't bad at all. Depending on how much time you spend on it I can see charging the battery nightly. I usually have to do every other night. Just plug it in when you go to bed, and when you wake it ready to go. Now here is the only problem I found with the kindle fire- however, I have fixed that problem. When I started reading books I realized that I was getting headaches. The light was just so bright and no matter how much I lowered it...it was still too bright. I was devestated. Just when I was about to give up and leave the reading for my other kindle, I decided to go on the web and find some help. The first thing I found was that people said to switch the white background to black and letters from black to white. IT WORKED!! I was happy and no more headaches. So, I was reading like that for a while, but it still felt off because it wasn't like a book. I went on the web again and read this. Someone said to go and download a screen filter. I couldn't find it, but luckily my brother did and put it in my kindle. What it does is let you lower the light even more than kindle allows, and it works. I don't know exactly how to get that screen filter, but if you search the web you will find it there. So now when I read my book I click on the screen filter icon and the whole kindle goes dark. Then I adjust the brightness in my settings up to a nice soft glow. Also I set my background color to the sepitone(don't know if spelt right) color. I felt it was more like a book than plain white. Thank God I solved this problem and now reading if perfect. If you have any questions feel free to contact me. I know how disappointed I was until I found the solution. Now I love my kindle. The only thing missing is a camera. It is a little on the heavy, but not bad. I am sure when they make a two, it will be slimmer and include a camera. So now the only disappointment was that it did not come with a USB cord. So if you wanted to transfer things from your computer to your kindle or vice versa, you would have to go out and buy a USB chord. Luckiy I have the origina Kinde which comes with a USB chord, and so I can use that. All in all, I Love it. Its the perfect size to carry around and is there if I want to watch a movie, go on the web, play music, play games or just read a book or magazine for that matter. It is well worth the price when comparing it to the apple I pad. Kindle is my friend.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is on Fire,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Michael "Buffalomikem"-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This device is a great multimedia device, people that think it is just for reading are sadly mistaken.  There is so much that you can do with a Kindle Fire and it goes beyond reading.  The amazon app store is expanding daily, and the silk web browser is gaining speed, each and everyday.  I listen to music and play games on my kindle fire daily; some of the great apps that I have on my Kindle Fire, include Angry Birds, Fruit Ninja, Plants vs Zombies, Madden and Ninjump.  There our many other great apps for the Fire, but I wish they would release Sonic Cd, Zombies 2, Tiny Wings, and papi missile.  Overall the Kindle Fire can pretty much do everything the Ipad can do.  So yes I would say it is an ipad Killer.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Must Have Tablet For An Awesome Price!,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Justin Johnson "Justin Johnson"(Fort Wayne, IN USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had read some of the reviews of the Kindle Fire and I wasn't sure if this was going to be a good tablet or not.  I finally got my own yesterday and I have to say this tablet is awesome!  I can't believe all the things that it can do.  Not only can you browse the internet, you can download music from Amazon.  You can read books, magazines and comic books.  I checked out the App Store and there are quite a few apps that you can choose from.  The display screen looks very nice and is responsive to finger swipes.  The body of the tablet feels very sturdy, it seems like a quality piece of equipment.  There aren't many tablets out there that retail for $200, but I have to say that for the price, you are getting a bargain.  I am very happy with my purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)





3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA delightful bargain,January 19, 2012By&nbsp;Holly C. Salley(Arkansas)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love Apple products but could not justify spending a fortune on an iPad. I did some research and decided to get the Kindle Fire. I am an Audible addict and am glad that I can purchase audiobooks on my moblie device again.(Apple prohibits this) I love the Oxford English Dictionary because I like British writers. I heard it was slow. It is slower than an iPad but the price tag makes me patient and I have a laptop and iPhone so no big deal. I was excited about the Amazon Prime book lending but no books I like are on there so I am not going to keep it. Games I like are on the Fire and are better than they are on the iPhone. It does not have a camera but I think the entire world has one on their phone so again who cares. What I love is the Cloud. I like being able to access my entire library anywhere. I upgraded to the 20 gig and since I am not loving the Amazon prime I will cancel that and keep the Cloud. I have not watched any movies on it yet but I like to watch movies on a TV. I LOVE my Kindle Fire.It is smaller than the iPad which I see as a plus because it is less bulky than the iPad and like I say I don't care much for the video thing; I have a TV and laptop so who cares. I work nights and so my hours are weird. I got frustrated with my Kindle running slow so I called at 12:30am. It took one minute for someone to answer my call. Mario helped me fine tune my Kindle Fire and so now it surfs the net easily. Apple closes early and you have to go through a million conversations with that annoying voice and they can never really help you. There is no downside to this product. It is wonderful!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery pleased,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Nathan E. Reynolds(N Las Vegas, NV, US)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased the Kindle Fire for my wife at Christmas and she LOVES it.  I couldn't have chosen a more perfect gift.  She watches movies on it constantly and now she hardly ever uses her laptop.  She won't leave home without it (sorry American Express).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;henry-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire for my Gal pal and she is thrilled to death with it. And is always braging to friends about how easy it is to use. I'm a hero now and can do no wrong in her eyes. And it even showed up at my door a day before I was expecting it to. How great was that. I don't buy all that much on line, but I know next time I do this is the place I'll visit first.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat device!,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Danysay-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle. I cannot stop using it for searching stuff on Internet, facebook, or just reading. The bad part is that you cannot buy movies or games if you do not live inside the USA, I would really enjoy that. Overall, this product is very good.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent product at a reasonable price!,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Oscar(El Paso, TX, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire as a Christmas gift for my son.  After a week or so of using the Fire he commented that he preferred the Kindle Fire to his Apple Ipad2 which he had received as a birthday gift in November.  The fact that the Fire doesn't have a camera is easily offset by the price as well as all the other outstanding features if does have.  I have a Xoom and I like it, but I'm very tempted to get a Kindle Fire for myself.  Affordability, size, and clarity of images definitely make this Kindle a winner!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe best part of owning a fire,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;c niezgoda(Hot Springs Ar)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire. If I can operate it anyone can. The folks at Amazon are wonderfully helpful and instructive. I've always previewed books for my grandchildren. It is nice when they need to write a book report they only have to call grandma to find a good book to read. I remember when I was younger, I couldn't find anything to read that I was interested in. They will not be readers until they do. It is so nice to have a common interest with the teens. I think I would like to purchase another kindle for more adult reading and save this one as reference for them. I haven't figured out yet how to completely delete a book from my devise. I am sure there is a way. If I can enjoy the kindle as much as I do with the limited experience I have, others will be delighted. If you are thinking about it and a little scared you won't figure it out don't be. I don't remember the problem I had that I couldn't figure out, but a phone call resolved that so quickly.(with my integrity intact) If you think you want one and can afford it- do it.  So far everything that was advertised about them has been true. Thank you amazon for such a pleasant experience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBrilliantly priced piece of nerd gadgetry.,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Thoren-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great size/form factor.  I've been impressed by the battery life so far.  Great speed, great UI, easy enough that my 2 year old can navigate around to his books and apps, excellent mobile browser.What could be better?  The power button on the bottom means the button gets pressed accidentally far too often -- and don't give me any of that Steve Jobs: "you're holding it wrong" BS.  Screens anti-glare could be a bit better.  I know its not e-paper, but it's nearly as bad as the iPad in terms of glare.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNice and useful little device,January 20, 2012By&nbsp;Djordje-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been using Kindle Fire for around a month now. It's a great and enjoyable little device, very useful for various purposes - but not without flaws. I hope this review may help you decide if KF is the right choice for you.1) SCREEN. It's just beautiful! Nice, sharp picture, great resolution, beautiful colors, fast response. And it's 7" - IMHO the best compromise between mobility and usability. Glare? Well, what can I say... it's quite bad, as with any other tablet out there. It is virtually unusable in the direct sunlight.2) SPEED. It's way faster than I expected from a device in that price range. Animations, zooming in-out, videos... all work smooth and nice.3) SIZE. With 7" screen, and not too thick frame around it, I'd say it has just the right dimensions - big enough for a pretty comfortable use, and still small enough to be able to always carry it around with you without a need for a big bag.4) BATTERY. Well, again, as with most tablets out there today, battery life is not KF's strong point either. It will serve you for several hours of intensive use at best. But that's the price you have to pay today for that nice, colorful, shiny back-lit screen and a fast enough processor.5) PRICE. Unbeatable on the market today. Amazon does not make money from selling Kindle Fire itself, but from what they hope you will buy from Amazon store to use on it - books, videos, comics, applications, ... That's why the price is so low.5) OVERALL LOOK AND FEEL. In a single word - great, for both hardware and software. Especially for the price.6) NON-US USERS. Ouch! This is where Kindle fails pretty bad. Non US users will still be able to purchase books and videos, but they can forget about applications. Not even free applications can be downloaded from Amazon App Store without a US credit card! Don't know why Amazon made such a decision, maybe it has something to do with legal reasons... but I am sure there is a way to overcome that and I hope Amazon will address this soon. Until then, KF will stay far less popular outside US than it could be.7) READING PDFs. Though AZW or mobi format is still much more comfortable, reading PDFs with Kindle Fire is a way better experience then with any other 6" e-ink Kindle. With the device in landscape mode, most A4 documents will be pretty fine to read - that additional 1" alone make a lot of difference... plus it is much easier and faster to scroll and zoom in/out when needed.8) READING COMICS. Pretty nice. Colors, easy and fast zoom in and out makes comic reading... well, maybe not perfect, but still a pretty enjoyable experience.9) COMPARISON TO OTHER KINDLES. The decision to use a standard capacitive touch screen is what makes Fire completely different from other Kindles, and puts it among tablets rather than e-readers. Is it a good or a bad thing? Well, depends on what you want to use it for. E.g. unlike other Kindles, you can watch videos and play games on your Fire just fine. It has a back-lit screen, so you can read from it in the dark without external source of light. Any screen operation is a way, way faster than with any other Kindle. And not to forget - it has colors! On the other hand, reading from any other Kindle that uses slow e-ink screen instead, feels way closer to reading from paper - has much, much less glare, and can be used to read in bright sunlight. E-ink also consumes so little battery that it can literary be used for a month without a need to recharge. Plus, a 6" e-ink Kindle is much cheaper even than Kindle Fire!But when it comes to reading there is still one very important area where Kindle Fire does a much better job than any 6" e-ink Kindle - reading PDFs! (I know, there is Kindle DX out there that handles PDFs quite well, but IMHO it is too large and too expensive to be considered an appropriate alternative).All in all, I am quite happy with my Kindle Fire. Good job with this one, Amazon. If you know what you want to use it for, are aware of it's pros and cons for that purpose, and are still considering whether you should get yourself one - I'd say: go for it. I am pretty sure you won't regret it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo fine we purchased another,January 15, 2012By&nbsp;PickyFlicky-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought one of early models last Thanksgiving. With updates and free apps it just got so great that we purchased another for my wife's birthday yesterday. With available apps we can watch movies and listen to every song from the from the i7 desktop (2 TB stored on it), play games acquired from the app store, word process while in the boonies, surf the Web, and read mobi file books (which are easy to transfer from your PC or acquire from Amazon. The following may sell some of you into purchasing a second Kindle Fire: The apps already purchased easily install onto the second Kindle via the Cloud, making it as upgraded as the first (and with no additional expenditure).I have only one complaint. The previous e-reader had all the books neatly stored in directories by author, but the Fire only works if you dump them all on top of each other in a single directory. I had to reorganize by retyping all the .mobi and .jpg file names, and since I have acquired over 1,000 e-books, that was a major pain!The bottom line is that this device is an unbelievable bargain, and with new apps it gets better every week. Make sure your wi-fi is working well.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle  Fire doesn't disappoint,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;amazonlyOld-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Fast browser and great color. The Kindle Fire is a great addition to the other Kindles we own. It is a nice size and easy to use.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product!,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;Brandon M. Baker(Ohio)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This was purchased for my 7 year-old daughter for Christmas. She loves it! She was easily able to transition from using an iPad to the Kindle Fire with ease. The device is very responsive and battery life is excellent! This is a fantastic tablet!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove Love Love my Kindle Fire,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;Lori L Tenn-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Received a Kindle Fire from my husband for Christmas and am so happy he did.  Has all thefunctionality I was looking for and it fits perfectly in my handbag!  He knows how much I like to read and how much I like fiddling around with electronic gadgets so it was right up my alley. The clarity is impressive and it is so easy to use. I would definitely recommend to others!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE!,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;browniesx5-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We bought this for my daughter at Christmas and just love it!  We would recommend this item!!!  Everyone in the family loves it!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEven better than expected,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;P. Woodland-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My wife and I each have original Kindles and have never really made full use of them.  This is certainly not the fault of Kindle.  It is just that advanced years make old habits hard to break.  I thought that buying the Kindle Fire might get us to try out the original Kindles more.I can't say whether that has happened but I am totally thrilled with the Kindle Fire.  I had a bad experience with a CRUZ reader that looks very similar to the Fire.  They could not be any more different.The Fire never drops the wifi connection.  The touchscreen is precise and responsive.  The overall quality and performance could not be better.  I have not read books or watched video on the Fire so I can not comment on those features.  I have several game apps loaded and they work flawlessly.I can not think of any negatives of the Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Review,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;ranco-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great product.  Had more features than I realized.  Easy to use and easier to read than a book.  I really like the fact that you can check out books from Amazon.  One per month and many other features if you subscribe to Kindle Prime.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire does what it is supposed to,January 16, 2012By&nbsp;Michael Ciance-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got the Kindle Fire for Christmas and it does everything Amazon says it will do.  I have gotten many free apps and books.  Is it an IPAD killer?  No, not really, but for $199 it is a great ereader and entry level tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's easy for a non techie to use.,January 12, 2012By&nbsp;KEN BEVIL-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a 54 non technically challenged man. This is easy for me to use. It will last a long time on a charge.  After setting it up, and searching through itunes books, and purchasing/ downloading a book:I made it 3/4 through James Patterson's new book "Private # 1 Suspect" before I had to recharge it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsnorjon_36054,January 14, 2012By&nbsp;John E. Norris-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I already had a Kindle e-reader (the kind with buttons) and I often wished it connected to the web.  I tried connecting under "experimental" and it connected, but was practically unusable.  When the Fire came out, I had to have one.  I have not regretted it.  If you have not had an Android device, there is a learning curve to figure out what the control icons mean, but then it's just a matter of swearing at it a sufficient amount of times until it becomes OK, just like all electronic devices.  I already had an Amazon Prime membership, which I bought when it meant nothing but fast and free shipping.  Then Amazon threw in streaming movies and 5G of cloud drive at no extra cost. The Fire has proved to be an excellent companion.  It plays music (my music or web music) for me while I read my favorite recently downloaded ebook (speakers are better than I expected - headphones are better than that), lets me check my email between chapters, acts as a flashlight (app for that) when I want to go to bed without waking my wife, and lets me surf the web or check the weather or Facebook without the hassle of firing up my laptop or desktop.  I do read quite a bit on it, and it's just the  right size for that.  It didn't come with a mini USB cable, which is necessary to access the Fire's storage by computer, but I found that the one I use to charge my cell phone works just fine. I tried Netflix and Amazon Prime movies, and it works great at home, but not in a hotel room (not enough available bandwidth at the hotel, I guess).  I have a couple of games, but playing games is not my thing, so they don't get used much. I loaded the pictures from our recent trip to Grand Canyon on the Fire from my computer, which the Fire could display one by one or in a slide show(holder's choice), using the included Gallery app .  I like  that I can start my music collection and it will play until the battery runs down, so I can take the music from room to room to keep me company without it shutting off. If you read much news, there is a USA Today app that works beautifully on the Fire. The Fire really is an entertainment device.  You can go from entertaining thing to entertaining thing very easily and often at the same time, and the 7" size makes it easier to read than a smart phone or Ipod and more portable than a larger tablet.  It's the right size for me.  By the way, the Fire has a free Pandora app and I like the "Yoga" station for reading background music (if you like New Age).One thing that does annoy me a lot is that I can't more easily get to the volume control when I'm playing music on the speakers while doing something else. It complicates things if I want to stop the music when the phone rings. The screen on the Fire goes blank after a while, but the music will still play (I have it set up that way).  To get back in and turn the volume down, I have to reopen the Fire, which is not that simple since I have it password protected. Also, once I get to the volume slider, it is not always immediately responsive.  There must be a better way.  So far the 8G of storage area has not been a problem, but I can see it becoming a problem in the future, if I want to begin loading more of my stuff on it.that being said, I'm really pleased with the Fire.  If it got broken, stolen, lost, etc., I would buy another one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIt's what I want with out all the bells and whistles,January 14, 2012By&nbsp;CorkiDeCat(Sonoran Desert USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have used the Ipod Touch for over 3 years and love it. But I only wished it was bigger for books and videos.  Now I have it for a decent price.  I am happy with the quality of the movies and love it for reading.  The apps need to catch up in quality to Apples versions (and I am sure they will), but through experience, 98% of those apps are not used after a few tries. Very Happy :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI Love It,January 14, 2012By&nbsp;A. William Benitez "A. William Benitez"(Austin, Texas)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As an avid reader, I love my Kindle and I purchased it way back when it cost almost $300. It still works great but once I read about the Fire I knew it was my next Kindle. So far I've read several books and do all my email including MS Exchange with sync and it is flawless. I've also installed a calendar and a notes app that work great.Last year when traveling to Europe I took my Kindle and a PC laptop to keep up with my email and watch movies now and again. This year I'm taking only the Fire because it handles everything I need to do in one compact package and the display and keyboard quality is excellent.I've read all the comparisons to the iPad and they make no sense to me. The Fire isn't an iPad and doesn't pretend to be. But, at one third the price it does everything I need to do and then some. Thanks Amazon for another great product.Bill BenitezHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOut of the park Amazon!,January 14, 2012By&nbsp;Thomas Reed-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Right off the bat the Fire is NOT an iPad junior. It wasn't designed to be an iPad junior, it isn't marketed as an iPad junior and it will never BE an iPad junior.Now that that's over the truth. This is one hell of a little device. It is not only great for reading but it does all the things I normally do on the 'net (read mail and check the weather - I know, I know - pretty mundane). AND it does them well. It's fast and responsive. I have to admit the built-in browser (Silk) simply isn't what Amazon cracked it up to be but it does the job and there are alternatives in the app store if you just can't stand it. Since I'm always in a wi-fi hotspot I do not miss having access to a 3G network. The app store is kinda limited compared to others but that is relative. Do you really need over 50,000 apps (or whatever the number is now)? I personally feel Amazon did a pretty good job of overlaying their take on Android. This is my first experience with any kind of Android op system and I don't have a problem with it. I've seen a bunch of websites where you can learn to 'root' the Fire if you are so inclined but imho why mess with a good thing? It is what it is and it is good just as it is out of the box.Oh yeah - then there's the price. If you find a better tablet for the price please let me know. I am so pleased with mine I already got another one for a friend. I feel that if you get one and give it a chance, without constantly comparing it to a device costing at least 3 times as much, you will be very pleased. (And yes I do have an iPad but the Fire is quickly becoming my 'go-to' device for quick access).Is the Fire perfect? Heck no. It is still a little 'touchy' on the home screen (way to easy to scroll over what you want to stop on) and the browser needs work. Apparently the Amazon version of Android isn't the greatest (that's for you to decide) but that will probably improve with future firmware updates from Amazon. And some people seem to have a little harder time reading on a back-lit screen as opposed to an e-ink screen. But all in all I love my Fire and wouldn't hesitate to get another if something drastic happened to it.If you need/want a tablet and don't have one why not give the Fire a try? It's a very good little device and, as always, Amazon is the very best about refunds and returns if you don't like it. (NO I do NOT work for Amazon! lol).Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starskindle fire,January 13, 2012By&nbsp;MidnightAura-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have only had my Fire for a week. I love it. It is easy to take anywhere, with so many books to choose from. I have been showing it off to many of my friends. Some have even made the decision to get one themselves.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI absolutely love it!,January 13, 2012By&nbsp;Vickeevel-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely love the Kindle Fire. My husband and I purchased it for Christmas for our 6 year old son who likes to read as well as play games. On Christmas night we were playing a racing game. It turned in to a "it's my turn; it's my game shouting match. The next day I went out and purchased 2 more Kindle Fire's. Currently we own 5 desk tops, 2 lap tops and 2 mini lab tops. We also own a Nook, 3 IPod Touches, PS3 and the WII. Needless to say, we have electronics issues. When I found the Kindle Fire I fell in love with it. It does everything that I want it to do.  You can read books, play games and watch Netflix movies. There are lots of free apps.  It's small and light weight, you can put in your purse or back pack. No matter where you are you have entertainment and for only $200.00 bucks what a deal.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAbsolutely love it,January 13, 2012By&nbsp;Jennifer Harfmann-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got one of these for Xmas, and I must say that I absolutely love it. A lot of people have been writing bad reviews because for lack of better words, it's not an Ipad. They're right. This isn't an Ipad. It's a Kindle, but has more than JUST reading on it. I originally wanted just a Kindle, but I'm really glad I got a Fire.Not only can I read books (Which I've already read 3- I'm not much of a reader, but this makes it more fun), but I also have the ability to use the internet, play games (As far as apps), listen to music. The storage on the Cloud is super convenient for all these things. A lot of people hate that they have to go through Amazon to do everything. Again, it's a Kindle. An AMAZON KINDLE. It's just like having to go to the Apple store to do things with anything "apple" related. If you're not wanting to use this for reading primarily, then go get a different tablet. If you don't like amazon, go get a different tablet. I love the Fire and personally wouldn't feel the need to have anything -more- than it has to offerMy ONLY complains:- The touchcreen works great. It's got a great picture on it. the only down fall is the backlit part of it (As with any tablet). Again, I've read q bit on it, and while you can change the background of whatever book you're reading, its still like reading off a computer monitor. After a while, my eyes would hurt and I'd have to set it down for a few before I picked it back up. I would also recommend getting a screen protector that is matted so that it reduces some of the glare. I'm not worried about the screen getting scratched, as it's made from a really good glass, but the glare can get annoying if you're reading.- The weight. It's pretty heavy for an e-reader. Now, I've never had an e-reader or tablet, but after a while, it gets pretty heavy to simply hold. I typically rest it on my legs, or on some other surface to give my wrists a break. I bought a case for it, which helps a bit.Overall, I'd give it a 9 out of 10. I haven't had really any glitches on it so far. It's frozen up on me two times at the most, but it doesn't take more than 1-2 minutes to restart it, so to me, it's not that big of a deal. And again, as long as I've had it, it's only 2 times. It's still a new product. Amazon is doing a great job at getting feedback about it, and like any electronics piece, it will have updates to run more smoothly. I don't see myself trading it in anytime soon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGood,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;A. Johnson-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I like the kindle fire but I find it hard at times getting certain sites to download. Also It needs a camera to make using the kindle easier for certain apps..Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - great for us Baby Boomers!,January 12, 2012By&nbsp;OneRun-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is easy to use and does everything I need. I like the size because it is so portable.  I like to use a stylus with my Fire since I don't have the best manual dexterity.  It's a lot quicker to use than a computer to check email etc and you don't have to pay  those exorbitant cell phone data plans fees since WiFi is usually readily available.  Also the E-reader is wonderful.  I find that choosing the beige background and turning down the brightness makes it easy to read without getting that eye fatigue you get from staring at a computer.  Most libraries now allow you to check out books for the Kindle so if cost is a concern you can still read for free. There are many free books and inexpensive books available at the Amazon store, too. There are plenty of handy free apps also.  You don't need to be computer savvy to love the Kindle Fire. "Try it, you'll like it!"Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;Phyllis Cheek-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am enjoying my Kindle Fire.  It has many great features that I have learned to use without difficulty.I have found one downside and that is that books that are downloaded onto the Fire, are missing whole pages.  This never happened with my other Kindles.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAn awesome gift,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;SirRichardCraniumIII-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off, the shipping and packaging were hands down amazing. Then once unpacked the Kindle fire was ready to blaze on as the greatest technological gift I have ever given! The lighted full color, full touch screen, burned on into the night. Awesomely fast wifi speeds made me think that it was powered by 1,000,000,000 jiggawatts! Again greatest gift I have ever given, that wasn't built by my own hands.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLOVE the Kindle Fire,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;Laura-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Kindle Fire for christmas and I absolutely love it!!! I was a little concerned when I saw some negative reviews, but I have been so happy with it.I think that even though you can't really compare it to an iPad, because that's not what it is, it still DOES a lot of things that I would want out of the iPad and for me personally, I don't feel I'm missing anything other than the larger screen size which is not a huge deal to me.I watch the amazon prime streaming movies/tv shows, netflix, I have downloaded tons of books for free with my local library card, and downloaded several apps. I love that they have a free app a day.One of the negative things reviews have said is about the power button being on the bottom... well you can just turn the kindle fire around so the power button is on top, it's really not a big deal. I do that when I'm reading so I don't accidentally hit it, although even with the power button on the bottom I have never accidentally hit it.The ONLY negative thing I have personally encountered with the Fire is sometimes the wifi will shut off and I'll have to reconnect. Also, when I had my dad at my house on his Kindle Fire and my brother on his laptop and we were all using the Wifi, it would seem to kick us off the internet sometimes. I'm not sure if it was due to the device though or my wifi. I haven't had any issues since. Has anyone else had this problem?I could go on and on but I wont repeat what everyone has already said... but ultimately I absolutely LOVE the Kindle Fire and would buy it again in a heartbeat!  It is well worth the price- you really can't beat it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,January 11, 2012By&nbsp;Charles-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I gave this to my wife for Christmas.  Needless to say it was a big hit.  She loves it and is constantly on it.  I don't think she even remembers that she has an android phone with the almost the same capabilities.  Definetly worth every penny and the Mrs. is very happy.  Awesome product. Go with this instead of any of the other pad products you won't be sorry.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA treasure!,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;I read therefore I am(Napa, CA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am so pleased with my Kindle Fire. I can order all kinds of merchandise from Amazon with one click and save on gas and bridge toll. I can read newspapers from around the world, I can listen to my favorite radio stations from Peru and France, I can surf the web, watch youtube, etc, etc. Thanks for a great product Amazon!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsRekindle with your kindle.,January 10, 2012By&nbsp;Cowboy's Cowgirl-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The price you pay for a Kindle Fire is $200, as opposed to samsung tablet, or any other tablet. Kindle blows the other products away for the price.Love the graphics. It does have a flashplayer, works great on Facebook. My husband tested it out, and played Farkle. The game played fine. The only downfall, which was a disappointment is there is no 3G Amazon Wifi. Buyer beware makes youcan only use it at home, or at a WiFi hot spot. However, the Kindle touch has Amazon 3-G WiFi built into it, I don't know why Amazon did not include this feature in the Kindle Fire.I love the size of the screen, it is perfect. I am used to having a lap top, and the touch feathure is taking me a little while to get used it. The power adapter that came with the Kindle Fire is wired adaptor (meaning the powercord is wired into the adaptor). I was disappointed that it didn't come with  a USB-type power adaptor.It does as advertised, lasts about 8 hours on a charge. If you are looking to just read books, and 8 hours isn't long enough to read your book, than the Kindle Touch will be your best choice.It has thousands and thousands of aps between Amazon AP Store, and Android AP Store, many of them are free. And the rest of th aps are very reasonably priced.The touch screen works great. I am really enjoying this product. The price is right, and the product works great. If you are looking for strickly an E-reader, buy the Kindle Touch, if you are looking for a combination E-reader and Tablet, then get the Kindle Fire, it's awesome.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet. Ditched Nook and bought a second Kindle Fire.,January 7, 2012By&nbsp;NatureBoy-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Very satisfied. Bought a Kindle Fire for myself, and a Nook Color for my daughter. Ended up returning the Nook and getting another Kindle. The Nook would freeze up; had a poor browser; and, a poor selection of apps.The Kindle Fire is fast and has not given me any real problems. My only complaint would be that the Fire is not recognized as an official Android device, so Google apps are not generally available from the Android appstore. Otherwise, a great all-around tablet for books, browsing, and applications.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsStudents: this tablet is a must!,January 9, 2012By&nbsp;StephLo-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As a 3rd year undergrad, I have no regret purchasing this wonderful tablet. It's small and scratch-resistant enough so that I can carry it around campus and, when needed, discretely pull it out during class to look up an email, syllabus, eTextbook, etc. (I feel like an iPad or laptop would be too large for this task). Since there is campus-wide WiFi, there really is no problem with connectivity; the web browser is really nice too, and I really appreciate that it supports flash. Plus, the display is so crystal clear that reading my PDFs and textbooks is super easy and enjoyable. Most importantly, it's a very affordable product, especially when considering the typical budget of a college student!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars3 1/2 -- I LOVE some of it and hate other aspects. Overall I am glad that I have it.,January 9, 2012By&nbsp;April Hendrickson "ady H"(tennessee)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off... I need to start by saying that I am glad that I got the kindle for Christmas. I have a regular kindle with keypad and we have a tablet plus any other electronic device that people may want so when the kindle option was presented to me I wasnt really wanting one. I was surprised at Christmas with it and I do like it. There are some things that I do hate with it however.I love the graphs on the fire. I could not ask for better graphics, content or speed when downloading. My daughter has all her music on it (contempary christian and children tunes like the chipmonks). I have amazon music on my palm pixi phone but was not able to "sync" it to the fire and ended up purchasing same songs again. The volume level is fine with me but my daughter plugs it into a separate "music bullet type of device" and jams out to music in her room. The movie selection is great! I definietely recommend becoming a "prime" customer. It is small enough that I can keep it in my purse and she can watch shows/movies when we travel. We havent really used our portable dvd player in the car since we got the fire.I love the books the same as I did with my keypad kindle but I love that I can see it at night, without an exteral light, while I am in bed at night. It may hurt some people's eye to read that way but mine have been good so far (knock on wood!). I HATE that it does not have the "read out loud" option on fire, like it does on my other kindle. I used that feature A LOT and miss it on the fire!! My daughter wanted it to read one of her books out loud to her just the other day and I had to explain that the fire doesnt do that like my other one. It is a shame that I have better graphics and a touch screen that is perfect for my preschooler but she can only have books read to her in the app books! There need to be more apps for read out loud children books since that feature was eliminated from the normal book part of the fire.The apps are great too! I am not big into online games and apps therefore I do not have much to compare to... but the ones that I play the most are great! And I have found many educational apps for my child. I am happy with the app store/amazon store selections.Sometimes the web takes a while to load (but I am using a mobile hot spot from my phone and downloading elaborate sites) and other times it loads quickly... once loaded the web is great. We go to sites like "bearville.com" and play online games. It is definitely not like playing on a lap top or desk top but... it works. (It doesnt work on our tablet - would love to hear how it works on various tablets, just to end my curiosity)It is a little awkward to hold. I think it is a bit heavy (not as heavy as a zoom) but a shock from the thin and light keypad kindle. I am constantly turning it off while reading! The placement of the power button is rediculous! I graze over it all the time while holding my fire in the bed at night and my daughter turns it off when she holds it against her stomach. It is very annoying. Plus it doesnt  seem to keep a charge very long -- or it defected and turns itself off all the time.So I am verrrrrry disappointed that it doesnt read that books outloud, almost outraged about it really. It seems like it was left out for greed... so that people will have to purchase read out loud apps. If they added a read out loud option and made all the book options equal or better than the regular kindles then I would upgrade to a fire2.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat!!!,January 9, 2012By&nbsp;Betty Jo "weezer"(USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received the Fire for Christmas and I LOVE it. I have read these reviews and cannot figure out what they are talking about. I have never accidentally turned it off and I hold in on my lap to read.The touch screen is very responsive and it is very fast. The colors are vibrant and the screen quality is wonderful.I am very happy and would purchase another in a heartbeat!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA keeper,January 8, 2012By&nbsp;Another Man of La Mancha-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have been using the Kindle Fire (and reading a lot of reviews about it) for a month. I purchased it as a trial. It is not perfect, but it is a great device that does many things very well, and  I will happily keep it. I will only review some of the features of this device as I have used them so far:- The wi-fi reception is really good wherever there is a consistent signal. I have seen no difference with my laptop (MacBook).- The touch screen is very responsive. Does it register every single tap? No, but it does most of the time, and I don't find it horribly inconvenient to have to repeat my taps every now and then.- I really like it as an e-reader. I also own a 3rd generation Kindle, and in general the Fire compares very well. True, it is heavier and has more glare. Unfortunately, I do a lot more reading in bed than on the beach, and for that I prefer having a backlight. I love the color and font settings, the dictionary function and the quick links to the web (Wikipedia) to find out more about some words. On the down side, the Fire does not allow changing the default dictionary or organizing books in folders, very useful features in earlier Kindles. This should be improved in a future update.- I think that Amazon advertisement overstates the case about the web browser, raising expectations to unreasonably high levels. Still, web browsing is quite fast and enjoyable (again, where there is a good signal). Flash audios and videos work very well, and the speed of access to many mobile sites (access to these can be set as a default) is actually impressive. The pinch-to-zoom feature works flawlessly, and it helps if you want to make sure you tap on the right hypertext link.- I am not a big game player, but I do test-play games I download for my kids. Of course, the quality of games is variable, but I have never found the Fire to be limiting in any way, and the controls are usually very responsive. Incidentally, I have not had any issues with my kids (seven and nine) using the Fire to purchase anything without my permission, but if they ever did, it would absolutely not be the Fire's or Amazon's fault, but my own. I sympathize with many other reviewers that have expressed this simple notion before. I will also add that the Fire is extremely useful in road trips with children.- Video playing is very good. The screen is relatively small, and I would always use anything bigger if available (a laptop, a desktop, a TV set), but it is still a perfectly enjoyable experience to stream a movie to the Fire.- Audio is a lot better than I thought. When listening to music, headphones or earphones are best for high quality sound, but I find the built-in speakers quite satisfactory if background noise is not too high. And the size of the Fire makes it possible to go around the house or to do yard chores while listening to your favorite music or radio show. The on-screen volume controls work perfectly fine, and I don't find the lack of volume control buttons to be a problem. Streaming from the cloud works very well.- The location of the power button seems to upset a lot of people. In a month of frequent use, I have hit the power button three times. I got an on-screen message asking me whether I was sure I wanted to shut down the Fire, which I declined. I understand that different people have different ways to hold a device like this one, but this is clearly not an unsolvable problem. And if you are buying any protective case, it will be more difficult to hit that button.- The battery life is acceptable, but not great. Depending on use, I found it to be between 6 and 10 hours. It seems to charge in 2-3 hours. I think there is room for improvement here in future versions.Overall, a very solid device that I can recommend to anybody as an e-reader, web-browsing device (only over wi-fi!), music player and game player.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat product for price.,January 8, 2012By&nbsp;Kayla-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So I got the Kindle Fire for Christmas and for the most part it was a great investment.  You can do almost anything a laptop can do. I am not an apple or Ipad anything so I cant compare it to that.  But I use this thing for everything and I absolutely looove it. I will say that the 3rd day I was using it, it froze on me.  I tried to hold down the power button to restart it but it would not do anything.  I was ready to pack it up and take it back but I went to the Kindle help and the power button needed to be held for 20 seconds, longer than most devices, which I am not a fan of.  It has been working fine ever since.  The only real complaint I have is that it should have come with a data cable.  I think that should come standard or the power cord doubles up as a data cord like my android phone.  I've been using it for a few weeks now and its an awesome product. Would recommend it to anyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle!,January 8, 2012By&nbsp;Aleta Payne(Wilkes Barre, PA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The best thing to happen to books, ever. I love the way it puts the books on a bookshelf, and keeps your page dogeared so that you can go back to where you left off. Haven't used the other features that much, just played around with them. Got it mostly for reading, and like the backlight so that you can read anywhere, even in the dark. I have some arthritis in my hands, and it is hard to hold regular books, but the Kindle is just perfect. I can prop it on my bean bag pillow and never have to touch it except to turn the pages. Can't afford too many of the bestselling books, but have read several of the free and 99 cent ones, and they were very good.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHAPPY! HAPPY!t,January 8, 2012By&nbsp;Pat D. In Austin, TX-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had an iPad for just about a year, and about the only thing it offers that the Kindle doesn't is 3G.  My Kindle is more convenient, respond faster, weighs less, and cost one third of the iPad.Amazon is easy to do business with, and really appears to care about customer satisfaction.  BUY ONE.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 stars95% Perfect,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;Karie Hoskins "karieh"(Everett, WA USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Pros:  The perfect size for portability, fast browser, easy to figure out, almost all of the apps I use, easier to read books on than I thought...Cons:  A camera REALLY would have been nice, the keyboard is a bit small for my fingers, and it didn't come with a USB cord.BUT - when I puchased a cord - documents transfer seamlessly to the right place.I really love this device and once I have a cover for it?  Will take it everywhere I go.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAWESOME!,January 5, 2012By&nbsp;kmtcke-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I didn't want to spend the money on an Ipad, my mother had just spent $1000 on hers, (insurance, sleeve, internet) I wanted something that has the same capabilities, only within my price range.  This does the trick.  I can do anything the Ipad does.  The only drawback is that you need to be in a hot spot or wi-fi area.  I can live with that and the fact that I am money ahead and still purchased the extra bells and whistles.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Christmas gift ever! (So far),January 4, 2012By&nbsp;Misha(West Haven, CT)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My boyfriend totally surprised me and bought me this for Christmas.  I had told him that I wanted to buy it and, with times being what they are, did not expect this to be what I unwrapped.  Let me tell you...it was EVERYTHING I thought it would be.  The picture quality is phenomenal, it is easy to use, and just a high quality product.  Searching and downloading content is a breeze.  Once you register with your Amazon account, you get a free month of Amazon Prime.  At first I was a little unsure about this, but now that I have used it, it is worth the $79 annual membership.  I do recommend getting a cover.  There are some reasonably priced ones on here.  And with the Amazon Prime, you get free 2 day shipping.  All in all, I am more than impressed with this product.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo Far So Good,January 4, 2012By&nbsp;Jai-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my kindle for a few weeks now and so far, so good. My sister has an ipad and I am not a tad bit jealous. I am loving the portability due to the size of my kindle compared to the ipad. I have all of the same apps and magazines that I loved on her ipad and am able to do everything I am interested in for hundreds of $ less. I know this is not comparing apples to apples but being that I was considering getting an ipad for myself prior to looking up the Kindle Fire I am quite pleased with my choice!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet for a great price!,January 3, 2012By&nbsp;Amanda-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was very impressed with the Kindle Fire! A family member of mine got one for Christmas and I have been playing around with it for a while, as I'm looking for a great tablet for myself.The Apps download quickly and with no problems whatsoever. It is no hassle playing games or using apps that you buy.WiFi is quick and easy to set up on the Fire. Once you receive your kindle fire, you can begin using it in minutes.Overall the Kindle Fire is a great tablet for those who just want to have a nice tablet to use in wiFi areas. And don't want to spend nearly $500-$600 on an iPad. You cannot beat the price!However...there are a few things that the Kindle Fire does not have.3G: If you aren't in a WiFi area you cannot access the internet, or use any apps that require internet use. This is because the Kindle Fire does not have 3G. This is not important to me though because often using internet with 3G can be very pricey. But, if 3G is important to you in a tablet, you should not purchase this tablet.Cameras: The Kindle Fire lacks a camera. So that means no Skype, video chatting, or taking pictures with it.Microphone: This also doesn't allow you to send voice messages or video chat.So if you don't want to spend a fortune, don't care if it doesn't have 3G, and don't care if it doesn't have a camera or microphone, then this is the tablet for you!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI'm in Love...,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;Bren-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Opening my package and turning on the kindle fire...just made me smile in happiness. I don't get happy much anymore so this was a huge treat for me.  The Kindle Fire is so neat and I love it!!!!  I just wish it never needed charging...lol  Getting free apps and books...who gets free stuff anymore...only us with Kindles that's who...isn't it grand?I do wish it came with more information on how to use all it can do...but I'm learning..and having fun.Thank you to who ever made the Kindle Fire and made it in a price range that I could afford. Love you dearly...Blessings and Love,BrenHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;Happy-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received the Kindle Fire for Christmas &amp; i'm in love with it! The endless supply of books, movies, internet, tv shows &amp; games makes it a definite competitor for the iPad. The only down sides are that it doesn't have a camera and can't be physically hooked to a computer; but there is a way to connect wirelessly using Amazon. Nice sound system, light weight, and very easy to use. Comes with Android programming so there's full access to thousands of apps.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire!,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;Joan(United States)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I must say that I was quite sceptical about this device until my husband bought it for me for Christmas. Now, it is my favorite gadget! The cloud storage let me download all of my music from Itunes. The only things I wish it had is bluetooth capability and it allowed me to watch all the movies I bought on Itunes; other than that, I am quite pleased. If these two things were fixed, it would get five stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsPlaying with Fire for a month,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;maheshg-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Now that I have owned  Kindle Fire for a month, it's time to  look back and document my own and only my own opinion about it. This disclaimer is necessary to not upset ipad fan club. This is not meant to compare Fire with any other mobile device in the market. To surmise my findings in one sentence - it's not very often that you get more than what you paid for. That's Kindle Fire for you.  How much more? It's up to every one to decide after reading this post. In my opinion Fire hits that sweet spot of providing you with adequate features with superior performance at a very very affordable price. It's no wonder Fire is flying off the shelf since its launch.I received the Fire in my mail after a month long wait time. I had placed an order on Amazon, immediately after the product announcement basically trusting the good reviews from analysts. Right from the time I opened the box I was hooked. Fire comes in a cardboard box with perforated edge that tears without help from scissors, there are no sticky tapes any where outside or inside the box. I was off and running in less than 5 minutes. The interface is intuitive and easy. It has its own quirks, but they don't  rob you of your quality time.First off, let's get out of our way some well documented and commented on 'lack of features of Fire'. They are, absence of any buttons other than power button. Not having  a button even for controlling volume is kind of annoying. The power button is at the bottom together with micro USB  port and a jack for headphones. Because of the unusual placement of power button, it's possible that Fire goes to sleep by holding it in your lap. But bringing it back to life is easy enough - sliding the switch on the screen like an apple device. The Fire is not exactly light and because of its very thin edges it's hard to hold it in a hand for a long period of time without touching the screen and without slipping through your hands. I would recommend Amazon to provide grooves or impressions/dents on the edges to make it easier to hold.Fire does not have a microphone, neither does it have a camera. So for all those skype fans this could be a serious issue.Now on to the best part.I have used the Fire so far to do almost all my online activities like reading my emails from various personal accounts, using social networks like facebook, twitter, linkedin, watching videos on youtube, carrying out banking, investing functions, listening to local radio channels and Pandora, downloading books and apps from Amazon, watching HD quality movies from Amazon, sending documents to kindle over an email. Without a doubt,  I am extremely happy and pleasantly surprised at its ease of use. The Fire boots remarkably fast, downloads web content at great speed, shows crystal clear images and videos. The screen rolls at a very fast pace showing the power of dual core processor, virtual keyboard is sensitive and fun to operate.The sound quality is acceptable and volume is loud enough for a noisy room. Streaming videos of movies and TV episodes works super fast and quality of the display is awesome.Now for the things I wish the Fire had -. I watch educational videos on you tube all the time. I really wanted  to download them to Fire, so I could watch them when I want and where I want, which according to my knowledge is not possible today. The Silk browser does not have any plug-ins that could perform this task. So you are back to downloading videos to your pc and then uploading them to Fire.Another missing feature is the absence of folder structure. The content is automatically classified and stored in different sections like video, audio, books, magazines etc, but you can't access those from any other section that the menu at the top. The folder structure like windows explorer doesn't exist in Fire today. This prevents you from organizing your content in your own way.Now for the quirks I found a little bit annoying. When you are watching youtube video in full screen mode and want to adjust volume, the only way you could make the volume adjustment bar to appear is to tilt Fire at an angle (sometimes but not always clicking the small arrow at the bottom displays settings. Why only sometimes is something I need to figure out). When Kindle senses that it needs to go to a portrait mode from a landscape mode or vice versa, it displays the settings at that time. Once you adjust the volume, the video restarts from the beginning and not from where you left it before adjusting the volume. I am sure, there must be some work around, but I haven't found that yet.Another important feature I think is important to mention is uploading of documents to Kindle. It could be done in two ways. One by connecting your other device like PC that hosts the document or by sending the document as an attachment to an email to your kindle email address. This email address is automatically assigned to you when you register the Fire. Getting the doc uploaded through this email address is something you need to get used to.As for the kindle applications. Although Kindle's ecosystem is still limited, it is expected to grow very fast. So far I could find all applications that I wanted like Facebook, Pandora, Radio streaming, Weather and most importantly Angry Birds - yeh!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsgood investment,January 2, 2012By&nbsp;nodakfarmgirl(centralusa)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire. But there are a few things that you should have made different. The power button should have be different. I keep pushing it off when I am working on something. Why wasnt it uploaded when I received  it in the mail? It took about a hour to do anyting with it. I also wish I could put a password lock on it.But I do like it, It reminds me of my IPOD touch, just bigger. The main reason I got is to download books.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love it! :),January 1, 2012By&nbsp;hoperss13-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I don't know why there are so many mixed reviews! I love my kindle and I'm using it to write this :) I use it for apps, music, and books!(And web obviously.) It's super fast and awesome! :) I'd recommend it to everyone!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGREAT PRODUCT... for the money,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;Sawyer Johnson-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The kindle fire is a great device when you consider the only other tablets you can get for $200 are cheap knockoffs. You shouldnt compare it to the ipad when comparing function because it will lose but should when comparing value because it will obviously win.Overall it is a great product that i would highly suggestHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFor the Daughter,January 1, 2012By&nbsp;Julie Sypniewski-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought the Kindle Fire for my 13 year old daughter. She loves it. Not only is she reading more but the ability to look up words as she is reading to find out their meanings so she can better understand what she is reading is a great feature. She also is using all other aspects of it. She loves it to the point where I have to limit the amount of time she is spending on it. Thank you for a great product. We are parents of the year for giving her this gift for Christmas.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThis was an awesome gift,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Kathy Birthisel(ALACHUA, FL, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased the Kindle Fire for my oldest Granddaughter for a Christmas gift.  She LOVED it!  Since I purchased it from my Amazon account, it was registered to me, but switching it over to her was SO easy.  She was so thrilled and excited, and absolutly loves the gift.  This gift made me a "cool" grandma.We couldn't be happier.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsTotally awesome,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;Circus Mom-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought this for my husband and He absolutely loves it. Great gift and very good size.He loves the wi-fi.Going from a nook to this was the best idea ever.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat color E-Reader, not a full tablet.,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;C. Best(NYC, NY)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I can't help but feel a lot of these negative reviewers were expecting this to be a full competitive tablet. It is not. This is a great low end tablet, and even better color e-reader! I bought this for my girlfriend and she absolutely loves it. She uses it everyday, whether to read books, magazines, or play some of the huge selection of apps available. The Fire does not compete with my Asus Transformer, but I knew it wouldn't when I bought it. It's not supposed to.If you're looking for a starter, or low end tablet that you can read many different types of periodicals, and play the occasional light weight game you should definitely get this!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)









3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNew Toy,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;M. J. Marvel "MNM"(Alabama)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just got my Fire the other day and must say I am loving it.  It is quick and simple to set up, and was using itwithin ten minutes.  Only real problem I have is the just having wifi which means I need to get a mobile hotspot device.  Besides that this is a great device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsJust what I needed.,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;MsButter-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)When purchasing new products, I read the worst reviews first, then make my decision based on whether or not I'm willing to take the risk.  In the case of the Fire, it was a gift, and one I am most definitely pleased with.I find none of the problems I read about in other reviews.  For example, one of the most concerning was password protection.  The fire is perfectly cable of being password protected.  It was the very first feature I found and activated and it works wonderfully.  I have to enter my password every time I use my Fire, even if only for the briefest of moments.Another common complaint was that you couldn't read all your books on the fire.  I also found this to be untrue.  There is some difficulty associated with getting certain titles to show on the fire, but it is not impossible.  In fact, this extra step is why I knocked my rating down to four stars.  Here is what I found, for titles that do not show up on your Fire, simply connect your Kindle USB cord directly to your computer, go to Your Account, Manage Your Kindle, and Download via USB.  If you follow the transfer tip that appears in gray, the selection will immediately appear on the bookshelf of your Fire.All in all, the only other complaint that I have about the fire is simply the choice of charging adapter.  I prefer the USB charger that comes with the other model Kindle's over what the Fire comes with (the old plug me into the wall kind, thankfully I have a regular outlet in my truck or long drives would suck), it makes life a lot simpler to be able to have a universal source.  Thankfully, everyone in my household has their own Kindle, so we have plenty to go around.This is an excellent device.  I wouldn't trade it for any other in the world right now.  If you are considering this but are concerned about some of the negative reviews like I was, there is also one other thing to consider.  The Kindle Fire (and everything else Amazon.com) is guaranteed, so if you don't like it, just print the return label and send it back.We Want It AllHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLoving it !,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;betsy biddle(EVANS, WV, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutly love my kindle fire! I am not a someone that reads alot so I just wanted a little something that I can play games on and WOW can you ever play games on the Kindle Fire! I give it a 5 star because there are 100's of games to choose from and many are free and there is a free app every day to check out. I recommend this little machine to anyone wanting something easy to use and by the way there is a ton of tech support if you can't figure it out. There is email,live chat or live person by phone if you need them which I needed all at first. It is super easy to use but I am kinda stupid when it comes to new things so I needed a little  help at first and they were always super kind and understanding.Hope everyone enjoys their new Kindle like I have....Betsy B in West Virginia......Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsenjoy it,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;jose-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So far so good. It is good for the price comparing to samsung or apple. I agree with someone about the battery, wish it can be longer. In all I enjoy it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEverything I expected,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;SimpleAtheist-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had the Fire about a month now and it is awesome. I haven't noticed a big delay with the web browsers as some reviews have implied.  Been sticking with free apps mostly and I really enjoy the amazon app store and their integration into most amazon products. Books, movies, mp3, and games are excellent.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery Nice!,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Mick-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)No complaints at all. Well worth the cost. It is not a laptop computer, but then again, it is not being marketed as one. For reading e-books, watching movies and playing games it is fantastic!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire WOW,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Mary E-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is my very first electronic reader and I am having a great time learning all of its features.  I have read one book so far, much nicer than carrying a book around..  I hope to continue having fun learning.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsfire,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;greg-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)excellent!i love it! exactly what i wanted for reading and surfing the net, music and video. the download is easy. i still have to play more with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love my Kindle Fire,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;catsch(AZ)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my fire on the release date and have used it every day since. My intention was to use it mainly to access the web but I love watching TV programs and movies on it and playing games. The e-mail app is fabulous; i didn't expect it to be so easy to use. I definitely didn't expect to use it for reading (I love my KK) but reading in the dark without worrying about attaching the light is a wonderful thing. My poor Kindle Keyboard must be feeling a little jealous because I've hardly used it since i got my Fire. :-)I think it's interesting that so many people seem to expect the Fire to work without a hitch all the time. My laptop has hiccups occasionally and so does my desktop so why would i expect my Fire to work to perfection every time. It does what it promised, entertains.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE the Fire!  Can't beat it for the price!,December 17, 2011By&nbsp;C. L. Newman(Brook Park, OH  USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased a Kindle 2 over 2 years ago and loved it!  I was anxious to upgrade to the Fire, and received it about a month ago.  So far, I am a VERY HAPPY Fire user!!  I can watch videos via Netflix, read a book, check my email, surf the web and play Angry Birds all on the same device. The only negative for me is that I miss the text-to-speech option for reading books.  I'm hoping Amazon will read this and consider pushing an upgrade to add the text-to-speech (other Kindles have TTS) to the Fire.People who give the Fire low marks because it doesn't do what an Ipad does need to think before they buy...  the Kindle Fire is $199... the Ipad starts ay $499.  I would love to have an ipad, but considering the cost difference, I'm very happy with the Fire.  The screen on the Fire is smaller than the ipad, but it does many of the things.  If you want a ipad buy a ipad, but if you want a really cool tablet that does a lot of the same stuff the ipad does but costs a lot less, buy the Fire.Finally, if you are looking for a Kindle to use for reading only, you'll probably be happier with one of the other Kindles that use e-ink.  I think it's easier on the eyes and can be read in bright sunlight.  If you're looking for a device that is an ereader and a whole lot more, get the Fire... you'll love it!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFor the price it is a great device,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;BW-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really like mine.  Sure it has a few issues well documented in reviews by others, but some of those will probably be addressed in the next update.  I think I would prefer a 10inch screen for browsing, but for apps and reading, 7 inches works well.  For now I'll pocket the $300 savings.  I have an iPod Touch too, and for the same $200 I much prefer using the Kindle.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle Fire but have one little issue.......,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Debbie Diaz-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Having a great time with my new Kindle Fire.  My husband bought it for me and I was delighted.  I have a Kindle 2nd generation and have been a big Kindle fan.Unfortunately, the only flaw with Kindle Fire is that I see when you go to your library and hit the menu button there is no selection for "Book Description" as was in Kindle 2nd generation.  I did call the Customer Service just in case I wasn't going to the right screen.  She confirmed that they did not have that option on the menu.  For those of us that have almost 300 books in our libraries, this is a bit of a pain.  My option is to go to manage kindle and look up book I want to read there.  If any changes are made to the Kindle Fire, I strongly recommend that you include book description.  Thank you.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE!!!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Allsman "allsmanfam"(Marysville, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire. I got it to mainly play games, watch movies, check facebook, read books, get email.. I am extremely happy with my kindle fire. I haven't noticed any issues with the touch screen. Nor have I ever turned it off when I haven't meant to. I seem to remember where the sleep/power button is and avoid it. I am happy with the apps on the fire, so much fun to play, clear screen and never really a delay. I love that I can read my magazines on kindle, sometimes I have problems with an app not opening, I think that is an app issue not a kindle issue. I don't mind not having an SD card, or a camera, or any of that other stuff. The Kindle Fire has met and exceeded my expectations.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing for the price,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Zao Huang(Arlington, VA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For the cost of the Kindle Fire, it's amazing. I don't really need something to replace an iPad, so this thing is the best option out there. I was worried about it not being able to lock, but 6.2 took care of that. People also complain about not being able to customize the screen, but to be fair is that really that big of a deal? Amazon Prime isn't the great thing out there, but for $75/year, you can't really beat it.The battery life is a little short. People have complained about it using a micro-USB cord. Who in this day or age doesn't have a smartphone? Minus the folks that have an iPhone, who probably wouldn't buy this product any way, most if not all smart phone are going with micro-USB, so I'm pretty sure you have a micro-USB cable lying around to sync with a cord. I don't see why you would ever need to, considering the cloud UL/DL is pretty amazing.The screen resolution is great, but it is a little sensitive. I have no problem typing with it, and i don't have dinky hands. Fat fingering really isn't an issue with it.I love it. Great buy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;AuntOh-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Prior to ordering, I did my research, read the specs and, low and behold, the Fire does everything it was advertised it could do!  I am absolutely in love with it!  Streaming tv and movies is great.  I *do* read on it but for heavy-duty reading, I still use my Kindle eReader.  For those who wonder, it is a tablet, therefore it *is* like looking at a computer, so you will get the glare and the backlighting.  Magazines and newspapers look fantastic and navigation is very intuitive, PLUS no mess laying around the house.  Highly recommend!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsmy son's Christmas present,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;jimmv-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm typing this on my son's Christmas present. I can't leave it alone. It will be well broken in by the time he opens it on that magic morning. This device is awesome for $200. All of the issues being reported are non-issues for me and I'm sure will go unnoticed by my son. Seriously, people are complaining about no physical volume control??? I like it the way it is, one click and I'm at the volume slider. I didn't think I would get the prime, but now I know I will. You get so much more for your average of $7.40 a month, than netflix.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire  Is Great,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;Johnny Mike Mcinturff-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire has a lot more strong points than weakness. Some of the negative reviews I have read I don't agree with.It does everything I want it too with a great price of $199. What you get for the money can't be beat.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazon at its Best.,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Michael S. Bell-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the kindle fire mainly because I shop Amazon for just about every thing. Now day 4 with the fire i have seen some flaws. But I have tried every tablet on the market, and everyone had a flaw. To judge a tablet you must take everything into consideration. What do you want with your tablet? Me I wanted no contract,no hidden costs, I wanted a device for what i needed. That is where the Kindle Fire shines. If everyone goes by the flaws of a product, than you might as well get rid of all your device's! Here are some examples..The PS3 got hacked and affected millions of users.The Xbox 360 Had the red ring of death. Many Plasma TV'S had problems with burn in. The I phones Had there share of Calling problems with there connections. So this is the point.. Not every device in the world is perfect. The kindle Fire has its flaws, But in my opinion is one of the products I have bought. I own a lot of Device's, being a so called Trust Fund baby, allowed me access to lots of products. So my advice to people out there.. try it first.. do lots of research, on both the product and the company that made it. It all boilies down to what you want. I wanted  a tablet with no contract,no 3g or 4g,small enough to hold in on hand, and access to music,movies, and games on the go.Everything I bought on the Kindle Fire,The movies,games,books,and music are mine! I can take my Fire with me anywhere! And I don't need to sign in or need a WiFi signal to access my content. With no contract I don't have to worry about going over my mb limit. And with all the WiFi places out there who needs 3g or 4g or a contract!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsgreat media device,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;Robert Berryman(Vicksburg, MS)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my KF for a couple weeks now and love it.  I read a very negative NYT review that was a great reminder of just how out of touch that paper can be.  I still believe there is no better newspsper published anywhere, but from now on I will probably ignore any technology reviews they might publish until they quit paying idiots to write them.  I was fully aware that I was not getting a 7" iPad, and it's hard to understand how the NYT could NOT have known that.  I think the reviewer probably just doesn't like Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsOverall a very pleasant experience,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;R.Lee-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've been enjoying my Kindle Fire for about a month now and overall I am very pleased with the device. I know some people have criticized the size, but I really like the form factor. It easily fits in the chest pocket of my suit or sport coat, which makes toting it around throughout my busy day a real breeze.As far as the availability of apps, I am fairly satisfied with the apps contained within Amazon's app store. I have not yet tried to install any apps from other sources, although I understand that the option exists.My main complaints are basically the same that have been expressed by many others about sometimes sluggish performance or locking up. Also, the Fire is a bit heavy for its size and would definitely be more convenient to hold unsupported if it  were a few ounces lighter.  One design choice that I am not happy about is the decision to make the default vertical orientation with the power button, headphone and usb port on the bottom of the device. Most apps seem to support rotating the device. 180 degrees, but that is not always the case. Sometimes I'll have earbuds in the headphone jack and/or charging the device while using an app that I want to view holding the device vertically, so having the ports on the bottom is not ideal. And finally, the Max volume for the external speakers is inadequate at times.Overall, for the price, I don't have any regrets about my purchase and would not hesitate to get a Kindle Fire if I had a chance to do it over.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Device for the Money,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;adang-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is an excellent device for users who want to read books, play games, watch movies (both amazon content and netflix), and much more.So far, I have found the battery life to be great, but watching movies will definitely reduce that length.  The interface is easy to use, and the lack of hardware buttons had not been a hindrance to me yet. If you are an Amazon Prime member (which is free for the first month), the content on the device is fantastic.  You can watch unlimited TV and movies, and check out one book from the Amazon Lending Library for free a month.  In addition, don't forget to visit the app marketplace once a day for your free app.  If you are looking for something that is not available for free, odds are it is available from Amazon for a price.Now for the things that need improvement:1) The sensitivity of the touch interface needs improving.  Sometimes clicking on an item in the carousel is frustrating.2) The selection in the app marketplace is not quite robust yet.  This will improve over time.3) The items on tne carousel are not customizable (this is supposedly changing in an update).4) The power button is in a terrible place. However, this is not a problem if you have a case.5) There is no calendar app out of the box.Many have argued that there are no volume buttons, but this is not really an issue for me as they seem to work great.Finally, I will mention that I have no need for a camera, bluetooth, or dedicated 3G since I have a cellphone for all those functions.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove this thing,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;beck n sf-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had a 2nd generation Kindle for a couple of years. Seriously debated getting a Fire. Finally bought one from Amazon. I cannot keep my hands off of it. I am thrilled with the ease of use, "intuitiveness," beauty of the screen watching streaming videos. I rarely watch Tv now. I never thought I'd say that.Thank you, Amazon.  This Fire delivers. It is everything I wanted it to be with a dose of extra spark. This thing rocks.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove it,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;Nicole NN-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have a Kindle 3g  and I love it, so I thought I'd get the Fire too. For me, they both have their place.  Outside in the hammock I prefer  reading off the 3g, it is lighter weight and one handed page advancing , does not get glare on the screen. The ability to go online and check email, etc is terrific on the Fire, and that it is backlit is great for night reading in bed if my husband is sleeping. I suppose some can turn the page on the Fire one handedly, but I cannot. The touch screen is hard for my arthritic fingers to hit exactly the spot I want when typing or clicking online, but that is ME, not the product.. I  did not think I would get into an electronic gizmo to read, I am a big reader and fan of books, but I have to say when I tried the Kindle, I wondered why I had held out. Instead of taking 3 books outside or in my purse, I take one...Kindle. Love it Love it Love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHave had my Fire for a month now,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;Hoosiermama "Mary Loveless"(Indianapolis, In USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I've had my Fire for about a month now, and find that I love it! I had a K2, which I recently upgraded to a Touch (gave the K2 to my son), so I do the majority of my reading on the Touch. I do some reading on the Fire, though, and it's especially nice when reading before bed, because I don't need a light on the Fire. I absolutely LOVE the Prime movies, and have watched three of them, that I had been wanting to see. The video quality is excellent, and streams nicely. We have a SLOW DSL line (considered high speed, but it's the lowest speed that's considered high speed, and all that's available to us), and movies stream without any pauses, even when I watch in the other end of the house from our wireless modem.It has a good variety of apps from the Amazon store, but I do wish I could access the Amazon Market without rooting (I have no intention of rooting and losing the Prime movies). I can sideload apps from GetJar, though, and that has worked well. I'm one that likes Amazon's interface, but I do look forward to being able to edit what's in the carousel. I've always stored my music in Amazon's cloud, so my music is there and ready for me.I didn't buy this device in place of an Ipad. I bought it for what Amazon offers, knowing that it's limited by wifi and storage content. I am usually in a wifi area (home or work), but did take it with us on a vacation last week. It worked flawlessly, connecting easily to wifi networks in three different hotels. Much, much easier to travel with than a laptop. I haven't had issues with the on/off button that others have complained about. Storage hasn't been an issue for me. I have one movie on it, and multiple apps, and still have almost 5 gigs of storage left, so at least for now, storage isn't an issue for me.To be honest, I had never had an interest in an Ipad or other tablet. I have a smartphone and a laptop, and really didn't see the value in spending $500 for a tablet. With the Fire, I have a $200 tablet that does what I want it to do. It's more of a play device, and I use the desktop and/or laptop for more serious things. The Fire has been much more than I expected. When I bought it and the Touch at the same time, I wasn't sure if I'd keep either of them, but I was curious about them. I not only kept the Fire, but have ordered another as a Christmas gift.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLOVE My Kindle Fire!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;offthevinegirl-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I always expect the naysayers and complainers to come out of the woodworks when a new product is released. I have no doubt those complainers want more volume control and the fastest browser ever created. With that said...I LOVE my Kindle Fire and it does exactly what I need it too. For $199 you can't go wrong. The few software glitches that are being overhyped, I am sure can be updated by Amazon. All in all I recommend it for those looking for an affordable tablet that can be used for surfing the web, reading and streaming videos. I personally have had NO issues with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - Fabulous First Try,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Karen(KOKOMO, IN, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Is it perfect? No. Is any technology perfect first time out? No. Okay Apple lovers...iPad was close, still...But the Kindle Fire is perfect for me. Who am I? I'm the person who loves technology, am pretty good at using it but not a "techie", though my friends would say I am. I'm not a "power gamer", actually I don't do much gaming at all but I love to catch up on movies and TV shows that I've either missed or want to see again. I like to keep up with my e-mail or be able to look something up on the web while in the recliner watching TV. I love to read but will keep my Kindle Keyboard to do that on most of the time. Most important of all I don't have $500 at a time to drop on new toys. Especially new toys that will be "new and improved" in a span of a few short months. I often eat out alone and love to take the Fire with me and watch "24" TV episodes. Of course I always make sure to go where there is WiFi. Do I want or need 3G or 4G? No, I can't afford the cost of it and as long as there is free WiFi why pay? Is it sometimes unresponsive, yes but so was the iPod Touch I sold when I bought the Fire. For me the Kindle Fire and an Amazon Prime membership are just perfect and should remain so until maybe third generation.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery nice - just be realistic about what you are buying,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Audrey Apfel(Stamford, CT USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was looking for a full color, multi-functional, Amazon-optimized Kindle device for my personal use that was within my price point. And guess what? I got it. Sure, it's not perfect, but the value for the price works for me so I give it 5 stars. I can get it to do what I want it to. And it looks really nice. I knew it wasn't an iPad, a PC, a full Android tablet, etc. Life is good if you don't try to make it something it's not. It's an Amazon consumption device.I read Kindle books as a supplement to a physical book. Reading Pride and Prejudice right now. I have a stack downloaded.I read several newspapers and magazines and got tired of the clutter. All on the Kindle now.I can grab a look at a web site or my email when another device isn't handy. I use Evernote to record quick things so I don't have to worry about which platform I am on.I can while away the time playing Angry Birds or Scrabble with Friends. And video and music plays very well.All the other stuff Amazon provides is gravy. I was already an Amazon Prime customer so they've hit me where I live.Do I care that others can see what is on my Carousel? No, not really. For this price, let them get their own Kindle. And Amazon is fixing that anyway. Is it a little tough to get the touch screen to respond correctly? Yes sometimes, but just "pinch" the screen bigger and it becomes a whole lot easier.For 200 dollars? Cool.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNo problems here!,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;B. Bowerman-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Granted, this is my first pad device I've ever purchased, but I've not had a moment's problem from the Fire.The screen gets a bit figety when the battery gets down to 15% or less, but any other complaint I could have possibly reported here has already had a fix announced coming within the next two weeks.I bought one for my wife for Christmas because it was the one thing she said she wanted. I had no idea that it was a full mini-tablet pc, thinking it was just a book reader. Once it arrived, I opened the box to inspect the device, turned it on, started playing with it, and now I'm buying myself one.It's no replacement for my desktop or my laptop computers, but then, that's not what it's meant to be.It's a light weight, fun little gizmo that plays games, has fun and useful aps, and lets me take several of my favorite books around with me where ever I go.The sound is far, FAR better than I was expecting, and even better when using headphones.I'd tell anyone that asked to buy one.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat for retirees,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Allen Holmes "Retired Math Professor"(Wabasha, MN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Although physical ailments are slowing me down, my mind remains active and alert. What a blessing it is to have an iPad, an iPod Touch, a Kindle reader, and now, the Kindle Fire. I love them all. I enjoy the graphing calculator apps on the Kindle Fire. It is a fantastic reader, especially on dark winter days. I love listening to Pandora, Tune in radio, and streaming old time radio.  I especially enjoy looking at maps and researching facts as I read books.  The power of Internet browsing is remarkable. And I for one, am pleased that there are now low priced alternatives to these devices. The iPod Touch and Kindle Fire are my two favorites. I enjoy recording folk songs with my son who lives 1200 miles away. (We use Garage Band on our IPods.) It's a privilege to own both.Thank you so much, Jeff, for providing a great new option to tablets- especially for senior citizens.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars5 stars for fire,December 14, 2011By&nbsp;Alias Junkets-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire was never built to be an Ifruit killer. It was designed to be a lower cost portable entertainment device. Its main function is to watch and stream videos, play some games, check your email and surf the web a bit. That is not to say you cannot use other applications to do work and other things but those are more added bonuses then primary objectives. The movies play wonderfully, the applications run smoothly and web surfing has been painless so from my perspective in this price range they have a real winner with the Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love mine,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;T. Gagas(Colorado USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had the first and second kindle that came out. I knew this one was going to be better but I am impressed by how much.  It goes everywhere with me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsK-Fire Rocks,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Carlos D.-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle fire was everything i wanted it to be. Fast web browsing, netflix movies stream well, great for shopping online and magazines look great on screen. For the price it can't be beat!! Thanks Jeff B!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsForget the naysayers,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Jen-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire! Bought it at walmart and love love love it. I have a desktop computer, a laptop, and a smart phone already. Anything this kindle doesn't do, or doesn't to perfectly is almost certainly something that one of my other devices will do. I bought the kindle fire because I wanted a small tablet that would fit in even my small purses, be light and simple to carry, and would have a plethora of apps and options. The kindle does this perfectly and uploading to it via the cloud is AWESOME. I never have lag time like others are complaining of with either the screen or the web. Partly it may because my wifi is the fastest roadrunner internet that brighthouse offers so my net is lightning quick. I bought a few books, my kindle makes reading them easy and enjoyable. I also am a member of a local library which participates in the kindle lending program so my book options are wonderful. My only caveat is that I wish the kindle offered gps services. I would love to use google nav on the awesome 7 inch screen and turning my phone into a wifi hotspot would certainly allow this if only the kindle supported it. Nevertheless I am more than extremely happy with my fire, it is amazing. Great buy for only 199.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes everything I expected,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;brownj-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I didnt buy this product to be a I-pad substitute. I am happy with this Kindle Fire and everything it can do. It looks to be built solid and put together well, the system operates fast and does not stumble on any apps.I have read some very negative colums but dont believe until you see.Fast downloads, good conection, fast app loading , no problem.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Lights My Fire,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;BobbyG-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I read a review online today in which the author stated that the Kindle Fire would soon go by way of the dodo bird (or words to that effect).  He must own stock in Apple.  Anyway, yes, the Fire has some minimal glitches that need to be worked out, but that is to be expected with any launch product.  And - no - it is not an iPad, but neither does it have the pricetag of an iPad, and I found that especially appealing.  For me, the Kindle Fire does exactly what I expected...and then some.  I can stream Amazon and Netflix videos, I was able to upload "most" of my iTunes library to my Amazon Cloud, I can read books and magazines and newpapers, and I can surf the web.  I knew going in that it didn't have a camera, but that was not a deal breaker for me.  Some people complain about the size, but for me, it's great; it fits in my purse and I can carry it with me wherever I go.  The long and the short of it is:  I'm VERY happy with my Kindle Fire and look forward to any upgrades Amazon may offer in the future.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsEnjoy it!!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Donna K. Koch-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really enjoy my Kindle Fire.  It is easy to keep up with my Fire and my son's Kindle Touch.  I use it to read books and to surf the internet.  I even ordered pizza over it!  :)  It is not meant to be an ipad.  Just nice ereader with some perks.  When mine is sluggish, it usually means I need to clear the browsing history and then it is fine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE my Kindle Fire!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Jeffrey E. Burich-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my new Kindle Fire and feel it does everything that they said it would do.  I hate seeing the negative feedback on Yahoo about this product.  Can't anyone be satisfied!!?? This is a good product and Amazon does a wonderful job.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWe really like the Fire,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Les-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We already have our share of family laptops and smart phones so this is our first tablet.  Did not want to spend the hundreds for a "full service" tablet like Apple, and decided to roll the dice on this "economy" version.  You get what you pay for, and we are very happy with that.  Does a fine job for movies, TV shows (some relatively free with Prime at $90/year) or others with rental or purchase fee.  The reader is fine and we are pleased with the apps and browser.  We are not big on games and never planned to use it for major work projects, so if you are looking for an economy tablet, it is great.I think those who are complaining thought it would have most of the features of an expensive tablet, but for half the price.  Get real.  You do get what you pay for, but in this case, that is fine and I give it 5 stars.  In fact, ordered a second one the other day.  No regrets although it would be nice if it had 3G or 4G connection, but not a critical issue for us.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOh For Heaven's Sake!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;D. O. "penguinicity"(Virginia, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire, it is awesome!  It is a personal entertainment device that works perfectly for that purpose.  I read a little, watch a few videos (free from Amazon Prime) browse a few websites and play a few games.  That is what it is for, and that is what it does, beautifully.  I use it everywhere, in bed, on the sofa, in the coffee shop, even at my desk at work!  Yes, the volume is a little weak, but I use headphones and have no problem.  It is not a big deal that the volume can't be controlled externally on the device.  And the on/off switch has NEVER been a problem for me, I have a cover on my Kindle, and I have never accidentally bumped the switch.  If you need an Ipad, buy one.  If you want a perfect little entertainer, this is it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAwesome gadget, Great price,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Urban, C.-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)You have to know you are not buying a tablet PC or an iPad. This is an e-reader that runs Android and has a web app. For these functions it works well.Had this for a month now and been very pleased. I have big sausage fingers and have had no problems with the touch input. The battery life is pretty darn good. No problems with the WiFi connection. All apps run smooth, and you can also read books! (I like the black screen/ white text w/ the font bumped up one point.)You cannot get apps from the Google Android Market, you have to get them from Amazon. There is no direct access to the device storage. If you are creative you can work around both of these without hacking into the thing.The biggest seal of approval is that my wife has now stolen it from me. We will probably end up ordering a second one, though it would be nice if we could just switch back and forth between accounts. That would earn it the 5th star. However, it does get extra merit for surviving extensive use by my niece and nephew - including a 5 foot drop! (Not recommended.)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsI love it,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Mike-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just read an article on Yahoo stating that there are so many issues with this.  First, it says there is no external volume control, so what, there is a way to change volume, just tap the top of the screen.  Next, the power button is easy to hit, i personally have not had that issue, ever.More complaints about the privacy, saying that a wife or children can see all of your browsing history.  Whats different on a regular computer, if you look at porn or something, your wife or kids will see that you went there.  You can clear your browsing history just like on a computer.My one and only thing that bothers me a little, is that to clear your history you have to individually click on each item to delete it.  maybe i just havent figured out how to delete all yet.Is this as good as the iPad?  probably not, but is it as good as 1/3 of the price of an iPad, DEFINATELY.  The amount of movies and books that are completely FREE is incredible.  The quality of the movies is great, and i was amazed that there is no buffering while watching a streaming movie.I use this kindle for books, movies, games, and internet.  it is absolutely perfect for all of these.  for 200 bucks you cant go wrong, just dont expect it to be a top of the line laptop, thats not the point.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThis is a great product!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Christine M. Ponak(Charlotte, NC United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my Kindle Fire! It goes with me everywhere. I like how it connects to the web instantly and I can download apps or books. I can keep track of the weather in my town and know what to expect. I especially like the lock password on the Kindle Fire as no one can get into it but myself. I was surprised when I received the Fire as it already had my 300+ books on there and the storage space only took up to 6%. What can I say. I love my Kindle Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet for the price,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;P. A. Sugg(Memphis,TN)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my fire for about a month now, and while it took some getting used to, I have to say I am really enjoying it. I use it primarily for reading books and watching videos that I have purchased through Amazon. I use some of the Android apps, and surf the internet occasionally.I was worried that reading on a backlit screen would be difficult on my eyes, but I can adjust the brightness to a level that does not cause any discomfort. However, I also do not read for more than an hour or so at a time. I have many e-book titles and this is one of the main reasons I got the fire.I purchase many tv shows and rent most of my movies from Amazon. I love that I can purchase them through my blu-ray player or my fire and through the cloud, I can watch them on either device, and even my pc. I can also download purchased movies or shows to my fire and watch them when I travel.I have found that not having 3G is not an issue for me because I can download the entertainment that I need and if I have to pull a website I can just use my iphone. As far as the speed for loading web pages, there are times when it takes longer to load pages, but it really isnt that noticeable. I don't think it is any slower than my iphone 4.Not having an external volume control can be annoying. But, once I get it to the level I need, I don't have to continually adjust it, so it isn't that bad. I have also noticed that the touch screen does have some delay at times. When I touch a link from a Google search, sometimes it takes several taps for it to recognize it. And I do not have fat fingers..You will have to view web pages on the horizontal view. And, you will have to zoom in to many of the web pages you are viewing. This can get annoying as well, but you should expect that with a 7" screen. It is also somewhat difficult to move between applications. I am used to being able to swtich back and forth between apps very easily with my iphone, so it has taken some getting used to.I have seen some complaints about the privacy with regards to the history of the content you have recently viewed. For example, If I pull my bank info, once I close out of the page, the last screen shot will appear on my home page's history for anyone who picks up the kindle after me to see. However, if you clear your web history, the pages will not show up on the home screen. It is a bit of a hassle, but it's a limitation you can get around.For $200 this is an incredible tablet. I use it daily and I am very pleased with it. I rated it a 4 star because there are some limitations that I believe could be addressed. If you are an Amamzon prime member, which I am not, this is really a must have device. You have access to many more videos and tv shows for no extra charge, as well as a great book lending service. If you use Amazon regularly, which I do, then I would highly recommend this tablet. It is not better than an iPad by any means, but for $200, it is a great device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFantastic 7 in Tablet for $199!,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Mike "Mike"(Boston, MA USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I notice some recent negative articles from news services and decided to comment on them.  I will also give my experience and help you decide should you get a Kindle Fire.Many of these articles are basted on comments and a report by Mr. Jakob Nielsen.  Mr. Nielson comments on the Kindle Fire are interesting in that he states the 7 inch screen of the Fire is too small when compared to the iPad.  But a little latter he states the Fire is too heavy and you need the arms of PopEye to hold it.  He said nothing about the Fire weighting a lot less the iPad.One of Mr Nielsen examples of privately concerns was a husband cheating on his wife! #?@Mr. Nielson report is based on input from only 4 people, at least half of which appear to be Apple fans.  According to his Bio, Mr. Nielson is a principal of the Nielsen Norman Group which he co founded with a former VP of Apple computer.Anyway, should you get a Kindle Fire or not?The bottom line is, what the user really does with a tablet, not what he think they will do.  IMO, today's tablets do not have the computing power of a laptop and I use my laptop for serious computing.  For me, and I'm sure many others, the Kindle Fire is an excellent chose for a tablet to supplement a laptop or home computer.I use my Kindle Fire mostly for the following in the following order:1. Surfing the internet when I'm on the couch or in bed, I find the size of the KF perfect for this and I have none of the problems Mr Nielsen talks about.  I have my FK configured to always use the desk top browse view when a site also has a mobile view.  I use my FK horizontal when what I reading span most of the page and use the FK vertically when the web story has ads on the sides of the story.  Sometimes links are too close on a web site but I simply zoom it when this happens and I want to link to some place else.2. Play games.  I know this is a waste of time but I do it anyway.3. Read some eBooks.  I am not a big user of eBooks but the FK give be a good size for this.4. Finish a stream video I was watching on my HD TV when I go to bed.Typical, electrons are updated about once a year and I expect the Kindle Fire will be the same.  However, software is updated more frequency and Amazon will soon (if not by the time you read this) release an update to improve some of the concerns, Including Mr Nielsen concerns about a cheating husband being caught by his wife.I also found that many of the problems some people have with the fire can be solved if only they read the online documentation.  I think this is mostly human nature but may also be because the Kindle Fire opens up the table market to people who are not techno geeks which camp over night and wait hours to get some new, over priced, high tech gadget..Updated Dec 21 for firmware update 6.2.1:Firmware update 6.2.1, adds enhancements including enhanced fluidity and performance, improves touch navigation responsiveness and basic Parental Control. I expect more updates with enhancements to be coming including additional Parental Controls.One of the changes is being able to remove items form the Carousel.  Now Mr. Jakob Nielsen and Mr. Norman (former VP at Apple) will no longer have to about worry about cheating husbands being caught by their wifes. :)I notice Amazon is not calling the wi-fi pw a Parental Control in the description. I think that is because this was a quick fix. That is why it is only a .1 update.I think they are now working on a more enhanced Parental Control like limiting books and videos basted on content. They may also be working on 1-click with password.http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html/ref=hp_k6_updatesi?nodeId=200790620Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsIt's a Kindle, not an Tablet,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;N. Celik(Cambridge, MA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After 24h with the device, I was very disappointed. I would have rated it 1 star.Until I realized, that I have bought a KINDLE and have expected a TABLET. As a KINDLE device, it works really well. You can read and consume media. I would have rated it 5 stars as a Kindle device.However, I have 2 issues with it.Amazon's willful decision not to support enterprise-level e-mail (Exchange and Google Apps) is a huge negative. My personal e-mail is hosted by google and I have to use subpar IMAP to retrieve the mail (IMAP barely works with the gmail concept) + a separate app for calendaring. Note that this being a google Android based device, it could have been the highlight of the device, out of the box and they broke it deliberately. Why?. Additionally, my business e-mail is hosted on Exchange. I had to buy an app to be able to read my corporate e-mail. Why amazon does not want e-mail and calendaring to be consumed on the device is a mystery.Additionally, the lack of "traditional" Android buttons and volume controls is bothersome. Pulling up the amazon keyboard/control panel makes the GUI harder to use, with no apparent benefit whatsoever. It must have been a late decision too, because the screen is not centered; ie. the bezel is thicker where these buttons originally should have been. This would have added far less than a $1 to the manufacturing cost, so I have no understanding for this decision.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsMy Kindle Died In Less Than Two Weeks,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;Geoff Livingston "GL"(Alexandria, VA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought my Kindle Fire two weeks ago at Best Buy!  I loved it, until it died mid-flight during a business trip this past Sunday.  Nothing has restored the Fire, including battery charges, etc.  I did find a way to restore by resetting it, it but, yeah, disappointing, and it was not easy to fix nor was it obvious. Too bad, as I really liked it, and thought it was a better deal than my iPad, but I think this issue demonstrates the Fire needs some polish.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes Everything I Expected it to do...,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;T. Atherton "t_bill"(Tehachapi, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Have had my Fire for a few weeks now and it is exactly the device I was looking for.  I needed a device, larger than my android phone and smaller than my laptop that I could pull out anywhere for email and entertainment while travelling.  I have loaded my Kindle books, added a few free games, rented and/or purchased a few movies (look for the $0.99 48 hour rental specials), added my music, and added the Touchdown email app ($13) to work with my office's Microsoft Exchange system.  I find it rare that I am out anywhere (restaurants, hotels, airports, etc.) and cannot find a wi-fi connection to switch out any content from the device to the cloud and visa versa and/or to check emails.  I also purchased the hard cover that acts as a stand.  Works great for hands free viewing of movies or reading on a plane.  Also seemed to protect it pretty well the one time I dropped it.  Battery life is very good, have not had a situation where I ever needed to recharge it other than overnight. I locked my device with the standard Android settings password protection, so I do not worry about anyone getting into the device and ordering using my one-click settings.  Only strange thing about using the password screen is that it is always in portrait mode even if I start up with the device in landscape.  I expect Amazon will fix these little bugs with the first OS/Software upgrade due out in the next couple of weeks just as they did with the bugs in the original Kindles.  Overall I am very satisfied with my purchase.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFantastic book reader and so much more,December 13, 2011By&nbsp;J. Miller "Heresy"(Frisco, TX USA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely love my Kindle Fire, it is the perfect size for reading e-books and has many other features that are easy to use and set up (connecting to WiFi is easy and very intuitive even if you have never done it before.)I use the KF to easily check my mail when I am on the road, watch video from Amazon/Youtube, cruise the web, play games and, of course, read books/magazines. The web browser is nice, and the KF will save the passwords to your various websites just like the browser on your PC.I was skeptical when I was thinking about buying this; I wondered if I would ever really use it instead of my laptop, but I have found myself using the KF all the time. One thing I have been using it for a lot is, while watching Mad Men, if something comes up in the show that I don't know about or sounds interesting I am able to use the KF to quickly connect to Wikipedia and look it up. Or I can connect to IMDB to look up an actor; just simple stuff like that is so easy with such an inexpensive, easy to use device.Try it out, you'll like it and grow to love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)





3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsold lady loves it,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;gkids5-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am nearly 60 years old and technilogically challenged.I do not own an IPAD or an Iphone---only a computer--desk top --and a cell phone---no texting! I love my Kindle Fire---so "user-friendly"!!! I am a VERY satisfied customer!!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;N. B. Krupp-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I LOVE my new Fire!  It arrived on Saturday; it is my in-house mobile device.  I can access the Web for everything I want to do on the Web without having to go to my computer and be isolated from the activities in the house.  I can play games.  I could read all my publications, but I use my other Kindle for that.  I wanted a mobile in-house device and that's what I got.  I cannot complain about anything with this device.  It is mine and mine alone.  I have no trouble with the on/off switch or who is checking my history or any of the other complaints I've read about.  It is a wonderful addition to my life.  I checked my e-mail this morning without having to go downstairs to the computer.  Fantastic!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsA Recommended Enhancement,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Howard the Duck-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire does all I want in a reader now that there is a Wall Street Journal app.I suggest an enhancement to the "Settings" -&gt; "Display" menu.- An option to freeze in portrait mode (as with the "E-ink" display Kindles), and- An option to freeze ion landscape mode, and- An option to change orientation in response to the accelerometer (default)Reason: Some of us read lying down on our side.  In that position the line between the eyes is perpendicular to the lines on the page.This is a big deal to me.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsCarousel "feature" a real problem,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;Anthony Frisby(Glenside PA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really enjoy my Kindle DX and the Kindle app on the iPad/iPad2.  I purchased the Fire to see how well it would work with our Bb LMS at work, believing the low price point would make it a hot Christmas item, and to be ready for questions about it when the students are back.The device has a very attractive screen, and it did work well with Bb.  Getting onto home and campus wireless was as easy as I expected.What I hadn't expected, and REALLY dislike, is this carousel feature of flipping through your books.  There isn't a way to limit the display to unread purchases or to select what to show and what not to show.  I haven't been able to find any information on how to disable it altogether - which wouldn't be my first choice but would be better than having no choice of having it or not.  Amazon needs to find a way to control, or turn off this function. As of December 12, 2011 there isn't. From the many complaints about it I have to believe Amazon will do something about it - so that's why the three stars.  If not, I'd only give it 2 stars.  And yes, I too would consider sending it back.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,December 12, 2011By&nbsp;John A Fritz "John F"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Great for what it does and what it costs. A fun media device. I have had it since it came out. No Wi-Fi connect problems, no crashes. Watched plenty of streaming media from Amazon. Have side-loaded Apps, no problem. It is not a PC substitute (neither is the Ipad if you do real work). Great for recreationI do not understand reviewers who complain about weight then compare it to the ipad (ipad is much heavier). The same goes for the finger size BS. I have that "problem" and you get use to it. People have been using the same Apps on phones with no problem, but the larger Fire screen is a problem?Check it out, if it does what you want it is a great buy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsperfect e-reader,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;NDEREADER-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is the perfect e-reader for someone who does not want the high-tech features/distractions of an Ipad. Screen is right-sized for reading.  Colors in photos are very good.  Maps and other illustrations are easy to read.  I understand the push to have each type of device perform all the functions of every type of device.  For reading, Kindle Fire is elegantly simple.  A great value.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat tablet for the price,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Monica-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ever since the iPad came out all I've wanted was a tablet.  They were (and still are) the cool, new, gotta have thing.  Unfortunately, as a broke, jobless, college student, there was no way for me to afford a $600 iPad (even with the student discount).Since the holidays are now upon us, my mom had been asking what I wanted for Christmas and as much as I wanted an iPad, there was no way I could ask for one since the price is astronomical.  Then I came across the Kindle Fire.It had everything I wanted; price, games, movies, web, music and ebooks, in a lite, easy to carry device that I can bring to school.The price was perfect and didn't break the bank for my family (my mom got one for herself also, which is why I can write this review).  I could finally have something that all of my iPhone/iPad/iPod Touch/Android friends were using. Apps!  No more will I have to steal my boyfriend's Droid X to play games like Angry Birds (which really isn't a game that I like all that much, but it's the best example I could think of... except for maybe Cut the Rope, which has had the both of us addicted).  I can also use it to watch Netflix while I'm on the go without having to lug around my computer.I already have a phone, so there is no reason to splurge on expensive data plans for a smart phone.  I don't need a camera, since I have Skype on my computer and a digital camera for capturing those Kodak moments.  To me the Fire is perfect.My only complaint is that I'm an uber nerd and like to read graphic novels.  I was looking forward to reading them on this device, but you have to use an app that they have pre-installed.  I don't mind it so much, but the free content isn't that great and I have my own comics that I wanted to upload from my computer, but couldn't.I have however found plenty of free content for the device, including books and apps, and I was able to upload my own music to the cloud and to the device itself which I tested out on my mom's Fire.I am amazed by how much fun the Kindle Fire is and I can't wait to take mine for a test drive on Christmas Day.  All I really wanted it for was entertainment and it is perfect for that purpose.  The Kindle Fire can not compare to the iPad (which I would still like to own one day, when I finally graduate and find a job that pays. Although, in this economy that may take til who knows when and something better will be available for my time wasting pleasure) , but to me it doesn't need to because it still gets the job done.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat device but needs STRONG wifi connection for some functions,December 11, 2011By&nbsp;Luv2BikeColorado(Denver)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am thrilled with my Fire but like many reviewers before me, I initially had LOTS of trouble with my wifi connection.  I spent the first few weeks borrowing a signal from a few nearby unsecured weak (2 bars) wifi signals.  The Fire would repeatedly disconnect and re-connect.  I could not stay connected to the internet, download a book, or watch video without frequent interruptions due to a dropped signal.  Finally, I installed my own wi-fi in my residence.  My connection is now full strength (4 bars) and I no longer have any connectivity problems!!  Please note that even a "fair" 2-bar signal would not hold a connection on my Fire.  A STRONG wi-fi connection might be what's needed to eliminate connectivity problems.  For some reason, the Kindle won't run right off a weaker signal, while my next-door neighbor's laptop works fine with a 2-bar signal.  Perhaps Amazon, in trying to make this device affordable, installed a lower-quality wifi device on the Fire.  One solution to this problem would be to buy a USB wifi booster....but the Fire has no USB port.  This may be a problem we Fire owners are going to be stuck with, until an improved version of the Fire comes out.  This is probably a hardware issue that cannot be solved by an over-the-air update.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPrice is great,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Carlos-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got the kindle because I don't want a smartphone. The kindle has many uses, though, at the moment I don't have the time to go deep into it. So it has a facebook app, and it is ideal to go online with it.It is a good tablet for its price.I am not a tech savvy person, so the Fire is great for me. I also look forward to viewing more movies and videos as well as reading books.I could add a couple of games to it. It is a great multi use tablet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle V Kindle Fire,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;quedn-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my kindle about a year and recently purchased a kindle fire.  There are differences, both good and bad.The kindle is solely a reader, it's nice that it has a long battery life and that you can read it outside.  Though no color or limited apps if you are into games.  The kindle fire is an explosion of color and sound and with the stand it makes reading in bed easier than the lamp cover for kindle.  Kindle fire has a low battery life which you have to recharge daily, though having it for about a month it really is not a big problem, it is a little more work to put your read books into archive and when you go through your books (read or unread) shows all of them which I would like to have them separated, unless I have missed something on how to show a separate category for archived and unread books. All in all I love them both and plan on using them for different situations.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWay More than expected!,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;Rick(Clyde, NC, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Sure it's different than the other Kindles and took me a little longer to learn how to use it, ( Ok, OK I'm still learning) but it's a fantastic, helpful friend. ( If a gun can be introduced as "My little friend!" this I can do it to my Fire.) If I could only get it to cut the grass and take out the trash, then I could tell my husband (Rick) that he's now on thin ice. Nah... he gave it to me. Nice Guy!My one and only complaint is the same I've heard from lots of others.FIX THE CAROUSEL! It's way to messy and too hard to look through everything The three shared account users have purchased.It is not meant to replaced the PeaPod, but it did. I got rid of my Ipad within the first week. NO FOOLING.It's worth the money. Thanks NoniHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsHappy,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;M. Richardson "Semper Eadem"(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Happy to say that after 3 weeks I am entirely delighted with my Kindle Fire.  I don't have an android phone or any other touchpad device, so I'd assume a lot of the other more negative reviews come from people who've had more experience with apps, etc., and find things missing in the Fire that I wouldn't notice or expect of it. But it does what I ask of it.  The interface was something I didn't so much learn how to use but just understood. It accesses Netflix, hulu+ and Prime videos easily. (In fact, with the recent *horrible* changes to Xbox's Netflix and hulu+ interfaces, I find myself preferring my Fire for streaming). It's much better than I expected to read with, and I enjoy Pulse very much. I've purchased just a couple apps: solitaire; a notepad; Accuweather; etc. I find games lure me away from reading, so I'm going to keep those at a minimum. As accessories, I'd bought an Arkon Portable Fold-Up Stand for my keyboard Kindle, and found that it re-poses and works beautifully, holding my Fire upright on my desk - I'd recommend this simple stand to anyone. A capacitative pen keeps the glass clean and glossy.  So, at this point, I am well satisfied with the value and performance of the Fire. If I had to come up with something negative, forgiving it the fact that I really need something with which to hold it more comfortably while reading in a chair... When I click on an article from Pulse and tap on it to enlarge it, occasionally it will keep enlarging the text when I try to move the page around, and I have yet to discover a simple way to shrink something you've enlarged.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove my Kindle Fire,December 10, 2011By&nbsp;rodedie-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I use my Kindle Fire everyday. I read the books I check out from the library. I listen to my MP3s. I play the app games. I check my email. I send my recipes to the document center. I take it to the grocery store and if I need to check to buy ingredients, I can pull up the recipe and see what items I need. I also send my knitting patterns to the document center and take it instead of printing the patterns out. I take it to the yarn store and can check for the yarns I need. I love it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMy Kindle Fire is absolutely amazing!!!,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Els M. Worthington "Maggie"(Roseville)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I absolutely love my Kindle Fire!  Since I've received it, I've used it every day!!  Compared to the competition,it's the perfect size and weight and for me it is perfect, it has everything I want and need.  I recommend it highly!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery impressed with my Kindle Fire....,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Shelah-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Kindle Fire as an early Christmas gift and it's my first venture into the digital media world...  Perhaps my opinion is a bit naive because of my lack of experience with similiar agents but overall I think the Kindle Fire is a fantastic device. I was very hesitant to even attempt reading a book any other way than turning actual pages.  But the Kindle Fire has been a pleasant surprise. It's very easy to use and I love being able to highlight any word while I am reading and get a dictionary definition for it. The fact that I can also access FaceBook, my email, web browsing and numerous apps among many things, is the icing on the cake. The Kindle Fire can't take the place of a laptop for many reasons but for the price, it's very convenient and simple to use.  Even at home, I often use my Kindle Fire to do things on the internet because of its accessibility.  The Kindle Fire is far more than a device for procuring media.  For the price, I don't see how anyone could be dissapointed.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT!,December 9, 2011By&nbsp;Nanny's Four Little Birds(Georgia)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was so hesitant to purchase the Fire after reading some of the reviews (I did a lot of research on Amazon and other tech websites). But since I knew the device could be returned for a refund, I had nothing to lose.  Oh, I am so glad I purchased it anyway!  NO this is not an Ipad, NO you cannot run an entire office from it, but if you want to listen to music, check in on Facebook, check your email, surf the web,  play a game or two, and of course, read, this is a perfect device for you.  I have two other computers in my house - I don't expect Fire to take their place. But for the aforementioned things, the Fire is perfect!  And for me, adoration is not too strong a word where the Fire is concerned! LOVE IT!!!!! SO, SO, SO glad I took a chance!UPDATE - As much as I adore the Fire, I had to return in after one day.  I just could not find a comfortable screen brightness setting, and had a horrible headache after a couple of hours on it - and I wasn't even reading!  I'm so sad. But if a backlit screen doesn't bother you, this is a fabulous device! Apparently my eyes do not care for it. But I still hold to my original endorsement.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove love love my kindle fire,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;M. Diggs-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I love my kindle fire got it from radio shack two day after  thanksgiving. I read a lot and I was looking for a cheap tablet so i thought the kindle would be great for me and I use amazon to buy almost everything so it was a no brainer some of the reviews had me thinking about not buying it but I'm glad I did I love it don't let the reviews stop u from buying it get and see if its for u if not return it but I'm sure u will love just as much as I doHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Fire is on Fire,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;King_George269-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire for my wife who loves to read as an anniversary present.  She absolutely loves it.  It's more than just a book reader and the color is as equal to my ipad.  If you're looking for a book reader and want to get the best bang for your bucks, this is it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBetter than my Color Nook,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Lourdes(Illinois, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire for my husband's birthday since he didn't have an e-reader and uses my Nook Color (last year's model) occassionally.  I have to say that I am jealous because the Amazon Kindle Fire is much, much better than my Nook.  The display is crisp, the weight is lighter and overall better.  It streams videos and tv shows smoothly and I can't believe the incredible sound that the Fire produces.  I love his Fire!  (No pun intended :-))I highly recommend the Kindle Fire over any other e-readers out there!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest gift ever!!,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;A. Sterkel "David's mom"-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I had a Generation 2 Kindle for about 2 years and I loved it.  It broke recently (unfortunate accident) and I was given a Kindle Fire for my birthday.  I LOVE IT!!!!  It is fast, easy to use, the color is great, and it's so much more versatile than the previous models!!  Like I said, BEST GIFT EVER!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove It, But It Could Be Better,December 8, 2011By&nbsp;Amanda M. Teeters "seafarer"(Pensacola, Fl)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I work in retail. This tablet, I hesitate to call it that, rocks. It's fast and easy to use. My store is located between 3 colleges. It is fast, easy to navigate, and has many perks from Amazon, like the Cloud 9 storage. The draw backs are pretty basic. The college kids and I have discussed this and it all seems to be boiling down to 2 things. A USB port is needed and expandable memory slots too. At least 32 GB. Most of these kids use the device for easy access to their digital text books. One kid showed me how easy it was to have his text book open while accessing the school's digital library for reference materials. Amazon has created a great product. I myself will be waiting for them to add a port and expandable memory before buying it. Sadly, until then I will play with the one at my store. Hey, maybe there will be a 10in. by then :D. It is still well worth the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove the Fire,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Trisha-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just received my Kindle Fire and I love it. I am still learning all the features but for me that is part of the fun. I have downloaded games, books, music and watched videos just like it advertised. I have read a lot of negative articles about the Kindle Fire and its comparison to the Nook and the Ipad. I would not trade my Kindle Fire for either of those. I am no longer bored at the doctor's office. My fiancee loves my Kindle Fire also so now I have to buy another one because I am not good at sharing.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMovies, Music, &amp; Books OH MY!  I LOVE MY KINDLE FIRE,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;Joan-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I LOVE MY KINDLE FIRE. I use my cell phone as a mobile hot spot to get WIFI browser access anywhere phone has coverage.  At home the unit just picks up my wireless internet access and at work I can use the wireless guest WIFI.  Movies, Music &amp; Books at my fingertips.  All of my music is stored in Amazon Cloud so it's available via Kindle Fire, anytime, anywhere ... and yes, I'm hooked on Angry Birds.  I love certain magazines but hate the clutter around the house, so now they are in my Kindle Fire and the images are brilliant.  I bought my son one for Christmas and the grandkids keep borrowing mine so there may be more purchased in the near future.OK ... enough of this love-fest.  There is one thing I hope you are working on, which is the capability to view my photographs that are stored in my Amazon Cloud.Oh, did I mention it fits in my small purse!All the Best and Happy Holidays!Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiPS:  THANK YOU for allowing us to use American Express points to purchase items!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove it more with each passing day,December 7, 2011By&nbsp;L. Short(East Tennessee)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre ordered my fire,and counted the days down for it to arrive. I love it More with each passing day. Haven't picked my laptop since Nov 16th!!! I also ordered the amazon stylus and am amazed how well it works with the device. Took my fire to Thanksgiving dinner and 3MORE were ordered after using mine.Buy one you will love it... beats $800 for a pad anyday... as I have no need for more than wifi.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGood product...but still needs more QA,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;swarna(CA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is a good product for a reasonable price but having said that I am a software engineer...so , I could say it is good but still needs more QA.We have been using for for about 3 days now(mainly used by my 5 year old) and following are the problems faced till now:Product hangs frequentlyNeeds restartVolume goes offWith android games, scores are not getting stored correctly.Happens with the first release....I am sure the next release would be much better...Also not sure how to lock purchases....Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starslove it... fits my life style.,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;Bon-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Suits me perfectly.  I stream episodes and movies from Amazons Prime.  Email is easy to use and music is great.  Has all of my content I need from the cloud. Sound is good. Honestly, it is so easy to use. I have an aneroid phone, so the learning curve was small.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKids!! Planned to buy two itouch for twins birthday went for the Fire instead. Overall Excellent!!,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;H. Curran "English Bay"(St Simons, GA)  -See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Purchased three fires, one for me and two for my twin boys 9th birthday presents. We had planned on getting our boys each an itouch for their birthday but at around $190, the Fire seemed (sight unseen)to be the better buy at $199. Now that we've had a chance to use and experience the Fire, I am blown away by everything that it can do and the image quality etc. $199 people!!! $199!!! 7''screen!!!For kids:The access to thousands of free apps, great video imaging, access to the web particularly youtube through wifi, the ability to live stream movies and shows and for road trips we can rent and download to each Fire movies that can be played multiple times over the 48 hour rental period. For example, each Kindle can have a couple of rented movies downloaded onto it, the kids watch and swap the Fires around and peace reigns in the car on a long drive. If they get tired of watching movies, they have hundreds of installed game apps to choose from. My boys have not received their Fires yet (their birthday is in December), but they've been using mine and both absolutely LOVE it!! Their friends all want to play on it. I am not afraid to let it be used and passed around because of the quality construction--Gorilla glass- (and the fact that I bought the Square Trade accidental damage warranty).Even for the app gaming alone it's a bargain at $199. We lost so much money on the nintendo portable systems, my kids could never keep track of their games, especially as the games became smaller and smaller over time. And don't get me started on the toy computers in different movie characters for $40 or $50 I can't count how many crappy educational / entertainment electronic toys(?) we've gone through as the parents of four active children (2, 8, 8, 14) and I can honestly say that the Fire hands down is the best value for the money.Even our toddler, two, uses the Kindle Fire. Educational apps, streaming movies, purchased movies -most recently Toy Story-, books of course, he is able to flip through the carousel and show me what he wants. The Fire has come in very handy while waiting indoors for appointments or siblings in extracurricular activities (places without children play areas), usually a very challenging time for an active two year old who doesn't want to be quiet or sit still.What I don't like is that I cannot shield my digital content from my kids, books music movies etc, if I have it they can see and have access to it. The only way around this is to register each Kindle separately and get them each Prime memberships, which I am not going to do. I wish that we could each have our own folders for content.The following is my eight year old's review of the Fire:I definitely love it.- I can play games like plants vs zombies and puffle launch- I can surf the web, look at youtube videos, watch netflix- Look at books- watch movies in the car- listen to musicMy friends think it's cool.As for me, overall well worth the money. I use it the most when I am away from home, unless I am reading a book. I thought that the Fire would take the place of my laptop for home use but I still prefer my hp.Pros:video qualityease of use7'' screenfast page loadingConsI don't like the carousel, feel that the top option should appear midscreen not to the leftWeight- heavier than expectedSometimes have to tap screen multiple times and option above or below will be selected insteadThe cons are minor points in an incredible value tablet. I would highly recommend without reservation.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsOverall pretty good, but...,November 23, 2011By&nbsp;M. Bartelt "buyer of stuff"(Mtn View, CA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was hoping for instant message capabilities... since I'm hooked to wifi without 3G/4G, it mostly sits on my lap on the couch.  It streams video from Netflix or Amazon Prime just fine, it plays simple games well and it's just ok to use with e-magazines.  Books read fine, but probably not as crisp as a regular kindle.Overall I'm happy with this purchase, I just hope that there will be some customizations allowable to the bookshelf/home screen.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFor $200 Its Great!,November 22, 2011By&nbsp;Robert Ciauri(Southern California)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I pre-ordered my Kindle Fire the day it was announced! So far, I'm very happy with it. That being said, there are features that have been left out no doubt due to price!I love tech products, I own Iphone, Android Incredible, Kindle keyboard 3g/wifi, Macbook Pro &amp; Air. I have bought and returned IPad 2, nook, nook color, and samsung galaxy tab.My first thought----Its Great for the Price!What I have been using it for:Surfing the interwebsNetflixAmazon Prime moviesA few appsAttempted reading a couple books.Being constantly connected, at work/home/on the go, I do a lot of browsing, the Kindle Fire is great for that. Silk is really smooth, and pretty fast. It's much nicer than using my phone to surf the net. The more I have used the browser Silk, the fast it becomes (like it knows where I am going to go next) For those who have complained about it, I'm not sure what your  doing, but mine is great. Another reviewer said it may be the wifi you're using...I would agree!Movies: on both Amazon &amp; NetflixQuality is decent. But what do you expect, its wifi, on a 7" screen. Its not going to be like your home LED/LCD/Plasma TV. Its portable! If you are planning on using this as your TV set, then think again.The UI is smooth, there are a few things that could be better like the scrolling on the home screen...slightly too sensitive for my taste, but It's fine for me.Reading on it will not be something I will not be doing for an extended period. I will use my 3g kindle for that. If just to read for a short time, it will do. Backlighting tends to hurt my eyes after a while.Amazon App Store for the Kindle Fire is somewhat lacking, but its brand new, and amazon has put a lot of restrictions on what apps are available for the Fire. As time goes on, their will be MANY more apps available...Being a prime member for 4+ years, It's another item that I will be keeping, and when their 3g version comes out, I will be buying that as well (though hoping for some sort of trade-in).If you're a amazon prime member, I can't see why you wouldn't purchase one.....it's only $200! Mine usually sits next to me while watching TV, or roaming around home/office.Wish list for the next Kindle Fire 2:Bluetooth3g/4gGPSBetter speaker placementAdditional inputsIf you're in the market for a tablet, this should be atop your list to check out (at your local amazon.com demo center...ie BestBuy). For 200 bucks, its a deal!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsCan't curl up in bed with the Fire,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Still a Fan(Maryland)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got a regular kindle for my birthday this year and I love it.  It is so nice to be able to get a book anytime I want it without have to fight crowds at the mall.  I also like the fact that my house is not filling up with books anymore.  So when the Fire came out, I went ahead and pre-ordered it.  I liked the fact that I could read email in my bedroom or watch a TV show or movie in bed if I wanted.  I had planned to give my regular kindle to my dad.  Then I tried the Fire and I realized that I couldn't do this.  You see at night, I like to curled up on my side to read.  This works great with the regular kindle but with the Fire, the text turns so that it is always straight up.  Now there might be a option that would keep the text in the same position, but I have not found this yet.  My solution is to keep my regular kindle by my bed and the Fire on the dining room table so I can read while I eat.  I'll use the Fire when sitting upright and the regular Kindle when curled up in bed.  Other that this one problem, I am very happy with the Fire so I'm giving it 4 stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDisappointed, but Amazon made it right....,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Bruce W-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Received my Kindle Fire this afternoon.  After getting the battery charged, I turned it on and found it was already registered to me. Impressed with that.  It connected to my wifi and it downloaded some updates. Impressed with the ease of this.  However.... when it rebooted itself, that was that.  It froze on the "Kindle Fire" screen.  I read the Kindle Troubleshooting guide and several reviews/comments by others who had the same problem.  I did a hard reboot several times and each time it froze on the "Kindle Fire" screen.  I contacted Amazon via "chat" and within 10 minutes a new one was on its way to me.  Disappointed it had problem, but pleased with Amazon for making it right!Update....  The replacement arrived and it works fine.  I have to say, so far I really like this. It has to be one of the coolest toys I have purchased in a long time.  The picture quality is great, as is the sound.  Lots to learn yet, but overall it is quite easy to work with.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsNeeds better software,,,,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Confuzed Win User(usa)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was on the edge in the 7" tablet department...  so I ordered both the Fire and Nook (Color)...Being an iPad2 owner I was not expecting the same performance...  Pros for the Fire?  Very nice screen, (dose Hulu remarkably well) Excellent sound from the 2 little speakers. Cons? Unless you Side Load, Fire does not do EPUB. UI not very friendly. Places everything I have ever ordered for my other Kindle on it with no way to remove them...User Interface (while nowhere near iPad'''s) is Kludgey and not very responsive...  when you finger/click something you will take a deep breath and hope it registers.  When Scrolling down a list more times than not I found myself opening the item, having to close it and go back repeatedly to the list.While the Fire screen has a bezel I found it difficult to hold (Unlike the Nook's rounded edges) for long periods of time.I was not expecting performance like this for a device that has a Dual Core CPU. Perhaps an update will address these problems.It seems to me that the Nook Color (with a slower processor) outshines in all the above mentioned both the Nook Color and the Nook Tablet have Micro Card slots that will let you add media indefinitely... they both do EPUB and have a much broader Video/Media 3rd Party capability (Nook Tablet streaming and MP4 MKV etc. ...)Both the Fire and the Nook Color are going back, and I am going to settle on the Nook Tablet (Faster Processor/More memory Much more friendly UI) for the most bang for my 7" screen buck.I will gladly pay the return shipping.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat Device, BUT DO NOT SHARE,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Murphy(Northern California)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a terrific device - terrific media consumption, excellent integration with the store, fast browser, decent music player.I would give it 4/5 - minus one point because it's a little heavy, the Android Economist App is not available, and the music player stutters.However, the main issue is the complete lack of controls when purchasing and displaying content. This device is going to handed around and it has next to no controls to prevent a user purchasing APPs or media. A simple "password confirmation" at time of purchase would solve this. What does this mean? If you're buying this as a media device for you and the kids, don't. Not until this issue is resolved.Secondly, I wish there was a UI control to suppress content. I have about 20 Kindle books and they all show up in the carousel. I'm done with 19 of them. Allow me to folder/categorize so they don't show up continually.That's it. 3 stars. A small patch to prevent unauthorized purchases, or it is a single person, one user only, locked down device.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFantastic and affordable option,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Katie B.(TN, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire as soon as I heard of its release. I've always wanted something in between an iPad and a Kindle reader. This fits the bill perfectly! It's small enough to carry in my purse. Love, love the interface. Super easy to use. My only "wish" was that you could switch to 'ink display' when reading books. I originally bought this thinking the whole family could share 1.... now I think we might have to purchase another one. :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsWife Loves It,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Jon M. Berger(Cedar Rapids, IA United States)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought this for my wife, who is an avid reader.  She had taken to reading books on her small smart phone once she found out that our local library allows you to checkout books through Kindle.  Watching her have to swipe to change pages every 15 or so seconds because of the tiny smart phone screen was painful, so I figured a kindle Fire would be a good solution.  She has been blown away by the Fire.  The browser is incredibly fast and doesn't even stutter in the slightest when surfing while streaming Pandora.  The screen is sharp and gorgeous and the size of the device is not uncomfortable at all.  The Fire is rapidly becoming the most used device in the entire house! Checking out books is a breeze and keeping everything synced between the Fire and the desktop Kindle software is all done behind the scenes.  This is the perfect example of how technology is supposed to work to make life better across multiple devices and software platforms!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsFire but not a Conflagration,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;jooleegee-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Avid Kindle fan and reluctant to give up the great reading screen for this one, but on balance the trade-off is worth it. Fire gives me exactly what it promises - a great device for accessing and displaying media with a few other conveniences thrown in for additional utility. The ease of rapidly accessing my extensive library and new media is the strongest selling point - couldn't be more seamless. Gmail works just fine too. I agree with others that the font resolution of some web sites and magazines detracts from long-term use, but certainly better than on my droid or blackberry. I bought the Marware leather stand, and it is comfortable for one-hand viewing and also adjusts for table-top viewing at just the right angle. Wish list so far: 1) volume button; 2) ability to sort books into categories like on my Kindle; 3) at least 16GB; 4) screen rotation with password log-in to align with device position; 5)enhanced sensitivity of touch screen. All in all FANTASTIC value. Thanks Amazon! PS - this is the first review I have ever written - and it is real.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it!,November 21, 2011By&nbsp;Nancy B. Faiella "Winanton"(BROCKTON, MA United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Received my Fire Friday.  Love it.  Does exactly as advertised.  Easy set up ( thanks to my 11YO setting up my WiFi for me!!)For people with problems with the On button at the bottom:  I just turn it upside down and put it at the top!I'm not big into downloading music, I just use the Radio App.I'm not a big hoarder of Music or Movies so the streaming of things I want on the fly works for me.Reader with extra bells and whistles.Could not be happierHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsI loved it,November 20, 2011By&nbsp;Khaps "Khaps"(Rio de Janeiro)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I'm a great Amazon fan. I had the previous Kindle model and I can say they didn't let me down again. I loved the Fire. I'm giving 4 stars because I live in Brazil and I'm not able to buy stuff from the Apps Store yet.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsmy Fire,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;amazonian-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Bought this for my daughter and she absolutely loves it! (she is 8yrs old) this unit is an excellent entertainment unit for kids and I can definitely see my self using one. It lacks the  interactive features with e-books like a nook because you basically just slide the pages. The browser isn't too shabby either and I am glad I made this purchase. My iphone finally gets a break!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt's not an iPad - and that's the whole point to it!,November 19, 2011By&nbsp;Patrick D. Williams-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I just got my fire last night.  It is clearly not an iPad - and THAT is why I bought it.It comes in a simple package and all you need to do to set it up is open the box, power it up and select an available wifi net to ride.  It practically sets itself up.  Within minutes all my digital content in the Amazon environment was available.This device is an upgrade from my version 1 kindle and I am truly impressed.  If you are looking for a very slick way to read your e-books, listen to music, play games and do some very basic web surfing, this device will do the trick - with the following proviso:  This device can only connect via wifi, so if you have no wifi, you are offline with a very sparse 8Gb of storage to rely on on, and the content is almost exclusively going to be from Amazon.  If this is ok with you, you are going to LOVE this device.  If you are considering this as an alternative to an iPad, do not bother- it's an entirely different offering and cannot be compared in the same genre.What's great about it:  Dead simple operation and integration within the Amazon content world.  Fairly sturdy without being heavy.  Excellent price point.What's not so great:  The browser is a little sluggish and the touch interface takes some getting used to.Overall it's an outstanding offering for the price.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat! Tethers to Iphone4, great interface for Prime Video,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Karen(Bothell, WA, United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am very pleased! I also own an Ipad 2, Amazon has brought a great product for a great price!1. Movie rentals last 48 hours, Itunes only 242. New releases on special for 99 cents.3. Good selection of magazines, overall cheaper than Itunes.4. Cloud integration seemless.If you see a little x next to Wifi Symbol, you are not connected to Wifi, choose forget network and reenter password for wifi.If I could change one thing, I would like a volume button on device, but this is a great product!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Device for Price,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;A. Fannon(USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was very delighted to open my Kindle Fire box, boot up the device and discover that my Amazon account information was pre-loaded.  I had to connect to my home network, but otherwise it was smooth sailing!I am an Ipad owner and also a Kindle Fire owner.  It is difficult to compare the two because they both are good at different things.I wanted a Kindle Fire because I am an avid reader. I enjoy watching movies, I listen to music, and I shop at Amazon at least 1-2 times per month.  I have a prime membership which pays for itself with free shipping of Amazon products and the book and movie streaming selection.The Kindle Fire is media-centered, it's main functionality is accessing media from Amazon, it allows you to read, watch movies, watch tv shows, and browse product content from Amazon.  It does have a web browser, e-mail and an app store, but those three functions are secondary to the media functions.The Kindle Fire is not app-centered like the Ipad.  Granted, there are plenty of good apps in the Kindle Fire app store, but not as many as there are in the Ipad app store.  I was slighly disappointed that there are no banking apps, or a wide selection of children's apps for my kids, but I'm hoping in due time the selection will grow.The e-mail app on the Kindle Fire allows you to sync more than one e-mail address.  The Fire also supports Flash, the Ipad does not.The bottom line is the Kindle Fire is exactly what you need if you are interested in accessing media from Amazon such as books, magazines, movies, newspapers, tv shows, or listening to music.Why only 4 stars?  The content of the Kindle Fire is very controlled.  There is no way to back-up your purchased books on an SD card to be read on a PC or other device.  It would be a more well-rounded device if the content wasn't so controlled.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat product. My iPad 2 is gathering dust.,November 18, 2011By&nbsp;Kevin G. Byrne(St. Paul, MN)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Three weeks in, and I am very pleased. I already have an ipad 2, iPhone, ipod and a Pandigital Novel. The Fire is flawless, fast and a gem to use. I never used the iPad to read because of the size. The Pandigital is very slow. My wife uses the iPad 2 for Skyping her relatives in Asia and games. I never use it anymore.The Kindle app has more controls than the Kindle apps for Ipad and iPhone. It allows night read (black screen with white letters), and multiple font and typeface choices.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsBetter than my cellphone,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Ladislav Nemec(Big Bear City, CA, US)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got my Kindle Fire well before the time of predicted delivery. It works for both my POP e-mail accounts (unlike my recently upgraded cellphone) and it, basically, does what it is supposed to do. Nothing is very fast, just about the same as my recently purchased Toshiba (cheap) laptop. I even managed to put one of my many pearls of wisdom on the Times readers page.Text entry may use, in addition to the destructive backspace, a simple DEL key. Or some simple way to move the cursor back and forth. It's manageable, however.I have no idea how to use the word processing 'cloud' (???) software and the Dropbox. Will have to work on it. Otherwise, this is an adequate substitute for my newest Toshiba laptop - I may not even to bother to travel with a laptop any longer.For $204 with shipping it is a real bargain for anyone who has realistic expectations about devices of this kind. It fits in a (large) pocket and there is no comparison with the tiny cellphone displays or keyborads (mechanic or screen based).So far, a very satisfied customer. Congratulations, Amazon!(this was created on a desktop, still much more convenient but not suitable for travel)Ladislav Nemec, Big Bear City, CAHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSolid, clean, hefty, but with unremovable apps,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;J. Barton "j Gregory"(Washington, DC United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After 24 hours with Kindle Fire it exceeds my expectations (even the expectation that I could delete unwanted apps...I can't. More on that later.)Overall: Solid, like a rock. Not as slow as reported. Allows me to add photos, documents, and video both family and movies. It is hard to believe this is a first try at a tablet for Kindle. Seems like a second or third iteration. So almost a perfect experience especially for the price. The size is perfect. Did I say it is hefty. It is hefty. Nothing lightweight in this tool. Solid, solid. Definitely a great start and even a second start in my op.Kerfuffle: What might seem like a tiny thing, but is HUGELY irksome is that there are apps that are preloaded to my cloud so that with one click they are downloaded. That's great if I WANTED them. I don't.  In fact I DON'T WANT THEM. I also don't want my kids downloading them. I want a little bit of propriety on what goes on our family Kindle Fire. The most irritating (for me) is the ESPN app. I'm sure it is a fine app for those who want it. I don't. I don't have the sports gene. There are half a dozen I just don't want. Don't want them cluttering up my small screen. Grrrrr. This is a huge miss for Amazon. I'm sure it is a money thing for them or ESPN. I just don't want to pay the price for dealing with it.Buy the Kindle Fire. You'll enjoy it...unless you want to delete unwanted apps from your cloud. I hope Amazon resolves this tiny, tiny irritating thorn and all would be good.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat little entertainment device, some flaws,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;JonathanJW-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As an iPad owner/user, I had realistic expectations and needs for this device.  I intended for this to be a secondary device for entertainment at home (reading/movies/games/net surfing). As a parent, a tablet gives you flexibility to watch your kids while still having a variety of entertainment options on hand no matter where you are at home.  I have found that the iPad is a very popular device and often more than one person would like to use it.The Great:  Price, look and feel - For a second device this price point is spot-on and the device feels good to hold and use (mostly).The Good:  easy to use, very portable - The interface is logical, if not intuitive.  I would rate this higher but the carousel remembering everything recent rather than being a favorites bar is a mistake.  Plus, I would love to be able to sort my books in collections.The Bad:  WiFi seems a bit weak, I had to be standing within 20 feet of my router to get full signal (I can sit 80 ft away in my driveway and have full strength on my iPad). Sound control is awkward, having no external buttons for sound means having to drill into settings for many tasks.  e.g. The sound control is built into the Prime video streaming and lets you adjust on the fly, but Netflix has no sound controls, so you have to open settings - the movie pauses - adjust and go back.  Also, the little gray bar that appears at the bottom of some apps needs to be tweaked, I would eliminate the white color of the arrow and make it a darker gray so it is less obvious (I really noticed it using Netflix).The Awful:  The power button is a disaster.  The location itself is bad enough as it is right at a place where you might hold the device if you are using one hand (like when you are reading)so I found I was constantly shutting it off when I moved my hands.  Worse yet is that the button takes very little pressure to activate so it just exacerbates the location problem.  I would suggest they design a cap of some sort that could clip on to cover it while in use.Overall, I am extremely satisfied (I gave it 4 stars, but really give it 3.5).  Setup was easy and it came ready to go out of the box.  I found that, as others have pointed out the device occasionally stutters, as you will touch an input and it won't seem to respond, then it will suddenly go on.  The device is solid and heavy which while it gives a feel of quality, though it is a little heavy when compared to reading a paperback or other kindle device.  I enjoyed reading on it and watching video was pleasant as well; both Amazon and Netflix pictures were good and the size of the video wasn't much smaller than an iPad due to the letterbox format. If I didn't own an iPad I would have no comparison for this and could see this working very well as a Primary tablet for a home user.  I have trouble envisioning this being great on the road due to the limited storage space and reliance on WiFi.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes what it is SUPPOSED to do!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Cosmic-Surf "Cosmic-Surf"(California, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am glad I bought the Kindle Fire as a pre-order, before the Goldilocks of the world started trashing it with one star reviews!  Going over those reviews, I can say only 1% are about actual defective items!  Most are complaining about the Kindle Fire not conforming to the way they want it, or they simply have no clue what they are doing and rather blame the Kindle for it.  Most sound like a five year old throwing a tantrum.  I am sure Amazon cannot please each of the millions who bought it in the millions of different ways each of us want this thing to work.  The way I look at it is, if it is doing what Amazon says it is supposed to do, it works for me!  I was not expecting an iPAD (if I wanted one, I'd get one) and do not expect it to work like one.  Amazon has been upfront about the lack of 3G and many other facts about this machine, so it is beyond me why people are giving it one star because it does not have 3G.  Why did they buy it then?  Or they complain because the thing is registered to one account and they can't share it with their irresponsible teenager!  Folks, this has been the deal with Kindle since day 1, it is no surprise here!  Come on, people!  If everyone took the time to assess what they were buying BEFORE they bought it, they'd save everyone, including themselves, a headache.  So, it sucks that the Carousel stores everything you just did, read or played with on it... But I can tell you, my mother's breast cancer REALLY sucks..So I am sure that I can deal with the little inconvenience of the carousel doing this. And who knows, Amazon may update this at some point.My experience with the Kindle Fire in the past day or so has been good.  Yes, it takes getting used to for me, since I cannot even stand a Blackberry!  I love my Kindle3, so I also got a Kindle Touch to replace that one with, since reading on a back-lit device is hard for my eyes and I knew that going into it.  I bought the Kindle Fire for other uses, such as being able to be on top of my business e-mail while on the road, without needing to pay a monthly fee or getting a phone that takes me ten minutes to get into.  Oh, I can wait to find a hot spot, no issues there.  I see the Kindle Fire as an addition to my life, not the other way around.  If you don't like needing to use WiFi to access your music on Amazon Cloud...GET AN iPOD! (no, not iPAD, iPOD).  Also, you can download books and music from your Cloud Drive to read or listen to when you know you will not have WiFi access.  You can just remove them later from the device once you don't need them.  They will still be stored for you on your cloud drive.  OK, so you may not be able to sit on a plane and watch your favorite film, but considering airlines now have a ton of channels to view on their flights, I can live without Netflix for a few hours.  Again, this is NOT an iPAD, folks!  You knew this from the start, so don't start complaining now that is does not do what an iPAD does.  Just spend more money and get one instead!For those others that complained...the Amazon Silk only works as fast as YOUR WiFi connection. That is pretty much the same with any WiFi device, by the way.  Apps are a little limited, but in just one day I have noticed a huge increase in what is available.  I am sure more are on the way.  Give the Kindle Fire time to breathe and it will improve with every update, otherwise wait a year before buying it.  If you did buy it and are complaining, give yourself a week or so before jumping to return it, because I can almost guarantee you in a week, those things won't bother you anymore.  Unless, of course, you got a defective machine, which can and does happen, then by all means, get a new one. But, please make sure IT IS defective, because reading over those one star reviews I saw many which were user issues, not the Kindle's.And maybe I was lucky and got one that is not defective, but I see thus far at least 440 others got a good one, too judging by the 5 star reviews.  I suggest those who don't like it because of their own limitations, skip the one star reviews and be fair to the rest of us who may be easier to please.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFantastic!,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Gunfighter(Northern Virginia)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I make my living teaching people how to fight with guns... I'm not a techie. I don't push electrons for a living; nor do I have pals who spend time trying to be trendy by purchasing the newest, glitziest electronic toy that comes down the pike.I'm just a regular guy.I had to start my review with that statement because I think that it is important.  I think it is important becasue I want whomever is reading this to understand that my point of view is that of a layman, not a guy who uses tablets and other high-end electronic gear as a matter of course.My opinion of the Fire is simple:  I think that it is the best piece of tech that I have ever laid my hands on.  I think that the Fire is even better than the ambidextrous safety/selector lever on my M-4 (trust me, this is high praise from a left-handed shooter).When my Fire was delivered yesterday I turned it on (after ripping the box apart like a child on Christmas) and was immediately pleased with what I saw. After spending a very few minutes configuring the device, and synching it with my home wi-fi, all of my content immeditely downloaded (I have a first generation Kindle), I was in heaven.I decided to try out the keyboard first, becuase I have heard many people complain about the keyboard size on a 7 inch device, and it was just fine.  Look, if I can type on my itty-bitty Blackberry with my big hands, I can easily type on this device, especially in landscape mode.So, I like the ease of function, which you would REALLY have to be deficient in mental candlepower to be unable to figure out.  I like the keayboard.  I like the browser.  I like the app store.  I like The access to streaming television and movies, even though I am likely never to use this feature because I have a life, and don't need to have movies and tv shows wherever I am.  You know what else I like?  I like the size.  I know that one of the main reasons that people like to sharpshoot at this device (and others like it) is the lack of a 10 inch screen, but for me, the smaller size is exactly what makes this tool (yes, tool, not toy) ideal, is the fact that at need, I can just stick it in my cargo pocket.As I said earlier, I'm not a techie, so the dpi and megapixels and what have you don't mean much to me.  Likewise, the lack of forward or rear facing cameras mean nothing to me, as the phone in my pocket has a more than adequate camera. Seriously, who uses a 10 inch tablet to take pictures? Well, there is that guy I saw doing eaxactly that at Disney World this past summer, but I doubt that many people do it.  I am not going to use the Kindle Fire (or the Ipad or any other tablet) to "create content" (whatever the heck that means) which I suspect is the case for most consumers of these products.No, what I really want to do with it is to read my kindle content on a device with which I can browse the web, blog, text, and send/recieve email on the go.  I don't need to spend $500 dollars to do those things.... and I don't need to have a dataplan.Look, I admit that as a Kindle owner and long-time Amazon consumer, I am somewhat biased, but if your tablet usage is anything like mine, this is the device for you.  Don't pay for stuff that you don't want, and aren't likely to use, simply because it is trendy.The Kindle Fire is a smokin' hot product, and I suspect that you would be really happy with it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Device.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Luis Ariel Camilo "Cantalarana"(Orlando, FL United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got mine today and I am very pleased with the Kindle Fire. We all know this is not a ipad killer but the things this color reader can do it is beyond what anybody would expect for 200 dollars.The Screen resolution is very good, the screen has 169ppi which is more than the 132ppi that the ipad 2 offers.I like like the interface, the GUI looks very different from all other andoid devices.Flash works very well on Silk, I was able to test it and run couple of flash games from the device.Netflix is available in the Amazon store after the update is installed.I opened couple of PDF and the speed is also impresive how fast you can move through the document.I cannot find anything bad witht he Kindle Fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire - better than expected,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Henry C. Diem "HDiem"(Maple Shade, NJ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)We have been waiting years for a device, that would let us read books, compose and send emails, read newspapers, etc., watch videos, surf the net and plays games... without having to plug in every few hours. We own an old Kindle and liked sitting outside and reading. Well, the FIRE has the same ability, along with watching videos and surfing the NET.By using the Cloud and Device storage, you will have 13 GB total without additional cost. I connected the Fire to my laptop using the mini USB wire from my older kindle.PROS1. Instant on - no waiting to boot the OS.2. Easy to use with or without WiFi3. Fast Internet4. Good Stereo Sound5. Good Video Display - Portrait or Landscape.6. Fire arrived pre-registered to me and 66% charge, could be different for others.7. Out of the Box to First use - 5 minutes, once WiFi connected - Fire downloaded and updated any OS updates.8. Amazon tracking App to your puirchases.9. Onboard security to prevent anyone from picking up and using. Must be turned on, if necessary.10. Free Movies and TV Shows for Amazon Prime members.11. WiFi only, NO extra cost to connect to the Cloud or Internet.12. $300 cheaper than with only 3GB less storage.Cons1. No Camera, but no need if you have a smart phone or digital camera.2. No SD card slot, but no need if you have a mini USB cable.3. WiFi only, no 3G or 4G.Finally, I have only used the FIRE for one day, I am tech savey and have owned several types of PCs and laptops.The FIRE will not replace a laptop, but will make looking for information faster, i.e. Your sitting around talking, watching TV, walking through a museum, traveling,... etc. The Kindle FIRE - with WiFi available - will be used to find your answer quickly and as well as a PC or laptop, without the need to wait for a OS to boot.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starscool,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Erica Goodman(Bellevue, WA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)(this is a kids review there is no option to say that exept this way)My Dad got his kindle fire yesterday and he let me play on it. first of all I love Doodle Jump so I played that and the jumping panels are way wider than the apple version,but pixalate when you jump higher. if anything was bad about this, its that I can't shoot an angry bird. all it does is zoom in and out. what I think is hapiningis amozon is compeating against the i pad and i pad 2, wich is werid because they sell'em.also, supid zombies is sooooooooooooo fun. If you already have kindle, kindle 3gkindle touch ect. you can read the same books on the kindle for kidle fire for free!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIf you can read/comprehend...please check it out.,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jay Whitaker-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off, please let me just say I am baffled by some of the negative reviews..... People clearly lack any and all ability to read and comprehend information.  The Fire is exactly what Amazon said it was from the day they launched it.  It offers the exact services, functionality and ease of use they claimed from day 1......  Please get your head out of the sand people.  It is $199 for a reason,there were sacrifices made in order to achieve that ridiculously low price point. But they are easily looked past because of the low price point.  If you wrote/believe a review that is less than 4 stars for anything other than a possible lemon.... you are not smart enough to own a tablet so please don't!!!Upon arrival I was instantly impressed by the packaging the device came in. It perfectly reflected the device itself, simple and functional with little waste. I turned it on and within 2 minutes of following the on screen directions I was up and running.  I was very impressed with how quickly it felt like "my Kindle" right out of the box, having all of my personal content right there in front of me.... Just as they said it would!( see above)I jumped right in to a movie that I had previously rented in anticipation for the Fire arriving and all I can say is WOW.  The speed with which it was loaded and playing was very impressive as was the quality of the screen. I have since ordered the anti-glare screen protectors as I can foresee the shiny screen getting smudged up easily with fingerprints... but this is not a bid deal if you have ever owned anything with a touch screen before (e.g. iPod Touch).After I decided to see what the apps were all about and try and get my feet wet with them.  I like how everything is easily and clearly accessible right from the home page with a simple touch.  Of course jumping into the App Store was a must.... must ...play...angry...birds..... And so far I am very impressed.  It is every bit as responsive if not more than my Touch and droid3 phone with an obvious advantage in screen size. I also dabbled with the Pulse app that I quickly found convenient to set up in order to have all of my favorite news under one roof.All in all, Fire is exactly what I expected, perhaps even more since I was a little skeptical at first due to the low price.  If you are considering buying one PLEASE read... do your homework... check out intelligent reviews on sights like engadget, tom's hardware, pc world, etc.... This is NOT an iPad or Galaxy Tab.... and if you expect that you are wrong and foolish... It is not Amazon's fault that you have false expectations. All of the reviews out there, which were written before Amazon shipped explain everything that Fire IS and ISN'T, so do yourself the favor.  If you read them and determine that this is a device you might like, I will bet that you are going to be pleasantly surprised!  Enjoy!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDoes what I want it to,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Elisabeth A. Braunfeld(Beale AFB)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Okay so first here's who I am.  I'm a gamer with a PSP, 3DS, DS, XBox, PS2, Wii, and an iPod touch I bought so I'd never have to play the 'I need my apps!' game when buying a phone again.  I'm a military medic who works night shifts, deploys, and goes on TDYs so I need something that goes with me.  I'm a cook/baker who hates having to go back and forth between her computer and her kitchen when looking at a new meal idea.  I play D&D;, Pathfinder, and other tabletop RPGs so I love being able to access my characters and books easily without lugging around all of my stuff every time.  Last but not least I'm a regular Kindle owner with no intention of getting rid of the one I already have.That said here's wanted when I bought my Kindle:-Something that did a little bit of everything-Something I could bring with me to the gym that I could set on the treadmill and watch movies or listen to a book while I ran.-Something easily portable for short trips, TDYs, and my upcoming cruise-Something that didn't have the huge price tag of the iPad-Something backed by a company that has taken care of me above and beyond even my best expectations time and time again-Something that connected with my home wifi as well as wifi on the go that I could move with easeI wasn't looking for massive storage or something for my music, I have an iPod for that.  I wasn't looking for a gaming device, I have systems for that.  And I wasn't looking for another eReader.All in all, thus far I'm happy.  It runs fast, does more than I expected it to, and is a perfect size for my needs.  I will almost certainly use it when cooking this Thanksgiving and will be able to leave my netbook at home on my cruise and take it instead.  When I packed my bag for work tonight I was able to leave my regular Kindle, DVDs, and 3DS at home.  I'm currently watching The Walking Dead as I type this and have been playing Angry Birds in between calls.  Do I think this would sufice for a computer on a deployment?  No, but then I don't think an iPad would for me either.  Would extra storage be nice?  Yeah I guess so but I don't need that much and the cloud has worked well for me so far.So for me, this works.  But for people who seem determined to gripe about how this tablet or that tablet doesn't 'do enough' need to realize what a tablet is.  A tablet is a portable mini computer that isn't built to do everything as good as the original object.  They're just flashy little luxuries that do a little bit of everything moderately well, and in that respect I am very very happy with mine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery good effort Amazon !!!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Chuong-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have just gotten the tablet about 1 hour ago and have been playing with it, liking it so far.  Here's what I have found, maybe helpful to others as well:1. Screen lock can be accessed by pressing the control button on top right, lock orientation is on the far left, press it to lock the screen orientation.2. Access equalizer for music by first playing a song. While the song is playing look on the bottom for the button in the middle between the left arrow and the magnifier, press it and go into settings, go down and check Enable equalizer modes, then chose equalizer mode.3. Some carousel items can be removed, long hold and chose Remove from Favorites.  If you like some of the items you can long hold and chose Add to Favorites, and the item will appear on the bottom of the carousel.Well thats it for now, hope my post was helpful to some of you :)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsfirst day,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Nonnie "CJ"(Cottonwood Heights City, UT USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)It's here!!  Have been playing around with my new "fire" all evening.  Not too computer literate myself, but am navigating it okay, all by myself.  This grandma is having a ball.  I have set up my facebook and Internet access, watched an episode of Lost.  If I can do it, anyone can.  Go Kindle.  I am not disappointed at all.  This is my own little toy and I don't have to share it with anyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire Is Excellent!!!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;H-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Absolutely amazing product! Especially for the price! Well worth $200! I don't understand why people are giving it bad reviews based on the lack of features that Amazon made clear that it would not have from the beginning. But, people will always complain no matter what.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 stars24 hours in... PURE LOVE!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;River Flow(nyc)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I take some pride of authorship in the Kindle Fire -- only because I got serious about buying a Kindle last summer, and upon trying out my sister's I had a wish list which was exactly three items long:  A) I wanted a SLIGHTly bigger screen, 7" instead of 6" (but no unwieldy iPad, please!) -- B) I wanted COLOR -- C) I wanted a touch screen.  Upon reading the anticipatory press last summer about Amazon's impending Fall Kindle releases, it seemed likely that I would get one or MAYBE even TWO of my wishes... BUT IN THE END I GOT ALL THREE!  The Kindle Fire is a LITTle heavier than the older models, and a LITTle bulkier, although it still fits in my pants pocket (barely, admittedly) or easily in a jacket pocket.  I DO prefer the Fire screen for reading -- that one inch really helps me there -- not to mention that as a bonus the Fire is also basically a much more portable iPad (not to mention an iPod, courtesy of the Amazon Cloud).  I have seldom put it down since it arrived yesterday and if the Kindle Fire is imperfect in any way... I haven't noticed that yet at all.  LOVING IT!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAlmost Perfect,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;P. C. Jackson "Abba's Girl"-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got mine earlier today (am writing on it now) and have spent several hours trying out all the different features. Here's my opinion:The Kindle is very solid; in fact almost too heavy to hold for any significant amount of time. I definitely need to purchase a case with a built-in stand. The screen is a very thick strong glass which cleans easily with a soft cloth. The images are crisp, bright and very clear.  I have the brightness set to midway and it is bright enough; any more would be too bright for me. All my Kindle books were automatically displayed in the carousel and there are hundreds of books that I have purchased from Amazon over the years... these are ALL displayed in the carousel. It would be nice to have more control of the carousel though.I played some music--sounds great but you really need to attach headphones or external speakers to hear it loud enough in my opinion. I watched a little bit of a movie which I downloaded for free as a Prime member and the video is extraordinary; beautiful rich colors and sharp images. But again, you really need to have external speakers or headphones to hear the sound better. My one disappointment in this area is that is has no bluetooth capabibilityReading books on the Fire is easy and very good. I do find it more comfortable on my eyes if I either change the color of the background to black with white text or if you use the black text on a white background then dim the brightness way down. I have found that this works well for me as well when I read on my iPad.I had lots of apps to choose from and downloaded a number of them which work well so far.I saved my review of the web browser for last because that is what I least like about the Kindle Fire. It quit on me a couple of times and I found it to lag somewhat. It is not as responsive as the iPad browser and needs some work on it to be optimally useful.The battery does not last 7-8 hours as advertised. I had to charge it after a few hours of use. Maybe it would get that much time if you disable the wifi and just read a book. I don't know what the life of the battery is and I know that it has to be replaced by Amazon so be prepared to use the AC adapter often. I hope I can find a car charger for it as well.All in all, I am quite pleased with it. However, I can tell that Amazon needs to make some improvements for future Kindles. It is not as superb as the iPad but it is a nifty toy to play with. I think I will mainly be using it for reading and watching free movies from Amazon. I won't be using the web browser because it is too buggy and the screen is just too small for reading web material.So that's my opinion for what it's worth. I hope this was helpful for someone. Now back playing with my new toy for awhile...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsFits What I Need Perfectly,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Michael(United States)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was basically looking for something to entertain me while I'm on the road with nothing to do. Originally, I was using my Droid to watch videos, play games; things of that nature. That is precisely what I get with the Kindle Fire. For the price and the functionality, I really couldn't be happier.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsIs everything they said it would be!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;D. Miramontes "oxneneox"(San Antonio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am a mother of 3 who didn't own a tablet or e-reader before now. So i didn't know what to expect. I think it is perfect for what is was made for... Reading kindle books, web, apps and fun. I am happy with the speed in web browsing, applications and books, i even enjoyed reading a magazine on it. The screen and picture quality for books and magazines is awesome. I streamed my favorite show and found it easy to navigate. I am a prime member and hold a library card so having access to many books to borrow is great. Thanks Amazon for the Fire!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsBetter than expected it.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;V. Orlov(Lexington, KY USA)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have every generation Kindle, so I knew how great Amazon products are. When I was ordering my Fire I knew it would be near as good as my iPad or my iPhone. However, I am pleasantly surprised. Fire is quick, very quick. It was very easy to get my book up and running. Very easy to download apps, which I was able to get my schedule on it.There are few minor concerns:1. I know this is not designed to be a tablet. However, email setup was pathetic. I have my own domain name through Google, and for some reason Kindle does not have native Google email app. WTF!!! I had to set it up as POP.2. I wish it had a schedule app preinstalled. Even though it did not kill me to spend $5 on a schedule app, I still would like it to be a part of Android.3. Would it kill Amazon to include a USB cable. Thankfully, I have Kindles and I was able to use the USB cable that was included with other Kindles.4. I wish it had a SD slot, so I could have pictures on it without having to use internal memory.Overall, this is a surprise for me. I have been showing it in the office and everyone is impressed with it. I definitely think it is a good buy. Screen is amazing on it. My kids love it (I guess I am going to have to purchase another one just for them)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsShips Charged and Ready to Rock!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;L. A. Meisel "gitasha11"(NYC)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Here are some of my initial impressions.1. Fire comes pre-charged which is a step above so many electronic devices out there (not fully but enough to update and play right out of the box)2. It was fully charged in less than 2 hours (I wasn't officially keeping track as I was multi-tasking)3. Once I added my WEP key I was ready to roll (my home network)4. Came pre-linked to my Amazon email account5. Tested the same video both through Amazon Prime AND through Netflix (after I installed the app). Test video was Star Trek Deep Space Nine, which is only in SD.- Amazon - loaded right away, no choppiness, no lagging, easy to adjust volume- Netflix - loaded right away, no choppiness, no lagging, unlike what other reviewers mentioned on the web, the audio was properly synched- unable to find a volume control within the app (mentioned by many)- ability to add subtitles - this is a KEY benefit as many people were upset when Netflix first began their streaming business because it lacked this basic feature.6. Music - navigated easily to my Cloud and downloaded the music I wanted to my Fire, as opposed to keeping it all just in the Cloud. This is good for those times without Wifi.7. Books - Again, easy to navigate to the mostly free Kindle books I had in the Cloud. With one tap they were loaded onto my device.8. App Store - while many are disappointed that there are not as many apps as Apple has, this is not a factor for me.  The apps I wanted were all there Hootsuite, Netflix, Evernote, etc.9. Tested Hootsuite, which I use in order to manage multiple Twitter accounts and it functioned the same way as the iPad, except faster.10. Web - browser loaded right away, was able to use my fingers to zoom in on a page easily.11. Email - first I installed my primary Gmail account, checked mail, responded to a few, rich text and html looked fab within email.- comes pre-loaded with a signature letting people know that you are sending a note from your Kindle Fire (sound familiar?)- was able to easily add a second Gmail account, giving each a different name and asked which I wanted to be "primary."- Didn't try POP mail yet12. Newstand - magazines, newspapers - I don't subscribe to any digitally so didn't test that yet.13. YouTube - my 5 yr old niece LOVES YouTube and this is one of the reasons I decided to get a Fire. YouTube was great! In fact, upon doing a search for Sesame Street, I discovered videos I hadn't seen before such as Law and Order: Special Letters Unit (funnier for adults if you know the original)Recommendations for those thinking of purchasing a Kindle Fire- Buy a case for your new toy. I orderedamCase(TM) Classic Leather Case and Stand for Kindle Fire, Blacklast night so haven't received it yet. Wasn't going to spend $50 so $10 shipped is more within my range.- If you don't already have one, invest in one or twoMediabridge - USB 2.0 A-Male to Micro-B Cable (6 Feet). The Fire comes with a wall outlet but not with a USB one to connect to a computer. Having one makes it easy to load up video or content which may be on your computer but not in your Cloud.- If you use a major credit card such as Visa or American Express for the entire purchase of the device (no gift cards), most will double your manufacturer's warranty. Check with your creditor in advance for the exact terms. Discover does NOT offer this.Final thoughtsSo many people are comparing this to the pricier iPad, which has a lot of features, but for many they go unused.  Personally, I have no need for a built in camera or GPS, so I don't feel slighted in the Kindle Fire.  Yes, the Fire is smaller than the iPad 2, however, it is also $300 cheaper! Is there a market for both devices?  Yes! Gadget geeks will want one and I recommend keeping it away from your kids or partner...or you will never see it again.The only thing that I really wish were an option with this release is 3G.  Is it a deal breaker? No.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe perfect device for my needs.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;P.N.(NYC)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Finally a tablet that has everything I want, and none of the things I don't need, at a great price. Things like cameras, GPS, etc. I never wanted a tablet for those things--I have those things where I want them: on my phone, in my pocket. If that's what you're looking for in a tablet, then Fire is obviously not the right device for you.The Fire is a breeze to set up. Once I was up and running, it was such a great feeling to see all of my books already there waiting for me, all of the TV shows I've ever purchased waiting for me in the video library, etc. Amazon just does cloud syncing better than anyone--it's as simple as that.The carousel keeps the most recent items you've used near the front, and you can also use the search bar to search for something on the device. You can add things to your favorites list just beneath the carousel.Videos look great--sharp and clear with amazing colors. Reading comics with the comiXology app is a real pleasure--I haven't read comics in years but I've already enjoyed a couple titles with the comiXology app, and I'll definitely continue to use it. I love having all my Amazon music there for streaming and/or downloading.Yes, the device only comes with 8GB internal storage, but because all of your Amazon media exists in the cloud and can be streamed, 8GB is more than enough. I ride the subway daily so I imagine I will download some things to the device so I can read/listen/watch them while I'm offline on my commute, but then those things can be deleted when I'm done with them or want to switch them for something else. And the best part is that they'll always be in the cloud if I ever need them again.The size of the Fire is PERFECT. To me 10" tablets are so cumbersome, especially when trying to use them while commuting. I see people on the train all the time readjusting, trying to find a way to hold their big tablets that is comfortable! The Fire always feels comfortable, whether holding in one hand or two. I love that I can slip it into my backpack without it taking up much space or adding much weight.I linked the email client to my main personal account, and though I didn't buy the Fire so much for that purpose, it's nice having it there if I want it. It was very easy to set up and looks great. The web browser is functional, and though I didn't notice it being particularly fast, I think the browser must become quicker with use as it begins to be able to predict your browsing habits, etc.The build of this tablet is really great. It feels very solid and high quality in your hands. As Amazon has said time and time again, it's designed to essentially disappear and not get in the way of your experience with books, movies, apps, etc. Mission accomplished, Amazon. It's a very well designed piece of hardware.Regarding Prime membership, I was already a Prime member so the Fire seems especially suited to someone like me. For those of you on the fence about it, let me just say that Prime membership is worth every penny, and Amazon continues to make Prime membership more and more valuable as they fold more perks into it (without raising its cost!). The ability to stream a selection of movies and TV at no cost, the ability to borrow a selection of Kindle books at no cost, and of course the ever popular 2 day shipping. This may ultimately be the thing that sways people one way or the other. Prime membership is not necessary to enjoy the Fire, but it certainly makes it MORE enjoyable/usable/etc.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat value, super fast, totally worth it!!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;ccmoore74(Northern Kentucky, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)So pleased to receive the Kindle Fire yesterday.  It does not disappoint.  I am really pleased with the speed of the Fire, the easy interface and the price - $200 is fantastic for what you get.  We have an iPad as well, and I still believe this is an incredible device for the price, despite some of its limitations (storage, limited apps and lack of camera).  I highly recommend it.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAmazing little device,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;M. Miller "middaleman"(Louisville, KY)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok, two things first off.1) This is not an iPad.  It is also less than half the price of an iPad.  If you want to edit or create content, get an iPad.  If you're an Apple fanboi, get an iPad.  This device has a specific market (content consumers, and specifically Amazon content consumers) and I am it.2) People who posted their reviews before the 15th did not have a device in hand. Even some of the people who reviewed it after have never used it.  Don't review a device you've never used.  That's stupid.  Also, why do people give a PRODUCT a bad review because they are unhappy with Amazon's policies?  One has nothing to do with the other.  Stop it.Having said that, this is an amazing little tablet.  Movies stream flawlessly (I've tried Prime, Netflix and Hulu+), books work just like the Kindle Reader on any other tablet, music plays fine (the players are all easy to use and the interfaces very intuitive) and there are more than enough Apps to keep most people happy.  Obviously that will continue to grow.  The Amazon app store has always focused on quality over quantity.  You don't have to sort through the trash like you do in the Google store.Yes, the power button is not in an ideal place.  I've hit it accidentally a couple of times (pops up a message which is easy to get rid of).  Sound quality on the device itself is so so, but I have a nice set of ear buds which sound GREAT.  The software is obviously a 1.0 release.  Occasional lag, and not registering a touch do happen.  I've not yet used a new device that didn't have bugs in it's initial release.  The iPad is on it's 2nd version of hardware and 5th major software release, so yes, it's interface is smoother in use (though I think not in design).  I'm sure with the massive sales of this device there will be plenty of software updates and the App catalog will grow exponentially.  The hardware is there to make it happen.If you are an Amazon customer and consumer of Amazon content this device is almost a no brainer.  Stop reading reviews and order one now.  (Though don't throw out your e-Ink Kindle.  This thing won't work as well outdoors or for hours long reading sessions.  The screen is pretty glossy and honestly there is just no replacing e-Ink for hard core reading). If you are looking at this as an alternative to the iPad (or even another Android tablet) then consider that the Fire will do 80% of what you want to do on those devices (honestly 99% of what you will do frequently) and cost you 60% less.  You could buy 2 of these and a Kindle Touch for the price of an iPad.  Also consider if you want to buy into Amazon's ecosystem.  Just like with Apple, the glory of the device is how well it integrates into that content.  Being a Prime member is almost mandatory to get the full benefit, but it's $20 a year less than Netflix for basically the same streaming service plus 2 day shipping and the book library.  Add a Roku streaming device to your TV (available from Amazon) and you can watch all of your Prime content and Amazon purchase or rented movies on your TV set.  If you aren't into Amazon and have $500 burning a hole in your pocket... go with the iPad.  It's a fine device.  If you are into Amazon and prefer not to over pay for things, get a Fire.  It is an equally fine device.  Just different.Last night I was sitting in bed watching Transformers: Dark of the Moon on my Fire when I realized I had a 42" TV sitting a few feet away.  I paused the movie, turned on the TV, brought up the Roku, went to my Amazon content and resumed the movie right where I had paused it, then proceeded to play Cut the Rope on the Fire, pausing it when big robots started blowing stuff up because really, is there any need to keep up with the "story" in a Michael Bay movie?  Yeah, I don't think so either.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThere is no words for the love I feel...,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;A. Bartholomeusz "MsAmber"(California)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have waited for a month for my Kindle Fire to arrive. I am estatic. Its everything I dreamed and more.This is exactly in that little overlap between a laptop and a smartphone, all the doo-dahs you need, without all the crap you don't....oh, and it has FLASH!! Woot!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA must for Amazon acolytes,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Susan Bennett "Susan Wells Bennett, novelist"(Phoenix, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received mine yesterday, and, so far, I love it. The streaming function is great -- no hiccups. I love being able to see all of the book covers in color, even if I don't anticipate doing a lot of reading on this one (I have a regular Kindle for that). It's perfect for what I want to use it for, and I can stream as much as I want without incurring "extra" charges.I've seen a lot of comments suggesting that the touch screen is "jerky." I think they aren't holding the device properly. If you aren't careful, the hand holding the device can interfere with the touch-screen feature. It's a simple matter of being careful where you put your thumb. I played Bejeweled on it this morning and found the touch screen worked very well.Is there an emphasis on Amazon products? Yes, of course. If you are an Amazon acolyte, there's a lot to love here. If not, you might want to look at an Android tablet instead. I'm giving it five stars.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGet one now!,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;E. Minor(Albany, Ga.)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My Kindle Fire arrived a few hours ago. Like the 7-inch screen, image quality of the screen, speed of the tablet. Was easy to set up, of course I already had an Amazon account. In fact it was a little scary, my books,music, etc, seemed to be there automatically. Extremely pleased with this purchase and my limited time with the Kindle Fire. It seems solid and extremely well-made - but then, I expect that from Amazon.Update: The Fire seemed to get warmer than other tablets I've owned - Samsung Galaxy Tab, Acer Iconia A500 and first generation iPad. The heat from the backside of the case wasn't in any way objectionable, so this is just an observation.I felt that apps from the Amazon store downloaded significantly faster than on my other tablets - and this was through a data card, which is significantly slower than my home wireless network. This was a pleasant surprise.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsamazing but touch sensitive,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Ron-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Amazing for 199 tablet!!! The kindle is a little touch sensitie, but love it better than 400-500 tablets. It also come with free 30 day of amazon prime. Wish it came with a screen protector to keep off finger prints. love it..........Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Jsea "Jsea"(Washington)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I Just love my Kindle fire. I also have an iPad2, and can say that the fire is a real competitor. The software is a bit Jerkey, but nothing that the average user would mind. For example, you may need to wait for a second for the device to respond, or you may need to re push an icon for it to open. Nothing really major. The fact that you can access amazon prime content as well as Netflix makes it a solid investment to me. The size is perfect, it fits in my purse and is about the weight of a hardcover book. The Pulse RSS reader is one of the best subscription readers I've seen. Also the UI is very impressive, intuitive and smooth.For the price, you really get your money's worth.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsVery much impressed,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;C. Munns-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have only played with the Fire for a few hours but I can say that I am impressed. First off I thought it seemed a bit small but after using it for only 10 minutes it soon seemed like the perfect size. The screen looks great when watching netflix or amazon prime stuff. Also the speakers are very nice and of apple quality. I didn't really notice any software ticks or anything beside some things open faster then others. I used most of the big features and I have to say most worked well. The appstore is nice and easy going. Much smoother than the android market. But we can't lie, there isn't much to choose from for now but that will change soon. Getting stuff from your cloud is also easy, both streaming and downloading it.I have yet to read a book or magazine one it.That being said I was a little let down by the silk browsers. Seemed a bit slower then I though it would. The email app is also crap. The no volume button was a bit odd to me but really didn't seem to be a problem. The power button is in a weird place when holding the fire vertically so I just would hold it upside down that way the power button was on the time for apps that rotate.As for the 8gb storage I was a little upset with that but that is amazon pushing their cloud. I have bionic with tethering and a nice data plan and front and back camera so they complement each other nicely.I would recommend this very much. From what I have read app developers are flocking to make apps for the fire which is good new for owners. Also besides the things like small storage and no cameras and mic everything other problem seems like it can be fixed with a OS update which I'm sure amazon will keep on up if they want to stay ahead.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNot bad for $200.,November 16, 2011By&nbsp;Richard Keller(Ewing, NJ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The thing to remember about the Fire is at $200 its not a laptop replacement or an iPad killer but it is a nice tablet.  Another thing before buying is READ THE DESCRIPTION AND FEATURES so your not posting later about it not having a camera or memory card slot and things like that.  It doesn't have some things for a big reason, that is so it can cost only $200.I have used it some to read a book and magazine and had no problems. At 7" it is a little more work to zoom in on some things but that was expected with a small tablet.Apps and games are nice with a good selection.  You can't access every Android app and some popular ones like FaceBook and Gmail are not there but you can work around that.Web browsing was fine not as fast as the hype about the Silk browser but OK.  I did play a few Facebook games like Mafia Wars and they play fine.  A few glitches but overall fine.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

19 of 26 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsIf you already have a smart phone or a Kindle - don't bother,November 17, 2011By&nbsp;Jedidiah D. Oliver-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)There are a lot of tiny little things to not like about the Kindle Fire. Any one of them, by itself, would be a small annoyance to be forgiven and forgotten.But with the Fire, it all comes together to make a product that feels incomplete, rushed and done on the cheap. This isn't to say that the Fire doesn't have potential - it most certainly does. I'm sure the Fire Mark 2 (or 3) will be an amazing product filled with all sorts of wonderful bits.This is not that product.So, let's just list all the stuff it doesn't do right here: No Bluetooth, No 3G, No GPS, No camera, No microphone and no ability to add to the paltry 6.5 GB of storage you're allotted.But you know all that. All forgivable at $199.So what do you expect for $199?What I was expecting was a happy marriage between my two favorite devices (my iPhone and the Kindle Keyboard). I expected a touch-screen e-reader that happens to play music, movies and games plus surf the web. Oh, and buy stuff from Amazon.  And the Fire, to its credit, does all that.It just does all that badly. Even the buying stuff.To start, there's the form factor. The Fire is the same size as a standard Kindle - but weighs almost twice as much. That dense design makes it feel heavy and hard to hold in one hand for too long - a big problem when reading.  You could try two hands in landscape mode, but that also feels awkward - especially when you have to let go so often to pinch, zoom and slide as much as you're going to with the Fire.Then there's the lack of actual buttons for 'home' and 'volume' and the speakers located on one side when held in landscape mode. Little things, I know, but interface is key. You shouldn't make things hard.Then there's all the inside bits. The Fire has a tiny little brain running a heavily modified (yet antiquated) Android OS. It works if you're playing Angry Birds or reading the new Stephen King book - but don't you dare try to go to CNN.com or any other media rich site. Or any site really - the web hangs constantly.Plus (and I can't confirm this beyond doubt) the Fire crashed my router 4 times in 24 hours. All I know is every time I really tried surfing the web with the Fire, the network crashed. When I turned the Fire off, the network came back. Could be a coincidence, but I doubt it.Then there's Fire's new browser - Silk.The Silk experience isn't new. It's the same experience I had in 2002 where I would point to an address, go to the kitchen to make a sandwich, and (hopefully) the site would have loaded by then. It's the same thing on the Fire - just without a 50-foot phone cord running from the kitchen to the office.I hear that the browser gets better the more you use it. This concerns me on several levels - not the least of which is what Amazon is doing with my browsing history besides playing guessing games with where I'm headed next.But if you don't like Silk and you want one of the other fine browsers available in other Android markets - tough. No Opera or Firefox for you.Then there are a number of little things too lengthy to really detail:- The cover flow home screen that shows your recent history of stuff you've been doing - but doesn't let you delete, remove or clear anything. (Sharing your Fire? Like 'adult' viewing? Awwwk-waaard!)- The lo-res, lo-response screen that you are constantly pinching, zooming and sliding because you can't really read anything.- The failure to include the text-to-speech functionality that's on every other modern Kindle.- The fact that there's a litany of great apps missing from the Amazon App store and the ones that are there are really lousy when compared to their iOS versions. HuffPost, Netflix, Wikipedia, Weather Channel - Not a single app was as good as or better than the equivalent app on my iPhone.- The ubiquitous 'Store' button that's everywhere reminding you that what you're holding is just a mobile Amazon storefront.Which brings me to the last straw which (ironically enough) was the Amazon shopping app - the one thing you think Amazon and the Fire would get right.The immediate glaring error is that there is no 'Deals' section. You want the Gold Box? Sorry. Lightning Deals? Nope. Not on the Fire.Not only does Apple's  Amazon app have access to 'Today's Deals' (not to mention a smoother, easier and just plain better interface) - there's an app just for the Deals. How wacky is that - An Amazon shopping app on an Amazon tablet designed specifically for you to buy their stuff and they forgot (or intentionally left off) access to Gold Box and Lightning Deals. Unacceptable with the Xmas shopping season around the corner.The other big loss was the sorting of goods when you're browsing for stuff. I like sorting by price, popularity and rating. The Amazon store app doesn't do that. The iOS app does.So in conclusion, the Kindle Fire Mark 1 -might- be worth it -if- you don't already have an iPod touch or a modern fully-featured smart phone. If you do, save your money because the Fire isn't going to be anything special or do anything you can't already do faster and better (and more of) on your handheld screen.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (7)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starskindle fire part 1,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Daryl Austin "chop360"(CHANDLER, AZ USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I will have a video review later on, but i wanted to give a quick short summary.  1st off  the build quality is great  felt real good and solid in my hands.  Not to heavy and not to light.  Set up was a breeze, took me under a min to have the kindle fire sync to my wireless network.  Being a amazon prime-member is just a added bonus to this device.  Being able to stream my music and videos was a breeze, ( I think i might just be letting a certain red envelope go.) Video quality is awesome i watched videos using netflix and amazon both worked great on my wireless N network.  The main reason i got my Kindle fire was to read comic-books, lets just say using the comixology app was great the 7inch screen is perfect for reading my weekly dose of comics.  The guided view is perfect for this machine.  As far as reading comics through amazon's comic reader, well lets just say its night and day compare to the comixology app.  I purchased the Watchmen graphic novel and i could barely read the text, its  too small and you have to click in each panel to enlarge to read to much of a hassle,  i hope amazon takes a page out of comixology and immediately upgrade its own comic-book reader.  The only other low point is the magazines, unfortunately i cannot read a magazine on this device, maybe the screen is to small for this feature but it was reall a chore to try to read maximum PC.  All-in All,  i am very happy with my purchase, i really do like this device, the few problems i have can easily be fix through a update, i hope amazon listens and try to fix them,  if they do this will be the tablet to beat.  If they come out with a 10 version i will probably be very interest in that,  but for now. I am very  glad i purchased my kindle fire.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsSo far, wonderful!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;AMS-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I bought the Kindle Fire as a bridge to fill all of my needs. I am "hard core" Windows Office base because of work, but fun can be other. The Kindle Fire seems to do just what I wanted: Provide reading material, videos, music, and games.  All this at a very decent price. So far I am VERY happy!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome tablet, great price!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Josh-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Amazon really hit the nail on the head with this! Cheap enough to buy one for me and my wife and still be under the iPad price. Yet it delivers almost all the features you WANT. Yeah, it doesn't have a camera, but who really cares. The software is smooth, games play great, the cloud storage is awesome! This is really a winner! Amazon did what all others have failed to do. Place a cheap, yet good quality tablet out on the market. Good job Amazon! PLUS... PRIME? STELLAR! Not enough??? How about 20 GB of cloud storage for 20 dollars a YEAR (not month), with unlimited music storage! ALL ACCESSIBLE FROM THE KINDLE!!!! Seriously Amazon, wow...Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Product,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Shahzad Saleem "Shawn"(DFW, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Just exciting and great product. Arrived a day earlier than expected and work excellent This is the future of Tablets.Ipad on the higher end while Kindle on the lower end.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsSolid, worth the money,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;mjs-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiThe Kindle Fire was something that intrigued me as soon as it was announced. I currently have an iPad 2 and have had an iPad as well. I have had a xoom, samsung 10.1 as well. While the Xoom and Samsung all fell short of what I was wanting in a tablet, the iPad always met my expectations.The Kindle Fire is NOT an iPad killer. I don't believe it was ever intended to be. One is a 7 inch tablet, while the other is a 9.7 inch tablet. Completely different tablets going after different markets.The Fire is more of a cloud based tablet, while the iPad is more on storage device. Neither is right or wrong, better or worse. That is a users choice.Right when I got the package and opened it up I felt a very solid quality product. It did not feel cheap like the Xoom and Samsung. The back is a hard rubber type material instead of a cheap plastic. It feels like a tank to be honest for it's size.So I turned it on and connected to the internet, downloaded an update right away (seemed pretty big), updated the Fire, then connected my account (comes connected to my amazon account) to amazon.The screen is very solid. It is as good as any screen I have seen, that includes the iPad. Colors are rich, yet not over saturated. Pictures I put onto the device look as good as they do on my computer screen.The UI was responsive and I love that Amazon specialized it for their device. I wish more of the "other" tablets would do that like Apple has done with the iPad. It really feels like the OS was made for this device.It is very easy to navigate between apps, web, books, etc... Zero complaints about it. It loads quick but does have a little bit of lag when scrolling side to side, up and down. If you are new to the tablets, you will probably not even notice it. It isn't something huge, just something that you can notice a little.I loaded up Hulu+, Netflix and Amazon Prime and all three looked great on the screen. With my quick connection it loaded just fine.I uploaded a video onto the device using the USB to see if it would play it, it did. It was a m4v file which plays on apple devices. Again the screen was solid , zero complaints. It can also play mp4 files as well. Will test more files formats as I go or find on the web.Only thing I wish you could do is access the video folder, picture folder and document folder on my amazon cloud drive. Maybe I am missing something but I can't access it from the Kindle Fire. I uploaded a video onto there a while back anticipating it would be able to see it. No go, but again maybe I am missing something here.Uploading a video from computer to kindle is slow. Talking 3 to 5 MB/sec over USB. Very slow for devices these days. But again this device is really selling the cloud, not actual files on the device.Facebook app is no app, it is a link to the mobile site for facebok. Very disappointed in that fact. Especially when Amazon said it was a app. Hopefully they will get an actual app like other tablets. Not just a link to their mobile site.I uploaded my music files to the cloud (over 2000 m4a files) and they play just fine as well as mp3. Their website gives you a list of compatible files.I also was able to go to my local library system here in Utah and download ebooks to the Kindle Fire as well. My system allows a total of 10 books out at a time. With the Prime membership you also get a Loan book, which gives you one a month. It resets every 1st of the month.There are just so many positives with this very affordable device. The negatives are there though.The negatives I see is again no access to my cloud drive. I might be missing something so hopefully I am wrong.Screen is only 7 inches and when viewing vertical it is okay on certain apps, but when on a web page that isn't mobile friendly the text is very small. When viewing horizontal there is not a ton of real estate. So scrolling becomes your enemy.Apps apps apps, in time I believe developers will come over to build for the Fire. I believe that the Fire is different than other tablets in that it has a unique UI which really does set itself apart from other android tablets. Plus I really do believe Amazon is going to kill with the tablet, but as of right now, apps are in the thousands, but lets be honest here only a few are really useful.I have not had a chance to test the battery out yet. But from what I have read online it gets what they have estimated.I really can't think of anything else. It is a fantastic buy I believe for the money. It is no iPad killer because it isn't competing with the iPad. It is a completely different tablet going after a different market of people.I like the idea of cloud based, just wish it was 16GB instead of 8GB. That way if and when you know wifi is not going to be an option (while traveling) you have space to put what you need onto the device.Right now I am testing different file compresions and sizes to get the most out of movie files without taking up a bunch of space.I either have to do that or invest in a 4G device that can stream at a solid speed. Which I really do not want to do.Overall I would give this thing a 7 out of 10. I believe it does a great job of delivering a fun experience, but falls short in storage. I don't need a camera, or bluetooth or GPS. That is what I have a phone for, thank you apple.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsDelivers the Goods!,November 15, 2011By&nbsp;Paulie Walnuts "Compulsive Buyer"(Ohio)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I received my Fire this afternoon.  Setup was a breeze and I really like the bookshelf-style interface.  The processor is very speedy and the display is incredibly bright and clear.  I was most pleasantly surprised by the stereo speakers.  They deliver much better audio than I expected.  With Netflix, Amazon Instant Video and the new Amazon book lending service; there is plenty of great content.  I am 100% satisfied with my purchase.  The seven inch size screen is perfect.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

3 of 3 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsBest Device Ever!,November 14, 2011By&nbsp;SN(Southern California, USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I can't believe how ludicrous some of these reviews were!No ad hoc so I give it one star.No SD slot so I won't buy it.No 3G so I give it one star.No dvd player so I give it one star, etc.LOOK, take it for was it is! OK?!Don't just give ONE star because it's missing ONE thing!It's not a laptop and it's not an All-101-Functions-In-One device.Does your paperback have multimedia capabilities?Does it let you access millions of movies, books, and music?GEEZ YOU PEOPLE NEED TO GET A FREAKIN LIFE!What do you expect for $199? a built-in vibrator?!!That out of the way, here's my review.=============The tablet is very sleek, slim, and lightweight compared to an iPad.The screen isn't too bright yet not too dim either.The color was sharp and images detailed.Easy to use right out of the box, just press the ON button and it powers on instantly!Then slide the yellow bar on screen. Setup your wi-fi which is a cinch,and register it and maybe it's already inputted for you.It'll self download the kindle software for a few minutes, and boom you're done!Now you're all set to take advantage of this wonderful device!As a newbie to tablets and Unlike other reviewers here (possibly Apple fans),I'm an ACTUAL owner of the Kindle Fire.  I just received it today on 11/15/2011 @ 10AM PST.I can personally recommend this device to everyone age 1 to 100.I also give my Iron Clad FIVE out of FIVE STAR rating!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAlmost Everything I Could Want in an Affordable Tablet,April 4, 2012By&nbsp;Claudia47-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiAlthough I already own (and love) a NookColor, I've wanted a Kindle Fire since they first came out. However,  I couldn't justify the price tag.  Then Amazon ran a one-day special on the refurbished Kindle Fire, offering it at $139.00, shipped.Since Amazon provides the same warranty on the refurbished Fire as on a new one, I felt safe buying it, which I did immediately. As you can imagine, the devices sold very quickly at that price.Once my order shipped I began to worry about what to expect, but I worried for nothing.  My Kindle arrived in the same box as a new one, and included an adapter, but no paper user guide. Per the Amazon site, this is standard for the refurbished models.  Not a problem, though, because the Kindle Fire includes an on-board user guide. There's also a lot of support available on the Amazon website.When I unboxed Kindle, I was pleasantly surprised.  It looked and acted like new, and was already fully charged.  In about an hour I mastered the user-friendly interface and downloaded apps, books, and a magazine from Amazon.  Everything worked like a charm.The first thing I noticed is that the screen is brilliant and played my Prime Instant videos well. I was happily surprised at the sound quality.  My NookColor can barely be heard without earphones but the Kindle Fire was easy to hear without them. It does have a headphone jack, of course, but I haven't had to use it yet.I love the browser, which lets me add a new tab instead of having to open a new window, as I do with Nook.  After a few minutes of getting oriented, I found the carousel simple and pleasant to use for browsing my collection.  The navigation menu at the bottom of each page is intuitive so I got the hang of it quickly.  It can be hidden (by selecting the full-screen option), to create more real estate.So far the only complaint I have is the screen glare (but I also have that problem with the Nook). Since I primarily use my Kindle indoors, it's easy to avoid glare and anti-glare screens can be bought, if needed. However the issue doesn't bother me.Kindle Fire does offer Cloud storage, but no SD card slot, so that could be a problem for some. The Kindle's native memory is fine for my purposes.One of the nicest perks about owning Kindle Fire is the huge number of apps and books available to download.  You can either take advantage of both free and pay apps and Kindle books on Amazon, get them from many sites online, or download library ebooks if your library supports that.  Kindle Fire is also compatible with MP3 music and audiobooks.The Kindle Fire is a wonderful tablet and I wouldn't hesitate to recommend it to anyone who wants about 90% of Ipad's functionality at a fraction of the cost. Kindle Fire is my new favorite tech toy.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

21 of 29 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsDisappointing as a book reader and web browser.,November 25, 2011By&nbsp;BradL-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was really excited to get a Kindle Fire since I wanted to use the Kindle's Read-To-Me feature to read many books while I drive and also have a media and Android device all in one.  There are tons of books that are never going to be converted to real audio-book format because they are either too technical, or too niche for the mass-market.  Unfortunately this feature turned out not to be available on the Kindle Fire.  But, the story gets worse.  When I called Amazon to confirm this feature didn't exist, the suggestion was to download an Android app that would provide the feature.  That didn't work either because the text-to-speech app sold in Amazon's webstore doesn't work on the Fire.  When I pressed the technical support person to tell me which application to download, they couldn't identify a single one.  So, the tech support team is clearly uninformed and is *assuming* that all will be made right with Android apps.I tried to download the Android app from my credit card company as well and that failed also.  (It's a big name credit card company...)  Finally, several of the Android apps I've downloaded have experienced multiple crashes (including Zynga apps).  Whether those are related to the apps, or the device I can't confirm, I don't have another Android device to test with.Searching the Amazon Android App store from the Fire turns up far fewer apps than the same searches on Amazon.com.  Not sure if that means the other apps don't work on the Fire either, but the result is that the selection of apps and games seems surprisingly thin (worse than my Windows Phone).The web browser experience is OK, but not as fast as I expected from the pre-release writeups about Silk and sometimes gets confused by popup windows.  I am often routed to mobile sites, rather than the full featured website, but this seems to vary by domain.The responsiveness of the touch panel is slow, with it frequently taking several touches to activate a button or action.When using the device in landscape mode (watching movies), it is easy to hit the power button by mistake, which necessitates unlocking again.  Also, both speakers are on one side, which is a little strange.  Given the bright, vibrant screen, the speakers should have been split to provide a better stereo field, but that's easily solved with headphones (when watching alone).The WiFi was easy to connect at home, but doesn't work at all from my office, while my phone's WiFi does work at work.The Email client built is is okay, but doesn't deal with multiple folders when organizing mail.Overall, the device is very good for movies, fair for books, and is worse than my Windows Phone for productivity and has a mediocre selection of games.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOOOOVE IT!!!,May 16, 2012By&nbsp;Ashley-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got the Kindle Fire for my birthday in December, not really knowing what i would be getting into. I've played around with tablets and ipads that my family owned and they were pretty cool. Now when i started seeing advertisements for the kindle fire i was pretty curious. So when my mom approached me about a birthday gift, i said i wanted the kindle fire. Let me tell you, i was pleasantly surprised! It literally is a smaller tablet for half the price! You can get books, movies, music, games and even the oh so popular apps!!! Plus, when i registered for my amazon prime membership (an $80 investment to... use the lending library to read books without having to actually buy them, one-click purchases on amazon so you don't have to type in ALL shipping info every purchase, plus discounts with TONS of things) i pretty much fell in love!! I've had sone people use my kindle fire and be mad that they spent over $400 for a tablet that does the same things! They make really nice covers for the kindle fire that actually double as a stand. Plus, i'm all about the fact that it fits perfectly in my purse, so it's great for on the go! Highly recomend kindle fire! (That is if you're not one of those crazy "stand in line for 50 million hours to get an ipad" people!)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsMaybe the best $139 I'll spend this year! You must install Android 4.0 ICS!!,May 10, 2012By&nbsp;J. Lenz-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I picked up one of the refurb deals for $139 last week...what a bargain!  Delivered in 2 days in typically quick amazon fashion.  Played around with it for about a day, the software is smooth and responsive and generally would be great for most users.However, I couldn't resist the temptation to root the Fire and install one of the many awesome custom ROMs available for it.  I installed GedeRoms 1.25 and holy sh** I'm glad I did.  With Android 4.0 you get 80-90% of a Samsung Galaxy 7.7 for a fraction of the price.  The interface is quicker/smoother than the stock software with much more capability feature wise.  Everything works as it should aside from a couple minor bugs like charge icon doesn't show and you have to hold power down 10sec to fully power off, these minor bugs should be addressed in future ROM updates though.  Access to android market is crucial for Google Voice/Gmail/Maps/YouTube/etc as well.  Android 4.0 really completes the Fire and the hardware handles it magnificently.  I haven't touched my iPad since getting the Fire lol.  I may buy another one!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsPerfect for my needs.,May 9, 2012By&nbsp;lolo-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Fire has been receiving some poor reviews for different reasons that are not specifically the fires fault.  For example, that it was stolen upon delivery and whatnot.  This is not the Fire's fault, but more of Amazon.  Please take this into consideration before placing a negative review for this.I purchased this and decided to wait around 6 months in order to write a fair review.I am a 20 year old male that was looking for a affordable tablet to play games, browse the internet etc.  I do not have children in my apartment. So I have no complaints towards the 1 click buying option.I am extremely satisfied with this product.  I use it every day.  I've never had any problems with purchasing anything, with battery, with display or with anything.Another complaint I have seen a lot in reviews, was lack of customization ability.  This is FALSE.  There are ways to customize just about everything on here, with out "jail breaking" it and voiding the warranty.There isn't much this can't do that an iPad can,  in fact, Apple's strict restrictions does not allow the iPad do do somethings the Fire.The only reason I can think of that would make an iPad better, would be the ability to connect with other Apple products the buyer owns (Apple TV, Mac, Etc.)Please, do not let negative reviews turn you away from buying this.If you are looking for something simply to watch Netflix, browse the internet, use social networks, and play games,  this is definitely for youHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent Gift,May 4, 2012By&nbsp;cmoney "Eb"(East Coast)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased the Kindle Fire as a gift for my wife, who was afraid of it, did not understand what it was, and said she will only read actual books.Setup of her accounts was so easy and fast; within a few minutes I had her email, her Amazon account and Netflix all connected to it.  After about 5 minutes of demo-ing the tablet she took over and now it never leaves her side.This is a great tablet.  The interesting thing is that this is actually a Kindle, it is easy to overlook that.  She has started using it for reading now as well, and she absolutely loves it.  I bought my wife a piece of technology and she loves it!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsIt is what it is,April 19, 2012By&nbsp;ShoeAdmirer(New Jersey)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Okay so I really don't write reviews about much but lately I feel it is needed to tell everyone what they should know before making purchases. First as far as my kindle fire goes I won it in a auction. Yah me! I was in a total debate over to purchase this or something from a different company. Needless to say I am not disappointed. The features are great I can get everything I want. From apps, to books, magazines, newspapers, video, music. I still learning from all of this so I may come back to adjust some of what I say. Here are my cons:- Would like a camera (not a big deal but I like to do youtube videos)- Apps I would like You Tube. Doesn't exist yet. Also Facebook app just takes you directly to facebook via web browser. NOT COOL! would just like the app please.- Web Browser is okay but I recently had a problem with a site I deleted from my cookies, bookmarks, etc. However the site kept popping up. I just decided to deactivate the entire account and reset the device in order to get it removed.- Music well I have been a huge fan of Amazon Cloud for a while now. So I was excited when I would be able to listen to the music on my phone device and my Kindle. Well I was sure enough disappointed. Currently trying to figure this out. But ALL my music on my phones Amazon cloud can not be display on my kindle cloud or on the web cloud version. BUMMER!!!- Library......Now I have two other companies e-book readers in my house hold. I have books loaded on them as well. The Kindle's library isn't that great. I would love customization to allow more then one library. So that I can have my child's book located under her own library and mine under mine and the option to see all together if I want.-Video: Be careful some videos, movies, etc don't look as clear. I am still testing this and will report back.Well that is my review for now.LLC = Live, Laugh, CupcakesCNDKindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLove it.,April 12, 2012By&nbsp;Nschueller-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Really love my new Kindle Fire. Love checking out the books from the public library. It is easy to carry around and always available. Screen is a little small for using the internet but convenient when I can't talk the kids out of their laptops.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsAwesome device,February 23, 2012By&nbsp;J. Matute "&#34;Im that guy, you know the one...(Anchorage, Alaska)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)This is an awesome device. I switch over from the Nook and I love it! It was a bit buggy at first but a few software updates have fixed most of the issues I had with it. If your looking a for a basic tablet at a great price you cant go wrong with a Kindle Fire...Streaming Media, Great selection and prices on books, fast web surfing and Android apps and a good size. what more do you need?Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire vs. Kindle Touch 3G,March 28, 2012By&nbsp;Amber-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I recently upgraded from a Kindle Touch 3G to a Kindle Fire, and I am so pleased with this product. There are some advantages and disadvantages to using one over the other, so I thought I would make a comparison between the products.The Kindle Touch 3G has some features that are unique, and are not available on the Kindle Fire. These features include:* The option of using 3G Wireless rather than a wireless connection.* E-ink, which has the appearance of ink on plain paper, as opposed to a backlighted screen that can strain the eyes.* Text-to-Speech, which allows users to have all of their Ebooks read aloud to them, with an option to switch between a male or female digital voice.* An email address that connects directly to the device, allowing you to send almost any computer-generated text to the device itself.* A USB cable that allows the Kindle to connect directly to the computer to transfer any supported file type from the computer to the Kindle.Most of the other beneficial features of the Kindle Touch 3G can be found in the product description:Kindle Touch 3G, Free 3G + Wi-Fi, 6" E Ink Display - includes Special Offers &amp; Sponsored ScreensaversThe Kindle Fire also has unique features, which are not available on the Kindle Touch:* Connectivity to the Internet and World Wide Web, through the use of a wireless network connection.* A variety of free Apps, as well as the ability to purchase and download many more.* Sleek, colorful design that allows you to read books, magazines, and newspapers in full color, play music, browse the web, and watch videos.* It does not come with any word processing programs, but you can view Microsoft documents. You can also purchase Apps that will allow you to create simple Word, PowerPoint, and Excel documents, as well as view PDFs.Most other beneficial features of the Kindle Fire can be found in the product description:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-FiMy husband and I are college students taking our classes online. He has a Kindle Touch, and I now have a Kindle Fire. My husband loves his Kindle Touch, mostly for the Text-to-Speech feature, and for the E-ink, which are not available on the Kindle Fire.However, I use the internet as a constant resource for my schoolwork, and I don't need the Text-to-Speech feature. What I do need is the portability offered by the Kindle Fire. The features of the Kindle Fire are very similar to those of a miniature, super-portable computer. There are a few negative aspects to the Kindle Fire. It does have a fairly short battery life, and some websites don't seem to work properly through the browser on the device. For me, the Kindle Fire provides everything I could ever need in an e-reader, plus many of the features I need in a computer, with added portability. I am very happy with my decision to upgrade my Kindle Touch to a Kindle Fire, and I love this device. I can't imagine any other tablet-style device could be better.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNice unit with a few caveats,March 27, 2012By&nbsp;Mykers(Fullerton, Ca)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Okay folks, I feel that now I can give an accurate review of the Kindle Fire since its release date!First, let me start by saying I had pre-ordered this item and couldn't wait for its release. Once I received the item I was sooo excited to let the good times roll. Immediately, upon powering this unit on and getting familiar with the interface I was a bit depressed. The carousel was not something I would call intuitive AT ALL. This was a major deal-breaker for me.The reason? Well I bought two Kindle Fires for the same account (one for my wife and one for myself). I was immediately disappointed because there was no way to remove books, apps, internet WebPages, etc from the carousel. This was a HUGE problem because I read hard-core horror, and the wife reads twilight, and other novels that do not interest me. When I would show off this bad boy, people would say, "Oh, you read twilight huh"?Needless to say it was a bit of an embarrassment. Anyhow, they recently came out with a few updates that fixed this problem. Prior to this, I would have rated the Kindle fire on a two star basis, due to the lack of customization.Now onto the most recent review.....Since the release of the two updates, this unit has been stellar with a few caveats. I like the interface of this device. I am a simplistic person, and do not like clicking/touching several screens just to get a program/app to open. I favor the book shelf due to adding my favorite apps and books-stored in a convenient place for easy retrieval.The carousel is still okay. It is nice that I can remove and add items, but it really is a slight embarrassment. This isn't the case for most, as some I have read enjoy the carousel. Either way, it appears it's a preference whether or not you enjoy this feature.Next, I would like to cover what I feel is lacking for this device. First, if you have more than one device on your account, both devices will receive the exact same items you purchase and/or download. This is not a major deal-breaker seeing now you are able to remove these items from the device. Nonetheless, it is still irritating to have my wife say, "Oh, I see you bought ANOTHER interesting book I would NEVER read again." Those of you who have been married for quite some time understand my dilemma...lolSecond, the lack of customization is a bit irritating. Unlike my Samsung Epic, I cannot download half the apps that I feel are useful. In other words, like my bank app to check my accounts, or make my car payments are NOT available (yes I know I can root this device, but I shouldn't have too). This is a bit perplexing which brings me to my third and final complaint.It appears Amazon wants you to buy this device so they can take control of you. They basically tell you what you can and cannot purchase. It would be nice if this was like any other android device where there really are no limitations of what apps you can and cannot download. For me, this is irritating.I know there are ways around this, and I am sure if I looked hard enough I can get the apps on the device that I want. But why go through all the trouble when Amazon clearly wants to control your device?Anyhow, all in all I love this device. For 200.00 you can beat this. I have never experienced problems with the Wi-Fi, nor the browser. In fact, the browser seems to work flawlessly on mine and my wife's unit. We have never lost a connection and have had only a few problems with apps that force-close. Amazons selection (aside from my complaints) are great. I enjoy Amazon instant video, the movies looks great. The speakers are okay, but I can hear them with no problem. Downloading items could not be any easier, and the book selection is superb.Even though I started with complaints, I feel this is a 4 star unit. This is in no way a comparison to the Ipad and I wish people would stop comparing it to Apples technology. This is an EREADER with a few perks. I am a hardcore reader and go through a book about every 5-6 days. This unit satisfies my craving, and the internet and apps are a bonus and a nice way to take a break from reading. I would recommend this product; after my babbling, 4 stars still stands.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful3.0 out of 5 starsGreat value? Yes. Quality? Eh.,March 24, 2012By&nbsp;Kim Joon "TheJoonSpirit"(Warminster, Pa)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I ordered a Kindle Fire for my fiance, who mainly surfs the web, checks email, watches video, and reads. I got her a netbook which she loves but understandably wanted something more portable.Flash was a must so that ruled out the iPad right away. (The price of an iPad ruled out the iPad as well.) I've used the Nook a little bit but the interface on that is clunky and slow.My sister received an iPad for Christmas and I played around with it a bit and was more than satisfied with the overall experience and design/engineering of the Fire. Amazon did a great job customizing the Android operating system to feel tailored to their device. If you've ever used the iBooks app on an iPad, the main screen is similar to that. Having said that, the interface does lack some finesse like when it flips from landscape to portrait and vice versa, and when you're browsing the app store, if you click on an item to find out more then come back to the search screen you were in, you are sent back to the beginning of the list rather than to the item you just clicked. But these are minor to medium annoyances that she and I can happily live with because the device does what it was designed to do, consume media, and it does it pretty darn well. This is really the extent of my pros/cons reviews. There's plenty of other (better written) reviews that go more in-depth. I encourage you to read them.So why am I only giving it three stars? The answer is because she's actually on her second Fire right now. The first one wouldn't turn on after a week. We told Amazon and they shipped out a replacement saying that it was most likely some defect with the battery. You may be thinking that I'm being pretty unforgiving for one defective device, but her second Fire just started freezing while web surfing and flickering during start up. We may need to order yet a third one.Caveat emptor is all I'm saying. It's superb when it works, it just doesn't work all the time.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire has changed my life!!,March 19, 2012By&nbsp;A. Harford "Student09"(Connecticut, USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)For anyone that wants to consume content - watch videos/TV shows, play games, check Facebook, read e-books, listen to music, etc. the Kindle Fire is the perfect addition to your life.  It's small and light enough to carry in your purse , yet the screen is big enough for you to truly enjoy e-books, videos, TV shows, and movies on.  Especially if you find yourself always or almost always within a wi-fi zone (home, work, etc.)  Having all of your stuff immediately available on this device ensures that you will never be bored again!  I keep mine in my bag and carry it with me everywhere so that I can whip it out and read a book, watch a show, play a game, do light internet browsing or shopping, etc.I'll echo what some of my fellow reviewers have already stated: The Kindle Fire is NOT iPad, nor is it meant to be.  It is an e-reader that also happens to have additional features, hence the apps, wi-fi, music, etc.  It has a bright screen with vibrant colors.  I'm able to comfortably read books both inside AND outside in direct sunlight by adjusting the screen brightness with no worries, strain or eye fatigue.The price point is just right for Kindle Fire.  I definitely recommend grabbing one.  Since I received mine, I've found myself not just playing games and watching TV shows, but actually reading more.  I've also found it very helpful for GRE prep.  It's much easier to carry around Kindle Fire and a small notebook for studying than it is to lug around a huge print book everywhere I go!If you get a Kindle, I recommend getting a screen protector and a case - you can grab these on Amazon no problem.  The protector will keep the screen from getting scratched/covered in fingerprints, and if you get a case that converts to a stand, you will be able to prob up Kindle in landscape, which is very helpful for watching videos.  I haveCaseCrown Bold Standby Case (Blue) for Amazon Kindle Fire TabletAnyway, if you fit the profile I described above, don't hesitate to grab a Kindle Fire.  My husband and I waited a couple months before we got ours and now neither of us can figure out how we lived without Kindle!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsDetailed Review: I am very happy with my purchase.,March 6, 2012By&nbsp;Kori-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have now owned my Kindle Fire for three months and feel that I can write a through review on the product.First I would like to state that the main purpose for purchasing the Kindle Fire was to be able to read e-textbooks on the device as well as watch TV shows or Movies during my down time at my University. The Fire has done everything that I have wanted it to do and I absolutely love it. Below, I will go into details about the things that stood out to me the most and things that I had questions about before buying my Fire.Size: I see the fire as being a 'baby' media tablet and for that, it is the perfect size. I do a lot of walking around campus and wanted to cut the weight of my book bag. Buying the Fire allowed me to switch all my books to e-textbooks. Now I really only carry the Fire (which is very light weight), a few notebooks, a pen, and on occasion my netbook. Having to walk such far distances across the campus, this has been an amazing lifesaver! The Fire is big enough without being too big for me to consider extremely portable.Watching TV/Movies: I have tested this feature out a lot and I have to say I have not had one complaint about the picture or the size of the video and I have a 63 inch TV at home. It's great for watching a show in between classes; which I do frequently. Having Amazon Prime (which I upgraded to after purchasing the Fire) has really come in handy and saved me a lot of money!Sound: With headphones (which is what I predominately use) the audio is great! I find that majority of the time, I barley have to have the volume above half. However when watching a TV Show or Movie, since the speakers are only at the top and you watch shows/movies in landscape format, all your audio comes from one side; this makes it sound a little weird. So if you're getting it to watch things without headphones, I would recommend getting some sort of external speakers.Games/Apps: I have been getting the daily free app from the amazon app store on my android phone for a while before buying the fire. I was pleased to know that those apps also work on the Fire. I downloaded and installed a few games and love how the graphics look. So far I have not had any trouble with apps freezing or shutting down or anything. I have been very pleased in that department. There is a small downside however, if the game you're playing uses the touch interface a lot, you will have a lot of fingerprints and smudges over the screen. For that, I recommend getting screen cloth as I find I use one often since touch the screen a lot.Comics: Reading comics on the fire is pretty awesome. There's a program called "comics x" which allow you to read the whole comic page, or read panel by panel using the swipe feature to get to the next panel. The downside is that some of the comics aren't always programed properly so sometimes it may go back one panel before moving on to the next; sometimes this can get frustrating.Books: I have never had a kindle before so I can comment as to how the reading is compared to others. But I did have one of the older Kobo readers. I find that I like reading on the Fire much better compared to that. In High School, I did a lot of reading on laptops so I am used to the screen. But if you have a hard time reading on the computer, I think you may find an issue reading on the Fire. My suggestion would be to find a best buy that carries one or a friend and try it out first.Textbooks: The biggest reason I purchased my Fire! So far, I have not bought a textbook through the amazon service; they don't carry the ones I need for my classes. But I have purchased my textbooks (and yes Pearson textbooks) through a website called coursesmart.com. They now have a non-downloadable Kindle Fire app so this helped me in making my decision; knowing that I could purchase and view my textbooks on the Fire. After having both hardcover textbooks and e-textbooks, I have to say that I really prefer having the e-textbooks. It's more affordable, lightweight, convenient for my lifestyle (I can read my e-textbook anywhere; including my cell phone), and eco-friendly! You're able to increase the font size and zoom in and even bring the diagrams and photos in the book to full screen. I thought the 7 inch screen would make reading textbooks difficult, but I haven't had any problems with it. Amazon really integrated the use of textbooks and their functions very well.(I also afforded my Fire, its case, and the protection plan by selling in all of my old textbooks to amazon!)The Cloud: I enjoy being able to stream my music straight from the cloud. It makes it really convenient instead of having to upload it from my computer. Also, songs that you buy through amazon will automatically be on there. A downside to the cloud is that pictures that you upload to the cloud are not visible on the Fire through an app or anything. You actually have to go through the web and go to the cloud. It's also important to know that you can't download the pictures from the cloud onto the Fire. If you try, it says that it is not supported... a little bit of a bummer.Internet: I haven't had any problems with the internet even though I have read some reviews stating that it was very slow. I have found that depending on your internet connection and what website you're view, you will rarely have a problem. Sites that seem to be visited a lot (ie. facbook) tend to load much quicker than ones that many Fire users probably don't visit. However, I haven't found it to be a problem and I am used to a hard wired cable internet connection at home.Other: The Fire does come with a wall plug for charging and I have found that even using it daily and keeping it on its 'sleep' mode, I don't have to charge all that often. I usually try to charge it at least once to twice a week however since I don't bring my charger to school and I don't want it dying on me there; it should be noted that while at school I usually watch between 6-8 hours on the Fire mostly streaming TV shows but occasionally reading my e-textbooks. It is also something to note that the cable needed to connect your Fire to your computer DOES NOT come with the Fire. Luckily I had one at home from my android phone, however this may be an extra expense you need to consider.Overall, I have been enjoying my Fire. Though its biggest downside is that it doesn't have the capabilities for me to add it to my cell network so it could have 3G or even 4G service; it only has wifi capabilities. When I first discovered that there were no 3G or 4G connection capabilities, I almost held off on purchasing the Fire. But I felt that its pros outweighed the cons that I would face with the connection issues. Usually most places now offer free wifi, however you will run into those that don't which honestly has made me a bit annoyed.Technically, I gave the Fire 4 1/2 stars. Only being able to connect where there's wifi, to me, is hindering on what should be a small media tablet. But for the price, if you can do without 3G/4G, then I would say its something that should be added to your technology collection. Sorry for such a long review, but I hope it was thorough enough and helped answer some of your questions before buying the Kindle Fire.UPDATE: I realize that I forgot to mention something important about the Kindle Fire.Screen: It hasn't come up for me very often, but the screen on the Fire has a lot of glare and can be a bit annoying to use out in direct sunlight or in a room where there is a light right above or behind you.Speakers: As I mostly use headphones with the Kindle Fire, this doesn't bother me, however the speakers can be very soft (especially when in a larger or non-silent room) even when turned up on both the system and with whatever your watching/listening to. However, if you have a good pair of headphones and don't mind wearing them (mine are from Creative) then it's not a bad flaw.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful2.0 out of 5 starsOkay option, at present,March 4, 2012By&nbsp;David-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Good- Clean interface for reading books, which has been more pleasant on an LCD than I expected (I previously owned a Kindle DX)- Video quality is good, and many of the BBC nature videos are well priced- Small enough that it fits in my fairly large coat pocketBad- There is no access to the Android app store on Google because Amazon doesn't register the Kindle Fire with Google even though it runs on Google's Android platform. Basically, Amazon used Google's free platform, took everything about Google out of it (screwing Google), then turned around to monetize it solely for themselves. This isn't a culture that I like to support, and it is the biggest reason I will sell my Fire in the next 6 months.- Some 3rd party apps can be installed, but even to do this it is a pain. It takes time to search online to find the work-arounds to even get some common apps, like the Nook app to read B&N; purchases.- Doesn't come with a cord to connect to a computer. Quality cords start at about $10 [EDIT: see the comments for a quality cord that is about $5]. I've bought two lower-end cords and both will disconnect randomly.- *Both* speakers are on one end of the device, which makes watching video without headphones a one-sided audio experience (video is always in landscape mode)- The Fire is too thick/heavy to hold comfortably with one hand for a long period of time- Occasionally the screen and power button are glitchy. For instance, the device sometimes senses motion when there was none, and sometimes the device turns on immediately after I turn it offNeutral- The Fire should continue be viewed as an Amazon-integrated, not a regular tablet. It was engineered to tightly fit with Amazon content and not serve many other purposes. For example, it doesn't even come with a basic text editor, and the only free text editor I've found in the Amazon app store is buggy.In summary: the bad outweigh the good at this point. The tablet is now only on par with many other good tablets, and Amazon closes the user off from outside resources. Only because I've already got my Fire will I keep it for awhile longer... I'll sell it as soon as Apple brings out a smaller tablet or when Google comes out with their Nexus tablet. I don't like supporting the direction Amazon is going.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsGreat electronic toy,March 4, 2012By&nbsp;Chucky69-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)After reading a few reviews where buyers had their Kindle Fires stolen and their credit cards charged up (because the Fires come with all your data pre-loaded), I went to Best Buy where I bought mine. I fiddled with the display model for about a minute and liked it enough to grab one. Unfortunately the darn "protective" cases are almost a quarter of what the Fire costs.But I've already loaded it with apps, videos, a few pictures, songs, and some books and it really is a fine big boy toy.Let me start with what I love about it:The price!Decent battery life.Outstanding display.Has a passcode lock feature.Decent browsing speed.Plenty of apps to choose from.The screen's keypad is better than my iPhone's (bigger if not better)Will probably take the place of my laptop on trips.Reading comics on it is awesome.Netflix and Amazon's Instant Video look great.Did I mention THE PRICE??Here's what I'm not so happy about:The touchscreen, probably depending more on the application than the screen itself, has (a couple of times) not wanted to honor touch. All I had to do was go back to the homescreen and then back into the app and things were good to go.Despite the larger keypad (when it appears), it's still not quite as great as I thought it would be. I still have to be careful what letters I touch. It does have the auto-complete word thing which helps a lot.Not as many apps as the iPhone/iPad but there's usually something out there that can compete with the Apple's version.I heard people complain about the scrolling speed but it gets better after you upgrade the software, which was a piece of cake to do. Even before the upgrade it wasn't all that bad.It's a little picky about what kind of user videos it plays but I haven't had too many problems with that. It plays Firefox's converted videos (off of YouTube) just fine. They're in MP4 format.The audio isn't as powerful as my laptop or iPhone but it is definitely loud enough. I use Skull Candy earbuds and maxing it out would be a little uncomfortable for me. (UPDATE 3/7/12: I don't know what happened before but I was listening to the audio in an office setting and it is outstanding.)BOTTOM LINE:Very happy with the purchase. As soon as the Kindle Fire 2 comes out (hopefully with 3G) and maybe a tad bigger screen, I'll give this one to my daughter and buy the new one. The Kindle Fire isn't perfect, but it's pretty damn good for the money.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsNOT an iPad killer, but for what it is, it deserves a 5 star,February 2, 2012By&nbsp;Moody-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Being an iPad and overall Apple fanboy myself, I had to go in to purchasing a Kindle Fire with an open mind. And you know what? I'm pleasantly surprised. I wanted something I could take to work, and kindof toss around, but quicker to access certain things than my macbook. My wife has the iPad and I sold my iPad, but still wanted the idea of a tablet without spending the dough. So far this little Fire has really outdone itself beyond what I expected, and all with a $199 price tag! Here's the break down in my usual way...Price: At $199 and for what it offers, you can't beat a quick $200 for a touch screen tabletPackaging: It's in a box in usual amazon fashion, cardboard style, simplicity. Not much to the kindle fire, just the device itself and a charger, pretty straight forward (It does not come with a separate mini usb for connecting to computer, if you need to load things manually, you'll have to get that separately yourself)Product: The kindle fire is simple, not a whole lot of options, just simple black with glossy gorilla glass screen and a pretty sturdy feeling outer cover. It feels good in your hands, and does not feel cheap at all. The majority of this product is all touch, so there won't be any volume buttons, silent buttons, it pretty much has two little speaker holes on top, and a power button, usb connection, and headphone jack.Performance: I tested this thing along with my wife's iPad and an iPad 2, and the kindle fire keeps up pretty well. The movie and video aspect actually loads up a little faster than the iPad 2 did (with Amazon Prime and tested with Netflix). The menus and tab functions move really smooth. You can store apps and web pages on the front springboard and arrange it in anyway. The top "shelf" of the main screen has something they call a carousel that stores previously opened apps or pages. Which is nice for quick switching back and forth, and a little annoying because it starts to stack up, and doesn't look very organized (for a neat freak like me, I'm constantly having to clear apps off my carousel, some people won't care though.In the end?? Some people may argue the fact that it has 8GB storage, and that's it, is enough to bump this down to 3 stars, some people may say a "touch only" device with very little button access may warrant a few more bumps in ratings, but I ask, if you want the more thrills and frills, why not get another device? Kindle Fire, is made to be a quick no-brainer purchase for someone that wants a tablet, e-reader, that looks sharp and shows clean images, web browsing, and checking email. For what it is, it does it real well. Tons of apps for it, tons of functions, I use this thing on a daily basis.I would recommend this to everyone! Newbies to tablets, or veterans!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsLove it now, but hated at first,February 19, 2012By&nbsp;msjackson1227-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have never written a review before on Amazon because I've never had one complaint about anything, but I was so frustrated with Kindle Fire I almost returned it. I just purchased my Kindle 02/19/12 and I would have given it 5 stars but for the simple fact that I had so many problems trying to get it connected to Wi-Fi is absolutely ridiculous. I did everything to try to get it going to my wireless router but nothing worked and yes I downloaded the update 6.2.2 for my kindle(manually).  I finally went out and purchased a new router even though my router worked perfectly fine, it's five years old and maybe that had something to do with it, but Amazon you should really let people know that there are issues with wi-fi or please get the issues corrected!!! Other than getting connected to wi-fi I love the Kindle Fire it is worth the 200.00, hope others had better success getting connected than I did.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsVery impressed so far!,February 16, 2012By&nbsp;J. Delgado(Dallas, TX USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Like most of the other reviewers here, I have been looking for a portable electronic device, smaller than a laptop and larger than a cell phone. In other words... a tablet.After trying almost everything out there, I decided to go for the kindle fire for the following reasons:1) Portability (Thus a 7" screen fit the bill)2) e-reader (Not only books but pdf files as well, I convert practically everything into a pdf to read later)3) The ability to connect to a computer and move files as I wish.4) Stream videos (I have netflix and prime).5) Internet access on wifi spots.I'll go into detail:1)Portability: I tried the iPad, the Iconia, the Thrive and the Transformer (to name a few) in their larger sizes. While the real estate was nice on my eyes, they all seemed bulky on extended use (Over 5 minutes of holding it). I like to carry a small bag (notepad sice) most of the time and did not want to bulk up what little space I have. I also have a 17" Mac Book Pro, which I have to carry half the time for work. I also have an iPhone 4. iPad was pretty much out of the question from the get go, since I wanted a different more free to manage platform without having to use iTunes... At this point I settle for the 7" tablet. I kept going back and forth between the Fire and  the Iconia. I settle for the Fire due to the unlimited amazon cloud space for amazon content. I ignored the USB advantage of the Iconia because I already have the laptop and I don't want a laptop substitute. I want something portable where I can read my bible (Olive Tree) and my books and PDFs while having some games and internet, IN COLOR.2)E-reader: I basically covered this above. The Fire is a great E-reader while I am indoors. Outdoors is horrible, oh my eyes, my eyes... the glare. Thus, took half a star. However, I like that I can move my PDFs back and forth to my Fire. And that I can zoom them as well!3)Computer Connection: I use MAC, PC and Linux. I can connect to all and move stuff around like I would with an SD Card. `Nuff said.4)Stream videos: Really a plus. The picture quality is really good but dependent on the internet connection. Obvious... Prime is only getting better for video content!5)Internet Access: Yup, it's good. Really good. I have not had any connection problems so far. I don't eat Ice Cream anyways...Why did I take the other half star?Dropbox! Not cool -.-I fail to see any valid reason to not have dropbox available as an app for the Fire. So I am left to connect via USB and transfer my files through my computer...I'm not big into gaming on a tablet, I play the common ones: Angry Birds, Plants vs. Zombies, etc. So I don't care much about having limited space for my apps. I use my iPhone to sync my calendar so I don't need to do that on my Fire.All in all, for $199.00 and according to my needs, the Kindle Fire is Perfect for me. I just went out to lunch today and tucked my Fire on my coat's chest pocket, I mean, come'on!!! That was great, and I ate while reading some research papers converted into pdf's... life is good :)Good Luck on your search and remember to be real with yourself and narrow down what you really need, not what you want!Peace,JoseHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (3)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire,February 15, 2012By&nbsp;Bob 2012-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is a great product. It's inexpensive, works well, and not only can you read books, you can listen to music, watch movies, surf the web, and much more. FYI - The Kindle Fire is NOT an iPad killer. It has awesome features at a very reasonable price. Here's my review.Pros-1. Decent size screen. My mom is 76 and she has no problem viewing the screen on her Kindle Fire.2. Responsive. When you touch the screen, things happen. Compared to older generation touch screens - the Kindle is first rate in my book. I won't get technical - but it just plain works well.3. Great viewing angle. Good for reading in portrait mode, or watching a movie in bed in landscape mode. 2 people can watch with the wide viewing angle.4. Battery life is fantastic. I can't give you a hard metric, but I can tell you that streaming a movie or two isn't a problem on battery.5. Email, surfing the web, and music are nice benefits.6. Compatible with Amazon Prime, Netflix, and Hulu. You can choose whoever you want, or all of them for your streaming content.7. Compatible with Slingbox - This is big for me. If you use Sling box, then you know why. (Note - Slingbox is officially available for those who side loaded the older version in the past.)8. Easy shopping on Amazon.  The Fire is very intuitive if you want to shop via Amazon.9. Play your own mp4 videos!10. Geeks or Casual users - take your pick - The Kindle works out of the box, OR can be customized to your hearts content. I'm a geek, but my wife and mom are not, and the Kindle Fire plays well with all of us.11. Cost - For the price, you get WAY more than you should expect from a product of this nature. Kindle beats Android based units &amp; iPads hands down when it comes to price. Remember - This is NOT a feature loaded $600 device. But then, you can buy one for every family member and still get a good amount of features for your money. That's why you're reading these reviews - right?12. Solid construction.13. Very intuitive. Learning curve on a Kindle is pretty quick.Cons -1. Sound stinks. The speakers are small and tinny sounding. Now a good set of headsets here makes a big difference.2. Silk browser is ok. 3rd party browsers might give you a better experience in some cases. I use the Silk Browser, and also use 3rd party browsers for various reasons.3. Video playback of mp4's are ok with the stock player, but can be improved with 3rd party applications.4. NO bluetooth, or ethernet.  WiFi or USB connectivity only. It's not a show stopper, but it does require mention as a "con" feature.5. Power button placement makes it easy to bump the switch when you're in portrait mode. Of course adding a protective skin or case, usually fixes this.6. Battery... I haven't changed one, but it looks like a factory thing at this point.. Take my comment here lightly since I haven't researched it at the time I wrote this.7. Applications - Applications are still limited however considering that the Kindle released in November 2011, I've seen the applications list grow considerably. Many Android apps will work on a Kindle Fire.8. Limited documentation. The Kindle manual is actually on the Kindle itself. Make sure you a have a Kindle savy user around when you first open the box.Special Note - Amazon Prime. Amazon Prime is the service that gives you streaming, free shipping, and other discounts when shopping on Amazon. Currently the cost is $79 and it's a pretty good deal when you consider, that not only can you stream from your kindle, you can stream from your laptop as well. Shoppers will also like the free shipping offered by most sellers if you're an Amazon Prime member. It's not a NetFlix yet... but movie selections keeps growing every day.Finally, As I mentioned earlier, I like the Kindle Fire. It gets the job done, it's intuitive, easy to learn, and just plain works well.  I hope this review helps.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire v NookColor,February 8, 2012By&nbsp;DON THE ONE-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)My wife bought me the Kindle Fire when I already had the NookColor and I thanked her thinking hmmmm, why?  I had the NookColor and she goes out and buys me the KF.  The KF is far far superior to the NookColor and I can say that categorically because I have owned both.  I paid $250 for the Nook which was $50 more than the KF, makes you think doesn't it?  The advantages are a more usable screen, more sensitive and yet more controllable.  The difference in sizing the fonts is wonderful after the basic enlargement of the Nook.  I could go and on but believe me when I say I have tried both and I know which is the best!!!!!!!!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsOMG I have gone tablet!!,February 7, 2012By&nbsp;let-there-be-light-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)...always the budget PC laptop and desktop guy. Keyboard man. Built my own gaming PCs from scratch.  Helped Microcenter move out some AMD inventory....cell phones and Blackberry loosened me up a bit. But I was still hanging on to the keyboard crutches.  And for some reason, my phone display "shrunk" to the size of a tiny postage stamp.  Maybe old age.  :(...tried the baby kindle on a whim. Disappointing, except for the limited application of e-reading on the throne. "Nice display but limited func."...decided to indulge myself and try the FIRE.  Yes, I'm too cheap and set in my ways to drink the apple koolaid and just go Ipad/Iphone/Imac/Itunes.  Plus I have Amazon Prime and I might as well use it.  lol.  The box arrives NEXT DAY!  It's like freaking xmas in February!So here I am, bathing in the warmth of this Kindle Fire.  What an awesomely awesome amazon appliance--regardless of the price.  ZIP, I open the box. It's already charged. TOUCH Somehow it knows who I am from amazon. POP it magicaly boots up in my hands and prompts me for wifi pw. CONNECT. Less than two minutes from box open to KF use!  I am in the Amazon Store before my eggs cook on the stove.  Download the iheartradio app and turn on the smooth jazz channel--less than a minute.  Display keyboard is good enough and actually kind of fun.  Audio quality is also good enough. I am going to stream a movie, when I get done here.  lol I am like a kid in a candy store.I cannot advise on Fire vs Apple, but if you are torn between Fire and baby kindle, omg don't think twice.  Kindle Fire is like 100 times more useful and usable than the dedicated e-reader.  And it only costs 2X.  That is my "objective" analysis.  Amazon is losing money on every sale, and I feel bad about that, but I am not a stockholder.  I am a VERY happy convert/customer.Disclaimer: this review was written on a laptop, while the KF was displaying weather, time and playing jazz.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (2)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGood Product for the price,February 4, 2012By&nbsp;J. James-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I was a little hesitant to buy the kindle fire after hearing mixed reviews on its performance. However, I am so happy that I decided to give it a try. For the price its a great device.The browser works great (my pages load fast and easy), games and movies play extremely well.So far, I have had no problem playing games. They open, load and play fast! I haven't watched an entire movie yet but I watched a short video and the play quality was extremely good.As soon as I touch the screen I get an instant response. I don't find myself pressing items more than once to open them and I love the keyboard! It's easy to type with and the buttons are a decent enough size.Books load easily and reading them is very comfortable. The only con I can see so far is the quality of images when you zoom in super super super close. As, hardly anyone needs to zoom in that close I don't think this will be an issue for too many people.Overall, I think the kindle is a great buy if you are looking for a tablet to occasionally surf the web, read books, play games and watch movies. A few people mentioned the position of the power button and the volume control. I haven't had any issues with these either. I think the speakers produce a decent sound not super super loud, but loud enough to hear from a couple of feet away. And you can just turn the kindle around so that the power button is situated at the top if it bothers you.Great device! Great price!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsMy opinion,February 4, 2012By&nbsp;typewrite-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)Ok, first off. The thing everyone considering buying it is this, its not the ipad. This is a well priced little device. I'm a careful (cheap) consumer. I spend my money very carefully, so i read/watched the reviews. Everyone was two-faced about it. They said it was a terrible machine, but you should still buy it. Unsure i took a leap of faith. I'm glad to say, I'm very happy. It runs fast and smoothly.Pro's:* runs great*flawless picture*great battery life*stylish*touch screen not too sensitive*easy to manage*free month of amazon primeCon's:*limited app market*freezes if over used (but what doesn't?)Overall score 8/10P.s I'm using it to write this reviewHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)





Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



5 of 6 people found the following review helpful1.0 out of 5 starsNice, but limited,December 27, 2011By&nbsp;Jim-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)One thing people should consider if they are buying this as a present for someone overseas. I am in Afghanistan in support of the US Military and am unable to download most books due to the location. If you want your loved one to have a kindle, load it with their preferred reading materials before you send it. Now, to top it all off, the Kindle Fire made it an incedible 3 weeks and will no longer boot up. I'll be sending this one back.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsReally like the Kindle Fire,December 30, 2011By&nbsp;Myka Mcpeek "msmyka"(orange county,ca)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I really do like my Kindle Fire, it does so much for being only $199 that it's really a steal. BUT I say Like and not Love because they do make it a bit difficult to transfer your already bought and paid for media IF they were not bought on Amazon. Being computer savvy I have overcome this but for people who are not their only option is to buy the same things again? Why is there no data sync cable?  Not everyone has access to WiFi all the time. Try not to be so much like APPLE with this proprietary BS and you would get 5 stars. Please don't let my review steer anyone away from buying... these are things that can and should be fixed with a software update and adding a cable to box when you buy.  Simple fixes... get it together Amazon.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsNice companion to my iPad2 for true mobility around the house,December 29, 2011By&nbsp;David Chan-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I think it is pretty clear that the iPad vs. Fire comparisons are without merit as they each serve a different need. Having said that, I think the KF is a nice piece of hardware for those of us who live and breath Amazon and have a Prime membership. I got the KF to complement my iPad 2, which isn't so portable especially when I am running around the house chasing my 2 year old. I have access to Facebook, games, movies both on Amazon and Netflix, and my music in a package that easily slips into my robe or my back pocket when I'm wearing my jeans. Of course, it is slower than my iPad and there's no GPS or camera. But that's what I have my iPad for. The KF is perfect for web surfing in bed or on the couch. If fits perfectly in one hand. Amazon needs to release more updates to help with smoothing out the browser. But for those who want to speed it up, you can do so by TURNING OFF the Silk Browser Acceleration feature and choosing "ON DEMAND" for plug ins. Pages seem to load 10 to 20% faster. Anandtech recently confirmed the slower load times on his site with the Silk Browser enabled.PROS:1) 7 inch size fits in palm and larger pant pockets2) Very nice IPS Display with very good contrast3) Great $199 entry level pricing4) Nice Amazon Eco-System Integration for shopping, books, movies, music and apps5) Decent battery life at about 6 hours6) Nice build qualityCONS:1) 512 MB RAM is too little and will slow apps down at times2) 8 GB strorage a bit thin even considering cloud storage3) Browser is slow with default setting (See above to change 2 settings to speed things up.)4) A little bit on the heavy side vs. the Samsung Galaxy Tab 7+ for example5) Power button misplacementAll things considered, you are getting the KF slightly below cost and you get 80% of the function of any of the $500 full featured tablets. In my book that is a win even considering the deficiencies of the KF. I'm sure Amazon will address most of these issues with the Fire 2.0 next year. I got it because it does what I needed it to do for a lot less money.  The device will improve over the next few months as Amazon listens to customers and address their concerns with more software updates.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLOVE IT!!,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;S. Phillips-See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had the Fire for about a month now (pre-Christmas gift to myself) and totally LOVE IT!! has done everything it says. and is great for reading books, browsing the web, playing a some games, etc. The battery life is great! For a reasonable priced tablet it does everything that I could want.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsEnjoying my KF very much!,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;Tyrone W. Jr(San Antonio , TX)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I am gonna try to keep this simple I enjoy using this for media comsumption and light web browsing and very light playing games , which it does without a problem.-I have seen some people complain that the wifi doesnt work good , or seems weak in receiving wifi signal , i have had no issues with my wifi connection and went outside and walked probly 150-200 feet easy with no issues nor connection loss(now maybe people have problems because they have same channel as a neighbor or their routers is just out of date or something)-people say its sluggish and slow....again i dont know why but im having none of those issues, i have quick and speedy loading of pages and play some games with no issues or lag at all-I have seen some people complain of not being able to access their gmail , but i have had no issues using the email client they have provided in the apps section with my gmail account so again im a little lost on that.-if you want something thats an ipad/ipad2 then maybe you should buy an ipad,and not buy an Fire and complain that its not an ipad-I see people complain it doesn't have an camera on it , but honestly that wasn't selling point for me as i always have my android phone with me that has an 8mp camera(so no biggie for me)-Noticed some people complain of the power button on bottom , it doesnt really stick out much more than say the power button on some cell phones , i haven't bumped it yet but maybe i'm just aware of it (i guess i will keep note and when i update this make mention of it)-the reason I bought the Kindle Fire was because it fits all my needs and wants in an tablet form and is smaller than the 10" tablets (i wanted something a little smaller in the range of 6-8inches) and this is perfect for bringing with me without having to have a large case for it , also wanted something for watching amazon prime videos,and access to hulu plus and netflix accounts and this does all of that so its perfect.I will update this the longer i have it , but honestly am very happy with it and have had no issuesHelp other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comments (4)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsKindle Fire is great Alternative to more expensive Tablets,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;Nancy S. Wickersham "Motherload"(San Luis Obispo, CA USA)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I researched tablets for my adult daughter who is a new high school teacher.  She wanted something to avoid lugging her heavy laptop around, that would enable her to check email, input grades in the schools electronic system, check Facebook, play games, read books from Amazon, stream movies &amp; shows from Netflix, etc.  I was not happy with the previous Kindles as all around devices, but the Fire is an amazing, versatile device at a reasonable price.  The screen clarity is amazing, &amp; the color very bright.  It quickly changes from vertical to horizontal viewing considering how you are using it.  She set up her email &amp; then was able to enter final exam grades for all her students quickly &amp; easily.  We paired it up with the leather case by Marware, which comes in a beautiful hot pink. This case acts as a stand, &amp; a case &amp; is worth the cost.  The Kindle Fire comes with 30 days of free Amazon Prime membership which allows you to have live streaming of Netflix movies/tv shows, &amp; also to borrow books from Amazon for a month at a time for free.  My daughter is really picky &amp; she is very happy with the Kindle Fire.  That is why I wanted to post this review.  Her boyfriend bought it for her after I gave him the details to buy it.  We were looking at the Samsung tablets but they are really expensive &amp; we feel that for her use, the Kindle is everything she needed &amp; more!  We could not be happier with the Kindle Fire.Kindle Fire Leather Cover by Marware, Black(the case comes in 5 colors)Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsLightin it up with the Kindle Fire,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;Grady Anderson-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)First off, let me just say that I love my Kindle Fire. I got it for Christmas, and the moment i got it out of the box, I was hooked. I highly recommend one of these to anybody looking for the features that they would normally use on any other tablet.To answer the first question, no, this is not meant to tear down the iPad's market. At the same time, I wouldn't say that this isn't a strong competitor to the iPad. For most people, an iPad has so many features that people don't even need, let alone want. I know for a fact that the Kindle can do everything I would want from an iPad, and perform it all at basically the same level. I browse the internet, play some games, read a book, maybe check my email, and then im done, not using a whole bunch of fancy gadgets for $500. The iPad may have a bigger app store, but i would expect that with growing popularity of the Kindle, it will start receiving some attention on the marketplace and have quite a selection of it's own.Now for the features of the Fire itself. First off, it has a 7" screen which has spectacular colors. Out of the box, it is very simple, it comes with a little slide out cardboard handout with some simple instructions, the power cable, and the kindle, and your ready to go. Pretty simple setup. As for the problem people have been having with the power button, I cannot relate to them because honestly it hasn't gotten in my way at all. For people with bigger hands though, I could understand this being a minor setback. When on the fire, no matter what application you're in or what song your listening to, there is always a little setting toolbar at the top of the screen where you can locate volume, brightness, etc. It is kind of hard navigating to, but since it's part of the software, there may be an update to put some of this in a more manageable location. Also with the power button at the bottom is the micro USB slot where you connect your kindle to the charger, and the headphone jack. Besides the power button, there are no other physical buttons located on the Fire.Shopping on the kindle is a breeze. Right out of the box, the kindle comes with an amazon shopping app which is really handy. Some people complain that if somebody were to get a hold of the Kindle, your credit card can be charged because of the 1 click shopping on there. I believe there is a way to set a code so that you have to type in a password each time you buy something. For those who are concerned, here's my advice to you:1.) Set a passcode for you kindle to access it, if somebody does get a hold of it, they're going to have to sit and play with a passcode for a long time.2.) Set the passcode for the one click shopping.3.) The most simple one of all would be, don't lose your kindle and take good care of your $200 piece of equipment.The Kindle Fire also comes with a free month of Amazon prime membership. Be sure to use this a lot, so that you can get a good idea of whether or not you make the decision to buy it later. For me I did not, because the Fire has a netflix app with streaming, and I just so happen to have netflix.Other than that, I'm not going to write an hour long review about the features of the device. My advice to you if your edgy on whether to get one or not is to go try one out at Best Buy. Take my word for it, you won't be disappointed.Also, remember, since the Fire is so cheap, (Amazon actually loses money when they manufacture them) remember that a lot of movies you might have downloaded will NOT work with the Fire. It is purposely set up this way. The Fire is an AMAZON consumption device, so if you are buying one to add all your movies to or books from another marketplace, you will be severely disappointed. ONLY buy this product if you are new to the tablet market, and are willing to buy from amazon.That's just my review on the Fire. There's thousands more out there and you can form your own opinion from them. One thing to remember from negative reviews on the Fire though is that a lot of old issues have been solved due to firmware updates. A lot of issues people had when they first bought the fire are resolved. Now go out and buy your kindle!*NOTE: IF YOU ORDER THE KINDLE FROM AMAZON.COM, YOUR KINDLE WILL ARRIVE IN THE BOX PRE-REGISTERED TO YOUR AMAZON.COM ACCOUNT. IT WILL HAVE YOUR CREDIT CARD AND ALL INFORMATION ON YOUR KINDLE WHILE IT IS SHIPPING. IF THIS IS A PROBLEM FOR YOU, I'D RECOMMEND BUYING IT FROM A RETAILLER.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment (1)

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAwesome Device,December 28, 2011By&nbsp;Rubes-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I got the Kindle Fire on Christmas Eve as a Christmas gift from my hubby.  I dropped every hint in the book that I wanted this thing.  It is AWESOME.  I've read every blog, review and detail on the Kindle Fire and I absolutely had to have one for myself.Since I've only had it for a few days, I'm still in learning mode, but its extremely user friendly.  And anything I don't know, the owner's manual is already downloaded on the device for you.  My friend bought me an Amazon gift card, which I loaded to my account.  So I've been buying things with my device and my gift card is automatically being used until it runs out, instead of my credit card being charged.  I LOVE that it knows to use my gift card without me having to prompt it each time I make a purchase.I purchased 2 books before I figured out how to check out free books from the library.  I'm also loving the Prime trial membership.  I've downloaded about 3 shows.  I will definitely become a member of Amazon Prime.Even though its very easy to make purchases, I also like how you can immediately cancel an order without ever being charged.I honestly thought that by it not being a 3G device, not accessing the internet would be a hassle for me but it isn't.  Because I don't have Wifi where I work, I simply download what I can at home as far as books or movies to the device, and that way, when I bring it to work, I can do what I want without needing a Wifi connection.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)







Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)



5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat device.  Great form factor.  I use it more than my iPad.,December 15, 2011By&nbsp;James Hanover "Jim"(Chatham, MA USA)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)As a long time iPad user (I got one the first day it came out), I have to say that for my usage patterns, I like the Fire better than the iPad.  I've always found the iPad a little too big for travel.  The Fire's size works better on cramped airline seats and tight places.  You can conveniently read your book or paper while in an elevator or standing on a subway.  My iPad sits at home all alone now.The only disappointment I have is that some newspapers seem to be only deliverable to older Kindles.  I received the Wall Street Journal by Kindle delivery on my older Kindles.  Now I have to read it through the WSJ app and it is buggier than the version that runs on the iPad.  I'm sure WSJ will fix it, but it's a bit annoying.  Some other newspapers also seem to be incompatible, but I haven't figured out why some are and other aren't.Anyway, overall the Kinde Fire is a pleasant surprise.  Amazon beat my expectations on this one.  Congrats!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsAwesome price but not the IPad,December 21, 2011By&nbsp;Sweets-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I purchased this Kindle as a replacement for my dream electronic, the IPad.  I couldn't justify spending or even charging $500 for a new personal toy.  BUT, at $199 the Kindle Fire does just about everything the IPad does...in theory.  Yes, it is Android based so you have access to LOTS of apps.  It surfs the web too, which is cool. The Amazon web browser is inferior to all others though.  It's NOT faster. I'm not even sure what they based that off of or compared it to. It acts stupid sometimes, and freezes.  Also, the Fire is small so I wish websites saw it as a mobile device but they don't.  The browsers functionality is lackluster overall, and is the weakest feature on the Kindle in my opinion.  The battery life is great.  Not alot of space to save stuff though, unless you purchase from Amazon and use the cloud feature.  And it doesn't have a camera, but who cares..my phone does.  So, really the only thing that makes this BETTER than the IPad is the price, which makes you bite your tongue and stop complaining about small stuff. Overall it's a great portable device to surf the web and play apps on.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsExcellent,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Marcella Loomis "Marcy"(Hamilton Ohio)  -See all my reviews(REAL NAME)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I have had my Kindle Fire for a week now and I am so very happy with it. After reading all the reviews I was skeptical. It met all my expectations. The color and graphics are very good.I think the thing I love about Amazon is they have so many free applications that you can get for both the Kindle and Kindle Fire. Thank you Amazon !!!Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful4.0 out of 5 starsTablet faceoff - Kindle Fire vs Dell Streak vs Lenovo A1 vs Velocity Cruz,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Ram-See all my reviews(VINE VOICE)&nbsp;&nbsp;Amazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)&lt;!--

function fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix,w,h)
{	
  try {	
    var ifrm = parent.document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "movieFrameID");
    if (ifrm) {	
        var h2 = h + 35;
        ifrm.style.height = h2;
      }
    } catch(err) {
 
    } 


  if (h &gt; 0) {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height=h+"px";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height=h+"px";
  }
  else {
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "clipDiv").style.height="";
      document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "videoPlaceholder").style.height="";
  }
  document.getElementById(nsPrefix + "flashcontent").style.height="100%";
}

function fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix,divName,html)
{	
    document.getElementById(nsPrefix + divName).innerHTML=html;
}

function embeddingPopup(nsPrefix)
{
  alert("placeholder function for embedding code");
}
--&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUembeddingPopup(){	
alert("Embedding code will be displayed here.");
}

--&gt;&lt;!--
function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUrefresh_preplay() {

document.getElementById("cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUchiDiv").innerHTML = document.getElementById("cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUhiddenPre").innerHTML;
};
cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUrefresh_preplay();

--&gt;// &lt;![CDATA[

var cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso;	   


function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUloadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes) {

  try {
      cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso = new SWFObject(swfLocation, "cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUAMPlayerProd", swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor);	   

      for (var v in swfParams) {
        cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addVariable(v, encodeURIComponent(swfParams[v]));
      }
      for (var v in flashParams) {
        cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addParam(v, flashParams[v]);
      }
      for (var v in embedAttributes) {
        cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.setAttribute(v, embedAttributes[v]);
      }

      cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addVariable("swfEmbedTime", new Date().getTime());

      var agt = navigator.userAgent;
       
      var reFirefox = new RegExp("firefox/", "i");
      var regx = agt.split(reFirefox);
      var ffVersion = 8;
      if (regx[1]) {
          var pts = regx[1].split(/[.]/);
          ffVersion = parseFloat(pts[0] + "." + pts[1]);
      }
      var minorVersion = parseFloat(navigator.ap);
      if ((navigator.appVersion.indexOf("Mac")!=-1) || (ffVersion &lt; 1.5)) {
          cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.setAttribute("height", swfHeight);
          cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.setAttribute("width", swfWidth);
          cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addVariable("oldFirefox", "1");	     
      }

      if (cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.write("cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUflashcontent")) {
          fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBU', 
                               320, 
                               283);
      }
      else {
          var nsPrefix = 'cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBU';

          fp_resizePlayerSpace(nsPrefix, 0, 0);
          fp_rewriteDiv(nsPrefix, "flashcontent", '&lt;br /&gt;To view this video download &lt;a target="_blank" href="http://www.macromedia.com/go/getflashplayer" target="_top"&gt;Flash Player&lt;/a&gt; (version 9.0.115 or higher)');
      }
  } catch(err) {
      fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBU', 0, 0);
  }
  return false;
}



function _cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
    var swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
    var swfWidth = "320";
    var swfHeight = "100%";
    var flashVersion = "9.0.115";
    var bgColor = "#FFFFFF";

    var swfParams = {};
    var flashParams = {};
    var embedAttributes = {};
    swfParams.amazonPort = "80";
    swfParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    swfParams.telemetrySubPageType = "VideoReview";
    swfParams.nsPrefix = "cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBU";
    swfParams.locale = "en_US";
    swfParams.logUrl = "gp/mpd/l";
    swfParams.canResize = "1";
    swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    swfParams.sessionId = "000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.marketplaceID = "ATVPDKIKX0DER";
    swfParams.salign = "LT";
    swfParams.preset = "detail";
    swfParams.mediaObjectId = "m1AK88YRXL6FRU";
    swfParams.autoPlayTimer = "";
    swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = "m1AK88YRXL6FRU";
    swfParams.playIsUserGenerated = "1";
    swfParams.enableShare = "0";
    swfParams.permUrl = "gp/mpd/permalink";
    swfParams.telemetryPageTypeID = "R1GLJI6A9GB3SU";
    swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/m1AK88YRXL6FRU/000-0000000-0000000";
    swfParams.amazonServer = "www.amazon.com";
    swfParams.scale = "noscale";
    flashParams.allowFullScreen = "true";
    flashParams.salign = "LT";
    flashParams.bgcolor = "#FFFFFF";
    flashParams.allowScriptAccess = "always";
    flashParams.quality = "high";
    flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
    embedAttributes.title = "Flash Player";

    if (movieID){
      if (playerVersion == '3'){
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/20111115154938207/AMPlayer._V163169252_.swf";
        swfParams.mediaObjectIDList = movieID;
      } else {
        swfLocation = "http://g-ecx.images-amazon.com/images/G/01/am3/legacy/20101014901/AMPlayerProd._V197491872_.swf";
      }
      swfParams.xmlUrl = "http://www.amazon.com/gp/mpd/getplaylist-v2/" + movieID + "/000-0000000-0000000";
      flashParams.wmode = "transparent";
      swfParams.autoPlay = "1";
    }

    if (document.getElementById('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUduration')) {
      document.getElementById('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUduration').style.display='none';
    }
    cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUloadSwf_Core(swfLocation, swfWidth, swfHeight, flashVersion, bgColor, swfParams, flashParams, embedAttributes);

  return false;
}

function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion) {
   return _cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUloadSwf(movieID, playerVersion);
}


	
		// ]]&gt;&lt;!--

function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUnewHeight(h)
{	
    fp_resizePlayerSpace('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBU', 0, h);
}

function cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUresetPlayer(w,h,bw,cc) {
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUnewHeight(h);

  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addVariable("resetBandwidth", bw);
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.addVariable("cacheCode", cc);
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.setAttribute("height", h);
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.setAttribute("width", w);
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUso.write("cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUflashcontent");
}

--&gt;m1AK88YRXL6FRU / mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUvar cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBURollOverImg = new Image();
cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBURollOverImg.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/81Hv%2BbuhD0S._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";

var cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay = document.getElementById('cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplayImageId');
if (cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay) {
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay.onmouseover = function() {
    cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/81Hv%2BbuhD0S._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play-active,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay.onmouseout = function() {
    cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay.src = "http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/81Hv%2BbuhD0S._SX320_PHcustomer-video-vignette_PIvideo-reviews-bottom,BottomLeft,0,43_OU01_PIcustomer-video-play,BottomLeft,130,-12_CR0,0,0,0_.png";
  }
  
  var node = cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUpreplay.parentNode;

  var cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUcurrentClick = node.onclick;
  node.onclick = function () {
    var head = document.getElementsByTagName("head");
    if (head[0]) { 
      var logTag = document.createElement('script');
      logTag.type = "text/javascript";
      logTag.src = "/gp/customer-media/du/log.html?ie=UTF8&amp;s=CustomerVideoPlay&amp;p=CustomerImage";
      head[0].appendChild(logTag);
    }

    if (cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUcurrentClick) {
      return cv_mo3MCDSMI2SOSBUcurrentClick();
    }
  }
}Length:: 7:55 MinsCompared Kindle Fire with Lenovo A1(7"), Dell Streak (7") and Velocity Cruz (8") in my video review.* While Kindle lacks certain features such as Camera &amp; GPS - Kindle fire comes with the best quality display and touch screen* It is an extremely frustrating experience to use touch screen on the other tablets - yes it may have some nice features, but no point if you start pulling your hair to get the touch screen work the way you think.* If you are looking for a fully featured tablet - Dell Streak 7" is the best one out there.  But if you are looking for a top quality tablet for under $200 - look no further - Kindle Fire is the best.* Android Market does not ship with Kindle Fire and yes we really miss out on a lot of some really cool apps. But there is a downside to it i.e proliferation of spamware and malware.  Getting your Apps through the Amazon Appstore assures you a peace of mind that it does not contain any viruses and malware.Hopefully the Amazon AppStore will start carrying a lot more apps for Kindle Fire in the coming few months.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsE-reader/Tablet,December 20, 2011By&nbsp;Ci Ci in Arkansas "Ci Ci in Arkansas"(Magnolia, Arkansas)  -See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I Love This E-reader!!!!!  It is great!!!  I am an avid smartphone user.  This is a huge smartphone, minus the cellular service.  I initially bought the Velocity Micro Cruz tablet.  Needless to say, I sent it back because I could not get Angry Birds.  Decided to give the Kindle Fire a try and I LOVE IT!!!!  It does everything the tablet would have done for me.  I can read my books and play games.  Of course the market is not as great as the Android Market, but I can watch videos, my kids play games, I play games, I read my books and the screen is so vivid and clear.  You can't compare it to the IPad because it is not an IPad!!!!  But it serves its purpose if you want a $200 tablet/ereader.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsGreat Price for a Colorful Ereader,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;LVanzie-See all my reviewsThis review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I specifically bought my Kindle Fire for the shortcomings I feel ipad has as a glorified ereading/internet browsing device with a basic camera and a few fun apps for the kids. My cell phone HD camera/video cam is just as good as an ipad and besides I use a professional camera for the real photos I need. For the price $199 the Kindle's usefulness/accessibility far exceeds the ipad.  My husband has an ipad for $600+.  It was an utter waste of money for the way we conduct our business and use applications. I am happy with the internal volume control and have had no problems so far with the touch screen vs the ipad.  The Kindle is smaller but I like it that way. If you use the Kindle Fire for ereading, basic research and use of basic online app with the enhance value of having cloud security, you might love it like I do.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsThe Kindle Fire,December 18, 2011By&nbsp;living in bliss-See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)The Kindle Fire is everything I expected it to be. I now have my music, books, and internet at my fingertips. The Fire is easy to operate, easy to read, and the price is easy on the budget. I can recommend this device to everyone.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment

5 of 6 people found the following review helpful5.0 out of 5 starsA Super Satisfied Customer,December 16, 2011By&nbsp;cicsos2 "Bill"(Texas)  -See all my reviewsAmazon Verified Purchase(What's this?)This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)I started in the eReader world with a Kindle 2.  When the Kindle with WiFi came out, I got one and gave my K2 to my grandson. I love to read and have been since my grade school days.  I have kept more books than I have resold.  When I found out about the Gutenberg books being available for the Kindle I was really happy.  Over 60% of the books on my K3 were from one of the free ebooks sites (these are legitimate sites).  I found books that I can remember reading as a young person and I got these and read them once again.I used my K2 and K3 readers a lot, one of the benefits of retirement.  During the year where I took my K3 everywhere with an unlighted cover, no less, I had it reboot only two or three times.  I finally did upgrade to a lighted cover.  I have had zero WiFi problems, no matter where I went.  The keys look as good as new.My personal background includes software development &amp; testing plus writing manuals for software. (I go back to punch card days)All of this background is to show that I had high expectations for the Kindle Fire. By the way, my wife has an iPad(1) with 3G that she really likes.  On rare occasions she will let me borrow it for a few minutes.  I also have to do the iTunes maintenance for both her iPhone and iPad ... and I have learned to really dislike iTunes!There is a term that has been used in some areas called "the out of the box experience" - or how hard or easy is it to get a product into productive use.  I would rate the Kindle Fire as one of the very best for an "out of the box experience".  Just for fun, I made pictures of each tiny step, from opening the box to having the Fire ready to read a book.  Even with taking pictures it went very smoothly.  The hardest step was entering the fairly long security code for the wireless router. I did have to wait a minute or so for the V6.1 upgrade to complete before I could start playing with this beautiful device.I also bought one of the simple Marware plastic cases - and have no regrets with that decision.  It does a good job protecting the screen and the power button.  I do keep a microfiber towel handy for wiping the fingerprints (and I gave my wife her own towel for her iPad).To be fair, there are some areas where the product could be improved - but that is nothing new (I assume that you, the reader of this review, do understand that there have been many more software releases than eight for the Microsoft Windows Operating System - that's the nature of the game).For example, there needs to be more user control over the book covers shown in the carousel or perhaps the ability to clear the contents.  We need to ability to download Personal Documents, pictures, etc directly from the cloud, just like as can be done with Books.  We need the ability to easily uninstall applications and, perhaps, that ability to extend the 1G area reserved for applications.In summary, I would not hesitate to buy one of these devices as long as you understand it's target audience.Help other customers find the most helpful reviews&nbsp;Was this review helpful to you?&nbsp;YesNoReport abuse|PermalinkComment&nbsp;Comment



This review is from:Kindle Fire, Full Color 7" Multi-touch Display, Wi-Fi (Electronics)





Please fix my app, all of a sudden I can&#39;t open it, having withdrawals.

Great game ....I love it and am addicted to it but it wont open since I updated it on my Samsung tablet :-[

I play this game every day. To the point that I bought it. And I&#39;ve never purchased a game on my phone before. Love it!

Orientation problem fixed,  thanks, and new words. Excellent!

If you like to draw (even if you are not the best) and you enjoy games at your own pace,  you&#39;ll love this app!

Needs screen shot feature!!! Want to save or share some pics!!!

Wish there was a recal or something where you can look back at the pics drawn.!.

This game is awesome! Lots of fun, too bad I can&#39;t draw...

I play this game eveyday with my friends and we  always have such a laugh. upgraded to premium ad free version as was getting bored with the same old words, worth every penny...thanks OMGPOP :)

The update that came down 8th May 2012 keens crashing on my ASUS Eeepad Transformer. Was working fine till this update

I love this game! It&#39;s fun and helps pass the time. :)

I am thoroughly enjoying the game. I have played against awesome artists. The only real complaint is being able to end games. I have been waiting for some opponents for days and just want to resign the game.

This is excellent. A bit too much though when only a couple of months ago it was 60 something pence! Still, well worth the purchase. :D

Back to 5 stars after removing the SMS permissions

So the app had been working great before last update! I paid for it cause I felt it was worth it ,but now I can&#39;t use it or play!

Too many games not loading. Creating new games can sometimes take hours. Have had to uninstall and reinstall three times. Fix this or at the very least acknowledge the issue!

I&#39;ve lost all my colours and coins... WTH is that all about? Not at all impressed.

This game is sooo adicting! I love it! I&#39;ve played almost 300 rounds and no complaints about gameplay. would like to be able to delete games with friends who dont play back. Great color selection once you have collected enough coins to buy new colors (press on the plus by the color pallette) I do wish that newly bought colors would organize with similar colors in my pallette tho. (update please)

I like this game alot. But can yall please put the option to add a picture:)))) pleaseee!! It would be very nice ...

Thanks for listening to people about the permissions. People It&#39;s called drawsome...please stop writing answers just to get 3 coins, play it properly or not at all!

After I uninstalled and re installed the app, it has been opening without problem!

The latest update really improved the speed of sending and receiving drawings, I think it&#39;s instantaneous now. Making the game much more enjoyable!

Everyone can draw and have fun!

Love love LOVE what you&#39;re doing with Draw Something!! Alerts, refresh, higher scores - awesome work, y&#39;all!!

... For removing the landscape only update. Super addictive! Too many repeating words though.

The ability to upload a profile picture for non Facebook users would be a plus. Such a fun game!

Thx no longer freezes on Samsung infuse works great. Fun game

Crashes opon opening. Was a great game for a few weeks but it&#39;s dead now and they&#39;ve done nothing to fix it.

But I must say, this game is in no way good for left-handed people. I have to do most of it right-handed &amp; I can&#39;t make the drawings nearly as cool because of it. Also, latest updates cause game to take very long to load. Please fix this issue. Otherwise, 5 stars all the way!

Great game, updates have been fine for me, sign in w facebook and you wont lose your game. Needs more colors or brush shapes. Also an option to keep the status bar in place would be nice

Changed review back to 5 stars after removing the SMS permissions. Thanks.

I wasn&#39;t able to play against people who had free version but now I can

I&#39;ve gotten my friends and family members to play and we&#39;re all having fun!   :-)

Thanks for thee push notifications!

Is fun, i play with my friends and family. Worth every penny!!!

Great game.  Phone restarts every time I turn game off.  Annoying, please fix (htc sensation)

This game is so dam entertaining..... buy pro n get more colors for only 99cents? Deal!

Love this app! Only things I would suggest at this point.. more words, and when pushing a bomb, to have an &quot;are you sure? Yes or no&quot; option.. because I&#39;ve accidentally used a bomb a time or 2 while watching someone draw.

Great game especially now that the recent update has thankfully been fixed again. Highly addictive and brilliant fun. A genius yet effective game to play with yoyr fruends. Recommended!

Thx to the Dev&#39;s for all the updates &amp; upgrades. A fun &amp; creative game. Love it! Very addictive.

Play it. yourself.... And tell me I am wrong!

Best phone app ever! Great for all ages. Can play for a few minutes or a few hours..and hook up with old friends to play

Thanks for removing the spying permission for int&#39;l back to 5 stars

Getting better. 5 stars now.

Thanx for fixing back to portrait mode

Fun game, thanks for fixing the horrizontal only view issue :)

Great but.. game doesn&#39;t open... Screen goes black and it closes... After new update. Samsung galaxy s2

I love this game! I cant wait until it is my turn again! My favorite by far!

Fun game!! Too hard to get coins though!

I absolutely love this game makes the long work day so much more fun

It is so fun and time consuming! Its a great time waster and fun to do with your friends . I had the free version but couldn&#39;t stand not downloading to the full! !!

I love playing draw something, it let me chalenge my drawing talent, and share some pieces of art to my friends

I am totally addicted to this game.  I just need my friends to stop spelling the words out and actually draw something...

Will no longer open after update goes 2 black screen then goes 2 home screen

I love this game an now it wont open on my phone only on my ipad not sure what happend but would like to get it working on my phone again help????

This game is a addictive as it its

It&#39;s fun but very lame and disappointing that the only way to upload a profile pic is through facebook.... Please change

Absolutly love it... works great no sign in problems.. worth every penny..

This game is awesome!

Works great! Lags my phone if I don&#39;t kill the task when I&#39;m done but love the game!

Doesn&#39;t need SMS permission any more, thank you for listening.

It automatically put me into a game from the same email,I emailed and I got a fast response from Linda saying she&#39;ll fix it all with my username! Love that, really appreciate it!

Great little game that keeps you amused for hours!  ADD ME @ kwijybo1982

Can&#39;t put it down. Sad thing is it eats your battery life. But, f*** it.  EVO.

Lots of fun and faster then words with friends

A blast to play with friends! Updates keep making the game funner!

Love &amp; addicted to this app.  Only wish I had a bigger screen &amp; stylus ti make better drawings.

A new way to play with riendas allover. Pictionary x 100.

Even though i payed for it and then uninstall, i dont have to pay for it a second time.

One of my favorite games to play in my spare time.

You can only get up to 99 on it and I bought the game I think that sucks!!!!

I love having a game I can play with my fiance and friends.

When I decided to connect with fb it made everything go haywire, I can&#39;t play now it kicks me out every time I open game HTC incredible 2

I just got a new phone so I can get a stylus pen!

Lots of fun who very addictive. Also can be very funny at times. Good entertainment

Having so much fun playing with friends across the pond in America. I&#39;m so abdicated.

This game the best! I love playing it with my kids and friends! Love the new feature allowing messages to be sent to the people you&#39;re playing with!

Its a great game keeps u in touch with alotvof friends

Game just goes b lack and back to my home screen. I love this game and this is my first trouble how do I fix that so I can play again. If I uninstall and reinstall will I loose all games in progress?

Was a great game. Now it goes from black screen to home.  What&#39;s the deal?

Great game. Needs a practice mode thought. Just to tinker with.

This is truly the best app on the market! We need new words please!

I love this game!!! And its helping me be omw a better artist!!

Brilliant combination of social media and mobile gaming.  5* -chongoDroid

Wikid. Add me 4 regular games. Can anyone not get on this game??? X

I use finger

!!!!!!!!!AWESOME!!!!!!!

New update has notifications now! Love this game!

Thanks for removing the permission. Installed again

Have 15 games going. This game is great!

My friends n I r so addicted.

This is addictive.  I could play it for hours.

Love it!!! Addicted!!! It&#39;s the only game I play now..

Since the newest update .... it wouldn&#39;t open at all... had to reinstall it...and now... it gets stuck when opening your friends game... had to close it... ~ Motorola Atrix 4g

Great game!

Cryin over sms permissions reallly:? I have  an option for ya flush ur fone down the toilet if ur gunna be so scared over a permission jesus.

If you don&#39;t cheat by writing the word and don&#39;t mind playing when possible and are some what creative with drawing hit me up for games EBearRaw is the screenname. Thanks

I love this game so much and I played it everyday... But now it wont even open! Please fix! Worth 5 stars if fixed!

This game is very fun, almost addicting

Completely addicted!  Great app!

This game is so practical yet so incredibly addicting...  Love it

Excellent app, but has now crashed while drawing and I cannot do anything with it.

Fear not. Download and enjoy.

I play with my friends. All the time I love it!!!

Great game but can not play, does not open since last update. I know its the same comment as other people but getting a bit fed up with it now!

No problems here. Atrix

Game

Lots of fun and has everything after last update.

Love it

Amazing game when your playing with friends and family hard words but thats more funer i recomend yoy get this

Say no more.

Love the game. Random people play is fast

Great game to play with friends

Best game I&#39;ve ever played

Thanks for all the fun!

This is a very fun and addictive game as long as you have active games. Also, the amount of words should be increased.

Awesome game! So glad the level was increased to 999.

Addicting and fun to play with friends

With all the updates now this app is awesome!

So much fun!

Awesome!

Fun fun hours of fun.

Absolutely awesome. One of the best games around. Keep up the good work

Highly addictive and fun game. Link to facebook users is cool

I have spent hours playing!!

Very addicting and makes you utilize that brain activity!

This game is awesome!

Love playing. Satisfies my boredum. Thanks

&quot;Gr8&quot; Game!

A stylus would be helpfull!

Nothing to add to the title

but fabfuntastic

Draw something when u bored:)

Very good and fun app. Worth buying!

Simple

Best game ever

Challenging and fun!

Enjoyable. Allows you to get very creative

Love it...play against my kids for a good laugh

I love this app its my favourite.

Very addictive

Love itttt

Great app!

Love love love this game

Love this game!

Always fun!

Soooo fun amazing time!

so enterteinment

From the range of words and colors, this simple game is a must have for anyone. Its a simple app to use and great with friends.

Love this game. Done.

Fun game..

Cool

Love it

Excellent!

Fun!

Addictive!

Awesome game. Works perfect. DROID X

The funnest game

love this game

Love this !

Love it!!!

Great fun

Love this app

Love this game

Gd game

Can u please make it so that we can save drawings  we like or so that we r able to share the drawings in facebook

Addicting!

Love it!

Very fun to play

Awesome game

I am VERY hooked

Awesome!

Great for when doing nothing

Bomb

Ace

I love this game, currently my favorite. However I really wish there was a way to delete some of the games. Some people just write the word, and that is seriously no fun. What&#39;s the point? PLEASE make an option to cancel games, so I can add those that draw and get rid of those who just write the word.

Wish I cud save pics, some of them are &quot;picture - perfect&quot;

Love it! Best game Ever!

I really wish there was a way to get rid of a color package you accidentally  buy but besides for that great game.

Awesome game, addicting when you get many friends playing.

Double points on each hundred games completed! Excellent idea!

Good time waster.

Love it

So much fun! Great way to interact with my friends who I dont see often. Plus, it doesn&#39;t matter how good you can draw, it&#39;s for fun!

Rocks

Hello...my name id Niki and I&#39;m hooked on Draw Something.

I&#39;m addicted!

Please DO NOT add a save feature! What makes this fun are the drawings you wouldn&#39;t share with anyone except your closest friends!!! If u could save the drawings the fun will stop.

A very funny game, some words are so strange and mad, which gives even more fun to draw and guess them. Though there is a problem with positioning and precision on my device and I think i&#39;m not the only one. Even despite this it&#39;s one of the most exciting games on Android IMO.

Love this app, and I love it even more now that it goes past 99 and I can write little notes.

I can spend hours here, it doesn&#39;t get old!

I wish there was a way to upload a photo without having to sign up through facebook! So everyone can have a picture up, nice see person ur playing with!

My co workers and I play all day

So much fun

Gotta play every day!

Cool.Fun

Best game ever. Buuut, please make it to where on Androids you can save the pictures to your phone!

Love it..addicting!

Enjoy this game, it make u laugh to see other people drawing

I love this app somethin.g to do while I waiting for anything

There should a warning this can be addicting lol I love this game!!! You don&#39;t have to play through  Facebook so can still play w/others! Great App!!! Thanks!!! Keep it up!

I really enjoy this game! its worth the money:D i wish for Colors! other than that its great!

I love this game as well highly addictive! Is there any way you can in the paid version make like a gallery type set up so we can view drawings from before...like add a save button to the guess and draw screen then have them save in a gallery or to the phone another thing is agreed with the not being able to view friends comments long enough:) keep up the great game though love it!  Thanx :-)

I absolutely LOVE this game!

Love this game

Addictive game.

This game is so addictive! Its fun being able to play with friends. Theres a couple things that could improve. Like whenever someone writes a comment, there&#39;s a character max. It would be nice to know what that max is, and when you&#39;ve reached it. It would also be nice if the comment was showed for a couple more seconds. There should also be a way of seeing which your your opponent is waiting to guess. Like while its their turn, the word could be displayed next to it, the one you drew for them. Because when you have allot of games running at the same time, its hard to keep track which word you drew for which person.  Thanks :) Overall, great game!

Need to create a messaging option like in &quot;Words With Friends&quot;. Great game overall!

Love this game!! But would like the option of more brushes

Lots of fun, well worth the Pennies!

My friends don&#39;t play fast enough, so it&#39;s great to be able to start games with random people. Nearing 100 score with someone in another country that I&#39;ve never met. Great app!

This app rocks! Best game out there!

I rate it 10 stars and if u have a lot of facebook friends it going to be endless fun. install

Fun fun fun!

very good

The game is excellently handled and updates keep making the game more comfortable to play with. I would ask though for option to save a photo of the final product from both players. Screen shooting isn&#39;t that friendly for phones although tablets find it easy. Keep up the good work.

I guess I don&#39;t get how a new owner will &quot;ruin&quot; this game - seems pretty darn straightforward to me!  If you don&#39;t like the game anymore - don&#39;t play it!  I however, think it&#39;s a blast!

Why do you need access to my SMS messages?

Had to reinstall after last update but works great. Wish more people would actually draw instead of just writing the word!

Just updated and great except now in landscape and drawing area shrunk :-(   (dell streak mini 5)  fix soon please. Can.t you just make It auto rotate and fit to screen?

Great game! Needs a drawing size between the 2 smallest circles but other than that fun game! Would highly recommend!!!!

This game is fun for everyone. Thank you for reading everyones feed back and trying to update and make changes as quick as possible.

I love this game. I can&#39;t draw but that doesn&#39;t seem to matter much.  Good with words so it&#39;s a combination of unscrambling letters and the picture that is sometimes just a hint.  Love tje ability to plau miltiple games with like minded friends. Recommend highly and wpuld give it ten stars if possible.

SMS requirement pulled, this goes back to being the single biggest time sink in my life

Clever app. I could think of one or two minor changes, but it&#39;s a great app!

This game is the best game ive come across until the new update I cant draw because its too small (dell streak mini 5) really guttes please fix it!!

Great game, especially since the need to send/receive SMS was removed.

Wish choosing a hard word would add more letters so that it would be harder for the person guessing the drawing, and desperately needs a way to add your avatar through your mobile device without Facebook. on the main menu, it should show the last word you drew...

Thanks for listening, great game!

I can&#39;t put this game down. Swnsasy add me!

Why would this application need permission to read and send text messages? Sounds shady to me.

I wish my droid had a stylus. Drawing with fingers is tough!

OMGPOP continues to update for WiFi devices at a pace with phone offering. I just wish I knew when and how those updates are being scheduled as WiFi devices seem to be behind phones for updates.

a briliant fantastic addictive game, pleased rounds now go past 99 was stuck on that number for ages, glad new words coming in this update, brill now can comment to each other on drawings

Great game.  Very simple to play.  Love the new updates.

Needs more words. Note latest update seems to cause failure for game to boot on the wife&#39;s Galaxy Ace. Fine on my Sgs2

This app is really fun, even if its impossible to do a picture like in the photos without an ipad. Really great idea, the problem for me is that most of my friends have bkackberries so i cant play them (but thats nothing to do with the app)

Just buy it! You&#39;ll never want to miss a game.

The only game I play on the regular.

Gave 5 stars since reading of SMS was removed. Old &quot;Why does this update need to have permissions to send and receive SMS messages?&quot;

This game is so addicting...

Returned stars now that SMS permissions have been removed.

Love this game but please, please, please let me resign from games with inactive players. I have a ton of them and they never go away.

I tried the free version of this app and I got severely addicted to the fun. So, I bought the paid version. I enjoy playing this game. Especially, using the S-pen that comes along with the galaxy note. A very good time killer. ;)

Bad bad bad bad bad

I love this game...just need new words, please!

I keep losing my colours and bombs what&#39;s the point of buying when this happens! That&#39;s really poor for a paid version to be worse than free!

All I can say is the game is so fun to play, wish I could actually draw!!!!..lol

My whole family and most of my friends are playing this.

Been playing this for a while and still loving it!  Just bought a stylus to draw more detailed pictures to submit to drawsome drawings blog in fact:-D

Excellent fun. No artistic tallent required!

Username: CTQ active play that actually draw instead of letters #ANNOYING

You&#39;re losing users fast enough as it is so don&#39;t make a mistake like that again!

for one of the best games :)

Love the new updates

Love this game! So addicting and fun! Wish you could save pics from you or your friends. Screen shots or something. Some are worth saving

thanks for removing sms permissions, back to 5 stars

I&#39;ve been playing just about 22 days and its been an incredible experience and very entertaining, thanks for the great effort!

This game is so much fun and even better now since the updates thanks thanks heaps guys.

Love it but now its force closing on me :(

I love this game. Great way to pass time.

Let me quit agroup. I have random people ive grouped with that stopped playing.

Awesome game! Even when you are playing with people that are drawful

Great game and awesome support.

AWESOME

I bought the pro version based on an ad in the free version which promised 400 coins. Bought it and only got 50. Opened a support ticket and it marked as resolved with no response from the support team. If they close my ticket again I&#39;ll be filing a charge back.

Glad to see them new permissions have been dropped.

Fun game to play with others. A must have!

As long as you play with the right people :)

Sometimes more than twice a day I need to uninstall and reinstall, cuz there is an error message that won&#39;t go away unless I do that. PLEASE FIX and ill give 5 stars. Cuz this app is one of the best ones out there. Time to improve it cuz it seems it can get super popular ;)

So much fun playing with friends and family

Even of u suck at drawing

A fun game that makes you think but not so hard it hurts. :-)

Notifications would be nice.

Im sooo into this game its not funny

Great game. Beware, can be addictive.

Love this game

Words fail to express the awesomeness of this game

This game makes me want to think and draw something.

I&#39;m the best at drawing donkeys!

I play it all day and night, just wish there was a way to share drawings to fb or text messaging! I have a droid.

Lots of fun.

Cool app, works

Thanks for listening to your customers and changing the sms permissions! You&#39;re back to being a 5 star app  :)

I love this game but I need to find more artistic friends....

Keep getting better and better. Great improvements with every update

Now that I know how to delete.this game is good stuff! Wish there could be more words though.

Very fun but lots of ads on free version

Watch out, it&#39;s addictive...

Totally addictive. :)

Love it! Play me. ThatMetalVero.

Love the upgrades, lots of fun.

Keep up all the good updates!

brilliant

Please add pinch to zoom. It would make drawing details much easier.

Awesome

A stylist would be useful.

Love this app great fun

This game is fun whether you can draw ir not

The game is a ton of fun!

Good

And fixed

Enjoy it so much, I am upgrading.

I wish I could save pictures!

Fun as ever

Really enjoy playing this game.

Hate the landscape mode please rotate back!!!!!

Love playing this game!

Simple, fun and  fast

Love it

I&#39;m loving the newest update! going to 999 is great :) also, I&#39;m finally getting notices when it&#39;s my turn. love it!

Great game very addicting and fun.

Absolutely love this application by far my favourite

Just amazing, and very addictive :)

I love this game!

Very addictive!  And fun.

Great game to play with friends and family

Still need improvements

...since update. can&#39;t play.

Addicting and the updates only make it better!

Awesome love the new message feature.

Never had a problem!

great game!

One of the best games on Android. Great developer support.

I would like the ability to screen capture with ease.  Great and very addictive.

Personal pics

As fun as it is addictive!!!

Love it ;)

Great game! Love it!

OK.  I&#39;m hooked.  Hours of fun!

Drawesome game! :)

Awesome

Love this game :)

Can stop playing it

This one is very fun

Love it!

Addicting!  Love it!

Fab app very addictive

Great game that supports Facebook  This app is basically online pictionary

Great

Improvements keep coming. Awesome to see.

Best multilayer game on Android.

Laughed so hard when  I first played it

Needs updates

Fun

Brillant game

Love it

Tough drawing with fingers, but such inspires the most creative solutions!  Would be nice to build in a way to share drawings - ones given or received... Taking screenshots on android 4 closes the program, and you lose the drawing!

Great developer, great game.

One word: perfection

So fun

Just as good as words with friends. love it! ! !

i love this game i love to draw

Thanks for this app! Ours so much fun!

Great game love the updates keep it up!!

Cool

Great fun

Very addictive

Love this app

Great game best way to kill time

Its fun &amp; entertaining

Very fun, great way to kill time

Ever

love it

Awesome game

Very cool

Keep up the great improvements!

Fun  game

:)

fab

I give 5 stars bc the game itself is fun &amp; addicting, but I&#39;m having problems with it .. I bought the game a couple of months ago. it has done good, but now it won&#39;t load. So I installed the free version... The fee version was doing fine all day, until I updated it. Now it gets suck on &quot;getting ready&quot;. ) :

What I said up there ^ Rhonda u must not be very bright...  now that push notifications have been added, the app needs SMS permission.  COMMON SENSE COMMON SENSE COMMON SENSE .....

Fun and addicting. The app itself is really simple but works perfectly. One of the best apps in the play store in my opinion.

Latest update has helped the freezing issue and the notifications are nice, but would be nicer if there was something audible. Still waiting to be able to exit to the menu without having to close the game. Overall, this is my favorite game from the market.

Updates seem to have sorted all issues on my phone. Great game. Lots of fun

After clicking tap to play, I can&#39;t put letters in, not showing bombs or mix up and recall options! HELP!

#addictedmuch  Just wish I could share some of the pics on facebook or Twitter but I can&#39;t take screen shots as I have a HTC desire HD gutted cause some are very funny

Brilliant fun. Love to see other peoples interpretations of the words they choose to draw.

fc when searching or trying to invite friends on facebook

Please add screen shots! Everyone doesn&#39;t have a rooted phone.

Best game ever. Except 2 minor glitches.  1)says I&#39;m playing on another device when I&#39;m not. 2)a friend and I have passed 100 turns looooong ago and it won&#39;t go past 100 like its stuck. So every turn on that 1 game is our 100th turn. Other than that fantabulous!!!!

Great game! Wish there were other individual ways to collect coins besides waiting for your opponent. But a great way to pass time.

Brilliant fun. Love to see other peoples interpretations of the words they choose to draw.

fc when searching or trying to invite friends on facebook

Please add screen shots! Everyone doesn&#39;t have a rooted phone.

Best game ever. Except 2 minor glitches.  1)says I&#39;m playing on another device when I&#39;m not. 2)a friend and I have passed 100 turns looooong ago and it won&#39;t go past 100 like its stuck. So every turn on that 1 game is our 100th turn. Other than that fantabulous!!!!

Great game! Wish there were other individual ways to collect coins besides waiting for your opponent. But a great way to pass time.

Stop crying Charles.  Draw something is going to hack your phone lol. What an awesome game!  Love it soooooooo much :-)

I&#39;d this game was a drug, then I would need to go to rehab!!!  I&#39;m totally addicted.  :)

Can only go past 99 with one person. Me and another person are stuck on99-100. Fix it plz

Excellent idea and game, very addictive too. Worth buying the ad free version. I can&#39;t draw stall which makes it even more enjoyable and fun.

Hey everyone! I suggest you go take a look at &quot;Permissions Denied&quot; app. By the way, this paid version is now ad-supported; it sends you notification ads... Thank you Zynga.  Also, take a look at Draw Something&#39;s Privacy Policy:  &gt; Technical info, like IP Address and device ID, help us to provide the service, track installs and target advertising.   &gt; Device IDs and email addresses allow us to deliver notifications on game events and new products and features

Very addictive game! Loving the new chat feature in between drawings. :-)

If you enjoy drawing and/or pictionary, you&#39;ll be addicted to this like I am!

Uninstalled and then reinstalled and works fine :)

Good game but I don&#39;t understand why it is asking for permission to send/read SMS. Not acceptable. Paid or not, I don&#39;t want to grant permission for this. It was fun, but i&#39;m uninstalling.

We have close to 30 people in our circle of drawsomething friends! We LOVE IT!

Love  it,but needs new words n maybe collections n achievements

Could use bigger word library Nd more challenging, other than that I&#39;m addicted!

Finally this app has earned five stars from me. Tons of colors, reliable notifications and loads a little faster now if you ask me. This app = winning.

I have no problems with this app, I love it its totally addictive :D

Awesome app with great new updates for notes and comments.

Very good game , addictive

Just wish I had more people to play with cuz its so fun

After the update its stuck on landscape!  Help!

Love this game. I always play when I have free time.

This game is so much fun, &amp; definitely keeps me entertained. I&#39;m so glad you can finally write notes back &amp; forth.

Loved it bought it because I loved it so much and today it stopped refreshing Samsung charge pulling down says nothing I have hubby playing against me and he says its my turn so I know it isn&#39;t refreshing!!!

This has got to be may favorite game! Only recommandation would be to allow screen shots so I can share my drawings

New update is terrible keeps telling me it couldn&#39;t sign in to Facebook I bought this now may need to uninstall please fix this. Samsung galaxy

They should make a noise to let you know It&#39;s your turn.

Best game ever I love this game

Great game to play with friends.

But words need to be better and prices for colors cheaper

Fun and addicting! I got the big update I was hoping for! Its awesome that you can make comments and be notified when you&#39;re up to draw!

And the continuous improvements make it even better.

Add me n help babies xhzgvl

I also find this game very addictive. I need more friends. It does have some quirks but I still give a five star rating because it is a blast. Special thanks must go out to the creators for their upgrades.

Love it, I can&#39;t draw but so funny xxx

Great game if you like drawing!

Never gets old, can play with anyone

So glad this is now on the Kindle Fire. I love this app. Freezes on my phone sometimes but I know its my phone more than the app. I wish there were less celebrities as what do draw options. Seems like every.month a new celebrity is an option

It&#39;s a great game to play wih friends! The drawings people come up with are hilarious!

Great game.

Great game =) x

My friends and I have so much fun playing this game! Ty for your ideas and hard work!

You can never be bored with this game

Almost perfect, just needs the ability to do your own words.

love it. . .so much fun

With all the updates this game gets better and better.

Love this game, my grandkids help guess the drawings

I PLAY EVERYDAY!

Great, most of my friends on Facebook have this game too.

I love this game.&quot; Its fun to see what people come up with ..

Totally addictive.

Awesome can&#39;t get tired of it

Recent update has fixed my problem. Really like this game :)

One of the funnest games there is on the market!

This game is so fun and easy and is good for killing a little spare time now and again :)

I love this game!! My kids and I play all the time..

Quality creativity. Use your imagination.

What are you waiting for? Download and enjoy!

Play with random people or friends

I can&#39;t tell you how much I love this game! Fantastic!

An awsome game so addictive

Needs more variety of words

Extremely addictive, fun &amp; entertaining.

Great time killer!

Glad to see the addition of notifications and chatting.

Awesome game to play with friends! Love it

Worth the 99cents &amp; a lot of fun!

Lull every round!

Thank you

Great game very addictive you will love it.

Love playing with friends its great :) Big fat 5 stars

This is so addicting

This is an awesome app, can&#39;t get enough!!

Addictive app!!

Very fun! And makes you a better drawer!

Draw something is my family&#39;s favorite app. Great selection of colors and wide range of words to draw.  Excellent!  playing on ATRIX 2 phones

Loads of fun!

Fun for the whole family!

So addictive!

awesome!

Excellent way to waste your evenings. Pictionary on steroids!

Is Fun

This shouldn&#39;t be four stars.  This game is amazing.

enough said

Reload data??????

&lt;3 So fun!

Best game ever love it helps with spelling :-)

Love this game!

Awesome

Fun to get u playing with your friends and family

Addicting

Love this game

Love this game

Love it!! Awesome changes!!

Love this game!!

Awesome game

Works great!

Yay!

Lots of fun. Kills time well.

Fantastic game totally addicted

Drawsome!

So much fun to play!

Have had the paid version for ages. Not once have I had a force close or problems with losing coins and/or colours. Great app!

Fun! Great app!

This game has come along way from when I started playing it. You can comment on the other person&#39;s  drawing and use multiple colors. It&#39;s a fun game to play with all ages.

Draw

Its fun

I love this game so fricking amazing!!! Good game very addicting

Great fun playing with friends. Connects smoothly with Facebook.

I had am issue with losing my account info when the program updated. I emailEd them and received a response the next day. All good...thanks! Annnnd the game is fun.

Would like to be able to view, save and send my drawings or my partners drawings on droid. Would like to be able to &quot;go back&quot; to the main menu without completely exiting the game. Sometimes i need to mull over a drawing so i want to play the next person Would be cool to be able to mix your own colors

It has gotten a lot better since the update. There are tons of people playing, and it&#39;s very rare that you just end up playing with a total idiot. This is a great game, and works for being able to pick it up and play through out the day.

some times the words don&#39;t match up with the picture. the previous word is some times displayed with the current picture and results in a failure. otherwise, great game! lots of fun.

I have NEVER had a problem with force closing or any of the other problems listed by other users. It would be cool to have the ability to save drawings without say using a screenshot. Other than that awesome! No complaints.

Updates - why so many? I&#39;ve updated 3 times. Would like &quot;fill&quot; ability, as others have mentioned.

Love it!  Its so fun esp if ur friends cant draw!!  Lol. My wishes: a pen size b/ t the two smallest sizes, my score wont go over 100, more words.

I love this app, and play it frequently! It would be cool though if you could buy new shapes to draw with, ex: triangles, and squares, etc.

It is so much fun, and I&#39;ve gotten family and friends hooked so we can play together. great job developers! I love the latest update with comments. Please add more words, they are very repetitive. It&#39;s too easy to guess when it&#39;s the same thing again and again.

Great awesome game. When I bought the app though, I didn&#39;t get the 2000 new words.

So love this game,I not much of an artist..ok I can&#39;t draw at all hehe... but its so addicting you just can&#39;t help yourself, so I say thank you for bringing a little fun and laughter into or lives ...;)

Only bad thing is people you play with. When they just write the answer instead of drawing. Not the devs fault so 5stars.

This game is perfect on the Samsung Galaxy Note.  Would love to see pinch to zoom enabled.

Needs ability to view notification bar on top also good idea add the ability to import pics as backgrounds maybe

Very fun, but very buggy. Half the time it wont let me on and i have to turn my phone off and back on. Fix this!

I love the game. Me and my husband play but now its says &quot;their turn&quot; on both our games and we cant play each other???  Update. Works great now. Update...closes after opening for almost a week.

How do I merge the free game with the paid version? I lost all of my colors and current games. I believe it is because I used two different email addresses

Please update so I cancel games with people who are not participating. There just wasting space on my game board

Love this app it is so fun  but there is alot of bugs.  Like I can&#39;t see all my colors that I own.  And can&#39;t get rid of the people I do not play with anymore.  Other than that it&#39;s very entertaining.

It said the new update would let me but it wont did the uninstall thing and all the updates!!! Other than that love love love the game!!!

Very fun to play. Update made it so much better.  Only complaint I have is that when I upgraded from the free version to the paid one I was suppose to get 400 coins for free and I didn&#39;t. I&#39;m waiting to get them still :-( Best this is a great game to play! Love it!!!!!

Great game ... just have to get all your friends to play too

Android galaxy s2 For some reason I get a message saying &quot;it looks like you&#39;re playing on multiple devices, please play on only 1 device&quot; I am only playing on 1 device. Love the game. Glad they added notifications for Androids and fixed the counter to go over 99. Thx

ONLY APP I&#39;VE GOTTEN ADDICTED TO!!!!  IT&#39;S A BLAST...Plus you have fun getting to know/joke w/some of the other players.

Love this game! It is so much fun!

Love it love updates. Would be nice to replay a drawing so in case we missed something. Though be nice if u could move around and draw on a bigger area if u wanted to.

I love this game, I&#39;m sure it would be very enjoyable. However it keeps freezing up and crashing constantly which is pretty frustrating. ATRIX CM7

I love love love this game! Needs ability to save and send drawings on Droid like it does on &quot;I-sheep&quot; phones. Also wish I could tell when last drawing was sent, ie date and time.... Also wish I could delete some colors or rearrange them the way I like.  Also, need an olive green color, now I&#39;m bring picky! Still, 5 stars overall, for sure!

Fun game, but with 2500 words why do I  seeing the sane exact words daily

Fun for anyone who likes pictionary! Hard to draw anything with detail unless you have an iPad or child sized fingers, but I have found that if there are many creative ways to give hints to help your opponent guess a word. For example, for the word vent I drew a Coors light with the vent exaggerated. Loads of time wasting fun:)

Soooo addicting very fun and can be very creative. I enjoy playing this game with family, friends, and co-workers!!

Awesome! Changed from 4 stars to 5! Play many games with friends, so fun!

Works well on ICS. There are a few inconveniences like the black screen before loading and the back button only taking you out of the game. Other than those (which don&#39;t deserve the docking of a star) the application is great. Plus they update it frequently with bug fixes and functionality.

Wicked now its been fixed!! It use to stuff up all the time now it never does. Thanks for fixing it :)

Fun, challenging and did I say fun....well it&#39;s funny too!

Works great with GNex LTE stock

Great app but the only fault I got with it is once you delete someone from you play list you cant add them back. So I rate it 9out 10

despite update. No save is showing on SG2.

Push notifications DO NOT rely on SMS permissions. Many other apps have push w/o SMS access. Push was working BEFORE the SMS permissions were added.

I got the paid version and it has none of the crashes I experienced on the ad-supported version.

Love this game! Even though i am a horrible drawer

Love the notifications! But lately when I go to the game the drawing that my notification said was there isnt.....

Works great! Love the new features chat and notifications, allow me to save pics within app and ill find a way to add 6th star! ( also more words, id even pay for a package)

Working good again. Cold use a few new features as mentioned by others

This is a revised review and I&#39;m upping it from 4 to 5 stars. All my Concerns were covered on the last update. :-)  Love this game.

Works great, just needs a few more additions...save image etc...great work so far!

omg people who are hesitating to buy this game,just buy it. at first when i bought i regretted it but after i played like 10 min im addicted

Play every day with my whole family. A great way to come together when we&#39;re apart.

I have enjoyed this game since a friend shared it with me. The update make it better each time. Keep them coming!

This is so much fun that I bought the paid version. When I forgot my password/email the support team was quick to fix the problem so I didn&#39;t lose my games, bonus coins, bombs, and colors. I &lt;3 you OMGPOP!

Latest update isn&#39;t supported on htc flyer (paid version of draw somethingb please fix :)

It keeps doing the oops thing and I just bought it plz fix then it will be 5 stars

Wish you would fix the profile problem..when you change your facebook pic it should update on Draw Something

After the update I lost all of the colors I had unlocked.

I didn&#39;t believe the other reviews saying the game stopped working for them so I bought this anyway after enjoying the free ad-supported version. Played a few rounds with people I already started the game with, and started a few more. Lo and behold, the game is stuck at a &quot;Getting Ready&quot; loader and I can&#39;t do anything to get out. I&#39;ve tried clearing the cache and reinstalling, but nothing works. I reinstalled the ad-supported version again, and that seems to work fine...

I waste entirely too much time playing this game.  It is ready fun to see if I can depict some of the words. Some of the choices are ridiculous and some aren&#39;t even  real words. Nevertheless it is fun.

This is a awesome and a very fun app to play when your board especially if you love to draw and your good at drawing this would be a fun and very addicting app.... I like it because it&#39;s fun and awesome.

It was a 5 star app but now its going to 1 because of the sms permissions. Im not updating until you explain why you need access to our sms

It&#39;s very addicting, I can&#39;t seem to put this game down. Big fan! It&#39;s pretty much the most fun you can have lol with a Facebook game.

Share wit friends n random people on-line!

Tried to play multiple games keeps freezing waited to long to ask for refund

why does this app needs permission to send and receive sms ??

Runs great on Samsung Galaxy S2!  So far, so good.  Think I may need an intervention between this and Scramble.....

Me and my girlfriend love this game. We send us love notes now. Keep it up. Oh if u guys can add notification sounds that&#39;d be great

won&#39;t. refresh bad pronjken im plying 18 people very annoying

I love this game - My only complaint is that there are too many repeat words. A larger dictionary would be a fabulous addition

Been playing for couple months now. Still fun. Need to add more words though. Seeing a lot of same cycling over and over.

Brushes, like the &#39;spray can&#39; and id really like to see a filler tool, so i can stop manually coloring in outlines or background.. takes too long

I am SO addicted! Wish they could let the pictures freeze at the end of someones drawing so you could enjoy it more though.

Love this game! Super fun! U find out how many of your friends truly get you! :)

Be able to organise colours according to shade would be nice. For example, put all greens together instead of just stacking the newly bought colours on end of  palette on the top.

This game is SO addictive! I catch myself thinking of ways to draw random words I hear throughout the day :P

Wow! This game is theostensibly fun I&#39;ve had ony phone!

I&#39;d like to see there be a function where you can send your drawing to your email or  post on facebook.

Highly recommend it for any age!

This game is so kool...i get to play with friends&amp;family which is a  big plus...lots of laugh

It logout from Facebook everytime!!  I hate it...

With this game you can get hours of fun without geting bored. It&#39;s the best game I&#39;ve played

Great game but If the next update came with some sort of storage capacity or something, I would LOVE to be able to save some drawings I and my friends have done.

This game is so addictting i can&#39;t put it down. It wears out my battery so fast. But it&#39;s. Still worth it.. love it wears

Just wish there was a way to save the drawings because some are really cool and have no way to save....add that and it would be the best. Still wanting a way to save drawings

I&#39;ve only been playing this game for less than a week and I love it.

The game is now perfect and that much more fun thanks to all that they&#39;ve added. So addictive!

Great app! GJ finally got notifications now we need more words keep up the good job guys!

Best game ever! Has some small glitches but still my favorite game

Can&#39;t put it down!

Gr8 game, wud like 2 b able 2 delete games so I havnt got a give list of games were nobody is replying 2 my drawings.

Brilliant game,great laugh tis a challenge to see how good a draw people can do

Have friends you don&#39;t feel like talking to? Perfect, just play a game with them. FBook integration guarantees friends to play with. I don&#39;t give 5 stars to just anything.

This is great, nothimg difficult. Lots of fun!!

Working great until today it sticks at the getting ready screen forevr

The free version was awesome, besides the force stops. Hoping the full version will be better! :)

This is definitely addicting!!! Wish there were a bigger word selection.

Can&#39;t get over 100 turns, just sticks at 99/100/101 then back again.

Since I downloaded this game about a month ago its all that I wanna do. I love it!!

...but this game doesn&#39;t!

Excellent but deleting people doesn&#39;t seem to  work, they keep re-appearing in my list and it&#39;s annoying!!!

The counter still sticks at 99 which is a bit annoying

I love this game, but since last update i only get black screen for 10 seconds and then it closes itself. i use a very common device, please fix it fast. i&#39;m a paying costumer..

If your time is valuable to you, dont play this game because you will waste it.

Don&#39;t even play words with friends anymore. This has taken over. Want to be able to invite facebook friends not currently playing Draw Something. Thanks!

I love this game!! Wish we could share drawings on facebook.

Very good pass time game.

I love the random function for when your real friends are busy you can still find a match

I absolutely LOVE this game! My friends &amp; I crack ourselves up!!

I&#39;m glad I bought this game It&#39;s a lot of fun and so much better with the updates but we need more words please :)

Love this app. Only one i&#39;ve ever wanted to pay for!

Lotta fun. Play w/ my friends/wife and a few randoms but when get 2gether its fun to rag on people for there drawing skills!!!

It&#39;s honestly the best game out there....way better than Angry Birds

Love this game! Love the updates which we can comment. Totally addicted and gotten others addicted too!

Few updates needed. Like a back instead of having to quit when clicking the wrong game. But pretty good on the whole. Addictive!

I suck at drawing. Would be nice if it was drawn just a little above my finger tip

Love the game! I Just wish it would notify of turns with a sound.

Could do with an update, when I open the game it just closes I can&#39;t play or anything. But when I can get on it, its an excellent game :)

This is the best game ever!

Send and receive text messages? No thanks

very addictive always playing it have ta give it 5 stars

I think it would benefit from a fast forward button when people draw so that if it&#39;s very detailed you don&#39;t have to wait forever

Love the game ... Needs chat and turn notifications....

&lt;3 this app.. Need a stylus to really get ur draw on, but it keeps me occupied!

This game is idicting

One of the best games out there but I have to keep uninstalling and re-downloading because sometimes it doesn&#39;t show when it is my move.  And I would like to be able to save my drawing.

Their there.slide fimger for colors

But I will NOT update since there are new permissions to SEND AND RECEIVE SMS MESSAGES. This is so not cool. Think twice before updating.

to play with my wife and family! It&#39;s like I&#39;m back home...

Love this game!  Needs different thicknesses for drawings, but otherwise great!  Very addictive!!!!

Its so much fun to play with.. Can play with all my friends... Love it love it..

Finally works well on samsung galaxy note. No more crashing without wifi.

This game is fun . When you have nothing else to do :)

Awesome app. Not sure what issues others may be having, but I have no issues with my Android phone.

Love this game like that it notifys me when its my turn to play.

Great game...but would like to be able to turn to draw &quot;landscape&quot; picture.

Just stopped working goes to blank screen the back to home screen. HTC DHD

Love this App.!!

Thank you for the laughter!

Obsessed!!!

Great game after the update!

Works great on T-Mobile g2 and even better on the nexus S

This game is awesome, addictive, and really makes your imagination go for a spin! It&#39;s magnificent.

I was having a blast with this game.... Until it stopped working completely. When I go to play, there&#39;s a grey screen for a few seconds, then it kicks back to my homescreen. I can&#39;t even forcestop it because it&#39;s not running in the first place! Please help!

love this game so addicted.. only thing that need to be fix is adding more things to draw

Great game but today it wont load on incredible s it just brings me back to home when I open it...thumbs down

An amazing game. I&#39;m addicted!!!

Enough said

I adore this game. Improvements are fantastic. my only complaint is that it absolutely annihilates my battery

I&#39;m a total junkie, this is so much fun. I play people in my family from 12 to 79. The notifications help greatly, nice update. I love this game!

I was wondering if there another up grade for 1.99? ?

Anyone want to play draw something with me? Sweettea21:)

I always play!

This paid app stopped working after an update :( Otherwise its great fun

Awesome. So much fun!!!

Yes you can delete players... You swipe your finger from left to right and delete shows up.... So don&#39;t complain on here if you don&#39;t know how to do something... This game is the best

Great updates! Thanks for listening!

I love it! And to Kathy: you can delete the game. Hold the game you want to delete and swipe.

The only thing that let&#39;s it down is the cheats that play !

definitely 5 stars after the update!  Probably my favorite app!

Excellent , addictive fun. Worth paying 62p for advert free version...!!

Always 4get to play cuz there is no notifications on Android

Lov it great fun but would like to save some of my pics sometimes..;)

Addictive, simple and great fun for all ages with no skill required. Would also like to see a save feature to stop having to repeat drawings and to be able to switch between games without exiting the game.

Great game and really addictive.

Love playing this game. It&#39;s so much fun!

I can&#39;t get enough of this game! Just wish there was a way replay or view past drawings.

Upgraded from the free version just to get rid of the ads and to support the game makers. Runs smooth on my Droid 4.

There should be a practice round for those who are unsure of their art. LOL. Just saying. Love the app though!

Not sure why other people have trouble. I love this game.

Excellent Game! Now tablet compatible!  When will we get to share our game on android, like you can to Facebook and twitter on iOS?    This game just keeps on getting better!  What about an Extra hard for 4 coins, and a stupidly difficult for 5 coins?  :-)

Who doesn&#39;t want to have fun, laughing, and smile. This game is awesome must download.

Need a brush size between smallest and next up, otherwise awesome!!

Love love love this game! But when will we get a screen capture feature for android? My iphone friends are having all the fun posting on facebook!

Haha awesome game!

One of the funnest games I&#39;ve ever played!

Love playing with all my friends and its made so well. Never have force closed or other issues. Some of the drawings are hilarious that my friends male up!

Need to be able to delete games!

It&#39;s off the hook like a cell phone! Especially now that u can comment. Perfect

It&#39;s so fun and me and my friends have a blast together even when we can&#39;t be together

Recommended by my friend.Got myself another addiction...

This gave is totally awsome, me and my kids and friends have a blast playing it

Works perfectly on the Samsung galaxy 2, great fun! Worth paying for full version to get rid of the adverts.

Totally addicted, great game. Works great on my galaxy note as i have the option of using my s-pen.

This app is so much fun and very addictive.

Only thing I wish is that it could save past drawings to look back at, otherwise fantastic game! Best on the marketplace!

Love it . Best game app I have.

Love this, can see this taking over the world!!! Galaxy Nexus

When are you going to update this to be compatible with the Samsung Galaxy Mini.  Good game but can&#39;t use it on new phone now

I love this game and paying for the ad free version is worth it

So addicting lol! I wish there were more color packages!!!!

Very time consuming

My only question is. How do you delete someone who&#39;s not playing?

I just wish you started off  with more colors

This rules. I draw veiny cocks any chance I get.

Posted wrong review.  Draw something is awesome.

The update fixed evrrything. The game is now 5* material

So addictive! Next update needs to include more colors and brush sizes to purchase!!

Never purchased before that&#39;s how much i love it

Finally went pro! Byebye ads!! So worth the $2... I play it everyday!! Addicted :)

I hate drawing and yet this is so much fun...

A little buggy when sending drawings.

Good game

Love this app! Draw with friends from Facebook too!

Don&#39;t you lie to me Larry

Very entertaining

Its fun, creative, &amp; friend interactions. I realize designers are spending much time improving game. Looking forward to new upgrades.

Best waste of time ever!!!

I love it..especially when i&#39;m at work bored.

Needs more words, and brush shapes.

This game is the best game that I have evvvver played!

I love this game, I just wish the counter went past 99.

Works best on tablets. Better drawing surface.

Most fun I&#39;ve had on my phone in a while! Fun app! Worth $2!

Love app and that rounds go over 100!  But after newest round of updates, the game thinks I&#39;m logging into more than one device.

This game rocks.

I love the game.  Want to know how to drop deadbeats from my list of players.  No &quot;Resign&quot; option. Figured out how to delete a player.  Upgrades made a good game GREAT!!!!

A lot of fun no problems.....yet!

Best and simplest drawing game ever! Xperia mini.  Less reactive with glass covered screens.

So fun and addicting! Very entertaining!

Soooo addicting!

Lovee it. I&#39;m addicted

Addicting

Great game if you have a good partner   .

Super addicting and I just luv it!

Keep getting logged out and told I&#39;m playing on multiple devices, making me lose my last drawing or two. Even changed my impossible password. Please fix.

A whole lot of fun.

My absolute favorite game!!!

Love this game! Super fun and addicting!

About time...

Pure fun!

Super fun....good on travel too

Really cool game fun

This is a great game sometimes force closes on the Acer tablet but still a great game

Love it, kills time. Highly addictive!

It fuken dope:D

Addiction overload !

Great game! Got an iPad just for it!

The comments add and notification are great, no trouble with the paid version (droid charge) and just a fun game. Just gotta keep the words list fresh and its solid all around

Love this app, its so addictive.

This is a great laugh with friends ..

Addicting game love it!

Fun use of free time.

I get to play with my family and fruends...

Hours of entertainment, a good laugh

Addiction

I love playing this with all my family and friends. Thank you!

I love this game!

Upgraded to paid version because I love it!

Love it and glad that there is now notification. Thanks!

Gud time killer...

Love

Just starting and we love this!

Best game ever  !!;))

Most addicting game of all time!

I saw my friends playing this, so i gave it a try. Now im ADDICTED!

So addicting!!

Good fun

I love this game

Love it I&#39;m addicted to this game

Great game!! I have never drawn so many stick people!  My own drawings amuse me cuz they&#39;re so ridiculous.

Best game to play with friends and meet new ones! Cant wait to see what people draw!

Works great! Addictive

Love it! Great app on my htc g2 android. I would LOVE to see a zoom feature. And please make available for Kindle Fire :)

Thanks for listening about the SMS permission update!

A Must Play Game!

This is classic XD

Improving with each update :-)

Works great. Fun with friends. Love this app. Addictive.

Best game I bought the other version I love it

No probs on the lg rev

Download now!

love it

Improvements keep coming and its totally addictive!

Awesome game.

Notifications, smoother running, less battery drain. Its almost perfect. I can play it daily without destroying my battery. Love it!

Fun game, very addicting

Best app on here

It&#39;s fun and addictive.

Cooler than ice.

Love this game. would like more words or brushes.

Very addictive can not put it down 5star B-)

Awesome app get it now ....

Brilliant app, although sometimes its rather slow at starting up

My first app I bought, fun &amp; laughs. I lil glitch once but thats it! A little boring after weeks of play tho

I really enjoy this game

Great game, love the updates!!!

Best game ever!

Works great. Love it.

Great game, like pictionary for phones. V addictive!

Keeps me entertained when bored

Great app, very fun game for everyone.

Great game enjoyed

I can play this all day

Great game, love it!

AWESOME game!!!!  Fun for everyone. You don&#39;t have to be an artist to play!!!

The word to guess is quite repetitive though.

I like to have sex on here

Love it.  It&#39;s addictive.

I never play games but this is a fun app.

Lovvee iitttt!

Fab game

Love it

Very addictive.  U

Love this game!

So addictive. love it

I love it! Its so much fun!

Aweaome game! So much fun to play, absolutely no complaints!

You dont need to be an artist

Game is a lot of fun.

Awesome

Awesome

You should be able to save drawings... Like a scrapbook or hall of fame.  Either party&#39;s drawings. Works great, great game. Thunderbolt

awesome

So addicting!

Awesome game

Love it!

Addictive fun with friends. Love that it&#39;s cross platform. Friends with iThing can play with friends on Android.

Updated and way better!

Amazing app!

Very addictive

Can&#39;t get enough of this game!!!

A lot of interactivity and getting the mind sharpened whilst talking to your friends! Great app

I love this app!

I love this game!

Love it!

Gnex 4.0.4

Love interactivity, comments, app is light and game is fun

Fun with my family n. Friends

Love the game

Having a great time playing this with my family.

A fun/awesome game! ...&#39;nuff said!

This game is VERY addicting

QuaLity game

Most addictive ever!!!

I love this game

Best game ever!

Love this game.

Get it!

I wish I can connect with Older ,players ,and not getting the message That the player has too many games Right now ...

So fun!

Great way to keep in touch with those far away

My friends and I love this game!!!

I enjoy it

I love this!!!!

I love this game!!!

It i s so addictive!!!

Love it!

It&#39;s funny because everyone draws so bad with a touchscreen

Love this game!

I just love this game

Fab,love it!!!!

So fun!

Love it!!

Awsome game you guys

Amazing game...love it!

Awesome!                      Way better than Words With Friends

Awesome!

Love it

Love this game!

great!

Great! !!!!

Awesome

Great

Great game

Lots of fun

Must have

Time killer

AWESOME!!!!

fabulous!!!

Very addictive

Always looking for opponents!!!

Great app

You would LLLOOVVEE this game!!!

Samsung attain Android!!!

:-)

Love this game its very addictive..

Love the update!

Very addicting!

Absolute Blast!!

Like picturnary anywhere.. Abso love it.

Great game!

Great to pass the time. Love it.

Super addicting!!

Fun:)

Awesome app!! Fun and passes time.

Best game ever

Love it

Love it:-)

Perfect price and worth the buy.

So addictive! love this game :)

So fun

Love this game!

Great fun

A great app and very fun to draw with friends!

Awesome game!!

Fun!!!

:)

Best game ever

Really fun but addictive:)

Just love it

Addicted to this game!

Really like this game

Very fun and good game love it

Hope its free

Love this game!

This is a very fun app!!!

Love it!!

good.

Great game!!!

Love it!

Love this game

Love this app

Awesome game. Love it.

A lot of fun!

Love this game

So fun!

Siiiiiiiiiiiiiiiick braaaaaaaahhg

I love this game! It works great and satisfies my creative side when I don&#39;t have much time to do so. Fairly easy game to play, I play with all ages of people. Link your Facebook to play with friends instantly!  :)

Based on the omgpop &#39;draw my thing&#39;, the mobile version ROCKS. I love watching my friends try to draw simple concepts and words. Hilarious fun.

So much fun.

Great game, makes _ makes u think

Awesome game

New words added and now has notifications. Very fun an addictive game. Highly recommended. :)

I love this app. Great fun.

Love the game

fun and addicting  Motorola electrify

Great game.  Very addictive

Update is great! Good work!

:-)

Such an awesome game!

Fun

Very fun

Very addictive!

Love. Love. Love this app!

Love it its amazing xxx

Addictive

So fun

Love it!

Cant get enough! Love it!

Fun game! Ty!

Love it

Great game

Love it

Absolutely love this game!!!

Love it

Love it!!!!!

Love it

Love it

Such fun.

Love it

Soooooo fun!

Fun game!

Awesome game.

Just awesome

Such a great game

Addictive !!!

Great, fun game to play with friends near and far. Hilarious to see what they draw.

:) galaxy note

Mad

smart

Great game now

Addictive

Yep

dX2

Works!

Funny

Meh

Easy and fun to play! Better than free version because no ads and faster load times! - EVO 3D

This has to be one of the best games out there. Regardless of your artistic level, its entertaining and fun.  Esp if you are having a bad day.

Love it, especially because the devs listens and adds features like notifications ;-)

It Doesn&#39;t Start Up For Me

Love the notification so I don&#39;t have to keep checking!!! Sometimes doesn&#39;t send my drawings so I have to redo.. Other than that, addicted!! Need more words, I keep getting the same draws

This game is the most fun I&#39;ve had with a social game. The update fixed every problem I had with the game. Well done. I forsee many hours of play with this.

Really good would be great to delete games with people who are unresponsive

Love this game. Great to play in down time at college. ;D

I guarantee that if there were notifications, the number of downloads for paid version would spike. Still fun game though!

Thanks so much for notifications but also need sound too. Not sure why galaxy s2 users are sayin games gettin deleted for? Mine was fine. I did take Facebook update too maybe that&#39;s significant?

This game is really fun, and I don&#39;t really have too hard of a time getting coins to get new colors (usually games like this skew the gameplay so you have to spend $20 to progress, but not this). The only thing I find to be a nuisance is the lack of a notification system. I tend to forget which games I&#39;m currently playing and forget to check back.

Great game. Never laughed so hard! Thanks :)

The wife and I love playing this. Please add more words!

I have played these words several times... PLEASE ADD MORE WORDS!!!

I love the new feature to comment on recent turns, I used to result to drawing a message out instead lol. would love more words though since I do get the occasional repeat but not terribly often 5 stars!

Definitely worth the hype. Instantly addictive :)

First game I ever spent money on....it&#39;s that addicting!!!  Love it!

Thanks for fixing the screen timeout. Just need more words! Lots more words!

Great app thou my drawings are terrible ;)

Great. Since the update

Add the ability to save the person&#39;s picture or video of them drawing on your device.

The only bad thing about this app is that you will get addicted and your studies will suffer.

It just needs a feature where you can save the pics you and your friends draw some how. Or more view time when you are watching a replay.

I&#39;ve had a droid for over a year. This is the first app I&#39;ve ever paid for! So worth it!

My favorite game ever!!!! 1st &amp; only game/app I&#39;ve purchased ever!

Love it

Fun game. Keeps me occupied for hours at a time.

Its really fun but there needs to be a notification thing set up. Would make games a lot funner

This game is loads of fun...now even better since the updates for Android phones!

Please add &quot;are you sure&quot; popup when purchasing colors. Just accidentally tapped and purchased the wrong color pack.

But get some new words man.

This game is so fun!  By far my favorite app/game ever!  I am completely hooked!   Tmobile G2

More words are needed, but I can&#39;t seem to not play it

... And addicting game.

Cocaine&#39;s a Hella a drug!

Works great on my EVO 4g and acer a500 tablet

A perfect procrastination

Crack! HTC EVO 4G

Latest update is great.

Im completely addicted! I got all my family and friends playing too! Played the free version for a month, and now I just bought the full version!

Would give more stars, but freezes a lot &amp; is slow.  Fix &amp; I&#39;ll rerate

Love this game! Can not stop playin!

Got full version still cant play.Facebook friends keep crashing.not happy now fixed all is good

I love this game but you can spend your life on it if you aren&#39;t careful ;)

In a good way. De-rustifying my drawing skills (and inner kid).

Awesome

Makes it almost perfect!  Great game,  very addicting. Only things left to add would be ability to leave one drawing back to list instead of exiting and cancel games that other person hasn&#39;t replied to in x amount of time.

Love it, way fun... Getting extra colors opened me up to more choices!

I love this game! It is so addictive

I am loving the simplicity of this game. Myself and my wife are consumed by this game

Love this game, hard to put down! Makes me want to brush up on my doodlin skills

Best, most addictive game I&#39;ve ever played

Love it

Love this app!!

Love it simple fun on my gnote

Love it

Not too time consuming

........notifications added that rox......other then that super fun!

Nice to know no one I know can draw either!

Keeps force closing!! Please fix!

My only complaint about this game is that not enough of my friends are playing it... yet.  :-)

I like this game

luv it

Awesome and highly addictive

Cool game

This game is awesome

Its so fun

Let&#39;s see, looks and plays perfectly on by Xoom and Galaxy Nexus, is only $1, and is absolutely fantastic. No complaints. Awesome Android game! Awesome updates!

Works great now that it has notifications.

!!

Super addictive!!

This game is addicting, the updates made it awesome.

Fun

A good app

Exremely fun and often hilarious.

Love it.

Super duper fun hall

Love it!

Awesome!

Love this game &amp; updates are amazing

Awesome game

Absolutely LOVE it... can&#39;t get enough of it!

;)

Very addictive.

Was apprehensive about this one as I cannot draw but so much fun as most of your friends apparently can&#39;t either ;) The update allowing comments....we ask we receive, thanks!

Love the game. So addictive and fun. I only wish it would notify me when someone has had their turn. Then I will give 5 stars. *edit* with new update it now notifies me. 5 stars!

Phenomenal game!!!

The new update gave me everything I asked for in my previous 4-star review. A well deserved bump to 5 stars is in order.  Great turn-based game to play with friends.  Would be called &quot;Drawing with Friends&quot; if developed by Zynga. Feature request: Please add a tap to continue after we have guessed the drawing so that we have more than a split second to appreciate the art!  Also, add some 50% opacity brushes to the store.

Updating my rating...it is now the best game ever!! A HUGE improvement with the notification icon! Also, love how messages can be sent to opponents!

Omg u have to get this game! Its amazing and always keeps you entertained (; all my friends play its awesome!!!! I recommended everyone to buy this!

Been great since I upgraded. Wish there was a undo last move and different brush shapes tho (like airbrushing.)  *update- undo last move added. Thanks guys*

Good game can get addicting! More fun with friends as random people will cheat and use words takes away from the fun and point of the game. FOR THOSE OF YOU WILL WHO CHEAT WE WILL NOT GUESS YOUR WORD SO YOU RECEIVED FREE COINS EARN THE THE HARD WAY PUT A LITTLE WORK IT IT.. Anyways a good game if used right

I love this game. It is so much fun interacting with your friends. Even better now with the new updates allowing you to comment. Sometimes a little slow loading, but worth it!

Very addictive and never gets boring. Updated features are brilliant, only problem is when drawing too close to the top, the colour occasionally changes, but a minor complaint really!

Lots of fun but needs some features. Notifications for when it&#39;s your turn, ability to see your drawings in between guesses, and a menu UI that let&#39;s you navigate easier using the back button without closing.  Also, let people shop for colors on the main screen, not just in game, I mean it&#39;s called the shop.

Update! And now, suddenly, I&#39;ve got push notifications AND it doesn&#39;t freeze up my screen!!!  So, changing it to 5 stars, though Draw Free still times out and exits on my 7 y.o.&#39;s iPod Touch, which bums her out terribly.  ------------------- I would have given it a 4, for lack of push notifications, but the new update blacks out the screen and freezes my galaxy sII.  So, it&#39;s impressive, all things considered, that I still give it a 3, but the game is really fun, if I can ever get it to work again.

Would love to be able to replay the drawings.  Watch the other player draw again.

Latest update is great! OMGPop really listens to their customers! I love this game and now with comments, undo move and notifications, I love it even more!	This pictionary-like game is completely addicting. I&#39;m sure I believe there are 2500 words; I&#39;ve had several repeats. But it&#39;s still a blast.

It just needs notifications and more words.  To those who don&#39;t know how to delete a game: do a sideways swipe gesture on the game button of the game you want to delete.  It will turn into a red &quot;Delete&quot; button, which you then tap to confirm you want to delete that game.  And there is a &quot;Skip&quot; button when watching the drawings.  UPDATE: The new notifications are okay, but it really needs to make a sound when the notification happens so I can know it is my turn even when my tablet&#39;s screen isn&#39;t on.  I get notified by sound and icon for another game as well as e-mail, but need this game to be sound as well, not just icon.

Like annoying others doing better pics on my galaxy note. Haha

I held off on reviewing until they got the minks worked out. Now I give it a perfect score!Awesome game.

I have played this game way too much and almost have all the colors, but here is my list of improvements to make this app perfect, notifications on when a turn is taken, a 5th line thickness(between the 2 thinnest ones) and an option to save some of the art, thank you for such an addicting app!

This game has outlasted the attention span of all other games. I keep coming back. Two thumbs up.

I waste too much time on Draw Something. Thanks!!!

This is an awesome game! You guys should try &quot;Rage of Bahmut&quot; too! Its a cool card game, and if you use the code &quot;ewn44350&quot; (without the quotes) you&#39;ll get free in-game items and cash! (You enter it at the end of the turtorial, it&#39;s called a referral code)

I wish there was a feature that would allow you to replay your opponent&#39;s drawing, and a &quot;tap to continue&quot; after the drawing is finished would be nice. (Some of my friends are great artists!), but otherwise perfect! Would love more new word choices, too.

* Upgraded to 5 stars with this upgrade. Colours restored &amp; I like comment feature. * I have bought colours 5 times, and keep losing them. Where do they go?  Facebook page does not answer users&#39; questions. Needs more words, with English spelling not American. How about the ability either to type a short comment, or maybe rate the drawing.  I like the game, but PLEASE ANSWER: how can I keep the colours I buy?

Couldn&#39;t be happier with the new features. I love this app so much I bought it. First game I ever bought!

What a great idea for a game! The new features are great! All it needs is the ability to save drawings! Also, the points system should be more complex, rewarding better drawings and faster guessing, rather than just a lump reward based on difficulty of the word.  Well worth a buck, that&#39;s for sure!

An option to speed up the drawing your guessing or eliminating the pauses the other person does while drawing would be nice

It won&#39;t let me open it.. What the hell does &#39;s3e&#39; mean?!!! &gt;:(

Excellent game, but please, please, please add notifications to the Android version. Until then, holding back on 5 stars unfortunately  Update 19th April : Notifications added and more, updated to 5*

only wish my android warp came with pen to be more detailed in my drawings or maybe that i could choose palate size to have more room to draw.

I loved this game so much. I&#39;m happy with the updates. I&#39;m on this game everyday and like five or six times a day. One thing I think this game needs is to be able to report someone. I know kids play this game and one guy that I started playing with through the random pick I would have reported in a heart beat. He started writing out Cruse words. I know I would not want my kids playing With someone like that. So please Omgpop at least think about adding that.

If I had reviewed this App after a week of playing it, then it would&#39;ve got 3 stars for the fact that on the Galaxy note, it crashed out over a mobile network and I could only play it over a wifi network. Since the update today, I can now play it over my mobile network, so 5 stars awarded.  The new additions are good too, with the ability to write comments back and forth after you guess the other persons word and the notifications are great too.  Love this App much better now, I can play it again.

I love the features in this update, this game is very Fun, just pick it up, and go. I would like to see more colors if you buy the game. like if you get the paid version, you get 5 free colors. But very good game nonetheless. also, I find I have to keep reinstalling because the game won&#39;t launch, all I get is a black screen, then it goes back to my home screen.

I just bought the paid version and it doesn&#39;t update the player&#39;s turn. Stuck on waiting for the other player.

Great update! I love this game. It be cool if the colors were easier to scroll through, maybe two or three rows?

Haven&#39;t had a chance to enjoy the new notification feature, but giving it 5 stars assuming it will work. Hard t draw on a small phone, but totally fun.  I accidently hit the bombs with my stubby fingers instead of letters which is really frustrating. But other then that, I&#39;m addicted. Bought the paid version and no ad&#39;s are totally worth it. Last thought, like others, I wish I could view the drawing longer after I guess it.

I play everyday and love it! Only wish there were more words and words that are more fun to draw, but otherwise great game play with my hubby all the time even when were both at work

Im very happy with the update havent had any issues all colours and bombs are back excellent work youll have hours of fun!!!

1st game app I&#39;ve given 5 stars to.  Please add a &quot;continue&quot; button at the end of a game, so we can have as long as we like to look at the picture our friend drew. Some are really good or funny, and they&#39;re only on the screen a second. Also needs a practice mode, a &quot;back&quot; button that takes you back to the games list screen instead of out of the game,  and would like to be able to click on waiting games and see the pic I drew.

This game is super addictive! It is a lot of fun and I can&#39;t ever put it down...and for .99, the full version is worth the buy too!

Play it all day on my EVO 3d. Fantastic, addictive game :)

And the latest update on my android is excellent..... sending comments or clues, or even a simple hello...... great game.

Fun game once I figured out how to get the new colors I bought. They totally fixed all the problems! Thanks

Lots of fun! I play it everyday. These new updates are great!

This game is great, but there just isn&#39;t enough time to appreciate some drawings. A free draw mode (like paint) where we could publish to Facebook or just save for the fun of drawing would be fantastic! Or at least allow us to save to file inbound or outbound drawings :-)

Really fun game when you&#39;re bored. Needs to not repeat words so much though

So much fun would like to see what I&#39;m drawing, and not have to use my finger but the pictures still turn out fine so not a real compliant

This app rocks. The new features are great too and the support is to notch. Just 3 wishes; you could use the back key to get to home page, you could buy colours in the shop, and more words/less repeats. x x

I changed my review from one star to FIVE stars. The latest update and all the improvements they have made are great. Bugs have been worked out too. HTC THUNDERBOLT

Ok so i phone version it pops up in middle of screen when notifys them a big fan of this game. Please make it notify me like pop. In middle of screen just like i phone also sotimes says connecting and never goes please fix that too

Great game, extremely addicting, but it still has room for some improvement

I&#39;m having fun. That&#39;s the main thing ey? My finger is too bloody big. :) This game would be mad on a galaxy note!! :D

Sooooo much fun! Wish they had a paint bucket. I play all the time .

I really enjoy this game. Now that they&#39;ve added the notification feature to let you know when someone has drawn it&#39;seven better. I also like that you&#39;re able to delete the game of people who haven&#39;t played in awhile, unlike WWF. Only gripe is I keep getting the same words to draw over and over. Great concept and very fun.

I am addicted to this game. Wish there were a way to save a drawing to our phones or something thou.

Android has had the notification bar from the beginning, so it seems kind of backward that we don&#39;t have notifications.

I really enjoy this game a lot. It&#39;s great for hanging out with friends who are in other states too :) I tried the free version but I like the paid version a lot more and it&#39;s worth it because you get lots of coins to get more colors.

I AM PASSIONATELY, WILLINGLY ADDICTED 2 THIS GAME! In fact of my current 20 on-going games: 8 are w/my FB Friends but the larger # is games I&#39;ve begun w/&quot;strangers&quot;!  I LOVE this feature which assists in the random match-up of players; Thank You, Team! This function helps players 2 connect w/other *drawsome* draw-addicts (draddicts?) out there across the globe! We &quot;Draddicts&quot; always have the option 2 create new (or *more*) Drawsome Experiences!  MY ALL-TIME FAVE APP! THANK U 4 this GAME &amp; CULTURE PHENOM!

Smooth game flow and hours of fun... Brings me back to Pictionary days... lol

Upgraded, but didn&#39;t get all 400 coins.....bought one pallet of new colors and was only left with 72, when I had more than 160+.  Wanted to get MORE colors!  Should have been able to buy two pallets! Needs notifications!. Will give 5 when I get what&#39;s do for the upgrade!

I hate that ios gets stuff before we do. Great. Add the ability to save drawings and it&#39;ll be on point. People don&#39;t even realize that this update added UPDATES(notified when someone took their turn).

I love this game!  This is the only game I have ever bought!  The only problem is evertime it updates I have to uninstall it and reinstall to get it to work

I find myself never getting bored... A couple repeat words, always different players though. Only con: some words are friggin hard to draw.

i wish we could purchase eraser packs that would have different shapes as sizes.

Please add option for non FB users to add user pics!

Even if this is the paid for version. Zynga will do anything for more cash. Program is 5 stars, purchaser gets 1.

Well this game is awesome. Apart from some glitches

So addicting!!!!! In the process of playing you can meet new people, see drawings etc... play against friends, family .. i wish you could see then drawing as theyre drawing instead of waiting... but i oh well

Such an addictive game. Have suffered with a few crashes before, but often a reboot of phone is enough to sort. Lots of fun though, highly recommended!

Snap! Notifications! If my colors stick around, you can keep 5 stars!

So happy with the upgrade, its faster and has push notifications for the Droid. Thank you soooooooooooo much!!!! Awesome job, people!

with added notifications and other new additions, totally 5 stars!  Loads of fun.

Most recent update finally fixed notification issues and the game is awesome.

SO COOL AFTER THE LAST UPDATE!!! But can you add something so you can combine your Facebook account with your non Facebook account? Still cool though, I recommend this game!

Please put in an are you sure about using the bombs, my son keeps using mine for me :-(

Id seen it on fail blog but didnt understand until it hit my circle like wild fire. Cant stop, need new words.

I enjoy playing this game. I use on my phone but really works great on the ipad. Hint: get a stylus....it makes drawing so much easier...my stylus works on both my phone and ipad. Fun for kids as well as grown ups!!

This is a really fun way to connect with friends and recall how bad I really am at drawing haha

Ive never paid for an app but this game was worth it!!! Oh and LOVE the new features from the update!

Very fun and addicting.  I love the new notification and the ability to comment on a drawing.  Its alsonice that I can delete old games that haven&#39;t been played in a while.  Nice job guys!  I changed my rating from 3 stars to 5 with this update.  Maybe next update will include ability to save a drawing???

Love playing need new words....but it still never gets old.

My gane for some reason the game just instantly closes out every time that I start it, though after restarting my phone and doing a battery pull, the problem vanished. May have just been a bug.

With 18.04. update my drawing quality greatly improve. Touch screen response is great. Keep it updating. Very good! *****

Upgraded and now it wont work! When i open the app it forces close so I cant even play @all..I did Love it until now!! Hard to draw on a phone screen tho..but still love it!

Best game ever, lol!  The update is great (4/19/12) and love the &quot;say something&quot; function, but the &quot;cancel&quot; button is where my finger wants &quot;send&quot; to be, so I keep hitting cancel instead of send, &amp; losing the opportunity to comment.

I love this game. Played the free version first but bored of getting repeated words so upgraded. When I tried playing the paid version originally it wouldn&#39;t load for a few days. Now it opens perfectly and I have no problems. I love all of the new updates and I think its great value for money. My only quibble is that some of the words I&#39;ve never heard of and wouldn&#39;t have a clue what to draw. This is the most played game on my phone. Keep up the great work guys.

Great game...would love other options to &quot;buy&quot; other than just colors...like simple shapes or background colors so you don&#39;t need to color in the  background yourself

No issues, love that its interactive, affordable &amp; hilarious without trying! CONS: do NOT like new violence words like &#39;STAB&#39; :-( kids play this!

I love this game and since the latest update it&#39;s even better!   I love the &quot;undo&quot; button and the fact that we can now leave comments after guessing a drawing.

Please add ability to download to kindle fire, I want a big screen!  And iPhone permits screen shots so you can save your art. Possible for android too?  Great game, I am addicted!

Updates are really cool, apparently they have been listening!!

Wish u could save draw ings

Love playing this game with my family but such a slow network. Also, too many cheaters. It&#39;s called Draw Something not spell the answer out to get three coins every time. Take time drawing, discover your creative side and earn those desperately needed extra colors.

Excellent game! My only wishlist is option to show the selected color name, it will greatly help me since im red/green colorblind

Worked great for a week then just didn&#39;t open anymore.

This game was made for the Galaxy Note!  WAY too much fun...  but too many repeat phrases...  even to the same users...  need to patch that.

Love this game its so addictive. Even better now with the notification when someone has drawn something :)

Now just need more sizes! Then I&#39;m happy! :o) Great game easy to play &amp; lots of word choices. Love the bombs to change words &amp; eliminate letters. Overall a great game. Has come a long way from its modest beginnings

Thanks to NOTIFICATIONS!! Great App/Game

Love it if so when ever u update can u Mark it to where u can message friends better but great game thanks again.

Love the update! But now suddenly today it keeps closing on me. I can&#39;t even open it! Tried reboot 6 times.....

This is my number one go to app.  Great app.  I have had many conversations lately based on this game.

Game is great,addictive &amp; well worth the upgrade from free. As has been said a million times already - notifications would be a VERY welcome addition.

Not loading games, I sent a game request to a friend and it said it was sent but, after I closed the program and reentered, the game wasn&#39;t there and it wouldn&#39;t let me start a new one. Now my open games won&#39;t load. The loading ring in the top left corner is continuously spinning, I&#39;ve tried switching to 3G, changing wifi connections. Nothing is working. I love this game, please fix it.  Paid for full version and it still didn&#39;t fix.

Absolutely love this game! Only complaint is that it takes forever to load. Other than that, the game is drawsome!!!

Heaps of fun, great laugh with friends &amp; randoms! - DREW-DOGZ

Can you no say what&#39;s specifically being updated??

I&#39;ve gotta say, this is one of the most addictive game ever!

Good, but comments need to stay on for longer so you can read them.

Great update. Could been nicer when more people were playing. Draw something is almost dead. Everyone is awaiting the next fad...

Love this game. We need more levels. After 99 we should go to five word choices &amp; harder pix to draw. WE NEED MORE!! haha totally addicted to this game:-)

I lose all my colors and bombs since latest update! Grrrrr!

I upgraded BUT STILL HAVE ADS. Unacceptable

Great way to pass thr time, never have any issues with this app! -Samsung Epic

Thank you sooo much for the notification icon!! And the comment bar is great too! ! Great job on listening to the reviews!! Great game!

How in the world you play friends through twitter I can&#39;t figure out. Funniest app I&#39;ve ever downloaded!

Especially now it has notifications, there are loads of different words and works brilliantly! So muh fun!

Love the game, and with the most recent update I honestly can&#39;t find a single criticism. Thanks OMGPOP!

The game is fun. My concern is that now my game is having blackout moments. I will be in the middle of watching a drawing or drawing something myself and my screen goes black. I have uninstalled and really installed and am still having the same issues.

Works fab. Addicted now :-D

This is one of the most addictive games...I love it! The most recent update that allows for notifications makes it even better. I can&#39;t get enough! :-)

Love the upgrades, but what happened to the stuff you said would be in it in the email you sent me?  Where&#39;s the &quot;gallery&quot; function?

The latest update makes this a 5 star app. I&#39;m hooked on this game, playing with friends and unknowns.

Updates have fixed problems and added new features...still wish you could save drawings...5 stars!

Fix the bugs! Games don&#39;t load, etc., etc... I love this game- bought the paid version and everything. If they would fix the problems that everyone keeps complaining about, they&#39;d have a flawless game. Till then, 2 stars is being MORE than generous. -- update: I&#39;m installing the latest update now and I&#39;m happy to hear that there are new features and the bugs have been worked out. 4 stars until I play and see for myself if it&#39;s finally worth 5.

The update came with all what people were expecting. Super fun game!!!

I have a few games that are stuck.  They say &quot;waiting for their turn&quot; but they went already.. same with me.  They haven&#39;t received my updated game saying they are waiting for me.. any fix?

I recently found this game and I&#39;m hooked. I start tons of random games, just so I can keep playing!!

I play this all day.  So much fun.  Very addictive.

I&#39;ve been playing for about 2 weeks now. So fun, very few bugs. Great for all ages!

got the purchased version and it keeps crashing! especially when u want to create a new game! Not happy :-(

I want to be able to share/save my fave drawings!

would be awesome if you could see your notification bar to monitor your battery and time... also I&#39;m happy u made the animations faster

Its really fun. Only issue is that your streak doesn&#39;t go past 99...

Yup, I&#39;ve fallen for this game everyone has been talking about!! :)  however my drawing is terrible! ;)

So far the I like the New update. It finally goes past 100 and it also let&#39;s u send a message with your drawings. And they finally added notifications for it. Love it, still needs more words though but overall great job

Love this game. I appreciate the option that you can either pay to obtain all the color add ons or you can play x amount of games and earn the credits to purchase the packs. Works Perfectly on Evo3D and Toshiba Thrive Tablet Honeycomb

Presently going thru difficult times, but this game only thing that makes me giggle ...either guessing or watching someone guess.

Now, that I&#39;ve decided to upgrade - I hope to see new words.

Loads of fun.  Really is better with paid version, the colors on free suck (I&#39;m sure on purpose).  But definitely worth the 99 cents!

Multi player game on Android as far as I am concerned. Especially with the latest update adding notifications. Good job developers.

The update really improved the App. It doesn&#39;t crash anymore and works fine. The new features i do find quite pointless however. But all in all. The update has prompt me to go from 2 star, to 5 star.

Totally addictive. Please add more words. I&#39;ve only played about 50 games and I&#39;ve had several words twice... and I&#39;m on the paid version. Thanks!

I love the new features :) thank you.  I am so glad it notifies me when someone has a drawing for me to view.  (not working all the time but i love that feature).

Love this game way too much, I had to buy it lol

Had to re-install Draw (paid) on new phone, and all coins + colors were lost. Just increased rating to 5-star since today new update brought back my coins, colors, and awesome new features like notify and drawing comments. Well done!

Totally hooked! Would love some updates such as new colour packs and more opportunities to win coins. E.g. If we complete 25 rounds, we get 5 coins and then more when we finish round 50 and so forth. Good fun nonetheless!

This game has taken over my life...

Would give 6 stars if we had the screen shot option like the iphones

Love the game, totally addicted!

Love it. Like the fact I can play with my FB friends. Definitely needs a thinner line between the first and second line you can draw with.

Maybe enable notifications

Knew zynga would clean it up. Nice work, and fast. Wish it had a snapshot feature so I can save my fave drawings. Not easy on android  like apple :/

Just what u needed thanks!!

Only game I know that I can play with my roommates and grandmother

Still some small bugs to work out but the new update (and features) have made a big improvement!

The notifications must be toggled on in settings. Fun &amp; addicting game with real people.

Fixed everything that needed to be! Thank you!

Would be a 5 if there was a notification, instead of having to randomly check to see if someone played...and being able to replay...and messaging between players...(features WWF has)...***game has updated, and is now a 5 star game

Extremely fun. I would recommend having the option to save drawings you&#39;ve made in a gallery of some sort. Very good game otherwise!

Love love love this ap, and even better with update!  Notifications and writing comments to friends makes it so much fun!

this game is sooooo much fun! i love it, it&#39;s ready to use and great to see how creative people can be.

Awesome game. Five stars for getting a notify button on android!

A little buggy, but great game with upgrading features all the time

I hope it survives another andriod update though. Be prepared and have your update to a new android update ready, Lookout. Don&#39;t be like other virus protections.

:)

Simple yet brilliant you can&#39;t really complain about it it is what it is so just enjoy it

Love! But makes my phone go whacky sometimes...but very addicting game and i am obsessed lol

super fun and top faves... download it to see what im talkin bouy!

Really addicting! Beware! Lol

I love this game. Its easy to play and have fun with friends.

No longer crashes on 3g since update! All good very happy customer!

I love the update :) read my mind for the being able to talk to other player

finally notifications when I have a new drawing!! five stars for u!!

I am totally addicted!!! Loving the new updates too, fantastic!

Would be cool if you could create your own word games. An undo feature for when drawing would be a good idea also.

Game is fun to play throughout the day, i check it as much as facebook noe.

Love this game. Half the funny is the goof pics people draw. Would not change anything.

My fav game!

There were a few glitches and people complained, but you fixed them all and now have a fantastic game! LOVE THIS APP, A MUST HAVE!

Editing my review... This gets 5 stars now since they did add notifications in this update. Yay! // So addictive. Only thing I wish it had was notification when it is your turn.

With the new patch, it notifies! The added comment section is also nice so you can yell at poor drawings!

Its a fun game 2 play &amp; highly addictive. &amp; its great of I need a laugh

5 stars now for notifications!

Grabe ang draw something talaga!

Only paid 99 cents for it- best dollar you&#39;ll spend on a game. They just updated it and made a good game an exellent game!

Lots of fun wih friends really worth the 99c as words repeat with free version

I love this game and post all my drawings to the SomethingDrawn website.

The game is very fun, Last Update everything is ok.

Best, simplest drawing app on the market. You dont have to be Picasso to play this game... But you&#39;d still enjoy it if you were!

Game is alot better with the update. Best game ever cant stop playing!!

I rated this 4 stars but now I am rating 5 stars because now it&#39;s faster and I have notifications!

I love this game, but it keeps shutting my phone down when I play and I have paid version and I keep getting the same words also I cant download the update but LOVE IT !

My one complaint: it lets the phone fall asleep. It&#39;s annoying when I&#39;m trying to watch the other person draw and the screen suddenly blacks and I have to unlock my phone.

If only it went passed level 99 and more words were added on updates.

Changed review to 5 stars since game works great now and the updates are just making things better..way to listen devs!

This is 10x better than the other version I was wondering what exactly I was paying the 99cents for when I first got it now its well worth more give. On the update

So much fun! Would love speed control for playbacks, and an export and history feature

The only downside is some of the people that choose to write the word out. I wouldn&#39;t be against a &quot;report&quot; or &quot;flag&quot; feature. They are a minority though so don&#39;t fear downloading this game. Also just as a bug fix/spelling error, in the shop it says &quot;0 bombs bombs&quot;. Again, fantastic game and absolutely worth your $0.99.

We play at work, play at home, play while traveling ...just fun

Very happy about the update. Good work, guys.

It keeps force closing and when I log onto Facebook it thinks I&#39;m someone else and that I&#39;m playing on two devices! Now sorted thx a lot!

I love the game! No more crashes on exiting. HTC EVO 3D.

I play so much the words get repetitive but there are new words added a lot. I&#39;m gladly addicted.

SO glad I can have my omgpop fix on the go with draw something. I also like the fact there is no time limit to draw.

Love love love this game.  It would be kind of cool with a chat option.  Sometimes won&#39;t load right. Needs notifications. Even with those problems I still give it 5 stars.

Not earning any coins :(

Everything I asked for, they fixed in the updates. Best game ever. Changing to five stars

Now getting notifications and can comment.  Most bugs fixed.  Thanks Dev!

All issues fixed in update, now perfect game, up from.1 star to 5.HTC sensation XE

This game just went through a major update and is better than ever! They added chat. Added notifications for android. Upped the max turns! OMGPOP you did an awesome job!

This game is GREAT! Very entertaining and hilarious! It would be awesome if you could look back on prior drawings, at least the last one. Regardless, FABULOUS GAME!

Update has sorted the freezing problem when on 3G, like the comment option now after a round and its a bit faster...now gets my 5 stars

Love it .....

One thing i think is needed is more settings...like notification alerts..

Love the notifications. Love the game!

You don&#39;t have to be able to draw to play it.

Now that its updated, it has everything we needed! thank you so much

I dont know why bt the game wont let me play!!! :( bt hopefully after uninstall it, it would work.

Great game! Completely addicting. I got my mom and fiancee hooked. Always playing! :)

There were a few bugs in the beginning, but now it&#39;s PERFECT! Fun, challenging and addictive. Enough said. [:

I like this game so much, I no longer have a life; I&#39;ve left my job and my family have disowned me :)

totally brilliant!

Definitely &#0;one of the most successful multi player app. Extremely fun and addictive. Look forward to more improvements and game modes

Love it. Shame you can&#39;t keep some of the pictures.

Love this game. Very addicting! Family and friends play and keep in touch around the world.

Love love love!! Would like notifications though.

I&#39;m always trying to create good drawings, its addictive! And now you&#39;ve added notifications its even better, thankyou!

Yup.

I friggin love it!!!

So much fun, though the colour buying confused Mr a little.

One of my favorite games. My only complaint is that the words repeat too much.

Its the coolest!!

I love this game :-) very pleased with the updates for notifications and the pull to refresh feature.

Started playing with some friends and now I can&#39;t put it down! This is the best multiplayer mobile game on the market!

Game of the year for phones anyway def get it

Best game ever!  Soooooo much fun on my EVO 4G.

Once you reach 99 it stays 99 I wish there a higher scoring system keep game motivtion going

Since the update its been running great, I LOVE this game and so do my friends!

Keeps crashing after recent update :(

I cant help it im addicted. I love the new features of sending notifications and being able to send text to the other player.

One of the best games ever pity about having to pay for everything could do it that every 5/6right then a life is earned

Will keep you entertained with your friends for ages! Highly addictive!

How can I play with people who aren&#39;t on my facebook?

It&#39;s pictionary with friends and you can play at your own pace. Great Buy!

Wish there were more words to choose from.

Love playing with all my out of town family and freinds!

Freaking love this game. So addicting.

Push notifications, more than 99 turns, comments....thanks!

Very addictive - update brings much needed features. Maybe more words needed too but otherwise great.

Love this game just wish it notified you when its your turn

Great game but needs more words to choose from.

Very addictive. Glad it has some new features though

The game is very fun but it should give us the option to refresh the list cause sometimes it doesn&#39;t refresh on its own.. I luv that we can message our friends now...

Make it so U can back out of a drawing without having to quit the game.

Love the update now I don&#39;t need to keep opening the app to see if someone went yet!!!!!!!!!  THANKS VERY MUCH for the update

They improved on everything i mentioned! From improving the icon to notifications and now its the perfect game at its best !!

Gteat game, really fun.  Should give option to save photos

Love this game!  So much fun! :)

Can&#39;t login via facebook, says fail!!

Would love to be able to see everything on my screen but hope my next phone will do better.

Love love the new update! Great game! Comments... refresh...notifications......new words....more than 99 games! Great job!........HTC Evo

Worth purchasing! No ads and more words.  Great way to kill time when you&#39;re our and about.

give us an airbrush!

Finally a game my husband doesn&#39;t mind playing! We have a blast!

Love how creative people can be! Even the vague drawings are good. Keeps me busy with my broken ankle!

This is addictive . I need to get more colors .

I love the game! Improved the rating since the notification was added.

I love this game just bought the full version! Great job guys!

Love it can be made easy or hard

Works great on my Droid X. thank u for adding the notification feature!! :)

Boredom buster

Herkese oneririm.

By far my favorite app EVER! Been playing for months and still enjoying it!!

Great app! Vary addicting!

This game is so addicting! Love it n I&#39;m looking forward to all the updates!!

Great new update today! One suggestion though...could you please add an option to play with a friend where you can pass the game back and forth between the same device when both people are in the room?

I adore this game and the recent updates made it even better!

I want ZOOM function !

Endless fun, flawless game.

soooo happy the update has included notifications and comments!! freaking love this game

I wish I could save the drawings or that I could share them on facebook

Amazing app!  It definitely brings everyone you care about together!  I love it!

Even tho I draw like a 5yo &gt;_&lt;

Repetition of words sucks, the more you play, but other than that...it is pretty fun.

Love love love it!!!

I like app but I wish I could save my drawings onto my Android phone

Love the new update and this game! Its literally my addiction. I do wish this was available on my kindle fire though!

Love the game, next update, pick your own words using bombs as payment :) I&#39;m addicted so is my bro, bf, mum!

A little buggy but far better since the update, a must have.

Fun to play and see other folks&#39; drawings

Pictionary on the web, ace game &amp; improving all the time.  A fill tool might be good ;-)

Only wish I could do a screen shot so I can show of my highest turn stats

Addicted! Had a 4 star rating but changed it to 5 because I now get notifications on my Droid when its my turn!! :)

To share on Facebook and twitter and to be able to save those drawings on our phone. I have the iPod Touch and it got updated too but including those new features.. hope it comes to Android...

Love the new updates! Why did I yell?

What exactly does this nudge button do bc to me it doesn&#39;t seem to do anything. Best game ever tho

I LAV DIS GAIME. MOAR PL0X

U fixed it yea that&#39;s wassup love this game. Great job!!!

Updates have made it 5 star...

Just wish u started off with more colors

Game is so addictive and with the new updates even better! Love it!

Greatest word/picture game ever!

Love the game just need new words... bt enjoy playing &amp; love the new update:)

Now its a 5 star!

I get stuck playing every chance I get!!!

Love it

Fun Game - Great update - Still Waiting On Image Save Option

So worth the buck! I play 35+ games at once...addictive!

Reminds me of when I was a kid and I used to play pictionary!

I play on my Motorola Xoom tablet and it&#39;s amazing and quite addicting! xP Play with me: Madiekat

Easy and addictive. Can&#39;t say more than that.

Love this game. Just wish ppl would stop saying the word.

Yay push notifications

Thanks!

With the new update it us even better!!

Yeaaaaaah notifications are here finally. Good job

Really nice app! Can&#39;t stop drawing! :)

Does anyone know how to get rid of games where opponent is not playing?

The best app ever! One suggestion: MORE WORDS! ! !

Having some issues viewing there msgz sent to me

Top game..... And a right laugh

I extremely love this app. I am addicted like crazy. And just downloaded the version you pay for and gunna try it out..

I passed level 100 but it only goes to 100!!!!

Love it!  Would be even better if I had a stylus for my phone.

Lots of fun and challenging. Keeps family and friends in touch.

LOVE THE UPDATE! NOTIFICATION! YESSS... EXCEPTIONAL!

Fun!  The only game I&#39;ve ever liked enough to pay for!

